A 2-year follow-up of 233 very mild (CDR 0.5) Alzheimer's disease patients (REAL.FR cohort).Making an early diagnosis of Alzheimer's Disease (AD) is becoming increasingly important. The Clinical Dementia Rating scale (CDR), a semi-structured interview with patient and caregiver, is a global rating scale designed for use in staging dementia. The primary objective of our study was to examine the evolution of AD in individuals with very mild AD (CDR 0.5) across a 2-year follow up.A cohort of AD patients (n=682) living in the community were followed during 2 years in 16 centres of the French AD network. Each subject underwent extensive medical examination including the MMSE and CDR every 6 months.Two hundred and thirty-three AD patients were rated CDR 0.5 at baseline (mean MMSE score: 23.15+/-2.57). They were younger and reported an average duration of symptoms of approximately 0.8 years less than patients with CDR >or= 1.During the 2-year follow-up, none of the AD CDR 0.5 subjects improved; 65% of them showed an increase in the CDR score. The rate of cognitive decline was similar between the AD CDR 0.5 and CDR >or= 1 groups. The ADL decline was more significant in patients with CDR >or= 1 at inclusion.It is certainly possible to identify AD at a very early stage focusing on intra individual change in cognitive and functional impairment. Criteria with a high sensitivity and specificity for detecting AD at an early stage will help to further develop effective pharmacological and behavioural interventions for delaying the onset and progression of the disease.New computer-based cognitive function test for the elderly.We developed a modified trail-making test using a PC and touch panel and compared it with the mini mental state examination (MMSE). The test consisted of a series of numbers from 1 to 36, randomly arranged across the display. The object of the test was for the subject to touch the numbers in order, beginning with 1 and ending with 36, in as little time as possible. The system consisted of a PC and a liquid crystal display (LCD) touch-panel screen. One hundred and thirty-four patients with dementia performed the test. Sixty of the 134 patients (15 male, 45 female; average age, 81.1 +/- 7 years) were diagnosed as having Alzheimer's disease and the others had cerebrovascular dementia. Sixty-two of 134 patients (23 male, 39 female; average age, 77.6 +/- 8 years; MMSE score, 21.5 +/- 5.6 points) completed the test. The correlation coefficient between test performance time and MMSE score was -0.534. This test may also be a useful indicator of focal frontal lesions and can be used as an early screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Prediction of probable Alzheimer disease in patients with symptoms suggestive of memory impairment. Value of the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is a widely used diagnostic tool for dementia. Its use as a predictive indicator of probable Alzheimer disease (AD) has not been established.To determine the accuracy of the MMSE in predicting emergent AD in a sample of patients who were referred because of symptoms suggestive of memory problems and to determine whether an abbreviated version of the MMSE could be developed that would be as accurate as the full MMSE in predicting emergent AD.Inception cohort of participants with symptoms suggestive of memory impairment by their family physicians were given baseline assessments, including MMSE. After 2 years, the participants' conditions were diagnosed following the standard criterion for AD. Diagnosticians were blind to baseline scores.One hundred eighty-three community-residing participants were referred by their family physicians to a university teaching hospital research investigation. After baseline screening, 165 participants were included in the study who did not have dementia and had no identifiable cause for memory impairment. After 2 years, 29 participants met criteria for AD, 98 did not develop dementia, 18 developed vascular lesions or non-AD dementia, and 20 did not return.Diagnostic classification of AD or no evidence of dementia.Logistic regression model was significant. At a cutoff score of 24 or less, sensitivity was 31%; specificity, 96%; with a likelihood ratio of 7.75. A reduced model of 2 subtests was identified with a sensitivity of 41%; specificity, 98%; with a likelihood ratio of 20.70.Results suggest that the full or abbreviated MMSE is useful in predicting emergent AD in patients with positive test results. However, it is not recommended for use as a screening or diagnostic instrument since a negative test result did not rule out emergent AD. It is recommended as a tool to identify those needing closer monitoring.Cross-sectional versus longitudinal estimates of cognitive change in nondemented older people: a CERAD study. Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease.To investigate the effect of increasing age on cognition in nondemented older people.A cross-sectional and longitudinal analysis.A total of 454 control subjects for Alzheimer's cases from the cohort assembled by the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD).The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) to assess cognitive function.Cross-sectional estimates were derived by generalized linear models and longitudinal estimates by generalized estimating equations. The cross-sectional model indicated a small but significant decline in MMSE of -.4 points per 10 years. The longitudinal model indicated a small but significant increase in MMSE of about +.6 points per 10 years. Evidence of an early learning effect and nonrandom dropout exists.The question of "normal" aging can be approached by considering cross-sectional information and, usually separately, longitudinal information. This study does both using recently developed statistical methods. We conclude that there is a small but significant decline in scores on the MMSE with increasing population age. The effect can be masked in longitudinal cohorts by a learning effect (especially early in follow-up) and other factors associated with repeated testing.Interaction of atherosclerosis and inflammation in elderly subjects with poor cognitive function.To test the hypothesis that a pro-inflammatory response is associated with cognitive impairment among individuals with cardiovascular disease.All 85-year-old inhabitants of Leiden (n = 599) were visited at their place of residence. A history of cardiovascular disease and an EKG were used as indicators of atherosclerosis. Production of the pro-inflammatory cytokine tumor necrosis factor-alpha and the anti-inflammatory cytokine interleukin-10 was assessed in a whole-blood assay using lipopolysaccharide as a stimulus. Global cognitive functioning was determined with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE); attention, cognitive speed, and memory were determined with four neuropsychological tests; and a history of dementia was obtained.In subjects with cardiovascular disease, median MMSE scores were lower in those with a pro-inflammatory response when compared with those with an anti-inflammatory response (p = 0.02). Similar associations were found for the Stroop Test, measuring attention (p < 0.01), the Coding Test measuring cognitive speed (p = 0.02), the Word Learning Test measuring memory (p < 0.01), and the presence of dementia (p = 0.04). The associations remained unaltered after adjustments for possible confounders such as gender, level of education, use of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs, use of cardiovascular drugs, and cardiovascular risk factors. In contrast, outcomes of the cognitive tests and presence of dementia were not dependent on the inflammatory response when cardiovascular disease was absent.The combination of cardiovascular disease and a pro-inflammatory cytokine response may be associated with cognitive impairment and dementia.Relationship between blood pressure and Alzheimer's disease in Linxian County, China.To investigate the relationship between hypertension and Alzheimer's disease(AD) and the change of Alzheimer's patients' blood pressure(BP) before and after the onset of AD, we conducted this epidemiological study. Subjects for this study were individuals who participated in a large scale, randomized controlled trial of nutritional intervention from 1984 to 1991. Participants were initially screened for dementia using Chinese Mini-Mental State Examination (CMMS) and Activities of Daily Living (ADL). Positive subjects were subsequently administered a detailed neuropsychological and neurobehavioral examination. The diagnosis of AD was made by a consensus conference of psychiatrists using Diagnostic And Statistical Manual Of Mental Disorders-Fourth Edition(DSM-IV) criteria. 16488 subjects were examined and 301 were diagnosed as AD. We compared the prevalence of AD in different populations that were stratified with 1984's systolic or diastolic blood pressure(those four stratifications being high blood pressure, borderline blood pressure, normal, low blood pressure), and compared the change of blood pressure of 301 AD patients between 1984 and 1999-2000, which is before and after the onset of AD respectively. Multiple Logistic Regression (1:1 nested case-control study) was used to assess if hypertension is an independent risk factor for AD, and Trend test was used to assess the relationship between blood pressure and AD. Here we demonstrate that there was a significant difference in AD prevalence among different populations stratified by systolic or diastolic blood pressure (P < 0.01). The prevalence is highest in hypertension group, and lowest in hypotension group. Multiple Logistic Regression identified high blood pressure as a risk factor for AD (OR = 1.97, 95%CI:1.09-3.54, P = 0.02). Trend test showed that there is a significant dose-response relationship between blood pressure and AD (P < 0.0002). For hypertensive AD patients, there was no significant difference in systolic blood pressure(SBP) before and after the onset of AD, but diastolic blood pressure(DBP) decreased dramatically after the onset of AD (P < 0.01); however, the result also showed that DBP decrease occurred in the non-demented group. Based on this, we think the DBP decrease is not related to AD. We further investigated whether BP values differed crossed-sectionally between the AD-patients and non-demented individuals. We found that regardless of SBP or DBP, the BP values of the AD group were all significantly higher than that of non-demented. In summary, these data suggest there is a strong relationship between hypertension and AD; however, the mechanism remains to be studied.Association between memory complaints and incident Alzheimer's disease in elderly people with normal baseline cognition.Results of previous studies suggest that memory complaints may predict cognitive decline and dementia among elderly people in whom cognitive impairment is already apparent. However, cognitive decline is often a gradual process, and elderly people may notice that their memory deteriorates before mental status tests are able to detect any change in cognitive functioning. Therefore, the authors hypothesized that memory complaints would predict incident Alzheimer's disease in elderly subjects with no signs of cognitive impairment.In the community-based Amsterdam Study of the Elderly, a sample of 3,778 nondemented persons, 65 to 84 years old, was selected and divided into two cognitive categories: normal (Mini-Mental State scores of 26-30) and borderline and impaired (Mini-Mental State scores less than 26). At baseline, the presence or absence of memory complaints was assessed. At follow-up, incident cases of Alzheimer's disease were diagnosed in a two-step procedure.After an average of 3.2 years, 2,169 persons were reevaluated, of whom 77 had incident Alzheimer's disease. Multivariate logistic regression analyses showed that memory complaints were associated with incident Alzheimer's disease in subjects with normal baseline cognition but not in subjects with impaired baseline cognition.The findings of this study suggest that memory complaints are a relatively strong predictor of incident Alzheimer's disease in older persons in whom cognitive impairment is not yet apparent. Furthermore, they suggest that older persons may be aware of a decline in cognition at a time when mental status tests are still unable to detect a decline from premorbid functioning.Neuropsychological detection of dementia: an overview of the neuropsychological component of the Canadian Study of Health and Aging.As part of the Canadian Study of Health and Aging (CSHA), a battery of neuropsychological measures was administered to 1879 participants. Participants who received neuropsychological evaluations were selected from an age-stratified random sample on the basis of scores on a cognitive screening tool, the Modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS). Seventy-five percent of the sample seen for neuropsychological evaluation scored between 50 and 77 on the 3MS and 25% of the sample scored 78 or over. This paper provides a descriptive summary of the methodological basis of the neuropsychological component of the CSHA. The findings indicated that differences existed between participants administered the battery in English or French in terms of refusal rates and diagnoses of dementia. Cursory examination of the utility of the battery indicated that the battery was tolerated well by both the participants and the psychologists involved with the study and that measures of memory functioning were central to diagnostic decision-making. The relations between neuropsychological, preliminary medical and consensus diagnoses were examined and indicated that neuropsychological information influenced diagnostic decision-making. The neuropsychology component of the CSHA is a rich source of information on persons aged 65 years and older in Canada.Diagnostic accuracy of a new instrument for detecting cognitive dysfunction.Effective screening of cognitive disorders is limited by psychometric and practical properties of available instruments. The Brief Cognitive Screen (BCS) was developed to improve sensitivity and overall diagnostic accuracy of case detection for cognitive dysfunction in a quick and convenient format.This validation study compared psychometric properties of the BCS with the Mini mental state examination (MMSE) in 308 patients with suspected or known disorders of cognition. Diagnostic accuracy of the MMSE was determined using the traditional 23/24 clinical cutoff and area under the curve (AUC) from receiver operating characteristics (ROC) analyses. Diagnostic accuracy of BCS summary scores and components was determined by ROC analyses. Comprehensive neuropsychological evaluation served as the criterion standard for determining cognitive dysfunction.The MMSE sensitivity (34.8%) was inadequate at the 23/24 cutoff. Under ROC analyses, diagnostic accuracy of a BCS summary score was superior (AUC = 0.950) to the MMSE total score (AUC = 0.862) for the total sample. Excluding all patients with a history of cognitive deficit, classification accuracy of the BCS remained high (AUC = 0.936).Findings suggest that BCS is an effective, convenient alternative screening instrument for use in clinical populations with suspected cognitive dysfunction.Is the Folstein's Mini-Mental test an aphasia test?The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is recognized as a valid screening for dementia. It consists of 29 verbal items from a total of 30. The Brief Aphasia Evaluation (BAE) includes 10 aphasia and 12 orientation items, which are similar to most of the MMSE items. It was studied whether those BAE items (MMSE-like): (a) correlate with the rest of the BAE items (BAE-rest), and (b) differentiate patients with left cerebral lesions (LC) from both patients with right cerebral lesions (RC) and healthy participants (HP). A sample of 109 right-handed volunteers (38 HP, 37 LC, and 34 RC) was studied. The three groups were matched according to gender, age, and education. Patients were similar in multiple variables. The correlation between MMSE-like and BAE-rest was .90. MMSE-like showed a sensitivity and specificity of .81 or above to identify the LC from the other two groups. There is a risk for misdiagnosing aphasia as dementia with the MMSE.Risk factors for dementia in the epidemiological study of Munguialde County (Basque Country-Spain).Prevalence of degenerative dementias and dementias associated with cerebrovascular disease is increasing. Dementia is one of the most significant public health problem. In recent years, the role of vascular risk factors (hypertension, diabetes mellitus and hypercholesterolemia) and depression has been evaluated.The incidence of dementia and risk factors has not been fully investigated in Spain. The aim of this study was to identify the risk factors for dementia, Alzheimer's disease (AD) and vascular dementia (VD) in elderly people in Munguialde County (Spain).A two phase, door-to-door populational study was performed. Demographic variables and the presence of vascular risk factors and depression were recorded. The MMSE, the DSM-IV and the conventional criteria for AD and VD were used in the evaluation. The odds ratio for each risk factor was calculated by logistic regression analysis.1756 healthy subjects and 175 patients with dementia participated in the study. Of these, 133 had AD, 15 VD and the remainder other dementias. The risk factors for dementia and AD were female sex (OR = 1.67 and 1.97, respectively); age (OR = 1.14 and 1.15); stroke (OR = 7.84 and 3); and depression (OR = 53.08 and 3.19). Stroke was the only risk factor for VD (OR = 119).Greater age, female sex, stroke and depression increase the risk of suffering dementia, AD and VD. The relationship between depression, vascular risk factors and dementia has clear public health implications. Prevention and early treatment of vascular risk factors and depression may have an important impact in lowering the risk of dementia and could modify the natural history of the disease.Is the telephone interview for cognitive status a valid alternative in persons who cannot be evaluated by the Mini Mental State Examination?The Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), a widely used tool for first-line assessment of cognitive function, cannot be fully administered to persons with severe visual or upper extremity impairments. This cross-sectional study, which was performed in a sample of patients admitted to the outpatient clinic of the INRCA Geriatric Department "I Fraticini" (Firenze, Italy) and their relatives, evaluated whether the Telephone Interview for Cognitive Status (TICS), a test originally created for telephone screening of cognitive impairment, is a valid alternative for assessment of cognition in persons who cannot provide valid responses to all the MMSE items. Fifteen subjects in each of seven MMSE strata (9-11, 12-14, 15-17, 18-20, 21-23, 24-26, 27-30) were consecutively selected. Inclusion criteria were: age > or = 60 years; Italian as the main language; education > or = 3 years; medical stability; and ability to complete the MMSE. At admission, participants were examined for dementia by an expert clinician according to the DSM IV criteria. Italian versions of the TICS and the MMSE were administered face-to-face by two trained interviewers. The TICS was readministered face-to-face one week later by the same interviewer that had previously administered the test. The TICS showed good test-retest reproducibility. Assessments taken one week apart differed on average by 0.52 +/- 1.9 points (p < 0.01), indicating a systematic improvement. The TICS explained 96% of the variance in the MMSE, and this association was independent of age, gender and education. More than 90% of the cases "screening positive" (i.e., scoring below a certain cut-off) by the TICS, were also identified as "screening positive" when comparable MMSE cut-off scores were used. Using comparable cut-off scores, the sensitivity and specificity of TICS and MMSE in detecting a standard clinical diagnosis of dementia largely overlapped. In persons who cannot be evaluated with the MMSE in its full form, the face-to-face administration of the TICS is a reliable and valid alternative.Incidence of dementia and associated risk factors in Japan: The Osaki-Tajiri Project.The incidence of dementia and risk factors has not been fully investigated in Japan. Following a prevalence study in 1998, we investigated the incidence and associated factors in the same population in 2003 and 2005. Randomly selected 771 residents in Tajiri were targeted. The final participants included 204 (65.2%) healthy older adults (Clinical Dementia Rating, CDR 0) and 335 (73.1%) people with questionable dementia (CDR 0.5). We analyzed the incidence of dementia and dementing diseases, and possible risk factors. The risk factors included demographics, lifestyle-related factors, vascular risk factors, cognitive functions, and MRI findings. Overall, 3.9% of the CDR 0 and 37.0% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 5-year period, whereas 40.2% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 7-year period. Older adults had a higher incidence. Higher CDR Box scores had a higher incidence. Of the dementing diseases, 60.8% of participants developed Alzheimer' disease (AD), followed by vascular dementia (VaD), 17.9%. Logistic regression analyses showed that age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as recent memory, and generalized atrophy were significant predictors of progression to AD. Similarly, predictive factors for progression to VaD were age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as frontal function, and white matter lesions and cerebrovascular diseases. A comprehensive system including CDR, cognitive tests, and MRI, is recommended in community-based health policy planning.Identification of dementia in epidemiological research: a study on the usefulness of various data sources.Prevalence and incidence ratios of dementia in epidemiological studies vary according to the data source used. Medical records, cognitive tests, and registry information are sources frequently used to differentiate dementia from normal aging. The aim of the present study was to compare the identification of dementia from these different sources with that from consensus diagnosis.498 elderly people (age range 70-81 at baseline) enrolled in a Swedish population-based longitudinal twin study (Gender) were evaluated on physical and mental health and interviewed for their socio-demographic background three times during an eight-year period. Reviews of medical records and the Swedish Discharge Registry (DR) were conducted. The 10th percentile was used to differentiate between dementia and non-dementia in all cognitive tests. Scores of 24 or below on the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (range 1-30) indicated dementia. A consensus conference diagnosed dementia on the basis of total information. The consensus diagnosis was used as the gold standard.MMSE scores (sensitivity 64%, specificity 96%, kappa 0.65) and the review of medical records (sensitivity 57%, specificity 99%, kappa 0.65) were good sources for dementia identification. The precision of medical records increased when recordings of cognitive impairment were included (sensitivity 83%, specificity 98%, kappa 0.84). The discharge registry had low sensitivity (26%) and kappa coefficient (0.31).The present study shows that both review of medical records and MMSE scores are good although not perfect identifiers of dementia. The discharge registry is an uncertain source of dementia identification.Mental status testing in the elderly nursing home population.The clinical utility of selected brief cognitive screening instruments in detecting dementia in an elderly nursing home population was examined. One hundred twenty nursing home residents (mean age 87.9) were administered the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS). The majority of the subjects (75%) were also administered the Dementia Rating Scale (DRS). Both clinically diagnosed demented (n = 57) and non-demented (n = 63) subjects participated in the study. Dementia was diagnosed in accordance with DSM-III-R criteria by physicians specializing in geriatric medicine. Using standard cutoffs for impairment, the 3MS, MMSE, and DRS achieved high sensitivity (82% to 100%) but low specificity (33% to 52%) in the detection of dementia among nursing home residents. Positive predictive values ranged from 52% to 61%, and negative predictive values from 77% to 100%. Higher age, lower education, and history of depression were significantly associated with misclassification of non-demented elderly subjects. Receiver Operating Characteristic (ROC) curve analyses revealed optimal classification of dementia with cutoff values of 74 for the 3MS, 22 for the MMSE, and 110 for the DRS. The results suggest that the 3MS, MMSE, and DRS do not differ significantly with respect to classification accuracy of dementia in a nursing home population. Elderly individuals of advanced age (i.e., the oldest-old) with lower education and a history of depression appear at particular risk for dementia misclassification with these instruments. Revised cutoff values for impairment should be employed when these instruments are applied to elderly residents of nursing homes and the oldest-old.Norms for the Mini-Mental State Examination in a healthy population.Although the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is widely used in clinical practice, few norms exist for healthy populations covering a broad range of ages.To obtain MMSE norms specific for age, gender, and education in healthy adults.From the population registers of seven communities across Italy, we selected a proportionate random sample of residents age 20 to 79 years to evaluate their health status with respect to conditions affecting cognitive performance. This sample yielded 908 persons who were deemed to be without cognitive impairment and who were then given the MMSE. We calculated fifth percentile norms and presented them as step functions. We then validated the norms as a screening tool for dementia in persons age 65 to 79 years. The validation was based on unpublished data from a separate study and involved estimates of sensitivity and specificity.The norms declined with advancing age, especially for less educated women. Given any age and sex, the norms were higher for individuals with higher educational levels. In screening for dementia, the norms had a sensitivity of 85% and a specificity of 89%.When using MMSE scores, it is important to account for age, gender, and education, especially in populations where the educational level is low. Expressing MMSE norms as step functions provides an easy-to-use tool for neurologists and other clinicians.Validation of a French version of an informant-based questionnaire as a screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Development of informant-based screening tests for dementia is an emerging field. The reliability and validity of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), an instrument that screens for dementia in general, have been established. We conducted a study to validate a French version of the IQCODE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in the elderly living in the community.In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, subjects were screened in their own homes using the modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3-MS). Those who screened positive, along with a sample of subjects who screened negative, were referred for a complete clinical examination. In Quebec, an informant was asked to complete the French version, IQCODE(F), at that time. Based on the final clinical diagnoses, performances of the IQCODE(F) and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE, converted from 3-MS) in screening for Alzheimer's disease were evaluated.Of the 237 subjects, the mean IQCODE (F) score was 3.4 (s.d. = 0.6), on a 5-point scale (1 = improvement in condition over the past 10 years, 5 = marked deterioration, 3 = no change). The mean MMSE score was 23.1 (s.d. = 4.5). The scores on the two scales were correlated (r = -0.44, P < 0.001). The IQCODE(F) scores were unrelated to education (r = -0.07, P > 0.3) in contrast to the MMSE scores (r = 0.28, P < 0.001). With respect to a diagnosis of probable Alzheimer's disease, the IQCODE(F) (cut-off point 3.6) had a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 95.6%. The sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE (cut-off point 23) were 70% and 82.3% respectively.The findings of the IQCODE(F) are consistent with those of the English version in correlation with the MMSE and apparent freedom from educational bias. The IQCODE is superior to the MMSE as a screening test for probable Alzheimer's disease in the elderly living in the community. It may be a useful addition to the screening tests already available, especially for the less well educated.Evaluation of a Japanese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination in elderly persons.This study aimed to examine the validity and item-response characteristics of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), which is used for assessing cognitive function, in Japanese older adults.Factor analysis and item response analysis were carried out for MMSE responses (n = 1971) from older adults living in the community (n = 1339) or in a nursing home (n = 632), including Alzheimer-type dementia (n = 330), vascular dementia (n = 36), frontotemporal dementia (n = 7), mixed Alzheimer-type and frontotemporal type dementia (n = 27), and age-related cognitive decline (n = 29). When choosing the cut-off score of 23 points for the MMSE, sensitivity and specificity for each item were calculated.A three-factor solution was found to be most appropriate by factor analysis: complex processing, simple processing and working memory. The item characteristics curves showed unidimensionality with high reproducibility. We identified a simplified scale comprising 10 items in all participants: "naming", "three-step command", "registration", "repeat a sentence", "write a complete sentence", "copies drawing of two polygons", "orientation to place", "delayed recall", "orientation to time" and "serial sevens" tasks. Sensitivity and specificity for both "year" task and "day" task were more than 90% ("year": sensitivity 92.5%, specificity 96.3%; "day": sensitivity 92.4%, specificity 91.7%). For the Alzheimer-type dementia patients, the five-factor solution was suggested by factor analysis and the MMSE also had unidimensionality in terms of level of difficulty.We found that the MMSE had multiple cognitive areas. We showed that the MMSE could be used as an essentially unidimensional measure of cognitive ability and the question about orientation to time might be useful in the simplest assessment to identify cognitive dysfunction.Mini Mental State Examination in Sinhalese: a sensitive test to screen for dementia in Sri Lanka.Although the Sri Lankan population is ageing rapidly, dementia has not been systematically investigated here. The Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) is a brief global instrument used to assess cognitive abilities in the elderly.This study aimed to develop and validate a Sinhalese translation of the MMSE, which could be used as a screening instrument to detect impaired cognition in an epidemiological investigation of dementia in Sri Lanka.Due to the high literacy rate in the country, the MMSE was translated and modified slightly without having to make major changes to the original version. 380 randomly selected subjects over 65 years in a semi-urban area were screened with the translated version of the MMSE. The cut-off score for cognitive impairment was taken as 17. Of the 380 subjects screened, 33 scored < or = 17, and were thus considered cases of suspected dementia. All 33 who scored < or = 17 and 24 randomly selected subjects who scored>17 on the MMSE, thus considered cognitively normal, underwent a brief clinical examination and neuropsychological assessment with the more comprehensive neuropsychiatric test battery, Cambridge Cognitive Score (CAMCOG), to determine the presence of dementia.Evaluated against the performance at the CAMCOG, the sensitivity and specificity of the translated MMSE were 93.5% and 84.6% respectively.Therefore, the Sinhalese translation of the MMSE described here is a sensitive instrument to screen for dementia in Sri Lanka.Diagnostic performance of the Chinese Frontal Assessment Battery in early cognitive impairment in an Asian population.The Frontal Assessment Battery (FAB) has been shown to be useful in evaluating frontal dysfunction. There is a paucity of studies validating cutoffs in the early cognitive impairment. We aim to validate the Chinese FAB in Asian subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and early dementia.Eighty subjects with MCI and mild dementia and 100 cognitively healthy community subjects were studied. ROC analysis was done to determine the Chinese FAB's optimal cutoff scores for age- and education-adjusted subgroups.Chinese FAB scores were significantly lower in early cognitive impairment compared with cognitively normal controls. The optimal cutoff score was 12/13 (sensitivity 92%, specificity 78.7%). A similar cutoff score was obtained following age-adjustment and for subjects with <6 years' education. Of note, the optimal cutoff for subjects with ≥6 years' education was 13/14 (sensitivity 91.8%, specificity 70.3%), an improved diagnostic performance compared to the earlier reported 11/12 cutoff. In comparison, the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) had lower rule-out accuracy (77% sensitivity, 91.2% specificity). The combination of the Chinese FAB and MMSE was superior to either test in isolation.The education-adjusted Chinese FAB has good diagnostic performance, which can supplement the MMSE in early cognitive impairment evaluation with construct differences observed between the Chinese FAB and MMSE.[Elementary test of concentration, orientation and memory. Application to the detection of dementia states in daily practice].The authors present a french version of the Katzman short orientation memory concentration test. The 6 items of the test include 3 orientation questions, 2 mental control items and an address memory phrase. Time for administration is less than 5 minutes. This french version of the test has been validated as a measure of cognitive impairment in a population of 200 subjects including 140 patients without cognitive impairment and 60 demented subjects. As defined by a 10/11 cut-off score, sensibility and specificity for the diagnosis of dementia were 91 p. 100 and 95 p. 100 respectively. Correlation of the scores with those obtained by the Mini mental state was highly significant. This fast, easy and reliable test seems particularly suitable for the detection of cognitive impairment in clinical practice.The clock drawing test in primary care: sensitivity in dementia detection and specificity against normal and depressed elderly.The aim of this study was to examine the sensitivities and specificities of the clock drawing test (CDT) in the detection of dementia among older people in primary care, with particular emphasis on the effect of depression on CDT specificity. Most previous studies have been sited in specialist settings and few have addressed the issue of specificity against depression.Comparison of cohorts identified from community-based screening with GMS-AGECAT. The CDT and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were administered to 41 elderly subjects with organic disorder (dementia), 84 elderly subjects with case level depression and 523 normal elderly subjects. Sensitivities and specificities of the CDT were calculated.The sensitivity of the CDT in the detection of dementia in the general community was 76%. The specificities of the CDT against normal elderly and depressed elderly was 81% and 77% respectively. Higher sensitivity and specificity were achieved by the MMSE.The use of the CDT in the detection of dementia syndromes is likely to be more relevant in the primary care context than in specialist settings. The CDT provides good sensitivity and specificity but may not be as sensitive or specific in the general community as previous studies have suggested, particularly in mild dementia. Community-based late life depression does not appear to alter the specificity of the CDT.Cross validation of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment in community dwelling older adults residing in the Southeastern US.Cross validation study of the MoCA for the detection of Alzheimer's disease (AD) and Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) in a community-based cohort residing in the Southeastern United States.One hundred and eighteen English-speaking older adults, who underwent diagnostic evaluation as part of an on-going prospective study, were administered the MoCA and MMSE. Twenty were diagnosed with AD, 24 met criteria for amnestic MCI and 74 were considered cognitively normal. Sensitivities and specificities were calculated using the recommended cut-off scores and ROC curve analyses were performed to determine optimal sensitivity and specificity. The influence of age, education and gender on MoCA score was also examined.Using a cut-off score of 24 or below, the MMSE was insensitive to cognitive impairment. Using the recommended cut-off score of 26, the MoCA detected 97% of those with cognitive impairment but specificity was fair (35%). Using a lower cut-off score of 23, the MoCA exhibited excellent sensitivity (96%) and specificity (95%).The MoCA appears to have utility as a cognitive screen for early detection of AD and for MCI and warrants further investigation regarding its applicability in primary care settings, varying ethnic groups, and younger at-risk individuals.Brief cognitive screening of the elderly: a comparison of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) and Mental Status Questionnaire (MSQ).One hundred and fifty unselected elderly community subjects were assessed by Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) and Mental Status Questionnaire (MSQ). The effects on cognitive test scores of potential confounding (non-cognitive) variables were evaluated. Sensitivities and specificities were: MMSE 80% and 98%; AMT 77% and 90%; and MSQ 70% and 89%. The MMSE identified significantly fewer false positives than the AMT and MSQ. The major effect of intelligence on cognitive test scores has previously been underestimated. Age, social class, sensitivity of hearing and history of stroke were also significantly correlated with cognitive test scores. Years of full time education and depression only affected the longer MMSE and CAMCOG. The MMSE (cut-off 20/21) can be recommended for routine screening. However, as scores are affected by variables other than cognitive function, particularly intelligence, further assessment of identified cases may fail to reveal significant functional impairment.A normative study of the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale: comparison of demographic influences between the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale and the Mini-Mental Status Examination.We investigated the demographic influence on the performance of the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale (HDS-R) and provided normative data of the HDS-R in the elderly.The HDS-R was administered to 803 community-dwelling cognitively normal elderly subjects aged 55 years or over. Cognitive disorders and psychiatric disorders were strictly excluded using the CERAD-K assessment packet and the Mini-International Neuropsychiatric Interview. The demographic influence on the performance of the HDS-R was examined using multiple linear regression analyses, and compared with that on the performance of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) using the Chow test and t statistics. Overlapping strata were used in developing age-, education- and gender-specific normative data of the HDS-R.Age, education, and gender influenced significantly the performance of the HDS-R, and explained 22.5% of the total score variance. Older age, lower education, and male gender were associated with lower performance of the HDS-R. However, the demographic influence on the HDS-R was much weaker than that on the MMSE (t = 5.578, d.f. = 800, p < 0.001). The normative data of the HDS-R stratified by age (60-69, 70-79, > or =80), education (0-6, 7-12, > or =13), and gender were presented.The HDS-R was more robust to demographic influences than the MMSE, and normative data may contribute to improving further its diagnostic accuracy for dementia.Comparison of the Saint Louis University mental status examination and the mini-mental state examination for detecting dementia and mild neurocognitive disorder--a pilot study.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is commonly used as a screening tool to detect dementia. However, it performs poorly in identifying persons with mild neurocognitive disorder. The Saint Louis University Mental Status (SLUMS) examination is a 30-point screening questionnaire that tests for orientation, memory, attention, and executive functions.The objective of this study was to compare SLUMS and the MMSE for detecting dementia and mild neurocognitive disorder (MNCD) using Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) criteria.Patients at the Veterans' Affairs Geriatric Research, Education and Clinical Center, St. Louis, MO (N = 702) were clinically classified as having normal cognitive functioning, MNCD, or dementia based on DSM-IV criteria. The SLUMS and MMSE were administered for comparison.Mean age was 75.3 years (standard deviation: 5.5). Regarding education, 62.4% of the sample had at least completed high school and 30.6% had not. Sensitivity and specificity were calculated and receiver operator curves (ROCs) generated for SLUMS and MMSE as a function of diagnosis (MCND versus dementia) and education. Both the SLUMS and MMSE produced acceptable ROCs for the diagnosis of dementia, but the ROCs for SLUMS were better than the MMSE for the diagnosis of MNCD in both education groups.These results suggest that the SLUMS and MMSE have comparable sensitivities, specificities, and area under the curve in detecting dementia. Although the definition of MNCD is controversial, the authors believe that the SLUMS is possibly better at detecting mild neurocognitive disorder, which the MMSE failed to detect, but this needs to be further investigated.The MacNeill-Lichtenberg Decision Tree: a unique method of triaging mental health problems in older medical rehabilitation patients.Evaluation of the utility of a "decision tree" that identifies potential mental health problems in older medical patients and guides decision making for referrals.Measures of utility including sensitivity, specificity, and predictive power were examined. Independent t tests and nonparametric statistics were used to evaluate group differences where appropriate.The stroke and geriatric unit of a freestanding urban medical rehabilitation hospital.In study 1,173 older, consecutively admitted medical rehabilitation patients completed all cognitive measures. In study 2, a separate sample of 313 older adults completed the Geriatric Depression Scale during admission.The MacNeill-Lichtenberg Decision Tree (MLDT) was compared with the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE), the Mattis Dementia Rating Scale, and the 30-item Geriatric Depression Scale.Study 1: The decision tree accurately triaged 87% of mental health problems and allowed for deferral of 41% of cases, for whom further assessment was unnecessary. The MLDT was superior to the MMSE, with higher sensitivity and a lower failure rate. Study 2: The emotional status component of the MLDT was useful in triaging cases for depression evaluation.The MLDT was useful in prioritizing cases with regard to mental health problems (eg, dementia, depression) and making quick referral decisions. The MLDT is a unique instrument that not only evaluates cognitive status, but also considers psychosocial factors and emotional status in older adults.Establishing the limits of the Mini-Mental State. Examination of 'subtests'.It has been suggested that the Mini-Mental State examination can be used to examine a patient's cognitive profile. We therefore examined the validity of Mini-Mental State subtests and individual items. The memory item, attention-concentration items, and constructional item had satisfactory sensitivity-specificity and correlated significantly with scores on neuropsychological tests. In contrast, four of the five Mini-Mental State language items had very low sensitivity, and three of five failed to correlate with neuropsychological test scores. These findings establish limits with regard to the ability of the Mini-Mental State to generate a cognitive profile. Our data also provide information regarding validity, difficulty level, and optimal cutoff scores for widely used mental status tasks.Validity of the Clock-Drawing Test as a screening tool for cognitive impairment in the elderly.The authors studied the validity of the Clock-Drawing Test (CDT) in comparison with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the association between the CDT and mortality in a large general population sample of persons aged 75 years or more. Data were obtained from the MRC Trial of the Assessment and Management of Older People in the Community. Baseline assessments were conducted between 1995 and 1999 in the United Kingdom. A total of 13,557 subjects with both CDT and MMSE scores were included in the analysis. The median follow-up period was 4.7 years. The sensitivity and specificity of the CDT for detecting moderate-to-severe cognitive impairment (MMSE score <or= 17) were 77% and 87%, respectively, for nurse administration and 40% and 91%, respectively, for postal administration. Sensitivity was higher among females and increased with age. In Cox proportional hazards regression, a worse CDT score was associated with increased risk of all-cause mortality and mortality from cerebrovascular and respiratory diseases, even after adjustment for potential confounders. The authors conclude that the CDT may have value as a brief face-to-face screening tool for moderate/severe cognitive impairment in an older community population but is relatively poor at detecting milder cognitive impairment.CSF-tau, CSF-Abeta1-42, ApoE-genotype and clinical parameters in the diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease: combination of CSF-tau and MMSE yields highest sensitivity and specificity.This study evaluated the sensitivity and specificity of the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) levels of tau-protein, amyloid-beta-peptide 1-42 (Abeta1-42), ApoE-genotype and the degree of cognitive decline as diagnostic markers for Alzheimer's disease (AD). Data was obtained from 105 AD patients and 68 controls. Median CSF-tau levels were increased (512 pg/ml vs. 145 pg/ml, p<0.001) and Abeta1-42-levels were decreased (238.5 pg/ml vs. 310 pg/ml, p<0.001) in AD patients compared to controls. A weak correlation was found between CSF-Abeta1-42 and MMSE score (r=.245). Within all subjects, a correlation of CSF-Abeta1-42 (r=-.337) and CSF-tau (r=.384) with age was found. The combination of CSF-tau levels and MMSE revealed the highest sensitivity (92%) and specificity (87%). In summary, CSF-tau was a useful biological marker to discriminate AD from normal aging, neurological and psychiatric disorders. CSF-Abeta1-42 showed no additional benefit in discriminating patients from controls but might be useful for tracking the severity of the disease.Does a reliable decline in Mini Mental State Examination total score predict dementia? Diagnostic accuracy of two reliable change indices.Norms for change in Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) total score suggest that only a decline of at least 2-4 points indicates a reliable change. However, it is unknown whether change norms (Reliable Change Indices, RCIs) of the MMSE total score are suitable to predict future dementia.554 elderly individuals aged 75 and over without dementia at the first 2 visits were tested with the MMSE at a maximum of 6 visits with 1.5-year intervals. Two different RCIs for change in MMSE score (first to second visit) were computed - one RCI which corrects for practice and one RCI which corrects for regression to the mean. The main outcome measure was the diagnosis of dementia.During the study, 88 persons developed dementia. RCIs were significantly associated with future dementia diagnosis. The best cutoff for raw change in MMSE total score to predict dementia was -1 point (sensitivity = 48%, specificity = 67%, relative risk = 1.6). With the RCI + regression to the mean, the diagnostic accuracy was moderate (sensitivity = 61%, specificity = 72%, relative risk = 3.2).A change in MMSE total score is significantly associated with future dementia, but the diagnostic accuracy for dementia prediction is rather low.Variability in annual Mini-Mental State Examination score in patients with probable Alzheimer disease: a clinical perspective of data from the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease.To determine the variability in annual Mini-Mental State Examination scores of patients with Alzheimer disease enrolled in the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD).A total of 372 patients with probable Alzheimer disease with 1 or more years of follow-up.Twenty-one CERAD clinical sites throughout the United States.An average annual decline of 3.4 points in CERAD patients returning for longitudinal reassessments was close to the SD of the measurement error of 2.8 points for the Mini-Mental State Examination. There was wide variability in individual rates of decline. Even with 4 years of follow-up, 15.8% of the patients had no clinically meaningful decline in Mini-Mental State Examination score (defined as a change in initial score >3, ie, 1 SD of measurement error). Validity of measurements of the rate of change in Mini-Mental State Examination scores improved with longer observation intervals and was reliable for most patients when observations were separated by 3 or more years.Although the Mini-Mental State Examination is a useful screening instrument to assess level of cognitive function, it has limited value in measuring the progression of Alzheimer disease in individual patients for periods less than 3 years because of a large measurement error and substantial variation in change in annual score.Value of the Mini-Mental State Examination and informants' data for the detection of dementia in geriatric outpatients.The Dutch version of the Mini-Mental State Examination was administered to 138 elderly patients who were referred to a geriatric outpatient clinic for a variety of reasons. An optimal cut-off point of 24/25 was found for the detection of dementia. At this cut-off point, the Mini-Mental State Examination was 87.6% sensitive and 81.6% specific in detecting dementia. The discriminative validity was influenced by education and by the presence of psychiatric disorders other than dementia. Informants' data showed better sensitivity and specificity than the Mini-Mental State Examination for the detection of dementia. The findings suggest that informants' data are a primary source of information for the detection of dementia in geriatric outpatients.The distribution of Mini-Mental State Examination scores in an older UK African-Caribbean population compared to MRC CFA study norms.to describe normative data for the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in a UK African-Caribbean population and compare these with norms for white UK-born elders.a comparison of MMSE data from two cross-sectional surveys.the MMSE had been administered to a community UK African-Caribbean population and scores were compared to norms from the Medical Research Council Cognitive Function and Ageing Study (CFAS). MMSE data were analysed for 248 African-Caribbean participants aged 55-75 and 5379 CFAS participants aged 65-74, without visual or auditory problems. Distributions of scores were tabulated and error rates for individual items compared.Median MMSE scores were 25 (interquartile range 22-27) for the whole African-Caribbean sample, 24 (22-27) for those aged 65-75 in the African-Caribbean sample, and 27 (25-29) for CFAS. Differences in error rates were specific to particular items: naming the season, serial seven subtraction, phrase repetition, three-stage command, and copying intersecting pentagons. These differences persisted when both samples were restricted to those with statutory duration of education, who were literate and who had worked in non-manual occupations. Normative data are displayed for MMSE scores in both groups.different distributions of MMSE scores between UK African-Caribbean and Caucasian groups can be principally explained by cultural bias in certain items. If the MMSE is to be administered to older African-Caribbean people, specific normative data should be referred to or else a culturally modified version of the instrument should be used.Does the combination of the MMSE and clock drawing test (mini-clock) improve the detection of mild Alzheimer's disease and mild cognitive impairment?There is currently a need to develop tools to identify patients with mild AD and mild cognitive impairment (MCI). We determined the validity and reliability of a brief, easily administered cognitive screening battery consisting of fusion of two well-known brief tests (Mini-Mental Status Examination [MMSE] and Clock Drawing Test [CDT]) (Mini-clock) to differentiate between patients with mild AD, MCI, and healthy control subjects. 66 consecutive patients with mild AD, 21 with MCI, and 66 healthy controls seen in a memory clinic setting were compared. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was used to calculate the cut-off value permitting discrimination between mild AD, MCI, and healthy control subjects. Interrater and test-retest reliability were also assessed. Mean cognitive scores for patients with AD, MCI, and control subjects on all two individual tests were significantly different (for each, p < 0.001). The mean area under the ROC curve for Mini-clock was higher than that obtained with MMSE or CDT in differentiating mild AD from controls (0.973 vs. 0.952 and 0.881, respectively) and MCI from controls (0.855 vs. 0.821 and 0.779, respectively). Test-retest reliability for the Mini-clock was 0.99, meanwhile interrater reliability was 0.87. The mean time to complete the test for all subjects was 8 min and 50 s. The Mini-clock is highly sensitive and specific in the detection of mild AD and reasonably accurate when attempting to separate MCI from health controls. It has a high interrater and test-retest reliability, can be quickly administered, and does not require major training.Performance characteristics of a two-stage dementia screen in a population sample.We analyzed the performance of a two-stage screening protocol [the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) or the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline (IQCODE), and the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ)] in a weighted stratified sample of 839 subjects from a population survey of dementia in Cache County, UT. The subjects were subsequently examined using a standardized diagnostic assessment protocol. Using the method of receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the main outcome measure was area under the ROC curve (AUC). The overall AUC estimates were 0.956 (95% confidence interval 0.943-0.968) for the 3MS/IQCODE and 0.945 (0.931-0.960) for the DQ. After adjustment for age, the efficiency of the both 3MS/IQCODE and the DQ was better for subjects with genotype epsilon4/epsilon4 at APOE, better among women, and better in those with two or more years duration of dementia. The optimal threshold for this two-stage screen yielded sensitivity and specificity estimates of 91.0% and 92.0%, respectively.The cognitive disorders examination (Codex) is a reliable 3-minute test for detection of dementia in the elderly (validation study on 323 subjects).Dementia often remains undiagnosed until it has reached moderate or severe stages, thereby preventing patients and their families from obtaining optimal care. Tools that are easy to use in primary care might facilitate earlier detection of dementia.Develop and validate a very brief test for the detection of dementia.In the derivation study, we recorded educational level, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores and subscores and results of a simplified clock-drawing test (sCDT) for consecutive patients attending a single memory clinic over a two-year period,. Dementia was diagnosed according to DSM-IV criteria. The independent variables related to dementia were determined by a multivariable logistic model (MLM) and used to develop a decision tree to predict this diagnosis. In the validation study, the decision tree was applied to consecutive patients of six memory clinics for whom status about dementia was previously determined with DSM-IV criteria. The decision tree, MLM, and MMSE were applied to detect dementia in these patients. The sensitivity and specificity of each diagnostic tool were estimated and compared.Of 242 patients in the derivation study, the following independent variables were correlated with dementia: sex, sCDT, and two MMSE subscores - the 3-word recall test and spatial orientation. We used Bayesian statistics to develop a brief 2-step decision analysis tree (2-3 min.), which we named Codex (cognitive disorders examination). The validation study applied Codex to 323 patients. Sensitivity was 93% and specificity 85%. The corresponding values were 88% and 87% for the MLM, 94% and 67% or 91% and 70% for the MMSE, depending on the MMSE cutoff score. The sensitivity of Codex was significantly higher than that of MLM, and its specificity was significantly greater than that of MMSE.Codex is a simple, brief, and reliable test for detecting dementia and requires three minutes or less to administer. Its simplicity and brevity make it appropriate for and easy to use in primary care.The AGECAT "organic" section as a screening instrument for minor cognitive deficits.In the context of increasing concern in occidental countries about dementing diseases in the geriatric population, an epidemiological study has been done in the city of Zaragoza, Spain. The sample, randomly selected from the census, was stratified by age and sex and included 1,134 elderly (aged 65 plus years) living in the community. In phase I, lay interviewers administered the Spanish versions of the Geriatric Mental State (GMS) and Mini-Mental Status Examination to the elderly. The individuals were considered to be "probable cases" on the basis of GMS "global" scores previously reported to be valid. These "probable cases" were then examined in phase II by standardized psychiatrists using both, the GMS and MEC, but also the History and Aetiology Schedule (HAS). A proportion of "probable normals" were also examined by the psychiatrists to assess the validity of the screening procedure in the community. The identified "cases" of dementia and "cases" of depression were then studied by the neurologists in what we call phase III. Specific project criteria for dementia were used but, in fact, all identified "cases" of dementia fulfilled DSM-III criteria. Some data of the application of the AGECAT computer program in both, phase I and phase II are now reported. The different severity levels of cognitive deficits according to AGECAT criteria are compared with clinical criteria. The advantages and disadvantages of the computer program in the detection of minor cognitive difficulties are discussed.Application of a Spanish version of the "Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly" in the clinical assessment of dementia.We studied the validity of a complete (S-IQCODE) and a shortened (SS- IQCODE) Spanish version of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) for the diagnosis of dementia in a clinical setting. Fifty-three consecutive outpatients were assessed with an extensive workup and followed up for 6 months in a specialized clinic for the diagnosis and management of dementia. Thirty eight (71%) were finally diagnosed as demented. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) had a slightly greater diagnostic power than did the S-IQCODE and the SS-IQCODE (sensitivity 89% vs. 84% and 79%; specificity 80% vs. 73% for both; positive predictive value 92% vs. 89% and 88%; negative predictive value 75% vs. 65% and 58%), but without statistical significance. Both the S-IQCODE and SS-IQCODE were independent of previous education of the patients. The best diagnostic results were obtained when the cognitive scores of the patient in the MMSE and the report of the relative in the S-IQCODE were simultaneously considered. We conclude that the IQCODE, in a complete as well as in a shortened form, is a good diagnostic instrument in the clinical setting that can enhance the validity of other cognitive tests.Primary care screening for cognitive impairment in elderly veterans.The objective of this study was to examine the diagnostic accuracy of a primary care screening procedure for identifying cognitive impairment in elderly veterans, in comparison with 4 brief standardized neuropsychological tests. The sample included 100 primary care patients who met age and other criteria requiring screening for cognitive impairment. The results indicated that 3 of the tests significantly discriminated normal from mildly impaired status on the Dementia Rating Scale, but the existing procedure failed to correctly identify any cases in the entire sample. Correct classification rates were near 80% for the Mini-Mental State Exam, Clock Drawing Test, and both Trail Making Test (TMT)-A and TMT-B, with high specificity but variable sensitivity. TMT-B produced good results across eight predictive validity indicators when a cutoff of 3 minutes to completion (1 SD) was used to identify cases. There was no evidence to support the current interview-based screening procedure. Additional research with brief standardized screening is encouraged.Prevalence of alcohol-related problems in an elderly population and their association with cognitive impairment and dementia.Studies investigating the association between alcohol use and cognitive disorders in the elderly population have produced divergent results. Moreover, the role of alcohol in cognitive dysfunction is not clear. The aims of this study were to estimate the prevalence of alcohol-related problems in an elderly population from Brazil and to investigate their association with cognitive and functional impairment (CFI) and dementia.A community-based cross-sectional study was performed. A sample of 1,145 elderly people was examined in 2 phases. Several instruments were utilized in the first phase: the CAGE questionnaire was used to identify potential cases of alcohol-related problems, and a screening test for dementia was used to estimate CFI. The CAMDEX interview (Cambridge Examination) and DSM-IV (Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th edition) criteria were used for the clinical diagnosis of dementia in the second phase."Heavy alcohol use" (CAGE > or = 2) was found in 92 subjects (prevalence: 8.2%). It was associated with gender (males, p < 0.001), low education (only in females, p = 0.002), and low socioeconomic level (p = 0.001, in females; p = 0.002, in males). The Mini Mental State Examination exhibited a nonlinear relationship with alcohol-related problems in females; "mild-moderate alcohol use" (CAGE < 2) presented the highest score. A significant association between alcohol-related problems and cognitive dysfunction was found only in females. "Heavy alcohol use" was associated with higher CFI and dementia rates compared to "mild-moderate alcohol use" (p = 0.003 and p < 0.001, respectively). "Mild-moderate alcohol use" had a tendency of association with lower CFI and dementia rates when compared to "no alcohol use" (p = 0.063 and 0.050, respectively).Our findings suggest that alcohol use does not have a linear relationship with cognitive decline.Preclinical syndromes predict dementia: the Sydney older persons study.To identify if preclinical syndromes for Alzheimer's disease, vascular dementia, and Parkinson's disease and related dementias exist. Identification of dementia at early or even preclinical stages has important implications for treatment.A community dwelling sample of 647 subjects aged 75 and over at recruitment were followed up for a mean period of 3.19 years (range 2.61 to 4.51 years). Each subject was asked to participate in a medical assessment which included a standardised medical history examining both past and current health and medication usage; a neuropsychological battery (mini mental state examination, Reid memory test, verbal fluency, subsets of the Boston naming test and similarities, clock drawing and copied drawings) and physical examination. Preclinical syndromes for the three predominant dementias (Alzheimer's disease, vascular dementia and Parkinson's disease, and related dementias) and their combinations were defined using cognitive, motor, and vascular features. Their longitudinal outcome as defined by death and dementia incidence was examined.Preclinical syndromes affected 55.7% (n=299) of subjects. Preclinical syndromes showed a trend for an increased odds of death (odds ratio 1.72, p=0.056) and a significantly increased odds of developing dementia (odds ratio 4.81, p<0.001). Preclinical syndromes were highly sensitive, detecting 52 of 58 (89.7%) incident dementias. Two hundred and sixteen of 268 (80.6%) preclinical subjects did not show dementia over the 3 year period (positive predictive value 19.4%). Subjects defined as having a combination of cognitive, extrapyramidal, and vascular features were at greatest risk of progressing to dementia.Preclinical syndromes were sensitive and significant predictors of dementia. In view of their poor positive predictive value, the preclinical syndromes as defined in this study remain a research tool needing both definitional refinement and greater periods of observation. Multiple coexistent preclinical disorders resulted in a greater incidence of dementia, providing evidence for an additive role between multiple disorders.Cognitive deficits of patients with Alzheimer's disease with and without delusions.The goal of this investigation was to study the prevalence of delusions in Alzheimer's disease and to compare the performance of the delusional and nondelusional groups on a neuropsychological test battery.The authors studied 107 patients with Alzheimer's disease and 51 age- and education-comparable normal subjects using a standardized psychiatric interview and a neuropsychological test battery.Thirty-seven patients with Alzheimer's disease had delusions with or without hallucinations. Patients with delusions were significantly more impaired than those without delusions (and the normal comparison group) on the Mini-Mental State examination; Blessed Information-Memory-Concentration Test; Dementia Rating Scale, especially its conceptualization and memory subtests; and a test of verbal fluency. The delusional group also tended to be somewhat more impaired than the nondelusional group on the modified Wisconsin Card Sorting Test and the similarities subtest of the Wechsler Adult Intelligence Scale-revised.Approximately one-third of patients with Alzheimer's disease had developed psychotic symptoms sometime after the onset of dementia. The presence of psychotic symptoms in Alzheimer's disease was associated with greater cognitive impairment, especially frontal/temporal dysfunction, and possibly with a more rapidly progressive dementia.Ethnic and educational differences in cognitive test performance on mini-mental state examination in Asians.The objective of this study is to examine ethnic differences in Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) test performance in discriminating between demented and nondemented elderly Asians.A nationally representative population sample (N = 1,092) of community-living elderly, comprising Chinese, Malays, and Indians in Singapore, was interviewed using MMSE, Geriatric Mental State, and demographic and health questionnaires.There were significant ethnic differences in mean MMSE scores among Chinese (26.2), Indians (25.0), and Malays (23.6), but only in noneducated subjects. No ethnic differences in MMSE were observed in higher educated subjects. The sample proportion of subjects with dementia was 4.2% in Chinese, 9.4% in Malays, and 8.8% in Indians. Overall, MMSE discriminated well between subjects with and without dementia (cutoff: 23/24, area under the curve: 95%, sensitivity: 97.5%, specificity: 75.6%). MMSE test performance was much better in higher educated subjects (higher specificity: 85.2%). Lower specificities were shown in less educated subjects (57.3%), and in Malays (62.8%), and especially in less educated Malays (35.3%) and Indians (50.0%). Significant differences in MMSE scores in less educated subjects persisted after adjusting for differences in sociodemographic, health, and behavioral variablesEthnic nonequivalence in MMSE test performance should be taken into account in dementia screening in Asians in less educated subjects. Known correlates of cognitive functioning did not sufficiently explain these differences.The Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination Revised is as effective as the original to detect dementia in a French-speaking population.This paper presents the validation of the French version of the Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination Revised (ACE-R).The variability of the 3 versions of the ACE-R (A, B and C), performed by the same observer, hence mainly 2 or 3 times on 119 patients showing no progression, was first calculated by Cronbach's alpha coefficient, t test and linear regression. The alpha coefficients of the 3 versions were obtained showing that the ACE-R versions can be considered as one, and an analysis of the interobserver variability was performed by Cohen's kappa coefficient, t test and linear regression on 12 patients. Eventually, we performed a receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis to compare the sensitivities and specificities to detect dementia of the ACE, the ACE-R and Mini Mental State Examination on 319 consecutive patients.The ROC areas of sensitivities and specificities of the ACE and ACE-R were very similar. Two cutoffs were identified at 83/100 and 89/100 with a specificity to normality of 98.6% if the ACE-R score was ≥83 and a sensitivity to dementia of 98.4% if the ACE-R score was ≤89.ACE-R in French is as reliable and valid as the original version to detect dementia.Mini-Mental State exam scores vary with education in blacks and whites.Previous studies have suggested that education and race may affect performance on standardized mental status tests. In order to more clearly define these relationships, a prospective longitudinal study was devised to answer two questions: (1) whether race or level of education affects scores on the Mini-Mental State (MMS) exam in non-demented people and (2) what numerical cutpoints maximize the sensitivity and specificity of utilizing the MMS to help diagnose dementia in blacks of varying educational attainment. A total of 100 white and 258 black individuals, recruited from two city hospital primary care geriatric clinics, were evaluated and subsequently followed longitudinally over a 2 1/2 year period in order to assess accurately the presence or absence of dementia. In the non-demented, total MMS scores and performance on each item of the MMS were analyzed, revealing that people with an 8th grade or less education consistently had significantly (P less than .01) worse results than the better educated (9th grade or better) on borough, attention items, recall of table and dog, copying, sentence writing, phrase repeating, and total score. Furthermore, a total of 25% of the lower education group had an MMS score in the 18-23 range, traditionally thought to suggest dementia. There were no consistently significant differences between blacks and whites of equal education. In the better educated groups, using a score of 23 or less to define dementia maximizes the sensitivity and specificity of using the MMS in this diagnosis at 93% and 100%, respectively. In the lower education group, using 17 or less to define dementia maximizes sensitivity and specificity at 81% and 100%, respectively.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Improving precision in the quantification of cognition using the Montreal Cognitive Assessment and the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) can be used to quantify cognitive ability in older persons undergoing screening for cognitive impairment. Although highly sensitive in detecting mild cognitive impairment, its measurement precision is weakest among persons with milder forms of impairment. We sought to overcome this limitation by integrating information from the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) into the calculation of cognitive ability.Data from 185 geriatric outpatients screened for cognitive impairment with the MoCA and the MMSE were Rasch analyzed to evaluate the extent to which the MMSE items improved measurement precision in the upper ability ranges of the population.Adding information from the MMSE resulted in a 13.8% (13.3-14.3%) reduction in measurement error, with significant improvements in all quartiles of patient ability. The addition of three-word repetition and recall, copy pentagons, repeat sentence, and write sentence improved measurement of cognition in the upper levels of ability.The algorithm presented here maximizes the yield of available clinical data while improving measurement of cognitive ability, which is particularly important for tracking changes over time in patients with milder levels of impairment.[Revalidation and standardization of the cognition mini-exam (first Spanish version of the Mini-Mental Status Examination) in the general geriatric population].The revalidation of the Mini Examen Cognoscitivo (MEC), first Spanish version (1978) of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) and documentation of "population-based norms" should clarify the potential confusion induced by later versions of MMSE.Validation of Addenbrooke's cognitive examination (ACE) in a Persian-speaking population.Use of reliable screening and diagnostic tests for assessment of cognitive abilities in neurological patients is rapidly increasing in clinical practice. This is due to the increase in the prevalence of dementias and the raised awareness of cognitive impairment in neurological disorders. Two well-known bedside screening tests for dementias among the English-speaking population are the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination (ACE). However, such tests have not been developed for the Persian-speaking population, which is estimated at 120 million worldwide. In this study we developed the Persian ACE and MMSE, adopted from the English version. We also assessed the sensitivity and specificity of these tests in the identification of Alzheimer's disease (AD) and mild cognitive impairment (MCI). We found that the Persian ACE at a cutoff point of 84, has a sensitivity of 93% and a specificity of 91% in discriminating MCI from a normal population; at 78, the test has a sensitivity of 73% and a specificity of 93% in differentiating MCI from AD, and at a similar cutoff point has a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 96% in discriminating AD from a normal population. We conclude that the Persian ACE is a valuable tool in clinical practice in the Persian-speaking population.Do memory complaints indicate the presence of cognitive impairment? Results of a field study.In the context of suspected cognitive disorders, the validity of memory complaints is subject to considerable debate. This investigation documents the prevalence of memory complaints and assesses the validity of memory complaints for detecting cognitive impairment.The sample comprises 349 randomly selected non-institutionalized individuals, aged 75 and over living in the city of Leipzig. Twenty individuals who suffer from moderate and severe dementia according to DSM-III-R were excluded. Memory complaints were measured by means of a single item question. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and a wider range of cognitive tests which constitute the short neuropsychological battery of the SIDAM (Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of dementia of Alzheimer type, Multi-infarct dementia and dementias of other etiology according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R) were used to test cognitive performance.One in three individuals aged 75 and over complained about memory deficits. The MMSE is not significantly related to memory complaints, whereas poorer performance on 2 out of 8 tests regarding specific areas of cognitive function (immediate recall, short-term memory) were found to be significantly associated with memory complaints. Despite these statistically significant associations, it is shown that memory complaints do not have diagnostic validity in detecting cognitive impairment on the individual level.Memory self-assessment should not be used as a substitute measure of cognitive performance. Initiation of further diagnostic and therapeutic steps should be based on cognitive performance testing. Relaying solely on memory complaints would miss individuals in need and allocate resources to worried but cognitively healthy persons.Diagnostic accuracy of a new instrument for detecting cognitive dysfunction in an emergent psychiatric population: the Brief Cognitive Screen.In certain clinical contexts, the sensitivity of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is limited. The authors developed a new cognitive screening instrument, the Brief Cognitive Screen (BCS), with the aim of improving diagnostic accuracy for cognitive dysfunction in the psychiatric emergency department (ED) in a quick and convenient format.The BCS, consisting of the Oral Trail Making Test (OTMT), animal fluency, the Clock Drawing Test (CDT), and the MMSE, was administered to 32 patients presenting with emergent psychiatric conditions. Comprehensive neuropsychological evaluation served as the criterion standard for determining cognitive dysfunction. Diagnostic accuracy of the MMSE was determined using the traditional clinical cutoff and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analyses. Diagnostic accuracy of individual BCS components and BCS Summary Scores was determined by ROC analyses.At the traditional clinical cutoff, MMSE sensitivity (46.4%) and total diagnostic accuracy (53.1%) were inadequate. Under ROC analyses, the diagnostic accuracy of the full BCS Summary Score (area under the curve [AUC]=0.857) was comparable to the MMSE (AUC=0.828). However, a reduced BCS Summary Score consisting of OTMT Part B (OTMT-B), animal fluency, and the CDT yielded classification accuracy (AUC=0.946) that was superior to the MMSE.Preliminary findings suggest the BCS is an effective, convenient alternative cognitive screening instrument for use in emergent psychiatric populations.A pilot study of the sensitivity and specificity analysis of the standard-Spanish version of the Culture-Fair Assessment of Neurocognitive Abilities and the Examen Cognoscitivo Mini-Mental in the Dominican Republic.This pilot study purports to address the need for culturally validated, evidence-based assessments and to serve as a springboard for future culturally sensitive research. This study was conducted in the Dominican Republic. It entailed counterbalanced administration of a standard Spanish translation of the Culture-Fair Assessment of Neurocognitive Abilities (S-S CANA) and the standard Spanish translation of the Mini-Mental State Examination (Examen Cognoscitivo Mini-Mental; ECM-M). The sample was composed of 30 Spanish-speaking Dominican adults who met the inclusion criteria for the normative and clinical groups. In an effort to initiate the validation process for the S-S CANA, as well as norm it to the given population, the efficacy of the S-S CANA in determining neuropathology was then compared to that of the ECM-M. Analyses of variance and covariance and t-tests were conducted, and a receiver-operating characteristic curve was computed. Results indicated significantly greater sensitivity and specificity of the S-S CANA relative to the ECM-M.Comparison of the short test of mental status and the mini-mental state examination in mild cognitive impairment.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is the most widely used brief screening measure of cognition, but it is not sensitive in detecting mild memory or other cognitive impairments. The Short Test of Mental Status (STMS) was specifically developed for use in dementia assessment and was intended to be more sensitive to problems of learning and mental agility that may be seen in mild cognitive impairment (MCI).To compare the STMS and MMSE for detecting or predicting MCI.Comparison of STMS and MMSE scores at baseline among 4 groups of patients: 788 patients with stable normal cognition, 75 patients with normal cognition at baseline but who developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease during follow-up, 129 patients with prevalent MCI at baseline, and 235 patients with prevalent mild Alzheimer disease. All patients and control subjects for this study were evaluated through the Mayo Alzheimer's Disease Patient Registry or the Mayo Clinic Alzheimer's Disease Research Center, Rochester, Minn, using a standardized diagnostic approach.The STMS was slightly more sensitive than the MMSE in discriminating between patients with stable normal cognition and patients with prevalent MCI. The STMS was superior to the MMSE in detecting deficits in cognition in individuals who had normal cognition at baseline but later developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease.Compared with the MMSE, the STMS was better able to document MCI and was more sensitive in detecting deficits in cognition in individuals who had normal cognition at baseline but later developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease.Validity of the clinical dementia rating scale for the detection and staging of dementia in Brazilian patients.The aim of this study was to determine the diagnostic value and agreement analyses between Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) and dementia diagnostic criteria (gold standard), Blessed Dementia Rating scale (BDRS), and Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 3rd Edition, Revised (DSM III-R) criteria for severity. In a sample of 343 Southern Brazilian participants, CDR was consecutively assessed in 295 dementia patients (Alzheimer disease, vascular dementia, and questionable) and 48 healthy elderly. The National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Diseases and Stroke/Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association (NINCDS-ADRDA) criteria for probable Alzheimer disease and the National Institute of Neurological Disorders and Stroke and Association Internationale pour la Recherché et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences (NINDS-AIREN) for probable vascular dementia were the gold standard. A battery of cognitive tests and the Mini Mental State Examination (as a screening test at study entry) were also applied. Sensitivity and specificity were obtained through contingency tables. Validity and reliability were measured through kappa coefficient, Kendall b, and percent agreement. CDR agreement among raters was demonstrated by percent agreement. Agreement to gold standard was good (kappa=0.75), as well as to the Blessed scale (kappa=0.73), and excellent to the DSM III-R (kappa=0.78). CDR detection of dementia among healthy elderly or questionable dementia was 86% and 80% sensitive, respectively, and 100% specific for both settings. In conclusion, agreement of CDR global score with the gold standard was good, and diagnostic values were high.The effects of metrifonate on the cognitive, behavioral, and functional performance of Alzheimer's disease patients. Metrifonate Study Group.The objective of this study was to evaluate the efficacy and safety of metrifonate, a long-acting acetylcholinesterase inhibitor, in patients clinically diagnosed with probable Alzheimer's disease of mild-to-moderate severity.This was a prospective, multicenter, 26-week, double-blind, parallel group study. The 264 randomized patients met diagnostic criteria of the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Diseases and Stroke and the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association for probable Alzheimer's disease. Patients had Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores of 10-26 and ischemic scores (Rosen modification) of <4. Metrifonate-treated patients received a single 50-mg dose once daily. The efficacy of metrifonate was investigated with respect to 3 symptom domains. Cognitive performance was analyzed using the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive Subscale (ADAS-Cog) and the MMSE. Psychiatric and behavioral disturbances were analyzed using the Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI) and the ADAS-Noncognitive subscale (ADAS-Noncog). The ability to perform instrumental and basic activities of daily living was evaluated using the Disability Assessment for Dementia (DAD) scale. Additionally, global state was assessed using the Clinician Interview-Based Impression of Change with Caregiver Input (CIBIC-Plus) scale.After 26 weeks of metrifonate therapy, a statistically significant benefit of metrifonate was observed in the cognitive performance of Alzheimer's disease patients (ADAS-Cog, t = 2.55, df = 237, p = .012; MMSE, t = 4.60, df = 237, p = .0001). Metrifonate also significantly attenuated the deterioration in activities of daily living of the patients (DAD total score, t = -2.11, df = 233, p = .036) and relieved patients' psychiatric and behavioral disturbances (NPI total score, t = 2.51, df = 233, p = .013). In addition, metrifonate significantly improved the scores for the global state of the patients (CIBIC-Plus, t = 2.07, df = 232, p = .039). Metrifonate was well tolerated; adverse events were predominantly mild in intensity, and no hepatotoxicity was observed.In this study, metrifonate was safe and well tolerated. It benefited the cognitive decline, psychiatric and behavioral disturbances, impaired ability to perform instrumental and basic activities of daily living, and global state of patients diagnosed with mild-to-moderate Alzheimer's disease.Misclassification of dementia by the mini-mental state examination--are education and social class the only factors?The 1988 Melton Mowbray Study of the Elderly comprised an initial screen with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) followed by a detailed clinical assessment using the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination (CAMDEX) for all those scoring 21 and under on the MMSE, a one in two sample of those scoring 22 or 23 and a one in ten of the remainder. A total of 1579 subjects completed the initial screen with 438 subjects undergoing the CAMDEX assessment. Analysis of those subjects who were found to be free of dementia at the clinical assessment (n = 155) demonstrated that the very elderly, those from the manual social classes and subjects with visual impairments had an increased chance of being misclassified as demented by the MMSE. Low educational level and various measures of physical disability also showed a tendency to result in misclassification as falsely positive by the MMSE when viewed alone but these effects appeared to be due solely to their association with extreme age and/or manual social class.[Five by five test. A brief instrument for the detection of cognitive impediment in clinical settings].Many psychological tests for the detection of cognitive impediment and dementia are inadequate by being too prolonged, inconsistent or with poor specificity or sensibility. It is presented a brief test of evocation of proper names by classes (TIG) and their properties psicometrics and utility are compared with the Mini-mental State Examination (MEM).We selected 196 patients from a neurological clinic, with suggestive symptoms of cognitive impediment. We excluded individuals with focal or chronic cerebral disorders, sensorial disturbances, severe psychiatric diseases and toxicity by drugs. Patients were by grouped the Clinical Dementia Rating scale and they were evaluated neuropsychologically. The internal consistency of TIG was examined and a cross-validation procedure was performed to test for the predictive validity. Likewise, the convergent validity was tested against the scale of dementia of Blessed and the MEM. Finally the diagnostic efficiency of both tests, the effects of the demographics variables and the clinical utility were analyzed. We used non-parametrics statistics, analysis of sensibility upon curves ROC and analysis of the post-test probabilities.The TIG has adequate internal consistency and validity. The diagnostic efficiency was high (area under the curve ROC 0,939 [IC 95%: 0,908-0,971], p < 0,0001). The introduction of the demographics covariates in a logistic model wisely improved the diagnostic efficiency. The TIG has some better fulfillment than the MEM. Neither the MEM nor the TIG are tests suitable for communitary screening of cognitive defect.The TIG is briefer, easier to apply and more efficient than the MEM. Possibly it is useful to detect cognitive impediment in clinical contexts. This study is preliminary.Mapping scores onto stages: mini-mental state examination and clinical dementia rating.Although the clinical course of Alzheimer disease (AD) is gradual, it is useful for a number of reasons to distinguish between different levels of severity. The Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) has demonstrated high validity and reliability for this purpose, but it requires a considerable amount of data to be collected both from the patient and from an informant. In the present study, the authors mapped Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores onto CDR categories to determine how well the MMSE performs as a surrogate of the CDR as a timesaving method of staging dementia.Eight hundred sixty-three probands, including 524 patients with probable AD, 92 patients with questionable dementia, and 247 with memory complaints but no objective cognitive impairment, were included. Cutoff scores were identified on one-half of the sample using a receiver operating characteristic analysis. The cutoff values were then applied to the other half of the sample, and the agreement between MMSE score ranges and CDR stages was determined by calculating Cohen's kappa.The MMSE discriminated well between CDR stages 0.5, 1, 2, and 3 but performed poorly in the separation between CDR stages zero and 0.5. The MMSE ranges were 30 for no, 26-29 for questionable, 21-25 for mild, 11-20 for moderate, and 0-10 for severe dementia. Substantial agreement between the two instruments was obtained for the categories mild (kappa=0.62, p<0.001, N=115), moderate (kappa=0.69, p<0.001, N=114), and severe dementia (kappa=0.76, p<0.001, N=39), whereas the agreement was moderate for no (kappa=0.44, p<0.001, N=120) and only fair for questionable dementia (kappa=0.28, p<0.001, N=42).The MMSE can be used as a surrogate measure for the CDR for the staging of dementia in AD.Prevalence of dementia in an urban Indian population.This article reports the findings of a 3-year epidemiological survey for dementia in an urban community-resident population in Mumbai (Bombay), India, wherein the prevalence of all types of dementia was determined.The study was conducted in three stages. Stage 1: From a potential pool of 30,000 subjects aged 40 years or more, 24,488 (male = 11,875; female = 12,613) persons completed self-report or interviewer-rated protocols based on the Sandoz Clinical Assessment Geriatric Scale, but 5,512 (18.37%) persons refused to participate. Scores on the protocol had a possible range from 0 through 34. Stage 2: Persons with a score +2 SD above the mean were selected in this stage where the persons were screened for cognitive functioning using a modified and translated version of the Mini-Mental State Examination. Individuals who scored below the 5th percentile were included in Stage 3 and underwent a detailed neurological, psychiatric, and neuropsychological evaluation as well as hematological, radiological, electrocardiographic, and electroencephalographic investigations. Diagnoses were made jointly by a neurologist, psychiatrist, and psychologist using the DSM-IV diagnostic criteria. Subjects were also rated on the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) scale and assessed for activities of daily living.One hundred five subjects with dementia (CDR > or = 0.5) were identified in this population of 24,488 persons. The prevalence rate for dementia in those aged 40 years and more was 0.43% and for persons aged 65 and above was 2.44%. Seventy-eight individuals had a CDR of > or = 1 yielding an overall prevalence rate of 0.32%, and a prevalence rate of 1.81% for those aged 65 years and older. The overall prevalence rate for Alzheimer's disease (AD) in the population was 0.25%, and 1.5% for those aged 65 years and above. AD (n = 62; 65%) was the most common cause of dementia followed byvascular dementia (n = 23; 22%). There were more women (n = 38) than men (n = 24) in the AD group. Increasing age was associated with a higher prevalence of the dementia syndrome in general as well as AD specifically.In the population surveyed, the prevalence of AD and other dementias is less than that reported from developed countries but similar to results of other studies in India. Prevalence of the dementia syndrome increased with age and was not related to gender. AD was the most common dementia and the prevalence was higher in women than in men. Results are discussed with respect to shorter life expectancy, relocation of affected persons, and differences in the risk factors as compared to developed countries.Mild cognitive impairment: cognitive screening or neuropsychological assessment?To describe the neuropsychological profile of mild cognitive impairment subtypes (amnestic, non-amnestic and multiple-domain) of a clinical sample. We further address the diagnostic properties of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Cambridge Cognitive Examination for the identification of the different mild cognitive impairment subtypes in clinical practice.Cross-sectional clinical and neuropsychological evaluation of 249 elderly patients attending a memory clinic at a university hospital in Sao Paulo, Brazil.The performance of patients with mild cognitive impairment was heterogeneous across the different subtests of the neuropsychological battery, with a trend towards an overall worse performance for amnestic (particularly multiple domain) mild cognitive impairment as compared to non-amnestic subtypes. Screening tests for dementia (Mini-Mental State Examination and Cambridge Cognitive Examination) adequately discriminated cases of mild Alzheimer's disease from controls, but they were not accurate to discriminate patients with mild cognitive impairment (all subtypes) from control subjects.The discrimination of mild cognitive impairment subtypes was possible only with the aid of a comprehensive neuropsychological assessment. It is necessary to develop new strategies for mild cognitive impairment screening in clinical practice.Age and education correction of Mini-Mental State Examination for English and Spanish-speaking elderly.Previous research has shown that the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMS) is biased as a measure of cognitive impairment in minority and low-education patients. The purpose of this study was to (1) develop a statistical correction for effects of age and education and (2) test the efficacy of the statistically adjusted MMS (MMSAdj) as a screening test for dementia using different ethnic groups and education levels. We used a population-base community survey sample (n=590) composed of 46.6% Hispanics and 53.4% non-Hispanics to derive the statistical correction, defined as:MMSAdj = Raw MMS - (0.471 X [Education-12]) + (0.131 X [Age-70]). Ethnicity and language of test administration were not significantly related to MMSAdj in the community survey sample, but the raw MMS was strongly influenced by these factors. We used an independent sample (n=2,983) of patients evaluated through the California Alzheimer's Disease Diagnostic and Treatment Centers to test the diagnostic accuracy of the MMS and the MMSAdj across low- and high-education groups and across whites, Hispanics, and blacks. Results showed greater stability of sensitivity and specificity across education levels and ethnic groups for the MMSAdj than for the raw MMS and suggest that the MMSAdj is a preferable measure of cognitive impairment for low- education and minority individuals.Selective memory impairment on an adapted Mini-Mental State Examination increases risk of future dementia.To determine whether selective memory impairment (SMI) on an adapted Mini-Mental State Examination (aMMSE) test increases risk of future dementia in a population-based survey of central Spain.SMI is a strong predictor of dementia in the elderly. However, most approaches have used extensive memory batteries, which are not always suitable for screening purposes.The basal cohort consisted of 2982 poorly educated individuals aged 65 or over. Dementia, stroke and parkinsonism cases were previously excluded. At entry, participants received a structured interview including an aMMSE. Two groups were created according to basal cognitive performance, namely: (1) aMMSE > 23 and no word remembered on the aMMSE delayed-recall task (SMI group); and (2) aMMSE > 23 and at least one word remembered on the delayed-recall task (control group). In a three-year follow-up wave, conversion rate to dementia was calculated and logistic regression was performed.Of a total of 2507 subjects who completed the two evaluations, 280 qualified for SMI at entry. In the SMI group, 25 subjects (8.9%) developed dementia vs 26 subjects (1.2%) in the control group. Taking the two groups together, and once demographic and medical variables had been controlled, a low delayed-recall score increased dementia conversion rate (OR 0.47, 95% CI 0.34-0.64). Alzheimer's disease was the main cause of dementia (79.8%).Memory impairment is a risk factor for future dementia in the neurologically-healthy elderly. This can be observed in a subgroup of subjects with SMI defined on the aMMSE delayed-recall subscore. Some other measurements should be added to the SMI construct to improve its predictive validity.Can Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) replace Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) for dementia screening in a Thai geriatric outpatient setting?Mini-mental-State Examination (MMSE) is a widely used tool for dementia screening. However, several limitations are found and the Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) appears to be an alternative test. The objective in this study was to compare the performance of MMSE-Thai 2002 and RUDAS-Thai for dementia screening, and to determine their performances and identify their optimal cut-off points. The participants were older patients from a Geriatric and Neurology Outpatient Clinic, Srinagarind Hospital, Khon Kaen University. The RUDAS-Thai and the MMSE-Thai 2002 were administered to each participant. Subsequently, a specialist physician assessed each participant for dementia. Results showed the area under receiver operating characteristic curve for both RUDAS-Thai (81.0%; 95%CI, 74.8-87.2) and MMSE-Thai 2002 (81.2%; 95%CI, 74.9-87.4) were equal. A score of 24 or lower provided an optimal cut-off point. Our finding supports that the RUDAS-Thai can be an effective alternative test for dementia screening. For both test scores, a score of 24 or lower is an optimal cut-off point to provide an indication of developing dementia.Cognitive test performance predicts change in functional status at the population level: the MYHAT Project.In the community at large, many older adults with minimal cognitive and functional impairment remain stable or improve over time, unlike patients in clinical research settings, who typically progress to dementia. Within a prospective population-based study, we identified neuropsychological tests predicting improvement or worsening over 1 year in cognitively driven everyday functioning as measured by Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR). Participants were 1682 adults aged 65+ and dementia-free at baseline. CDR change was modeled as a function of baseline test scores, adjusting for demographics. Among those with baseline CDR = 0.5, 29.8% improved to CDR = 0; they had significantly better baseline scores on most tests. In a stepwise multiple logistic regression model, tests which remained independently associated with subsequent CDR improvement were Category Fluency, a modified Token Test, and the sum of learning trials on Object Memory Evaluation. In contrast, only 7.1% with baseline CDR = 0 worsened to CDR = 0.5. They had significantly lower baseline scores on most tests. In multiple regression analyses, only the Mini-Mental State Examination, delayed memory for visual reproduction, and recall susceptible to proactive interference, were independently associated with CDR worsening. At the population level, changes in both directions are observable in functional status, with different neuropsychological measures predicting the direction of change.Effects of general medical health on Alzheimer's progression: the Cache County Dementia Progression Study.Several observational studies have suggested a link between health status and rate of decline among individuals with Alzheimer's disease (AD). We sought to quantify the relationship in a population-based study of incident AD, and to compare global comorbidity ratings to counts of comorbid conditions and medications as predictors of AD progression.This was a case-only cohort study arising from a population-based longitudinal study of memory and aging, in Cache County, Utah. Participants comprised 335 individuals with incident AD followed for up to 11 years. Patient descriptors included sex, age, education, dementia duration at baseline, and APOE genotype. Measures of health status made at each visit included the General Medical Health Rating (GMHR), number of comorbid medical conditions, and number of non-psychiatric medications. Dementia outcomes included the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Clinical Dementia Rating - sum of boxes (CDR-sb), and the Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI).Health status tended to fluctuate over time within individuals. None of the baseline medical variables (GMHR, comorbidities, and non-psychiatric medications) was associated with differences in rates of decline in longitudinal linear mixed effects models. Over time, low GMHR ratings, but not comorbidities or medications, were associated with poorer outcomes (MMSE: β = -1.07 p = 0.01; CDR-sb: β = 1.79 p < 0.001; NPI: β = 4.57 p = 0.01).Given that time-varying GMHR, but not baseline GMHR, was associated with the outcomes, it seems likely that there is a dynamic relationship between medical and cognitive health. GMHR is a more sensitive measure of health than simple counts of comorbidities or medications. Since health status is a potentially modifiable risk factor, further study is warranted.The milan overall dementia assessment and the mini-mental state examination compared: an epidemiological investigation of dementia.We assessed the validity of two screening tests [the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Milan Overall Dementia Assessment or (MODA)] in a population study on the prevalence of Alzheimer's disease, carried out in a small town in the north of Italy. A random sample of 1000 subjects aged 60 years or over entered the study. Subjects who scored below the cut-off points on MODA or on MMSE, or both, were further investigated with neuropsychological, laboratory and instrumental tests to ascertain a final diagnosis, which was considered as the gold standard. Our findings show that MODA has a higher sensitivity than MMSE in detecting subjects affected by dementing illnesses, while MMSE shows a higher specificity. MODA seems to be preferable to MMSE as a screening test for studies where a very high sensitivity is required.[The clock test: a simple method to assess dementia].to validate an easy and simple test to measure cognitive function: the clock drawing test.138 hospitalized and free living elders (96 female, mean age 77.9 years) were studied. They were requested to draw a clock, using standardized instructions. The drawings were independently analyzed and scored by the authors. The Mini Mental State test was used as reference and the scores of both tests were correlated.there was a correlation of 0.73 between the scores of the clock drawing and Mini Mental State tests. Using a score of 7 points in tye clock drawing and 26 points in the Mini Mental State test as cut of points for the diagnosis of dementia, the former's sensitivity and specificity was 0.82 and 0.71 respectively.the clock drawing test appears as a simple and effective test for the initial assessment of cognitive functions in patients with suspected dementia.Cognitive screening in community-dwelling elders: performance on the clock-in-the-box.The Clock-in-the-Box is a rapid (2-minute) cognitive screening tool. The purpose of this study was to compare the Clock-in-the-Box with the Mini-Mental State Exam and neuropsychologic tests; to determine Clock-in-the-Box score normative values by age and education group; and to determine if the Clock-in-the-Box score is associated with measures of physical function.Community-dwelling older participants in the Boston area were recruited for a prospective, longitudinal study in which they completed a variety of cognitive and functional assessments.At baseline, participants (n=798; mean age [± standard deviation]=78.2 [±5.5] years; 14 [±3] mean years of education) completed in-home assessments of cognition (Clock-in-the-Box and Mini-Mental State Exam), measures of independent function (Activities of Daily Living and Instrumental Activities of Daily Living), and measures of physical function (Short Physical Performance Battery). The mean Mini-Mental State Exam score was 27.1 (±1.6; range 0-30 [0 worst]), and the mean Clock-in-the-Box score was 6.2 (±1.6; range 0-8 [0 worst]). Performance on the Clock-in-the-Box was correlated (Spearman) with the Mini-Mental State Exam (r=0.49, P<.001) and neuropsychologic measures (r=0.37-0.50; P<.001). Higher Clock-in-the-Box score was significantly associated with no difficulty in Activities of Daily Living (χ(2) = 39.6, P<.001) and Instrumental Activities of Daily Living (χ(2) = 35.5, P<.001). In addition, higher Clock-in-the-Box scores were associated with higher scores on the Short Physical Performance Battery (F=5.4, P<.001).The Clock-in-the-Box is a brief cognitive screening test that is correlated with the Mini-Mental State Exam, neuropsychologic tests, and measures of independent and physical function in community-dwelling older adults.Prevalence of dementia in an urban area in taiwan.This two-stage epidemiologic study was to investigate the prevalence and types of dementia among elderly people in the Saa-Min district of Kaohsiung City in Taiwan. In stage one, the Chinese Mini-Mental Status Examination (CMMSE) and Blessed Dementia Rating Scale were employed. In stage two, a comprehensive neurobehavioral examination and neuropsychologic tests were administered by neurologists and neuropsychologists. Dementia was defined by DSM-III-R criteria. The National Institute of Neurological and Communication Disorders and Stroke-Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD) and the National Institute of Neurological Disorder and Stroke-Association international pour la Recherche et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences criteria for vascular dementia (VaD) were applied. A total of 1,016 randomly selected elderly people participated in phase one: 131 people with CMMSE below cutoff values participated in phase two, of whom 45 were confirmed to have a form of dementia. The prevalence of dementia in this sample was 4.4% (3.2% in men and 5.8% in women): 2.0% for those 65 to 74 years old, 8.3% for those 75 to 84 and 24.4% for those > or = 85 years old; 6.0% for those who were illiterate, 3.3% for those who attended grade-school; and 2.8% for those who finished junior-high-school. AD (22 cases, 48.9%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (11 cases, 24.4%) and mixed dementia (MIX: 5 cases, 11.1%). Old age and being female were significant high risk factors for AD. Medical history indicated that stroke and hypertension were significant risk factors for VaD. A relatively high prevalence of dementia was observed in this study, probably because we assessed neurobehavior in great detail. Although AD was the leading cause of dementia in the present population sample. VaD and MIX also comprised an important proportion, reflecting the high prevalence of stroke in Taiwan. Older women had high risk for AD, not for VaD; and those with a history of stroke and hypertension had high risk for VaD, not for AD.Prevalence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan: impact of age, sex, education, and urbanization.To determine the prevalence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan, a two-phase study consisting of a phase I screening survey using the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) and a phase II diagnostic examination using the CERAD neuropsychological battery and the neurobehavioral examination was conducted. According to the household records, stratified random sampling by the degree of urbanization of the community was used, and 2915 inhabitants aged 65 and over participated in this study. The ICD-10NA criteria for dementia, NINCDS-ADRDA guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD), and NINDS-AIREN criteria for vascular dementia (VaD) were employed. Three hundred and ninety-eight persons who had MMSE scores below the cutoff values were recruited into the phase II study, of whom 108 had dementia. The prevalence rate (PR) of dementia was 3.7%, increasing from 1.3% in people 65-69 years old to 16.5% in people 85 years old and older. The age-standardized PR (ASPR) was 4.0%. AD (58 cases, 53.7%, PR=2.0%, ASPR=2.3%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (25 cases, 23.1%, PR=0.9%, ASPR=0.9%), and mixed dementia (eight cases, 7.4%). After adjusting for age, sex and education using logistic regression analysis, aging was a significant risk factor for AD, VaD and total dementia. Female sex and illiteracy were significant risk factors for AD only. We concluded that the prevalence of dementia in Taiwan is lower than in the developed countries, which could be due to a relatively young elderly population and a high mortality from dementia in Taiwan. AD is the leading cause of dementia in Taiwan. Considering the high stroke prevalence, the relatively lower prevalence of VaD in Taiwan deserves further investigation.Validation of the General Practitioner Assessment of Cognition - Chinese version (GPCOG-C) in China.To assess the reliability, validity, and diagnostic utility of the Chinese version of General Practitioner Assessment of Cognition (GPCOG-C). The GPCOG, which is specifically designed for use in primary care to screen for cognitive impairment, consists of a patient section testing cognition, and an informant section asking about decline in cognitive and functional abilities.The English version of GPCOG was translated, back-translated, and subsequently revised to determine the final GPCOG-C. Our sample comprised 253 community-dwelling volunteers with memory concerns aged 50 years and over and 103 outpatients of a psychogeriatric clinic with memory complaints. Participants were assessed by one of the four general practitioners or six psychogeriatricians. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the Hasegawa's Dementia Scale (HDS), and the GPCOG-C were compared against the DSM-IV-defined dementia diagnosis.The internal consistency (Cronbach's α) was 0.68 for the GPCOG patient section. The test-retest was 0.98 for the GPCOG-C total. The sequential administration of both components of GPCOG-C had a sensitivity of 97% and a specificity of 89%, with a positive predictive value of 72% and a negative predictive value of 99%. Both the GPCOG-C total and sequential two-stage scoring methods performed at least well as the MMSE and HDS in detecting dementia. The administration time for the two-stage approach was 4.3 ± 2.4 min.The GPCOG-C is a valid, time efficient instrument for dementia screening in China.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment is superior to the Mini-Mental State Examination in detecting patients at higher risk of dementia.To examine the discriminant validity of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in detecting patients with cognitive impairment at higher risk for dementia at a memory clinic setting.Memory clinic patients were administered the MoCA, MMSE, and a comprehensive formal neuropsychological battery. Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) subtypes were dichotomized into two groups: single domain-MCI (sd-MCI) and multiple domain-MCI (md-MCI). Area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) analysis was used to compare the discriminatory ability of the MoCA and the MMSE.Two hundred thirty patients were recruited, of which 136 (59.1%) were diagnosed with dementia, 61 (26.5%) with MCI, and 33 (14.3%) with no cognitive impairment (NCI). The majority of MCI patients had md-MCI (n = 36, 59%). The MoCA had significantly larger AUCs than the MMSE in discriminating md-MCI from the lower risk group for incident dementia (NCI and sd-MCI) [MoCA 0.92 (95% CI, 0.86-0.98) vs. MMSE 0.84 (95% CI, 0.75-0.92), p = 0.02). At their optimal cut-off points, the MoCA (19/20) remained superior to the MMSE (23/24) in detecting md-MCI [sensitivity: 0.83 vs. 0.72; specificity: 0.86 vs. 0.83; PPV: 0.79 vs. 0.72; NPV: 0.89 vs. 0.83; correctly classified: 85.1% vs. 78.7%].The MoCA is superior to the MMSE in the detection of patients with cognitive impairment at higher risk for incident dementia at a memory clinic setting.Validation study of the Mini-Mental State Examination in a Malay-speaking elderly population in Malaysia.In view of the differing sensitivity and specificity of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the non-English-speaking populations, we conducted the first validation study of the Malay version (M-MMSE) in Malaysia among 300 subjects (from the community and outpatient clinics).Three versions were used: M-MMSE-7 (serial 7), M-MMSE-3 (serial 3) and M-MMSE-S (spell 'dunia' backwards). Dementia was assessed using the criteria of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders IV. The optimal cutoff scores were obtained from the receiver operating characteristics curves.Seventy-three patients (24.3%) had dementia and 227 (75.7%) were controls. Three hundred patients completed the M-MMSE-7, 160 the M-MMSE-3 and 145 the M-MMSE-S. All 3 versions were valid and reliable in the diagnosis of dementia. The optimal cutoff scores varied with each version and gender. In the control group, significant gender differences were observed in the patients with the lowest educational status. Increasing educational levels significantly improved the M-MMSE performance in both genders.All 3 versions of the M-MMSE are valid and reliable as a screening tool for dementia in the Malaysian population, but at different cutoff scores. In those with the lowest educational background, gender-adjusted cutoff scores should be applied.Non-cognitive psychopathological symptoms associated with incident mild cognitive impairment and dementia, Alzheimer's type.To test the hypothesis that specific psychopathological non-cognitive symptoms are associated with incident mild cognitive impairment (MCI), while different symptoms are associated with incident dementia of Alzheimer's type (DAT).A representative community sample of 4,803 individuals aged 55+ years was interviewed in a two-phase screening, in Wave I or ZARADEMP I. This is the baseline, cross-sectional study of the ZARADEMP Project, a longitudinal study to document incidence and risk factors of dementia. The main instrument for assessment of participants was the ZARADEMP Interview, which includes standardized Spanish versions of instruments such as the Mini-Mental Status Examination and the Geriatric Mental State GMS-AGECAT. Two years later, in Wave II or ZARADEMP II, the cognitively non-deteriorated elderly were reassessed in a similar, two-phase procedure. "Incident cases" of both dementia and DAT (DSM-IV-TR criteria), as well as MCI (operationally defined Petersen's criteria) were diagnosed by a panel of psychiatrists. Statistical, logistic regression models, adjusted by age, sex and education were used to test the hypothesized association."Irritability", "neurovegetative symptoms", "sleep problems", "concentration difficulties", "loneliness" and "subjective slowing" documented at baseline were associated with incident MCI (odds ratio, OR range 1.71-2.67). A different profile of non-cognitive symptoms was associated with incident DAT, specifically "tension" (OR= 2.45), "sleep problems" (OR= 2.81), and "observed slowing" (OR= 4.35). On the contrary, "subjective restriction of activities" seemed to be negatively associated with DAT (OR= 0.12).To our knowledge, this is the first report about some specific psychopathological, non-cognitive symptoms associated with incident MCI and/ or incident DAT, when controlling by each other. The psychopathological profile associated with MCI is different from the profile preceding DAT.Test-retest reliable coefficients and 5-year change scores for the MMSE and 3MS.The present study explored several different procedures for determining the amount of change that occurred on the Mini-Mental State Exam [MMSE; Folstein, M. F., Folstein, S. E., & McHugh, P. R. (1975). "Mini-Mental State": A practical method for grading the cognitive state of patients for the clinician. Journal of Psychiatric Research, 12, 189-198] and Modified Mini-Mental State Exam [3MS; Teng, E. L., & Chui, H. C. (1987). The Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS) examination. Journal of Clinical Psychiatry, 48, 314-318] over short and extended test-retest intervals. The test-retest scores were drawn from a selected sample of elderly individuals who participated in the Canadian Study of Health and Aging [Canadian Study of Health and Aging. (1994). The Canadian study of health and aging: Study methods and prevalence of dementia. Canadian Medical Association Journal, 150, 899-913] and were tested on two occasions (CSHA-1 and CSHA-2) separated by 5 years. On each occasion the MMSE and 3MS were administered twice at approximately 3-month intervals. Thus, the mental status tests were administered four times: times 1 and 2 at CSHA-1 and times 3 and 4 at CSHA-2. Mean difference scores and percent of baseline scores showed relatively small group changes over both short and long test-retest intervals for the MMSE and the 3MS. A reliable change index based on a linear regression model controlled for practice effects, psychometric errors due to low reliability, regression to the mean, and accounted for the effects of various demographic variables. Consequently, this reliable change index provided a better estimate of the amount of change that occurred for individual participants than did the mean Retest-Test 1 difference, percent of baseline change, or a reliable change index based on a Retest-Test 1 difference score. Normative data for the change scores are provided.Screening for dementia in an Irish community sample using MMSE: a comparison of norm-adjusted versus fixed cut-points.The MMSE is a widely-used instrument in screening for dementia in the community. The traditional cut-point of <24/30 may be unsuitable for use in some settings, due to biases in age and education.This study aimed to investigate whether cut-points derived from age- and education-specific norms would improve the performance of the MMSE as a screening tool for dementia and cognitive impairment in an Irish community setting, potentially reducing the number of onward referrals. A secondary aim was to obtain score norms in an Irish sample.One thousand one hundred and fifteen people aged over 65 (mean age 74.8+/-6.8 years; 68% female) were assessed in their own homes, using MMSE (world) and the AGECAT computerised diagnostic system for mental illness in the elderly. The performance of the MMSE in identifying case- and sub-case-level dementia was investigated using cut-points of <24 and <23, as well as adjusted cut-points based on published norms and norms derived from the Irish sample.Published norms did not prove useful in improving screening accuracy. Cut-points based on 10th percentile Irish norms and the <23 cut-point performed comparably well, both yielding 93% specificity, with overall accuracy of 90% and 91% respectively (as sensitivity was higher for the <23 cut-point).Locally-derived norms yielded better screening accuracy than did published norms or the traditional <24 cut-point. The importance of selecting an appropriate percentile cut-off when using norms is discussed. The best results were obtained with a simple <23 cut-point, and this may be optimal when screening for dementia in an Irish community setting.The performance of the Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) for cognitive screening in a geriatric outpatient setting.Dementia is prevalent in the elderly but it is usually unrecognized. The Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) appears to be a good screening tool for dementia detection. The objectives are to validate RUDAS-Thai for detecting dementia according to Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders- IV-Text Revised (DSM-IV-TR) criteria in a geriatric outpatient setting and to determine its optimal cut point.This is a cross-sectional study in which the target population is patients from a Geriatric and Neurology Outpatient Clinic, Srinagarind Hospital, Khon Kaen University who were aged 60 years or above. The content validity and test-retest reliability of the RUDAS-Thai were performed initially. It was administered to each participant. Then a specialist physician assessed each participant for dementia.Eighty-nine (44.5%) subjects had dementia, 89 (44.5%) had normal cognition and 22 (11%) had mild cognitive impairment. The area under the Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was 0.82 (0.75-0.87). The optimal cut point was 24/30; it provided sensitivity and specificity of 78.7% and 61.8%, respectively. It was not influenced by age and gender but by educational level.The RUDAS-Thai is a good screening tool for dementia detection in a geriatric outpatient setting. It is portable, short-time consuming, and avoids some limitations of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). However, education does affect the scores. The scores of 24 or lower is an optimal cut point for an indication of developing dementia.Relationship of dementia screening tests with biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease.Screening tests for Alzheimer's disease lack sensitivity and specificity. We developed the AD8, a brief dementia screening interview validated against clinical and cognitive evaluations, as an improvement over current screening methods. Because insufficient follow-up has occurred to validate the AD8 against the neuropathologic findings of Alzheimer's disease, we investigated whether AD8 scores correspond to impairment in episodic memory testing and changes in biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease (cerebrospinal fluid and amyloid imaging with Pittsburgh compound B) characteristic of symptomatic Alzheimer's disease. We also compared informant-based assessments with brief performance-based dementia screening measurements such as the Mini Mental State Exam. The sample (n = 257) had a mean age of 75.4 years with 15.1 years of education; 88.7% were Caucasian and 45.5% were male. The sample was divided into two groups based on their AD8 scores: those with a negative dementia screening test (AD8 score 0 or 1, n = 137) and those with a positive dementia screening test (AD8 score ≥2, n = 120). Individuals with positive AD8 scores had abnormal Pittsburgh compound B binding (P < 0.001) and cerebrospinal fluid biomarkers (P < 0.001) compared with individuals with negative AD8 scores. Individuals with positive AD8 tests and positive biomarkers scored in the impaired range on the Wechsler Logical Memory Story A (mean score 7.0 ± 4.5 for Pittsburgh compound B; mean score 7.6 ± 5.3 for cerebrospinal fluid amyloid beta protein 1-42). The AD8 area under the curve for Pittsburgh compound B was 0.737 (95% confidence interval: 0.64-0.83) and for cerebrospinal fluid amyloid beta protein 1-42 was 0.685 (95% confidence interval: 0.60-0.77) suggesting good discrimination. The AD8 had superior sensitivity in detecting early stages of dementia compared with the Mini Mental State Examination. The AD8 had a likelihood ratio of a positive test of 5.8 (95% confidence interval: 5.4-6.3) and likelihood ratio of a negative test of 0.04 (95% confidence interval: 0.03-0.06), increasing the pre-test probability of an individual having symptomatic Alzheimer's disease. Individuals with AD8 scores of ≥2 had a biomarker phenotype consistent with Alzheimer's disease and lower performance on episodic memory tests, supporting a diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease. Informant-based assessments may be superior to performance-based screening measures such as the Mini Mental State Examination in corresponding to underlying Alzheimer's disease pathology, particularly at the earliest stages of decline. The use of a brief test such as the AD8 may improve strategies for detecting dementia in community settings where biomarkers may not be readily available, and may enrich clinical trial recruitment by increasing the likelihood that participants have underlying biomarker abnormalities.MMSE cross-domain variability predicts cognitive decline in centenarians.Early detection of dementia is one of the key issues in cognitive gerontology. However, so far the detection of early stages in cognitive decline has been rather unreliable. One central limitation of current assessment strategies is that they rely on information about a person's level of performance obtained from a single assessment.In the first part of the present paper, we propose three strategies for overcoming this limitation by using information from several measurement occasions to improve diagnostic reliability.In the second part, we present one exemplary empirical analysis of one of these approaches reporting data from the Heidelberg Centenarian Study.In this sample of very old individuals tested at baseline and at a follow-up 18 months later, the intra-individual cross-domain variability across MMSE subscales [1]at baseline predicted cognitive decline (i.e. change in an external cognitive functioning rating from baseline to follow-up) much better than baseline mean MMSE scores.In conclusion, we discuss the advantage of performance variability as a predictor for cognitive decline.Validating screening instruments for cognitive impairment in older South Asians in the United Kingdom.The numbers of older South Asians in the United Kingdom are rising. Investigation of their mental health has been neglected compared to their physical health.This study aimed to determine the sensitivity and specificity of modified versions of two screening instruments for cognitive impairment (Mini-Mental State Examination and Abbreviated Mental Test) in a community-based population.Two-stage study comparing screening instruments against diagnostic interview.South, central and north Manchester.Community-resident South Asians aged 60 years and over.Subjects were approached via their general practitioners and interviewed at home. Sensitivity and specificity for the screening instruments were calculated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.For the Gujarati population, the MMSE cutoff was >/=24 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 95%) and AMT>/=6 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 95%). For the Pakistani population, the MMSE cutoff was >/=27 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 77%) and AMT>/=7 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 87%).Culturally modified versions of the Mini-Mental State Examination and Abbreviated Mental Test are acceptable and may have a high degree of sensitivity. They may assist with the recognition of cognitive impairment, if an appropriate cutoff is used.The Mini-Mental State Examination score and the clinical diagnosis of dementia.To set a working cutoff score for the referral to diagnostic examination, we evaluated 150 consecutive patients with complaints potentially related to dementia, using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). All patients were later given a complete, standardized work-up and diagnosis as part of our Alzheimer's Disease Patient Registry protocol. Dementia diagnosis was made, consistent with accepted criteria, by consensus of the physicians and psychologist. Diagnosis was reaffirmed after 1-year follow-up exam; 133 of the 150 original patients completed follow-up (80 dementia, 53 no dementia). We evaluated the initial MMSE score compared with the follow-up diagnosis. Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values were calculated for MMSE scores ranging from 22 through 29. The conventional cutoff score of < 24 shows a sensitivity of 0.63 and a specificity of 0.96; sensitivity increased at higher cutoff scores. Multivariate analysis showed that educational level added significant prediction only at scores of > or = 27. We conclude that an MMSE score of 26 or 27 should be used as a cutoff score in symptomatic populations with similar educational and socioeconomic backgrounds when the goal is to miss few true cases. Population surveys where the expected prevalence is low may require a different cutoff score to indicate the need for further diagnostic evaluation.Canadian study of health and aging: study methods and prevalence of dementia.To estimate the prevalence of dementia and its subtypes by sex and age group for five regions of Canada.Prevalence survey.Community and institutional settings in Canada, excluding those in the two territories, Indian reserves and military units.Representative sample of people aged 65 and over interviewed between February 1991 and May 1992. Those in the community (9008 subjects) were chosen randomly from medicare lists in nine provinces or from the Enumeration Composite Record in Ontario. People in institutions (1255) were randomly selected from residents in stratified random samples of institutions in each region.Screening with the Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS) Examination to identify cognitive impairment. Clinical examination of all those in institutions, those in the community with a 3MS score of less than 78 and a sample of those in the community with a 3MS score of 78 or more to diagnose dementia. Dementia and Alzheimer's disease were defined according to established criteria.Prevalence of dementia of all types, by region, sex and age group, the estimated number of cases in the population by type of dementia and the age-standardized rate per 1000 population.The prevalence estimates suggested that 252,600 (8.0%) of all Canadians aged 65 and over met the criteria for dementia (95% confidence interval [CI] 236,800 to 268,400). These were divided roughly equally between the community and institutional samples; the female:male ratio was 2:1. The age-standardized rate ranged from 2.4%, among those aged 65 to 74 years, to 34.5%, among those aged 85 and over. The corresponding figures for Alzheimer's disease were 5.1% overall (161,000 cases; 95% CI 148,100 to 173,900), ranging from 1.0% to 26.0%; for vascular dementia it was 1.5% overall, ranging from 0.6% to 4.8%. If the prevalence estimates remain constant, the number of Canadians with dementia will rise to 592,000 by 2021.These Canadian estimates of the prevalence of dementia fall toward the upper end of the ranges in other studies, whereas the estimates for Alzheimer's disease fall in the middle of the ranges. This may suggest an unusual balance between Alzheimer's and other forms of dementia in the Canadian population.The reliability and validity of the Mini-Mental State in a British community survey.The Mini-Mental State (MMSE) was administered to 2302 general practice patients aged 75 yr and over. Those scoring 23 or less and a sample of those scoring 24 or 25 were selected for further investigation using the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination. Inter-observer reliability was high with a mean kappa value of 0.97. Eighty-six per cent of respondents judged to have organic mental disorders scored 23 or less on the MMSE and 92% of those judged to be cognitively intact scored 24 or more. However, only 55% of respondents who scored 23 or less were demented or delirious while a number of relatively well educated, mildly demented subjects scored 24 and 25. The customary cut-off point of 23/24 may need to be revised in future community studies. MMSE scores cannot be used to make even tentative psychiatric diagnoses; more detailed investigation of low scorers is essential.Use of the MC-FAQ and MMSE-FAQ in cognitive screening of older African Americans, Hispanic Americans, and European Americans.The purpose of this study was to examine the performance of the Mini-Cog-Functional Activities Questionnaire (MC-FAQ) and the Mini-Mental State Examination-Functional Activities Questionnaire (MMSE-FAQ) in cognitive screening of a multiethnic sample of older adults.This is a descriptive psychometric study.Cognitive screening was done in senior centers, at health fairs, and within the nine participating memory disorder centers in the State of Florida.African American, Hispanic American, and European American older adults who participated in this screening were matched on gender, age within 3 years and education within 3 years yielding a sample of 225.The MC-FAQ is a combination of the Mini-Cog and Functional Activities Questionnaire. The MMSE-FAQ combines the MMSE with the FAQ. The Geriatric Depression Scale was used to assess depressive symptoms.African Americans reported significantly less depressive symptoms (F[2, 217] = 10.31, p <0.001) and European Americans had significantly higher mean MMSE scores than the other two groups (F[2, 222] = 3.33, p = 0.037). Participants did not differ by ethnic group on the MC-FAQ or MMSE-FAQ classifications of normal, mild cognitive impairment, or dementia. Age, years of education, and depressive symptoms were significant predictors of MC-FAQ and MMSE-FAQ classifications.The results suggest that these combinations of screening measures may have less culture bias than the MMSE alone. Sensitivity and specificity should be evaluated in these groups with confirmatory neurological and psychiatric diagnosis.Consistency of clinical diagnosis of dementia in NEDICES: A population-based longitudinal study in Spain.Few longitudinal studies have verified the clinical diagnosis of dementia based on clinical examinations. We evaluated the consistency of the clinical diagnosis of dementia over a period of 3 years of follow-up in a population-based, cohort study of older people in central Spain.Individuals (N = 5278) were evaluated at baseline (1994-1995) and at follow-up (1997-1998). The evaluation included a screening questionnaire for dementia and a neurological assessment.Dementia screening consisted of a 37-item version of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Pfeffer Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ). Study neurologists investigated those participants who screened positively (N = 713) as well as 843 who had screened negatively to test the sensitivity of the screening instruments or because they had a positive screening for other chronic neurological diseases. We detected 295 patients among those who screened positive and 13 among those who screened negatively. Three years follow-up evaluation demonstrated 14 diagnostic errors at baseline (4.5%) leading to a final number of 306 patients with dementia. The corrected prevalence of dementia was 5.8% (95% confidence interval [CI] 5.2-6.5).The diagnosis of dementia was highly accurate in this population-based, Spanish cohort study, and our prevalence figures agree with other European surveys. Given the high cost and difficulties of population rescreening and its relatively low yield, we conclude that a single 2-phase investigation (screening followed by clinical examination) provides accurate information for most population-based prevalence studies of dementia.The limited utility of the Mini-Mental State Examination in screening people over the age of 75 years for dementia in primary care.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is used worldwide to assess cognitive status and it has been recommended for use in primary care to detect dementia. In this study, the MMSE was administered during annual health checks for patients over 75 years of age in nine practices by a member of the primary care team. The mean age was 80 years. Of the 709 patients screened, 286 scored at or below the cut-off point, which was set at 26/30 on the MMSE, and they were invited to be assessed further by a researcher, using the well-validated GMS-AGECAT diagnostic system. Eighty-four of these patients refused, 173 were identified as not having dementia, and 29 (14%) were identified as having dementia. These results, with an 86% false-positive rate, raise concerns regarding the utility of the MMSE as a screening instrument for dementia in primary care.Detecting cognitive impairment in primary care: performance assessment of three screening instruments.Early detection of Alzheimer's disease and related disorders (ADRD) is important, especially in primary care settings. We compared performances of two common screening tests, the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Clock Drawing Test (CDT), with that of the MCI Screen ({MCIS}) in 254 patients over 65. None had previous diagnosis of ADRD, and 81% were asymptomatic by Functional Assessment Staging Test ({FAST}) (FAST=1). 215 patients completed all screening tests - 141 had >or= 1 abnormal result, 121/141 completed standardized diagnostic assessment, and the remaining 74/215 (34%) screened entirely normally and weren't further evaluated. Potential bias due to unevaluated cases was statistically adjusted. Among diagnosed cases: AD=43%, cerebrovascular disease=36%, other causes=21%. Bias-adjusted MCI prevalence for FAST stages 1 and 1-3 were 13.9-20.3% and 23.0-28.3%. Bias-adjusted results for the CDT, MMSE and MCIS were: clinical diagnosis validity (kappa statistic)={-0.02 (p=0.61), 0.06 (p=0.23), 0.92 (p< 0.0001)}; sensitivity={59%, 71%, 94%}; specificity={39%, 36%, 97%}; overall accuracy={54%, 62%, 96%}; positive predictive value={16%, 17%, 86%}; and negative predictive value={83%, 87%, 96%}. The MMSE and CDT were not valid for early detection, while the MCIS had high validity and accuracy in the primary care cohort.Epidemiology research on dementia in Antwerp, Belgium.Epidemiological research on dementia in Belgium started in 1990 with a prevalence study. In the first phase of the MMSE was used for screening a random sample, stratified by age, of 1,800 aged people. In the second phase the diagnostic work was done by a psychiatrist using the CAMDEX. An incidence study will start after 2 years. Potential risk factors will be examined in a case-control study.The prevalence of dementia in Girona.To provide a preliminary assessment of the prevalence of dementia and its subtypes in a rural area. From a total of 2,469 people over 65 who were not committed to any institution, 273 were randomly chosen and stratified by age and sex. Of these 273 individuals, 244 (89.4%) took part in the study. Family doctors administered the miniexamen cognoscitivo (MEC), a Spanish version of the Mini Mental State Exam to screen all individuals taking part in the first phase. Enrolled in the second phase were all those whose scores on the MEC were below the cut-off point, plus a similar number of individuals whose scores were above this level and who were used as controls. The CAMDEX was the instrument used for diagnosis by clinical psychologists. The overall prevalence of dementia in the area under study was 13.93 +/- 4.34%. This prevalence includes the three levels of diagnosis certainty for CAMDEX (definitive, probable and possible) and the three levels of severity (minimum, mild, moderate, and severe) defined by the instrument. The number of individuals with dementia increased with age. Females showed more dementia than males in all age groups. The distribution of dementia by subtypes was 41.18% for both Alzheimer's type senile and presenile forms, and for vascular dementia, and 17.64% for mixed dementia. Our results show a prevalence of dementia that is higher than rates observed in other studies using similar materials and methods.Correction for age, education and other demographic variables in the use of the Mini Mental State Examination in Finland.The population-based Helsinki Aging Study was comprised of three age groups: 75-, 80- and 85-year-olds. A random sample of 511 subjects completed the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and were assessed on the Clinical Dementia Rating-scale (CDR). According to the CDR results 446 subjects were screened as non-demented. Of these subjects 30% scored below or at 24 MMSE points. Age, education and social group had a significant effect on the MMSE scores, even after excluding the demented cases. Together they explained 10% of the total variance within the MMSE. Social group correlated with education. The MMSE scores were corrected according to age and education. Adjustment of the originally used cutpoint of 24 resulted in cutpoints of 25 and 26 among the 75-year-olds, in the low and high education groups respectively; 23 and 26 in the 80-year-olds; 22 and 23 in the 85-year-olds.Community screening for dementia: the Mini Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) compared.The objectives of this study were to assess whether Teng's modification of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) improves its performance as a screening test for cognitive impairment and dementia, and to replicate this comparison in French and English language groups, and for differing assumptions concerning the relative importance of false negative and false positive errors. Screening interviews were conducted with representative samples of people aged 65 or over, set in 36 communities in 10 Canadian provinces. There were 8900 community participants in the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, of whom 1600 also underwent an extensive clinical and neuropsychological examination. Sensitivity, specificity and areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve for the original MMSE and modified version (the 3MS) were the main outcome measures. Results are reported for French and English versions of the tests. The results indicate the alpha internal consistency for the 3MS was 0.87, compared to 0.78 for the MMSE. The area under the ROC curve in identifying dementia was 0.93 for the 3MS and 0.89 for the MMSE (p < 0.001). There was less difference between the two tests in identifying all levels of cognitive impairment (AUC 0.80 versus 0.77, p < 0.01). The superiority of the 3MS appears more due to its extended scoring system than to its additional questions. The validity of the MMSE was comparable in English and French samples; results for the 3MS were inconsistent between the two samples, suggesting possible translation problems. In conclusion, the 3MS was superior to the MMSE, justifying the slightly greater burden for its administration and scoring. Neither test worked well in identifying lower levels of cognitive impairment.[Validation of a screening test for age associated cognitive impairment, in Chile].The real prevalence of dementia in a given population must be determined through prevalence studies, using validated screening tests.To validate and determine cutoff points for a cognitive impairment screening test composed by the Folstein Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Pfeffer Functional Activities Questionnaire (PFAQ).Validation of the diagnostic test in a sample of 100 subjects over 65 years old (85 from the project "Age associated dementias" and 15 with a confirmed diagnosis of dementia). All were subjected to a complete neuropsychological test by a trained neurologist, that constituted the "gold standard" for the diagnosis of dementia. An independent interviewer applied the MMSE to the subjects and the PFAQ to a next of kin informer. Cutoff points were calculated using ROC curves. The points with the better equilibrium between sensitivity and specificity were selected, considering differences in results between groups with low and high educational level.The cutoff point for MMSE was 21/22, with a sensitivity of 93.6% (95% CI 70.6-99.7%) and a specificity of 46.1% (95% CI 34.7-57.8%). The figure for PFAQ was 5/6, with a sensitivity of 89.2% (95% CI 70.6-99.7%) and a specificity of 70.7% (95% CI 58.9-80.3%). The combination of both instruments gave a sensitivity of 94.4% (95% CI 58.9-80.3%) and a specificity of 83.3% (95% CI 72.3-90.7%).This screening test, using MMSE and PFAQ, has a good sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of dementia in Chile. Being simple and of low cost, it can be applied in primary health care.Four sensitive screening tools to detect cognitive dysfunction in geriatric emergency department patients: brief Alzheimer's Screen, Short Blessed Test, Ottawa 3DY, and the caregiver-completed AD8.Cognitive dysfunction, including dementia and delirium, is prevalent in geriatric emergency department (ED) patients, but often remains undetected. One barrier to reliable identification of acutely or chronically impaired cognitive function is the lack of an acceptable screening tool. While multiple brief screening instruments have been derived, ED validation trials have not previously demonstrated tools that are appropriately sensitive for clinical use.The primary objective was to evaluate and compare the Ottawa 3DY (O3DY), Brief Alzheimer's Screen (BAS), Short Blessed Test (SBT), and caregiver-completed AD8 (cAD8) diagnostic test performance for cognitive dysfunction in geriatric ED patients using the Mini Mental Status Exam (MMSE) as the criterion standard. A secondary objective was to assess the diagnostic accuracy for the cAD8 (which is an informant-based instrument) when used in combination with the other performance-based screening tools.In an observational cross-sectional cohort study at one urban academic university-affiliated medical center, trained research assistants (RAs) collected patients' responses on the Confusion Assessment Method for the Intensive Care Unit, BAS, and SBT. When available, reliable caregivers completed the cAD8. The MMSE was then obtained. The O3DY was reconstructed from elements of the MMSE and the BAS. Consenting subjects were non-critically ill, English-speaking adults over age 65 years, who had not received potentially sedating medications prior to or during cognitive testing. Using an MMSE score of ≤23 as the criterion standard for cognitive dysfunction, the sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) area under the curve (AUC) were computed. Venn diagrams were constructed to quantitatively compare the degree of overlap among positive test results between the performance-based instruments.The prevalence of cognitive dysfunction for the 163 patients enrolled with complete data collection was 37%, including 5.5% with delirium. Dementia was self-reported in 3%. Caregivers were available to complete the cAD8 for 56% of patients. The SBT, BAS, and O3DY each demonstrated 95% sensitivity, compared with 83% sensitivity for the cAD8. The SBT had a superior specificity of 65%. No combination of instruments with the cAD8 significantly improved diagnostic accuracy. The SBT provided the optimal overlap with the MMSE.The SBT, BAS, and O3DY are three brief performance-based screening instruments to identify geriatric patients with cognitive dysfunction more rapidly than the MMSE. Among these three instruments, the SBT provides the best diagnostic test characteristics and overlap with MMSE results. The addition of the cAD8 to the other instruments does not enhance diagnostic accuracy.Detecting dementia with the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test and the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were administered to 323 non-demented elderly and 70 individuals who meet DSM-IV criteria for dementia in order to compare the validity of these two measures for detecting mild dementia and for the two most common dementia subtypes, Alzheimer's disease (AD) and vascular dementia (VaD). The study was conducted in an elderly, ethnically diverse community-dwelling population. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values were calculated over a range of clinically relevant cut scores for each test. We analyzed the influence of age, education, reading ability and sex on test performance using logistic regression models. When sensitivity is held constant at 0.69, the specificity for the HVLT total recall was 0.89 and the MMSE 0.82 for all dementias (P=.10). Age, sex and education did not significantly influence test performance for either test in this sample. Results were similar for AD and VaD. However, while adding a measure of reading ability to the regression models did not affect the overall dementia model, it resulted in improved specificities when combined with the MMSE for AD and combined with the HVLT for VaD. Additional tests such as reading ability can improve discrimination of dementia subtypes. The modest sensitivity of either the HVLT or the MMSE alone suggests that further neuropsychological evaluation is required to confirm dementia diagnosis.Detection of MCI in the clinic: evaluation of the sensitivity and specificity of a computerised test battery, the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test and the MMSE.the sensitive detection of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) in older adults is an important problem that requires objective assessment. We evaluated whether the computerised cognitive test battery, CogState, was as sensitive to MCI as two well-validated 'paper-and-pencil' tests, the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE).these tests were administered with a subjective memory questionnaire and an 'Activities of Daily Living' scale to 21 individuals with MCI and 98 cognitively healthy controls matched for sex, education and IQ levels. The sensitivity and specificity of the tests and their discrimination between groups were determined.the HVLT had a maximum discrimination between controls and MCI cases of 90%, compared with 86% for CogState and 65% for the MMSE. Only CogState showed correlations with subjective memory complaints (SMC) and activities of daily living for the whole cohort when controlled for age, sex and years of education. Logistic regression analyses showed that diagnosis (control:MCI) was predicted by HVLT and a CogState ratio score. Age was a significant predictor of HVLT performance, while age and SMC predicted CogState performance. The computerised test battery was well tolerated by older adults, but presentation speed was a limiting factor for some participants.overall, we conclude that the HVLT has better sensitivity for the detection of MCI in older adults than the CogState, but that CogState may enable the identification of cognitive deficits above and beyond impairments in memory.A new systematic method of measurement and diagnosis of "mild cognitive impairment" and dementia according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R criteria.Normative data were collected in a study population of 150 randomly selected elderly subjects. Using the SIDAM (Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of Dementia of the Alzheimer Type, multi-infarct dementia, and dementias of other etiology according to DSM-III-R and ICD-10), both the dimensional and the categorical aspects of dementia and "mild cognitive impairment" are considered. With the SIDAM score (SISCO) [range 0 (minimum)-55 (maximum, no cognitive impairment)] and the SIDAM Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (range 0-30), appropriate cutoffs for the category of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia and "mild cognitive impairment" were defined. MMSE scores of 0-22 were found to be indicative of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia. For "mild cognitive impairment," MMSE scores ranged from 23-27 according to a DSM-III-R definition (ICD-10: 23-28). An MMSE score of 22 or less was found to differentiate between DSM-III-R/ICD-10 dementia and "mild cognitive impairment," with a specificity of 92% (ICD-10: 95.6) and a sensitivity of 96% (ICD-10: 96%). With the SIDAM-based DSM-III-R/ICD-10 diagnoses of dementia as the criterion, the SISCO was 97.3% specific (ICD-10: 99%) and 94% sensitive (ICD-10: 94%) in detecting dementia. A SISCO of 0-33 was highly indicative of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia. For "mild cognitive impairment," a SISCO between 34-47 (ICD-10: 34-51) was found. The SISCO covers a broader range of cognitive functions than the MMSE and is more useful in detecting even very mild cognitive decline. Furthermore, the newly defined category of "mild cognitive impairment" could be validated successfully by means of GDS Stages 2-3 and CDR Stage 0.5. These findings confirm the value of the SIDAM as a short diagnostic instrument for measurement and diagnosis of dementia and "mild cognitive impairment."The prevalence of dementia in a total population: a comparison of two screening instruments.Two short screening tests for dementia, the Information/Orientation (IO) sub-test of the Clifton Assessment Scale (CAPE) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were included in a survey of 1579 elderly people of a large general practice. All those scoring 21 and under on the MMSE, a one in two sample of those scoring 22, 23 and a one in ten sample of the remainder were investigated further using the Cambridge Examination for Mental Disorders of the elderly (CAMDEX). The prevalences of moderate to severe dementia and mild to severe dementia determined from the CAMDEX interview were 4.8% and 14.2%, respectively. For detection of moderate to severe dementia, a cut-point of 21/22 on the MMSE gave a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 85% and an overall prevalence of 19.7%; mild to severe dementia was best detected by a cut-point of 23/24 giving a sensitivity of 89%, specificity of 81% and prevalence of 28.5%. A cut-point of 7/8 on the IO sub-test gave a sensitivity and specificity for detecting moderate to severe dementia of 87% and 97%, respectively, with a prevalence of 7.3%; for mild to severe dementia a cut-point of 10/11 gave a sensitivity of 67%, specificity of 94% and prevalence of 14.7%.Effect of education on the mini-mental state examination as a screening test for dementia.We studied whether Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) norms for detecting dementia in elderly outpatients vary according to educational attainment. Subjects were 109 elderly outpatients with Alzheimer's dementia and 100 non-demented outpatient controls. Receiver operating characteristics (ROC) of the MMSE were examined among three strata of educational attainment: middle school, high school, and college/graduate school. MMSE ROC curve areas were .95-.96 in the three educational strata. Assuming a dementia prevalence of 10%-30%, the most accurate lower limits of normal for MMSE scores and their attendant sensitivities and specificities were 21 for middle school (.82/.94), 23 for high school (.79/.97), and 24 for college/graduate school (.83/1.00) attainment. These norms accurately classified over 90% of subjects in all three educational strata. We conclude that education-specific norms optimize performance of the MMSE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in elderly outpatients.Prevalence and subtypes of dementia in Taiwan: a community survey of 5297 individuals.To study the prevalence rate of dementia in Taiwan, the relative frequencies of its subtypes, and its associations with age, education, gender, and residence location.A total of 2753 men and 2544 women from four urban and four rural communities participated. Their age ranged from 41 to 88 years; 28% of them were at least 65 years old. Their education ranged from 0 to 20 years; 27% of them had less than 1 year of formal schooling.Phase I was a screening survey by trained nurses who administered a Chinese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination, the MMSE-T1, to all participants. Phase II involved the assessment for dementia by neurologists on the 1521 individuals who had scored less than 24 on the 30-point MMSE-T1.Thirty-one cases of dementia were identified by the DSM-III-R criteria, including 18 cases of Alzheimer's disease, 10 cases of vascular dementia, and three cases of other dementias. The prevalence rate in individuals aged 65 and over was 2.0%. Aging and illiteracy were associated with higher rates of dementia; gender and residence location made no difference.The prevalence rate of dementia was low in this Chinese population. Consistent with common findings from other parts of the world, a high rate of dementia was associated with older age and illiteracy, and Alzheimer's disease was the most frequent cause.Incidence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan: impact of socio-demographic factors.To determine the incidence rate (IR) and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan.From a cohort of 2,915 community inhabitants aged 65 years and over, 2,507 and 2,175 subjects participated in the first- and second-year follow-up surveys, respectively. A two-phase study used the Mini-Mental State Examination in phase I and the Consortium to Establish a Registry of Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) neuropsychological battery and the neurobehavioral examination in phase II. We applied International Classification of Diseases (ICD)-10NA criteria for dementia, National Institute of Neurological and Communication Disorders and Stroke-Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association (NINCDS-ADRDA) guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD), and National Institute of Neurological Disorders and Stroke-Association Internationale pour la Recherche et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences (NINDS-AIREN) criteria for vascular dementia (VaD).The annual IR for total dementia was 1.28%, which increased with age from 0.77% for 65- to 74-year-olds to 6.19% for persons aged 85 years or older. AD (25 cases, 41.7%, IR=0.54%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (19 cases, 31.7%, IR=0.41%) and mixed dementia (9 cases, 15.0%). After adjusting for sex, increasing age was significantly associated with total dementia and AD (p < 0.01). Illiteracy was associated with a marginally increased risk for total dementia (aRR=1.59, p < 0.1) as was being female for AD (aRR = 1.92, p < 0.1). The 2-year mortality rate was high among the demented (48% in total dementia, 38% in AD, and 60% in VaD).The age-specific incidence of dementia in Taiwan is approaching that of developed countries and the low prevalence of dementia (especially VaD) may be mainly due to the high mortality. Age was the major risk factor for total dementia and AD. Being female was probably a risk factor for AD, as was illiteracy for total dementia.Usefulness of repeated presentation of Mini-Mental State Examination as a diagnostic procedure--a population-based study.The 280 subjects who achieved 24 points or less in the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the first survey of 1449 subjects were invited for a comprehensive diagnostic examination for dementia including medical history, thorough neurological and cardiovascular examinations and detailed neuropsychological evaluation, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI)-study, cerebrospinal fluid (CSF)-analysis, electrocardiogram (ECG), chest radiograph and blood tests after the first assessment. The MMSE was presented again.Out of 240 persons, 57 subjects were diagnosed as having dementia. When the cut-off point of 24 or less in the second MMSE was used, the sensitivity of the second MMSE was 82% and the specificity was 64%. The positive predictive value of the second MMSE was 42% and negative predictive value 92%. The non-demented subjects improved their MMSE score at the second examination. In contrast, the demented subjects maintained their low MMSE score at the second examination.Primary care screen for early dementia.To determine whether the Alzheimer's Disease Screen for Primary Care (ADS-PC) is more sensitive to early dementia than the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and whether it has as high a misclassification rate in minority patients and patients with limited education.Cross-sectional validation study.Urban geriatric primary care practice.Three hundred sixteen African-American and Caucasian patients, including 55 patients with early dementia (Clinical Demential Rating of 0.5).The ADS-PC is a two-stage strategy for identifying early dementia that consists of a brief high-sensitivity dementia screen, applied to all patients aged 65 and older, and a second stage to identify memory impairment, applied to patients who fail the first stage. Differences in the sensitivities or specificities of the ADS-PC and the MMSE were evaluated using the McNemar test.Receiver operating characteristic curves were used to examine differences in the operating characteristics of the ADS-PC across a range of cutscores. When the specificities of both tests were equated (0.90), the sensitivities were significantly different (ADS-PC, 0.75; MMSE, 0.56). The MMSE failed to identify five times as many cases of dementia as the ADS-PC. When the sensitivities were equated, the specificities differed significantly (ADS-PC, 0.95; MMSE, 0.73). The MMSE misclassified five times as many noncases as the ADS-PC. This pattern of significantly higher sensitivity and specificity for the ADS-PC than for the MMSE was repeated in the results according to race and for individuals with high school or more education but not in individuals with less education.The ADS-PC outperformed the MMSE in identifying early dementia in a racially and educationally diverse primary care cohort.A comparison of five clock scoring methods using ROC (receiver operating characteristic) curve analysis.To compare the accuracy of five clock scoring methods for detecting dementia in English-speaking patients.A prospective cohort study.A general geriatric outpatient clinic in southwest Sydney, Australia.A total of 127 consecutive new referrals to the clinic, of mean age 78.2 years.The clock drawing test was conducted at the beginning of each clinic appointment by a blinded observer. Each patient was then assessed by a geriatrician, who collected demographic data, administered the modified Barthel index, the geriatric depression scale, and the Folstein Mini-Mental State Examination, and categorised each patient as demented or not demented, according to DSM-4 criteria. Each clock was scored according to the methods of Mendez, Shulman, Sunderland, Watson and Wolf-Klein, and evaluated for reliability, and predictive accuracy, using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.The area under the ROC curve was largest for the Shulman (0.79, 95% CI 0.70-0.85) and Mendez (0.78, 95% CI 0.70-0.85) methods. Both predicted dementia more accurately than the Sunderland (area = 0.71) and Watson (area = 0.65) methods (p < 0.05). The inter-rater (0.81-0.93) and intra-rater (0.87-0.96) correlation coefficients were high for all five methods.While substantial differences among the clock scoring methods were evident in our sample, the accuracy of each was modest at best. Unless further studies in relevant settings suggest otherwise, we caution on the use of clock drawing alone to screen for dementia.Mild dementia or cognitive impairment: the Modified Mini-Mental State examination (3MS) as a screen for dementia.To examine the Modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS) as a screen for dementia.A group of 1092 elderly Edmonton community residents completed the 3MS and the Geriatric Mental State Examination (GMS). 3MS sensitivity and specificity were determined by comparing positive 3MS screens (score < or = 77) with those classified as GMS "organic" (severity level 3, equivalent to a clinical diagnosis). In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging (CSHA), 2914 subjects received the 3MS and a clinical examination. A group described as having "cognitive impairment but no dementia (CIND)" was identified.In Edmonton, the 3MS showed 88% sensitivity, 90% specificity, 29% positive predictive value (PPV), and 99% negative predictive value (NPV). In the CSHA, 30% of subjects receiving both the 3MS and a clinical examination were classified as CIND. One-half of these were classified as having "age associated memory impairment (AAMI)" or as "unspecified."The 3MS with a cutting score of 77/78 proved a reasonable screening instrument; 1 case in 3 screening "positive" has dementia, but few (0.64%) will be missed by screening "negative." CIND, accounting for 2 out of 3 cases screened positive by the 3MS in the Edmonton study, is a substantial, heterogeneous group that is not necessarily "predementia" but that in many cases merits further investigation.Executive function impairment in community elderly subjects with questionable dementia.The neurocognitive profile of community-dwelling Chinese subjects with 'questionable' dementia was studied.One hundred and fifty-four ambulatory Chinese subjects were recruited from local social centers for the elderly. Each subject was examined using the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR), the Cantonese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination (CMMSE), the Chinese version of the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive Subscale (ADAS-Cog), the Category Verbal Fluency Test (CVFT), digit and visual span tests, and the Cambridge Neurological Inventory. The neurocognitive profile of nondemented subjects (CDR 0) was compared with that of subjects with 'questionable' dementia (CDR 0.5).Subjects with 'questionable' dementia were older, and had lower educational levels and global cognitive assessment scores than the controls (CMMSE and ADAS-Cog; t tests, p < 0.001). In addition, they also had significantly lower scores in delayed recall, reverse span, verbal fluency tests and worse performance in complex motor tasks related to executive function (Mann-Whitney tests, p < 0.001). Logistic regression analysis revealed that ADAS-Cog, CVFT, and reverse visual span were significant predictors for the CDR of 'questionable' dementia.Aside from memory impairment, executive function deficits were also present in subjects with 'questionable' dementia. To identify groups cognitively at risk for dementia, concomitant assessments of memory and executive function are suggested.Videoconference-based mini mental state examination: a validation study.Neuropsychological testing is a prime criterion of good practice to document cognitive deficits in a rapidly aging population. Telecommunication technologies may overcome limitations related to test administration. We compared performance of the Italian videoconference-based version of the Mini Mental State Examination (VMMSE) with performance of the standard MMSE administered face-to-face (F2F), to validate the Italian version of the 28-item VMMSE.To validate the Italian version of the VMMSE, we compared its performance with standard F2F. The sample (n=342) was administered three VMMSEs within 6 weeks after F2F testing. We identified the optimal cutoff through the receiver operating characteristic curve, as well as the VMMSE consistency through inter- and intrarater reliability (Inter/RR and Intra/RR) analysis.We found high levels of sensitivity and specificity for the optimal VMMSE cutoff identification and an accuracy of 0.96 (95% confidence interval 0.94-0.98). Intra/RR and inter/RR were highly significant.This study demonstrates that VMMSE is a valid instrument in clinical and research screening and monitoring of subjects affected by cognitive disorders. This study shows a significant correlation between videoconference assessment and the F2F one, providing an important impetus to expand studies and the knowledge about the usefulness of tele-assistance services. Our findings have important implications for both longitudinal assistance and clinical care of demented patients.Cognitive screening for dementia and mild cognitive impairment in assisted living: comparison of 3 tests.Compare diagnostic characteristics of brief cognitive screening tests in residential care/assisted living (RC/AL) residents.Cross-sectional study involving a comprehensive clinical examination to ascertain a consensus diagnosis of probable dementia, no significant cognitive impairment, or mild cognitive impairment (MCI), including both amnestic and non-amnestic subtypes.Fourteen RC/AL facilities in North Carolina.Participants were 146 RC/AL residents, aged 65 years or older, who did not have diagnosed cognitive impairment.Diagnostic characteristics of the Mini-Cog, the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE), and a new 50-point test based on expanding selected MMSE items (MMX).Overall, 55/146 (38%) participants were diagnosed with probable dementia, and 76 (52%) met criteria for MCI (most non-amnestic). Both the Mini-Cog and the MMSE showed high sensitivity and negative predictive value for dementia, but had relatively low sensitivity and negative predictive value for MCI. The Mini-Cog had low specificity and was less accurate as a dementia screen than either the MMSE or MMX. Reliability and validity data for the MMX were satisfactory, and it performed better as a screening test for MCI than either the MMSE or Mini-Cog.Although the MMSE and Mini-Cog are both sensitive to dementia, modest specificity and positive predictive value may limit their utility as screening tools. Preliminary MMX data suggest it improves screening for MCI compared to the Mini-Cog or MMSE, while providing a similar level of screening for dementia. Further work is needed to identify suitable instruments for cognitive screening across the range of MCI and dementia.The Clock Drawing Test: utility for dementia detection in multiethnic elders.Disproportionate increases in dementia morbidity in ethnic minorities challenge established screening methodologies because of language and culture barriers, varying access to health services, and a relative paucity of cross-cultural data validating their use. Simple screening techniques adapted to a range of health and social service settings would accelerate dementia detection and social and health services planning for demented minority elders.The effectiveness of the Clock Drawing Test (CDT) for dementia detection was compared with that of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI) in community-dwelling elders of diverse linguistic, ethnic, and educational backgrounds. Subjects (N = 295) were tested at home in their native languages (English, n = 141; another language, n = 154). An informant-based clinical dementia history and functional severity index derived from the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) protocols were used to classify subjects as probably demented (n = 170), and probably not demented (n = 125).All tests were significantly affected by education (p < .001) but not by primary language (p > .05). Sensitivities and specificities for probable dementia were 82% and 92%, respectively, for the CDT; 92% and 92% for the MMSE; and 93% and 97% for the CASI for subjects completing each test. However, in poorly educated non-English speakers, the CDT detected demented subjects with higher sensitivity than the two longer instruments (sensitivity and specificity 85% and 94% for the CDT, 46% and 100% for the MMSE, and 75% and 95% for the CASI). Moreover less information was lost due to noncompletion of the CDT than the MMSE or CASI (severe dementia or refusal: CDT 8%, MMSE 12%, and CASI 16%).Overall, the CDT may be as effective as the MMSE or CASI as a first-level dementia screen for clinical use in multiethnic, multilingual samples of older adults. Its brevity (1-5 minutes), minimal language requirements, high acceptability, and lack of dependence on specialized testing materials are well adapted for screening of non-English-speaking elderly persons in settings where bilingual interpreters are not readily available and screening time is at a premium.The prevalence of dementia in older people in an urban population of Korea: the Seoul study.To estimate prevalence of dementia and its subtypes in older people in Seoul, a metropolitan area of Korea, and compare these findings with estimates reported for other populations.The study employed a two-stage design for case identification. Initially, the Mini-Mental State Examination in the Korean version (MMSE-KC) of the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) assessment packet was administered to all participants. Two hundred seventeen persons sampled from three levels of performance on MMSE-KC underwent the second-stage clinical evaluation based on the Korean Version of the CERAD assessment packet.The study was conducted in an urban community setting.Six hundred forty-three persons aged 65 and over participated in the study.Dementia was defined using the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition diagnostic features of dementia.Dementia prevalence ranged from 2.6% in persons aged 65 to 69 to 32.6% in persons aged 85 and older. Age-standardized prevalence was 8.2% for dementia, 5.4% for Alzheimer's disease, and 2.0% for vascular dementia. The prevalence estimates, which excluded very mild cases (clinical dementia rating index 0.5), were approximately 5.3% for dementia and 4.3% for Alzheimer's disease.The prevalence of dementia in older people in Seoul appears to be somewhat lower than in rural areas of Korea. Considering the difficulties involved in establishing a diagnostic threshold for dementia, actual differences in dementia prevalence between Asian populations are probably minimal.Identification of factorial structure of MMSE based on elderly cognitive destiny: the Italian Longitudinal Study on Aging.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is one of the most commonly used instruments in the evaluation of global cognitive status, but only few studies have investigated the relationship among its components in terms of factorial structure. We have considered data from the Italian Longitudinal Study on Aging (ILSA), carried out in Italy in 1992 on a sample of 5,632 subjects aged 65-84 years, and followed up in 1996. The aim of our study was to investigate static factorial structure in three groups of elderly (subjects with a diagnosis of dementia at baseline; subjects free of dementia at baseline, but incident cases at follow-up; subjects who never developed dementia during the 4-year follow-up). Considering our results, we could hypothesize that MMSE static structure reflects the cognitive profile of elderly, and is thus influenced by subjects' potential to develop dementia.The mini-cog: a cognitive 'vital signs' measure for dementia screening in multi-lingual elderly.The Mini-Cog, a composite of three-item recall and clock drawing, was developed as a brief test for discriminating demented from non-demented persons in a community sample of culturally, linguistically, and educationally heterogeneous older adults.All 129 who met criteria for probable dementia based on informant interviews and 120 with no history of cognitive decline were included; 124 were non-English speakers.Sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic value of the Mini-Cog were compared with those of the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI).The Mini-Cog had the highest sensitivity (99%) and correctly classified the greatest percentage (96%) of subjects. Moreover, its diagnostic value was not influenced by education or language, while that of the CASI was adversely influenced by low education, and both education and language compromised the diagnostic value of the MMSE. Administration time for the Mini-Cog was 3 minutes vs 7 minutes for the MMSE.The Mini-Cog required minimal language interpretation and training to administer, and no test forms of scoring modifications were needed to compensate for the extensive linguistic and educational heterogeneity of the sample. Validation in clinical and population-based samples is warranted, as its brevity and ease of administration suggest that the Mini-Cog might be readily incorporated into general practice and senior care settings as a routine 'cognitive vital signs' measure.Factors associated with inconsistent diagnosis of dementia between physicians and neuropsychologists.To explore reasons for discrepancy in the diagnosis of cognitive impairment between physicians and neuropsychologists.Retrospective analysis of national survey data.Canadian Study of Health and Aging Phase 1, a national survey of community-dwelling and institutionalized older Canadians.1879 subjects who completed all components of a clinical examination.Data available to both disciplines (demographic data, functional status, Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS), schedule H of the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination (CAMDEX)), results of the physician's history and physical examination, and results of a psychometric test battery. Subjects were classified as No Cognitive Impairment, Cognitive Impairment Not Dementia (CIND), and Dementia, the latter according to the criteria of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual, 3rd Ed., Revised. Preliminary diagnoses by physicians and neuropsychologists were compared.In univariate modeling, higher education increased consistency. Lower scores on the 3MS, depression reported in the CAMDEX, focal neurological signs, and all neuropsychological variables decreased agreement. In multivariate modeling, higher education and identification of long-term memory impairment by the neuropsychologist increased agreement; lower scores on the 3MS, depression reported on the CAMDEX, and identification of short-term memory impairment or constructional impairment led to disagreement. When the category of CIND was removed, kappa for agreement increased from 0.51 to 0.92.Physicians and neuropsychologists have different, complementary approaches to the diagnosis of dementia, and a consensus approach should be used. The category of CIND requires elucidation. Identification of dementia in subjects with depression or low education is difficult, and new strategies are required.[Mini mental state examination and the diagnosis of dementia in Brazil].The diagnosis of dementia is based on the presence of memory deficits and decline of other cognitive functions. Many scales have been designed to aid the clinician in the assessment of at risk subjects, such as the elderly. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is the most widely used of such scales, although its use as an aid to the diagnosis of dementia has not as yet been studied in a Brazilian sample of patients. The current study was designed with 2 main aims: (1) to determine the best cut-off point of the MMSE for the diagnosis of dementia in a sample of elderly subjects assessed in a mental health outpatient unit and; (2) evaluate the impact of age and schooling on MMSE scores. Two hundred and eleven subjects aged 60 or over assessed at the Mental Health Outpatient Unit for the elderly at "Santa Casa de São Paulo" between February 1997 and February 1998 were included in the study. They were assessed with the SRQ-20, MMSE, and a clinical interview for the diagnosis of dementia according to the ICD-10. Seventy patients received the diagnosis of dementia. The MMSE cut-off point of 23/24 (cases/non-cases) was associated with a sensitivity of 84.3% and specificity of 60.3%. MMSE scores were associated with age (r = -0.41, p < 0.001) and schooling (F = 12.69, p < 0.001). Analysis of covariance taking age into account showed that MMSE scores were significantly lower among those with no formal education (F = 10.51, p < 0.001). A cut-off point of 19/20 on the MMSE was associated with sensitivity of 80.0% and specificity of 70.9% for the diagnosis of dementia in this particular group. Subjects with previous school history were better classified to the diagnosis of dementia with the cut-off point of 23/24: sensitivity of 77.8% and specificity of 75.4%. The evaluation of elderly subjects with the MMSE should take education into account, and different cut-off points should be used accordingly as a guideline to the diagnosis of dementia.Incidence of mild cognitive impairment and Alzheimer disease in Southern Brazil.The objective of the study was to evaluate incident cases of Alzheimer disease (AD) and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) in an elderly community cohort in a major city of southern Brazil and to determine the variables associated with the development of cognitive dysfunction. Data were drawn from a cohort to investigate healthy aging among community elderly (N = 345) and were derived from the follow-up for a maximum of 8 years. Sociodemographic, psychiatric and medical information, the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), and the Clinical Dementia Rating scale were obtained in each assessment. The Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (Fourth Edition; DSM-IV), NINCDS-ADRDA (National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and the Alzheimer's Disease and related Disorders Association), and the Mayo Clinic criteria were applied to ascertain diagnoses of AD and MCI. The incidence rate per 1000 persons-year for MCI was 13.2 (95% confidence interval [CI] 7.79-20.91) and for AD was 14.8 (95% CI 9.04-22.94). Cognitive dysfunction was associated with education (odds ratio [OR] = 0.86; confidence limit [CL] 0.76-0.97 95%) and baseline MMSE (OR = 0.81; CL 0.70-0.94 95%). The AD incidence in this sample was higher than those reported in a previous Brazilian study. The study filled the epidemiological gap in the evaluation of MCI in Brazil.[Mini-Cog: a simple method for very brief screening of mental decline].Physicians do not detect majority of the demented people, and many patients appear only in an advanced stage of their mental decline at the first medical visit. Role of general practitioner is crucial; a brief and effective screening method can basically change the present situation. Borson et al (2000) has investigated a new, very brief method named Mini-Cog that consists of the combination of the 3-word recall and the clock-drawing test.of the present study was to evaluate this method in Hungarian patient population.Authors have analysed the charts of patients examined by the first author in the outpatient part of the Memory clinic of the National Institute of Psychiatry and Neurology in a 2-year interval (between 11.01. 1999 and 31.10.2001). Data of 186 patients were analysed. From the Mini-Mental State the total score, score of three-word recall (possible scores between 0-3), serial counting backward with 7 from 100 were taken into consideration; the clock-drawing test was analysed quantitatively (1 = failure, 2 = borderland, 3 = acceptable solution).The algorithm which considers the patient demented if she or he does not remember of any word, or remembers only of 1-2 and the clock-drawing is pathologic, has a high sensitivity (100%) and specificity (80.9%) in cases using the < or = 24 Mini-Mental State value, while the sensitivity and specificity is 98.8% and 88.0% respectively if drawing the limit at < or = 26 points. Combination of the two tests (word-recall, clock drawing) gives a better value than either of them alone. Based on their experiences they propose to apply in a short test the serial backwards with seven from 100 too, while patients with very high Mini-Mental State scores (29-30) not infrequently can not perfectly solve this subtest (7/11 = 64 p.c.).In agreement with the Hungarian Protocol for diagnosing and treating dementias (1999) authors stress the importance of the consultation with a specialist (neurologist or psychiatrist) in cases of suspected dementia to reveal the underlying disease.Validation of a 6 item cognitive impairment test with a view to primary care usage.To validate the 6 Item Cognitive Impairment Test (6CIT) against the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) with a view to usage as a screening tool.Three groups with varying levels of dementia were tested using the MMSE, 6CIT and Global Deterioration Scale (GDS).Testing was carried out within Wiltshire, both in the community and outpatients.Patients were selected from a hospital database of dementia patients and were stratified into two groups according to GDS; a control group was also tested.Two hundred and eighty-seven patients were tested: 135 controls (GDS 1-2), 70 with mild dementia (GDS 3-5) and 82 with more severe dementia (GDS 6-7). The 6CIT and MMSE were found to correlate well, r(2)=-0.911 (p<0.01), when all groups were analysed. Correlation falls to r(2)=-0.754 (p<0.01) in the mild dementia group. In the GDS 3-5 group, the MMSE has a sensitivity and specificity of 51.43% and 100% respectively (cutoff 23/24). The 6CIT gives a sensitivity and specificity of 78.57% and 100% (cutoff 7/8).The 6CIT is a brief and simple test of cognition, which correlates well with the MMSE but outperforms it in milder dementia. The MMSE is of little value as a screening test for dementia.The cognitive assessment screening test (CAST) for dementia.The purpose of this study was to assess the usefulness, the sensitivity, and the specificity of the Cognitive Assessment. Screening Test (CAST), a paper-and-pencil self-administered cognitive test designed to screen elderly people for possible dementia, for use in general physicians' offices, requiring little expertise or staff time. CAST consists of three parts: part A (relatively easy), part B (more demanding), and part C (self-report of concerns). CAST was administered in two studies to: (1) 19 patients known to be mildly to moderately demented versus 24 age-matched normal controls (to establish cutoff standards); and (2) a "real world" sample of 26 elderly patients not known to be demented, attending a general medicine clinic. The sensitivity and specificity of CAST were compared with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Blessed Dementia Scale cognitive portion (BDS-cog). In study 1, controls were given a detailed neuropsychological battery; in study 2, all patients were given the neuropsychological battery, which served as the "gold standard" to identify individuals with cognitive impairment. In study 1, the cutoff scores for dementia using CAST (Parts A and B) were established. CAST discriminated demented patients from controls with a sensitivity of 95% and a specificity of 88%; the MMSE had a sensitivity of 74% and a specificity of 100%; and the BDS-cog had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 96%. In study 2, CAST discriminated cognitive impairment with a sensitivity of 88% and a specificity of 100%, the MMSE had a sensitivity of 38% and a specificity of 100%; and the BDS-cog had a sensitivity of 50% and a specificity of 94%. Part C was not used to discriminate demented from normal elderly individuals, but to screen for those concerned about their cognitive functioning. CAST is highly useful as a dementia screening test, with sensitivity and specificity equal to or better than the MMSE and BDS-cog, yet requiring minimal examiner time and little training or experience to administer.Mini-mental Parkinson (MMP) as a dementia screening test: comparison with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE).As populations age, screening instruments for cognitive impairment and dementia will become of increasing importance in clinical practice. Mini-Mental Parkinson (MMP), a derivative of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), was originally described as a cognitive screening instrument for use in Parkinson's disease. Its item content addresses some of the acknowledged shortcomings of the MMSE. Pragmatic use of MMP in general cognitive clinics has not previously been examined.To compare the performance of two scales, Mini-Mental Parkinson (MMP) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), as cognitive screening instruments for dementia in a memory clinic population.MMP was administered prospectively to 201 consecutive new patient referrals independent of other tests used to establish dementia diagnosis according to standard diagnostic criteria (DSM-IV). Diagnostic utility of MMP for dementia was measured and compared with MMSE.MMP proved easy to use and acceptable to patients. Optimal test accuracy (0.86) was at MMP cutoff of ≤ 17/32, with sensitivity 0.51, specificity 0.97, positive predictive value 0.83, negative predictive value 0.87, and area under Receiver Operating Characteristic curve 0.89. Using a higher cutoff (≤ 29/32), MMP sensitivity was 1.00 with specificity 0.70. MMP scores correlated with MMSE (r = 0.93) and diagnostic agreement was high (κ = 0.85).MMP is a useful screening instrument in the memory clinic setting, with patients who fall below the designated cutoff requiring further investigation to ascertain a cause for their cognitive impairment.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.[The Mini Mental Status test inadequate as screening test for cognitive deterioration in a neurological department].To study the validity of the Mini-mental state (MMS) in a neurological population.Comparing the results of a neuropsychological examination and the MMS score.Departments of Neurology/Neuropsychology of the University Hospital Leiden.One hundred and forty-seven patients participated in the study. One hundred and eight patients were classified into two diagnostic groups according to the deterioration index (obtained from test results of the neuropsychological examination) and DSM-III-R criteria: 63 patients had dementia, 45 did not; the other 39 patients were found to have specific cognitive impairments and were excluded from the group comparisons. The discriminative powers of the deterioration index and the MMS were compared; sensitivity and specificity were determined with several cut-off scores of the MMS.The MMS had limited power to discriminate between demented and non-demented patients. The MMS score was strongly related to premorbid intelligence, occupational level and age. Increasing the original cut-off score to 25 points improved sensitivity and specificity to 79% and 84% respectively (with the original cut-off level these were 68% and 93%).The diagnostic value of the MMS is limited, especially in patients for whom a correct diagnosis is most relevant.Correcting the 3MS for bias does not improve accuracy when screening for cognitive impairment or dementia.We investigated the effects of correcting for demographic biases on the sensitivity and specificity of the Modified Mini Mental Status Exam (3MS) using a sample of English-speaking older adults (N=8901) from the Canadian Studies of Health and Aging. The sensitivity and specificity of the original 3MS were compared to the 3MS regression-adjusted for the influence of demographic variables and then to 3MS percentiles based on published normative data with age and education corrected cutoff scores. According to receiver operating characteristic curve analyses, the regression-adjusted 3MS was no more accurate than the original 3MS when screening for dementia, and it was less accurate when screening for cognitive impairment. The use of 3MS percentiles based on normative data with age and education corrected cut-off points were less accurate than the original 3MS when screening for both cognitive impairment and when screening for dementia.The prevalence of dementia in Belgium: a population-based door-to-door survey in a rural community.The project Epidemiology Research on Dementia in Antwerp (ERDA) estimated the prevalence of dementia in a random, population-based sample, stratified for age and sex. The sample of 1,736 elderly was screened at home with the Mini-Mental State Examination. All elderly under the cutoff of 23-24/30 got a diagnostic examination with the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination and the DSM-IIIR criteria. The prevalence of dementia in the population above 65 years was estimated at 9%. The following age-specific prevalences of dementia (included mild dementia) were found in the age-groups 65-69, 70-74, 75-79, 80-84, 85+: 0.6, 5.1, 7.6, 16.2 and 33.6%. The prevalence of at least moderate dementia was 0.3, 3.9, 4.0, 11.2 and 25.0%, respectively. The prevalence of dementia, vascular dementia and dementia of the Alzheimer type was markedly higher in women than in men.Contribution of informant and patient ratings to the accuracy of the mini-mental state examination in predicting probable Alzheimer's disease.To determine whether the accuracy of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in predicting future Alzheimer's disease (AD) could be improved by the addition of patient and informant ratings of cognitive difficulties.An inception cohort of nondemented patients followed longitudinally for 2 years.Patients referred to a university teaching hospital research investigation by their family physicians because of concerns about memory impairment.One hundred sixty-five community-residing patients were included who did not have dementia or any identifiable cause for memory impairment. After 2 years, 29 met criteria for AD, and 95 were not demented.Baseline assessments included MMSE, an Informant Rating Scale, and a Patient Rating Scale of cognitive difficulties. After 2 years, patients were diagnosed following the reference standard for probable AD. Diagnosticians were blind to baseline scores.Age and education were included in all analyses as covariates. The best logistic regression model included the Informant Rating Scale and the MMSE (sensitivity = 83%, specificity = 79%). An empirically reduced six-item model that included two items each from the MMSE, the Patient Rating Scale, and the Informant Rating Scale produced a significantly better model than the one with the full test scores (sensitivity = 90%, specificity = 94%).Results indicate that inclusion of informant ratings with the MMSE significantly improved its accuracy in the prediction of probable AD. Replication in a new prospective cohort of nondemented patients is necessary to confirm these findings.Which two questions of Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) should we start from?The MMSE is a simple and commonly used instrument to evaluate cognitive impairment. With the aim of enabling the examiner to skip a large portion of the MMSE when screening subjects with lower possibility of cognitive impairment, we examined the internal distribution of the MMSE scores among 792 older adults visiting a teaching hospital, a long-term care hospital, nursing homes, and a geriatric clinic. The correlation coefficients between the summed scores of any two items of MMSE and the total score were compared. A receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was drawn to show the sensitivity and the specificity of predicting cognitive impairment, which was defined by the total MMSE score being less than 24. The mean MMSE score was 20.5 +/- 6.9 (+/-S.D.). A good predictor for cognitive impairment was the summed scores of the time orientation and serial sevens with a sensitivity of 98.2% and a specificity of 69.2% if cut-off was set at 7/7+. This finding appears to help streamline the screening process for cognitive impairment in general elderly population.The prevalence of dementia and depression in the elderly community in a southern European population. The Zaragoza study.Provocative international disparities reported in the prevalence rates of dementia and depression require further investigation. This is the first psychiatric study, to the best of our knowledge, about the prevalence of DSM-III-R dementing and depressive disorders and their relationships in a representative, stratified community sample of the elderly in both a Spanish-speaking country and southern Europe.A two-stage screening was completed in 1080 elderly. Sampling with replacement was done, and the cumulative response rate was 88%. In phase 1, lay interviewers administered the Spanish versions of the Mini-Mental State examination and the Geriatric Mental State Schedule-Automated Geriatric Examination for Computer Assisted Taxonomy package. In phase 2, research psychiatrists administered the same instruments and the History and Aetiology Schedule to all the probable cases and a similar number of randomly selected, probably normal subjects.An estimated 5.5% of the elderly were considered to have a dementing disorder, the most prevalent types being primary degenerative dementia, Alzheimer's type (4.3%), and multi-infarct dementia (0.6%). Depressive disorders were found in 4.8% of the elderly. Psychiatric morbidity, specifically depression, was associated with lower educational levels. "Case levels" of depression were documented in 25.4% of the demented cases and case levels of "organic" disturbance were seen in 18.2% of cases of major depression.Among the elderly, the prevalence of Alzheimer's disease and multi-infarct dementia, as opposed to depression, increases steeply with age. The overlap found between dementia and depression may have nosological implications. There could be an effect of lower education levels on psychiatric morbidity, particularly on depression.The psychogeriatric assessment scales (PAS): further data on psychometric properties and validity from a longitudinal study of the elderly.The PAS is a standardized interview which assesses the changes seen in dementia and depression using a set of scales. There are three scales derived from an interview with the subject (cognitive impairment, depression, stroke) and three from an interview with an informant (cognitive decline, behaviour change, stroke). The aim was to provide data on the psychometric properties and validity of the PAS. The scales were originally developed using data from the first wave of a longitudinal study of the elderly. Reported here are further data on the PAS from the second wave of the same study, carried out 3 1/2 years later. The setting was a community survey carried out in the Australian city of Canberra. Seven hundred and nine elderly persons, with a mean age of 80 years, and 641 informants participated. Besides the PAS, participants were administered several other scales: the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly, the National Adult Reading Test and the Goldberg anxiety and depression scales. Diagnoses of dementia and depression were made with the Canberra Interview for the Elderly, from which the PAS is derived. Confirmatory factor analysis replicated the five-factor model which underpins the PAS. The PAS was found to correlate with the other scales having similar content and showed correspondence with diagnoses of dementia and depression derived from the Canberra Interview for the Elderly. Longitudinal data supported the validity of the cognitive decline scale as a measure of change. Overall, the results support the original psychometric and validity research on the PAS.Detecting dementia with the mini-mental state examination in highly educated individuals.To evaluate the utility of Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores in detecting cognitive dysfunction in a sample of highly educated individuals.Archival data were reviewed on 4248 participants enrolled in the Mayo Clinic Alzheimer Disease Research Center and Alzheimer Disease Patient Registry.A total of 1141 primarily white (93%) individuals with 16 or more years of self-reported education were identified. These included 307 (164 men and 143 women) patients with dementia (any type), 176 (106 men and 70 women) patients with mild cognitive impairment, and 658 (242 men and 416 women) control participants without dementia.Mayo Clinic Alzheimer Disease Research Center and Alzheimer Disease Patient Registry cohort.Diagnostic accuracy estimates (sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive power) of MMSE cut scores in detecting cognitive dysfunction.In this sample of highly educated, largely white older adults, the standard MMSE cut score of 24 (23 or below) yielded a sensitivity of 0.66, a specificity of 0.99, and an overall correct classification rate of 89% in detecting dementia. A cut score of up to 27 (26 or below) resulted in an optimal balance of sensitivity and specificity (0.89 and 0.91, respectively) with an overall correct classification rate of 90%. In a cognitively impaired group (dementia and mild cognitive impairment), a cut score of 27 (sensitivity, 0.69; specificity, 0.91) or 28 (sensitivity and specificity, 0.78) might be more appropriate.Older patients with a college education who present with complaints of cognitive decline (reported by themselves or others) and score less than 27 on the MMSE are at a greater risk of being diagnosed with dementia and should be referred for a comprehensive dementia evaluation, including formal neuropsychological testing.The validity of informant report for grading the severity of Alzheimer's dementia.The validity of informant-based techniques has been established for the detection of dementia cases by non-pathological individuals, but is still controversial for the assessment of the severity of dementia. This study aimed at ascertaining whether informant-based evaluation (the so-called informant report) of the cognitive and behavioral impairment of a patient is valid for grading the severity of dementia, and consistent with objective assessment of the patient's cognitive and behavioral functioning. We enrolled 96 community-dwelling outpatients and 56 controls assessed at the Geriatric Evaluation Unit of the University of Modena, Italy. All patients scored lower than 27 on the MMSE, and met DSM-IV inclusion criteria for Alzheimer's dementia. Patients and controls were administered the CAMDEX interview, containing a section which collects participant (patient or control) and informant evaluations on dementia-related cognitive and behavioral deficits. The informant report resulted effective at MANOVA for grading the severity of dementia in 4 of its 5 measures (namely, memory, everyday activities, general mental functioning and depressed mood), and was correlated with the scores of several scales of the CAMDEX cognitive section (i.e., CAMCOG). Instead, the participant's (patient or control) report showed a lower capacity for grading dementia, and was poorly correlated with the psychometric outcomes of cognitive functioning. On the whole, the results corroborated the validity of the informant report in the diagnostic work-up for grading dementia, given its sensitivity to the severity of dementia, and its consistency with cognitive psychometric outcomes.Comparison of the Saint Louis University Mental Status Examination, the Mini-Mental State Examination, and the Montreal Cognitive Assessment in detection of cognitive impairment in Chinese elderly from the geriatric department.The Saint Louis University Mental Status (SLUMS) examination is a popular screening scale for cognitive impairment in North America but has not been studied in Chinese populations. The aim of this study is to compare consistency of the SLUMS with the Chinese version of Mini-Mental Status Examination (CMMSE) and the Beijing version of Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA-B) in Chinese elderly.Two hundred seventy-eight Chinese elderly with chronic diseases and geriatric syndromes from the geriatrics department were screened for cognitive impairment, including dementia and mild cognitive impairment, using SLUMS, CMMSE, and MoCA-B. The modified education level cutoff in the diagnostic criteria of SLUMS (mSLUMS) was explored. Scores of the scales and classifications for cognitive status by them were compared using Spearman and κ statistics, respectively.Spearman correlation coefficient between scores of the scales were 0.747 (SLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .001), 0.839 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .001), and 0.773 (CMMSE vs MoCA-B, P < .001). For detection of dementia, κ values were 0.462 (SLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .000) and 0.484 (mSLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .000). For mild cognitive impairment, κ values were 0.123 (SLUMS vs CMMSE plus MoCA-B in parallel, P = .089) and 0.148 (mSLUMS vs CMMSE plus MoCA-B in parallel, P = .031). For all cognitive impairment, κ values were 0.562 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .000) and 0.650 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .000).Findings from our study indicate that the scores of SLUMS are fairly consistent with MoCA-B and CMMSE in Chinese elderly. Discrepancies of classifications for cognitive status by SLUMS and the other 2 scales implies that further work is needed to explore optimal cutoffs of SLUMS for screening mild cognitive impairment and dementia in elderly Chinese.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment and the mini-mental state examination as screening instruments for cognitive impairment: item analyses and threshold scores.To perform an item analysis of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) versus the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the prediction of cognitive impairment, and to examine the characteristics of different MoCA threshold scores.135 subjects enrolled in a longitudinal clinicopathologic study were administered the MoCA by a single physician and the MMSE by a trained research assistant. Subjects were classified as cognitively impaired or cognitively normal based on independent neuropsychological testing.89 subjects were found to be cognitively normal, and 46 cognitively impaired (20 with dementia, 26 with mild cognitive impairment). The MoCA was superior in both sensitivity and specificity to the MMSE, although not all MoCA tasks were of equal predictive value. A MoCA threshold score of 26 had a sensitivity of 98% and a specificity of 52% in this population. In a population with a 20% prevalence of cognitive impairment, a threshold of 24 was optimal (negative predictive value 96%, positive predictive value 47%).This analysis suggests the potential for creating an abbreviated MoCA. For screening in primary care, the MoCA threshold of 26 appears optimal. For testing in a memory disorders clinic, a lower threshold has better predictive value.Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination: agreement in a cross-sectional study with an elderly sample.We aimed to compare the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) with the Mini-Cog, measuring agreement in participants' classification, using a general population sample.Cross-sectional evaluation of 609 community dwellers aged ≥60 years was performed by trained interviewers. Cohen's kappa and 95% confidence intervals (CI) were calculated to assess overall agreement, and Cronbach alphas computed to assess reliability. Two-parameter Item Response Theory models (difficulty and discrimination parameters) were used to assess discrimination.Considering MMSE cut-point for scores <24, 3.1% of the participants would be 'cognitive impaired' and 6.2% considering cut-point scores <25. Following Mini-Cog's cut-point score <3, 11.3% would be impaired. For MMSE cut-point <24 and Mini-Cog <3, we observed a Cohen's kappa of 0.116 (95% CI: -0.073 to 0.305), and of 0.258 (95% CI: 0.101-0.415) for cut-point <25. The highest kappa was obtained for cut-point <26 on the MMSE and Mini-Cog <3 (kappa = 0.413). MMSE Cronbach alpha was 0.6108 and Mini-Cog's alpha was 0.2776. Co-calibration according to inherent ability is graphically presented.Agreement between scales seems fragile in our sample. The discriminative and reliability analysis suggests a better performance for subsets of the MMSE compared with the Mini-Cog. Usefulness of calibrated scores is discussed.A low, 'normal' score on the Mini-Mental State Examination predicts development of dementia after three years.To study whether a low, "normal" sumscore (i.e., 24 or higher) on the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) near the cutpoint usually employed for identifying persons with cognitive impairment predicts later development of dementia.A prospective study of a random sample of nondemented persons aged 75 years and older, according to DSM-III criteria, with follow-ups after 3 and 6 years.The subjects were 215 persons living at home, mean age 81 years, 81% women. Their mean MMSE sumscore at the start of the study (T0) was 27.9 (range 24-30).A low MMSE sumscore at T0 was identified as a statistically strongly significant predictor of dementia after 3 years (P < .001), when more than 40% of those with a sumscore of 24 or 25 at T0 had become demented. A similar, although weaker and statistically nonsignificant, trend was observed for the risk after 6 years in relation to MMSE scoring at baseline.Persons with a sumscore of 24 or 25 and classified as not suffering from dementia according to the DSM-III criteria are at high risk of developing dementia within 3 years.Validation study of a French version of the modified telephone interview for cognitive status (F-TICS-m) in elderly women.To evaluate the performance of a French version of the modified Telephone Interview for Cognitive Status (F-TICS-m) in identifying cognitive decline among elderly women.All women aged 72-86 participating in the 'Etude Epidémiologique auprès de Femmes de l'Education Nationale' (E3N) cohort and living in or near Paris constituted the target population of the validation study. Volunteer women (n = 120) underwent both a 20-min telephone interview and a face-to-face neuropsychological examination at an interval of few days (median interval: 10 days). The telephone interview included F-TICS-m, as well as a recall of key elements of a short story, arithmetic/verbal problems and two verbal fluency tests. Neuropsychological examination consisted of a standardized battery of cognitive tests (including the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the Free and Cued Selective Reminding Test-FCSRT, Trailmaking tests A and B, the similarities subtest of the Wechsler Adult Intelligence Scale-III, etc.) the Instrumental Activities of Daily Living questionnaire, and the Geriatric Depression Scale. Neuropsychological examination led to classification of each subject as cognitively normal (n = 92) or impaired/demented (n = 28).F-TICS-m showed satisfactory internal consistency (Cronbach's alpha = 0.69). It correlated linearly with MMSE (Pearson's r = 0.72). Concurrent validity against the gold-standard classification was satisfactory, with an area under the ROC curve (AUC) of 0.83. The combination of F-TICS-m and the other telephone tests had no additional effect on discrimination power in our sample (AUC = 0.81).F-TICS-m is a valid instrument for assessing the overall cognitive status of French elderly women. Its validity in men and its reproducibility warrant further studies.Subjective memory complaints in Chinese subjects with mild cognitive impairment and early Alzheimer's disease.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) represents a transitional state between normal aging and dementia. However, there is inconsistent opinion as to the validity of subjective memory complaints as a criterion for diagnosis.This study aimed to examine the potential significance of applying a short memory questionnaire in the assessment of Chinese subjects with MCI and early dementia.Three hundred and six ambulatory Chinese subjects were recruited. Each participant completed a short memory questionnaire. They were also assessed with the Chinese versions of the mini-mental state examination (CMMSE), Alzheimer's disease assessment scale-cognitive subscale (ADAS-Cog), category verbal fluency test (CVFT) and span tests. Severity of cognitive impairment was evaluated using the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR); subjects with CDR 0.5 were further classified into MCI not demented (MCIND) and MCI possible incipient dementia (MCIID) depending on the subscale scores of CDR.An increasing frequency of memory complaints with increasing CDR was observed (Kruskal Wallis test, chi square = 21.29, df 3, p < 0.001). With a cutoff of 3 or more memory complaints, the memory questionnaire demonstrated a sensitivity of 65.3% and 70.4% in identifying subjects with incipient and early dementia respectively. Significant associations between memory complaints and most cognitive test performance were found (Spearman's correlations, p < 0.01). Logistic regression analysis revealed that educational level, the memory questionnaire, ADAS-Cog total and delayed recall scores were significant predictors of MCIID status.The findings suggested that a short memory questionnaire is useful in the screening of MCI, particularly in subjects who already present with subtle functioning disturbances. Subjective memory complaints were significant correlated with objective performance of memory functions, reflecting the usefulness of memory complaints in the assessment of MCI.Performance on the Mini-Mental State Examination and Mattis Dementia Rating Scale among older American Indians.Optimal methods for assessing cognitive impairment among older American Indians have not been established. This study sought to examine the cultural relevance and performance of two common cognitive screening measures, the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Mattis Dementia Rating Scale (MDRS), in one American Indian population. One hundred forty American Indians ages 60 to 89 were assessed; nearly 11% scored more than 2 standard deviation points below performance expectations on the MMSE, as did 27% to 81% on the MDRS. Complex relationships were found between gender, health conditions (with possible effects on cognitive functioning), and MMSE and MDRS scores. The authors discuss implications and future directions.Assessment of instrumental activities of daily living in dementia: diagnostic value of the Amsterdam Instrumental Activities of Daily Living Questionnaire.Measuring impairments in "instrumental activities of daily living" (IADL) is important in dementia, but challenging due to the lack of reliable and valid instruments. We recently developed the Amsterdam Instrumental Activities of Daily Living Questionnaire (A-IADL-Q; note 1). We aim to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of the A-IADL-Q for dementia in a memory clinic setting.Patients visiting the Alzheimer Center of the VU University Medical Center with their informants between 2009 and 2011 were included (N = 278). Diagnoses were established in a multidisciplinary consensus meeting, independent of the A-IADL-Q scores. An optimal A-IADL-Q cutoff point was determined, and sensitivity and specificity were calculated. Area under the curves (AUCs) were compared between A-IADL-Q and "disability assessment of dementia" (DAD). The additional diagnostic value of the A-IADL-Q to Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) was examined using logistic regression analyses.Dementia prevalence was 50.5%. Overall diagnostic accuracy based on the AUC was 0.75 (95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.70-0.81) for the A-IADL-Q and 0.70 (95% CI: 0.63-0.77) for the DAD, which did not differ significantly. The optimal cutoff score for the A-IADL-Q was 51.4, resulting in sensitivity of 0.74 and specificity of 0.64. Combining the A-IADL-Q with the MMSE improved specificity (0.94), with a decline in sensitivity (0.55). Logistic regression models showed that adding A-IADL-Q improved the diagnostic accuracy (Z = 2.55, P = .011), whereas the DAD did not.In this study, we showed a fair diagnostic accuracy for A-IADL-Q and an additional value in the diagnosis of dementia. These results support the role of A-IADL-Q as a valuable diagnostic tool.Brief cognitive assessment in a UK population sample -- distributional properties and the relationship between the MMSE and an extended mental state examination.Despite the MMSE's known flaws, it is still used extensively as both a screening instrument for dementia and a population measure of cognitive ability. The aim of this paper is to provide data on the distribution of MMSE scores in a representative sample from the UK population and to compare it with an extended cognitive assessment (EMSE) which covers a wider range of cognitive domains and provides a wider range of difficulty levels.The MMSE and the EMSE were administered to over 12,000 participants at the screening stage of the MRC Cognitive Function and Ageing Study (MRC CFAS). MRC CFAS is a multi-centre population-based study in England and Wales with respondents aged 65 years and older.Normative values on the MMSE and EMSE are presented by age group, sex and level of education. There are very large differences between age groups, with smaller differences seen between the sexes and by level of education. The EMSE extends the scores at the high end of the ability range, but is no better than the MMSE at differentiating between dementia and non-dementia.Population-derived norms are valuable for comparing an individual's score to the score that would be expected among the general population, given the individual's specific demographic characteristics.Comparison of two scoring systems of the Mini-Mental State Examination as a screening test for dementia.The difference in validity in detecting dementia of two different scoring systems (age- and education-adjusted versus raw scores) of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), was assessed in an epidemiological study on the prevalence of dementia. A second, independent, psychometric screening tool, the Milan Overall Dementia Assessment (MODA), was also used. A group of 829 subjects over age 59 took part in the study. Subjects scoring below the cut-off point of the MMSE and/or MODA were clinically evaluated. Clinical diagnoses were adopted as the gold standard. Sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of the two tests were calculated. Our findings show that the correction for age and education of the raw score of the MMSE causes the loss of the mildest demented patients and heavily reduces the sensitivity of the screening test (from 85.7% to 71.4%), while it accounts for a moderate improvement in the specificity (from 90.0% to 96.3%). A possible explanation for this seeming paradox is proposed.Clinical utility of the mini-mental status examination when assessing decision-making capacity.The main objectives of this study were to examine the relationship between cognitive deficits, as measured by the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE), and decision-making capacity and to determine whether the sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE varied based upon the patient population assessed. Using a sample size of 152 patients and varying cutoff scores, the MMSE demonstrated extremely poor sensitivity. In contrast, the MMSE had excellent specificity when scores of 19 or less were obtained. In our sample, not one patient, regardless of diagnosis, was deemed to have capacity if their MMSE score was below 20. However, reliance on the MMSE for scores above 19 would too frequently lead to misclassification and incorrect assumptions about a patient's decision-making abilities. Although a score below 20 consistently yielded findings of incapability in our sample, it remains our opinion that the MMSE should not be used as a stand-alone tool to make determinations related to capacity, especially when considering the complexities associated with capacity evaluations and the vital areas, such as executive functioning and individual values and beliefs, which are omitted by the MMSE.Screening for cognitive impairment: comparing the performance of four instruments in primary care.To determine whether brief cognitive screening tests perform as well as a longer screening test in diagnosis of cognitive impairment, no dementia (CIND) or dementia.A cross-sectional comparison of cognitive screening tests to an independent criterion standard evaluation using Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) criteria. Performance of the cognitive screening tests for identifying dementia, and separately for identifying dementia or CIND, was characterized using sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios, and diagnostic odds ratios.Three Department of Veterans Affairs primary care clinics.Of 826 independently living veterans aged 65 and older without a prior diagnosis of dementia, 639 participated and 630 were assigned a research diagnosis.Screening tests included the modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS; average time to administer, 17 minutes) and three brief instruments: the Memory Impairment Screen (MIS; 4 minutes), the Mini-Cog (3 minutes), and a novel two-item functional memory screen (MF-2; 1.5 minutes).Participants were aged 74.8 on average and were mostly white or black. They were mostly male (92.9%) and had been prescribed a mean of 7.7 medications for chronic conditions. The prevalence of dementia and CIND was 3.3% and 39.2%, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity for dementia were 86% and 79% for the 3MS, 76% and 73% for the Mini-Cog, 43% and 93% for the MIS, and 38% and 87% for the MF-2, respectively.In individuals without a prior diagnosis of cognitive impairment, the prevalence of dementia was low, but the prevalence of CIND was high. The 3MS and Mini-Cog had reasonable performance characteristics for detecting dementia, but a definitive diagnosis requires additional evaluation.Epidemiological dementia index: a screening instrument for Alzheimer's disease and other types of dementia suitable for use in populations with low education level.MMSE and CAMCOG are neuropsychological scales developed for use in everyday clinical practice and epidemiological surveys.These two instruments were used as part of the assessment during an epidemiological survey in the municipality of Pylaia, Greece. The project was based on the World Health Organization Program for Research on Aging and Age-Associated Dementias (1992). It had two phases. During phase I, nursing students collected demographic data, risk factors, personal and family history data and they applied MMSE, CAMCOG and scales of everyday life functioning. During phase II, 4 physicians examined all subjects that manifested possible cognitive deterioration (MMSE<27), in order to reach a final diagnosis. The final diagnosis was made according to DSM-IV and NINCDS-ADRDA criteria. MMSE and CAMCOG were not taken into consideration in the diagnostic process. Three hundred and eighty subjects were initially screened. All were aged over 70 years. After the exclusion of subjects who were illiterate, blind, etc., the results of 277 subjects were finally analyzed. Subjects with 6 years of education or less accounted for 92.42% of the total study sample. Twelve of them (5.33%) suffered from Alzheimer's disease, 7 from vascular dementia (2.52%) and 1 suffered from secondary dementia (0.36%).MMSE exceeded 90% sensitivity at the level 22/23 and specificity at 14/15. The levels for CAMCOG were 56/57 and 43/44, respectively. This low performance of both tests is to a large extent due to the functional illiteracy of elderly individuals in Greece, to possible coexistence of mood disorders or simply to lack of cooperation. The analysis of data led to the development of an Epidemiological Dementia Index (EDI), with a scale ranging from 0 to 7. Nondemented subjects had a mean EDI of 5.12 (SD = 1.67) and demented patients had a mean EDI of 1.6 (SD = 1. 92). At the level 4/5 sensitivity was 93.33. Specificity was 93.56 at the level 2/3.Is the montreal cognitive assessment superior to the mini-mental state examination in detecting subtle cognitive impairment among middle-aged outpatient U.S. Military veterans?The Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) is a relatively newly designed test that was developed as a tool to screen patients with mild cognitive problems that are not typically detected by the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE). While early research suggests that the MoCA is more sensitive to subtle cognitive impairment than the MMSE, there is concern about potential decreased specificity when using the MoCA. The aim of the present study was to examine the comparative utility of using the MoCA and the MMSE to detect subtle cognitive impairment among a group of 82 middle-aged U.S. military veterans referred for outpatient neuropsychological testing. Using receiver operating characteristic analyses, the MoCA was shown to be a better predictor of subtle cognitive impairment on neuropsychological testing than the MMSE. When using an adjusted cutoff, the MoCA was shown to be more sensitive (i.e., 0.72 vs. 0.52) and nearly as specific as the MMSE (0.75 vs. 0.77).Memory testing in dementia: how much is enough?Analyses of eight widely used memory measures (Word List Acquisition and Recall used in the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale and the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease neuropsychology battery, Wechsler Memory Scale-Revised [WMS-R] Logical Memory I and II, WMS-R Visual Reproduction I and II, the memory scores from the Neurobehavioral Cognitive Status Examination [NCSE], memory scores from the Mini-Mental State Examination [MMSE]), and the MMSE total score showed each to have moderate predictive power in differentiating between patients with mild dementia and healthy normal controls. When these instruments were combined in a logistic regression analysis, three of them had substantial predictive power. Together, the Word List Acquisition, WMS-R Logical Memory II, and WMS-R Visual Reproduction II were 97.26% accurate (100% sensitive and 94.59% specific) in distinguishing these two groups. The Word List Acquisition is a brief test that alone had high accuracy (92%). These memory tests are highly useful in the diagnosis of mild dementia.Social and leisure activities and risk of dementia: a prospective longitudinal study.To study the relationship between social and leisure activities and risk of subsequent dementia in older community residents.A cohort study of people aged 65 and older were followed-up 1 and 3 years after a baseline screening (the Paquid study).2040 older subjects living at home in Gironde (France) were randomly selected and followed for at least 3 years.Information about social and leisure activities was collected during the baseline screening with an interview by a psychologist. Incident cases of dementia were detected during the first and third year follow-up screenings according to the DSM-III-R criteria.All but one of the social and leisure activities noted were significantly associated with a lower risk of dementia. Only golden club participation was not significantly associated with this risk. After adjustment for age and cognitive performance measured by the Mini-Mental State Exam, visual memory test, and verbal fluency test, only traveling (Relative risk (RR) = .48,95% Confidence Interval (95% CI) = .24-.94), odd jobs or knitting (RR = .46,95% CI = .26-.85), and gardening (RR = .53, 95% CI = .28-.99) remained significant.Regular participation in social or leisure activities such as traveling, odd jobs, knitting, or gardening were associated with a lower risk of subsequent dementia.Cut-off values of blessed dementia rating scale and its clinical application in elderly Taiwanese.Although the Blessed Dementia Rating Scale (BDRS), a clinical screening instrument, has been applied extensively, no suitable cut-off values and clinical application have been proposed, particularly in mild cognitive impairment (MCI), the precursor of dementia. The BDRS, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), and Clinical Dementia Rating Scale (CDR) were administrated in people aged 65 years and above, who were enrolled from southern Taiwan with multistep stratified random sampling and followed-up for 2 years. All subjects (total number = 3,027), with new onset of MCI (defined as CDR = 0.5) in the first year and dementia (defined as CDR > or = 1) in the second and third years were subjected to statistical analysis. In distinguishing normal from MCI, except in the literate group aged 65-74 years, MMSE was superior to BDRS, with cut-off values of 1 in both literate groups aged 65-74 years and > or = 75 years, and 1.5 and 2 in less educated groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, respectively. In distinguishing MCI from dementia, BDRS had cut-off values of 2.5 in both literate groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, and 2.5 and 3 in less educated groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, respectively. These values were better than those for MMSE in all groups. BDRS might be considered as a better tool than MMSE to screen for MCI and dementia in the increasing proportion of literate elderly aged 65-74 years in the aging population.Prevalence of mild cognitive impairment by multiple classifications: The Monongahela-Youghiogheny Healthy Aging Team (MYHAT) project.To estimate and compare the frequency and prevalence of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and related entities using different classification approaches at the population level.Cross-sectional epidemiologic study of population-based cohort recruited by age-stratified random sampling from electoral rolls.Small-town communities in western Pennsylvania.Of 2,036 individuals aged 65 years and older, 1,982 participants with normal or mildly impaired cognition (age-education-corrected Mini-Mental State scores ≥ 21).Demographics, neuropsychological assessment expressed as cognitive domains, functional ability, and subjective reports of cognitive difficulties; based on these measurements, operational criteria for the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) scale, the 1999 criteria for amnestic MCI, the 2004 Expanded criteria for MCI, and new, purely cognitive criteria for MCI.A CDR rating of 0.5 (uncertain/very mild dementia) was obtained by 27.6% of participants, whereas 1.2% had CDR ≥ 1 (mild or moderate dementia). Among those with CDR <1, 2.27% had amnestic MCI and 17.66% had expanded MCI, whereas 35.17% had MCI by purely cognitive classification. Isolated executive function impairment was the least common, whereas impairment in multiple domains including executive function was the most common. Prevalence estimates weighted against the U.S. Census are also provided.The manner in which criteria for MCI are operationalized determines the proportion of individuals who are thus classified and the degree of overlap with other criteria. Prospective follow-up is needed to determine progression from MCI to dementia and thus empirically develop improved MCI criteria with good predictive value.Improving detection of dementia in Asian patients with low education: combining the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly.Previous work combining the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) has been conducted in western populations. We ascertained, in an Asian population, (1) the best method of combining the tests, (2) the effects of educational level, and (3) the effect of different dementia etiologies.Data from 576 patients were analyzed (407 nondemented controls, 87 Alzheimer's disease and 82 vascular dementia patients). Sensitivity, specificity and AUC values were obtained using three methods, the 'And' rule, the 'Or' rule, and the 'weighted sum' method.The 'weighted sum' rule had statistically superior AUC and specificity results, while the 'Or' rule had the best sensitivity results. The IQCODE outperformed the MMSE in all analyses. Patients with no education benefited more from combined tests. There was no difference between Alzheimer's disease and vascular dementia populations in the predictive value of any of the combined methods.We recommend that the IQCODE be used to supplement the MMSE whenever available and that the 'weighted sum' method be used to combine the MMSE and the IQCODE, particularly in populations with low education. As the study population selected may not be representative of the general population, further studies are required before generalization to nonclinical samples.Cases with mild cognitive impairment and Alzheimer's disease fail to benefit from repeated exposure to episodic memory tests as compared with controls.Memory tests may be predictive for cognitive decline. We investigated the sensitivity and change in performance over time of the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) for Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) and Alzheimer's Disease (AD) when compared to cognitively healthy controls. Participants included elderly controls (n = 54), MCI (n = 19) and AD cases (n = 28) from OPTIMA. The MMSE and the HVLT (version 1) were administered twice to all subjects with an interval of 2-3 years.MCI and AD cases had poorer performance than controls on the HVLT and MMSE at both testing episodes (p < 0.05). The HVLT profile over time showed a learning effect in the control group (P < 0.0001), a trend to decline in the AD group (p = 0.09) and no change in the MCI group (P = 0.8). A subgroup of MCI subjects had lower HVLT scores at follow-up. The MMSE profile showed no significant change over time for all three groups (P > 0.05). The HVLT had better sensitivity and specificity compared to the MMSE for detecting MCI and AD. The HVLT is not only valuable for cross-sectional designs but has also proved to be valuable in a longitudinal design. Cognitively healthy controls showed evidence of learning strategies on the HVLT after a 2-3 year interval, with improved scores at the second testing episode. By contrast, an MCI group showed no benefits of previous exposure to this test. Lack of use of learning strategies on the HVLT may be an important marker of the likelihood of cognitive decline to MCI or dementia.Development and validation of a brief cognitive assessment tool: the sweet 16.Cognitive impairment is often unrecognized among older adults. Meanwhile, current assessment instruments are underused, lack sensitivity, or may be restricted by copyright laws. To address these limitations, we created a new brief cognitive assessment tool: the Sweet 16.The Sweet 16 was developed in a cohort from a large post-acute hospitalization study (n=774) and compared with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Equipercentile equating identified Sweet 16 cut points that correlated with widely used MMSE cut points. Sweet 16 performance characteristics were independently validated in a cohort from the Aging, Demographics, and Memory Study (n=709) using clinical consensus diagnosis, the modified Blessed Dementia Rating Scale, and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE).The Sweet 16 correlated highly with the MMSE (Spearman r, 0.94; P<.001). Validated against the IQCODE, the area under the curve was 0.84 for the Sweet 16 and 0.81 for the MMSE (P=.06). A Sweet 16 score of less than 14 (approximating an MMSE score <24) demonstrated a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 70%, whereas an MMSE score of less than 24 showed a sensitivity of 64% and a specificity of 86% against the IQCODE. When compared with clinical diagnosis, a Sweet 16 score of less than 14 showed a sensitivity of 99% and a specificity of 72% in contrast to an MMSE score with a sensitivity of 87% and a specificity of 89%. For education of 12 years or more, the area under the curve was 0.90 for the Sweet 16 and 0.84 for the MMSE (P=.03).The Sweet 16 is simple, quick to administer, and will be available open access. The performance of the Sweet 16 is equivalent or superior to that of the MMSE.The Mini-Mental-37 test for dementia screening in the Spanish population: an analysis using the Rasch Model.Our aim was to analyze the psychometric properties of the Mini-Mental State Examination-37 using the Rasch Model (RM) in order to identify the cognitive domains that optimize detection of dementia in the Spanish population. All participants (n = 3955) were part of the NEDICES (Neurological Disorders in Central Spain) cohort study designed to detect dementia in persons aged 65 years and older. Clinical diagnosis of dementia (n = 178) was established by consensus of expert neurologists according to the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM-IV) criteria. Results indicate that the items on the MMSE-37 have a good fit with the assumptions of the RM. None of the items on the MMSE-37 exhibits differential item functioning in relation to the groups. The items that assess orientation, attention, and language (repetition and comprehension) are those that best enable us to discriminate between the group with dementia and the group without dementia. The implications of the education and other sociodemographic characteristics of the population are discussed.Premorbid cognitive testing predicts the onset of dementia and Alzheimer's disease better than and independently of APOE genotype.To determine whether a cognitive test package can predict the onset of dementia up to 11 years later, and the extent to which this prediction is independent of that provided by APOE genotype.Prospective cohort study based on 54 general practices in the UK; 657 survivors of the 1088 participants in the MRC treatment trial of hypertension in older adults were followed for up to 11 years; 370 participants (57% of survivors) were traced, screened for dementia, and genotyped for APOE in 1994. Baseline assessments included trail making test A, paired associated learning test, Raven's progressive matrices, and national adult reading test. At follow up, both mini-mental state examination and CAMCOG were used. Outcome measures were DSM-IIIR dementia and NINCDS-ADRDA possible and probable Alzheimer's disease.All the cognitive tests completed in 1983 predicted onset of dementia and Alzheimer's disease up to 11 years later, as did APOE genotype. Cognitive test performance was not associated with APOE genotype. Addition of cognitive tests increased the area under the ROC curve for the prediction of Alzheimer's disease provided by age, family history, and APOE genotype (0.81 v 0.69, p = 0.048); addition of APOE genotype did not increase the area under the ROC curve for the prediction provided by age, family history, and cognitive tests (0.81 v 0.77, p = 0.28).Simple tests of cognitive ability provide useful predictive information up to a decade before the onset of dementia. The predictive information provided is independent of, but not enhanced by, the addition of APOE genotype.The accuracy of the MMSE in detecting cognitive impairment when administered by general practitioners: a prospective observational study.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) has contributed to detecting cognitive impairment, yet few studies have evaluated its accuracy when used by general practitioners (GP) in an actual public-health setting.We evaluated the accuracy of MMSE scores obtained by GPs by comparing them to scores obtained by Alzheimer's Evaluation Units (UVA).The study was observational in design and involved 59 voluntary GPs who, after having undergone training, administered the MMSE to patients with symptoms of cognitive disturbances. Individuals who scored < or = 24 (adjusted by age and educational level) were referred to Alzheimer's Evaluation Units (UVA) for diagnosis (including the MMSE). UVAs were unblinded to the MMSE score of the GP. To measure interrater agreement, the weighted Kappa statistic was calculated. To evaluate factors associated with the magnitude of the difference between paired scores, a linear regression model was applied. To quantify the accuracy in discriminating no cognitive impairment from any cognitive impairment and from Alzheimer's disease (AD), the ROC curves (AUC) were calculated.For the 317 patients, the mean score obtained by GPs was significantly lower (15.8 vs. 17.4 for the UVAs; p < 0.01). However, overall concordance was good (Kappa = 0.86). Only the diagnosis made by the UVA was associated with the difference between paired scores: the adjusted mean difference was 3.1 for no cognitive impairment and 3.8 for mild cognitive impairment. The AUC of the scores for GPs was 0.80 (95%CI: 0.75-0.86) for discriminating between no impairment and any impairment and 0.89 (95%CI: 0.84-0.94) for distinguishing patients with AD, though the UVA scores discriminated better.In a public-health setting involving patients with symptoms of cognitive disturbances, the MMSE used by the GPs was sufficiently accurate to detect patients with cognitive impairment, particularly those with dementia.Simplifying detection of cognitive impairment: comparison of the Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination in a multiethnic sample.To compare detection of cognitive impairment using the Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and to identify sociodemographic variables that influence detection in an ethnoculturally diverse sample.Cross-sectional.A registry of the University of Washington Alzheimer's Disease Research Center Satellite.A heterogeneous community sample (n=371) of predominantly ethnic minority elderly assessed using a standardized research protocol, 231 of whom met criteria for dementia or mild cognitive impairment (MCI).Demographic data, a standardized research protocol for cognitive assessment and dementia diagnosis, MMSE, and Mini-Cog.Both screens effectively detected cognitive impairment, the Mini-Cog slightly better than the MMSE (P<.01). Overall accuracy of classification was 83% for the Mini-Cog and 81% for the MMSE. The Mini-Cog was superior in recognizing patients with Alzheimer-type dementias (P=.05). Low education negatively affected detection using the MMSE (P<.001), whereas education did not affect the Mini-Cog, and low literacy minimally affected it.The Mini-Cog detects clinically significant cognitive impairment as well as or better than the MMSE in multiethnic elderly individuals, is easier to administer to non-English speakers, and is less biased by low education and literacy.[A comparison between 2 abbreviated Spanish versions of mental status assessment in the diagnosis of dementia. Study data on elderly community residents].There are several Spanish versions and adaptations of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the most used abbreviated test for screening of the cognitive decline in clinical and epidemiological setting. Among them, the Mini-Examen Cognoscitivo (MEC) is highlighted. The aim of this study was to compare the diagnostic usefulness between the Spanish translation of the MMSE (the MMSE1 which incorporates the proof of serial "sevens" and the MMSE2 which includes spelling "world" backward) and the MEC for the diagnosis of dementia.A sample of elderly persons (65 years or over), included in a population-based study of dementia prevalence. The diagnosis of dementia was assessed through exhaustive neuropsychological evaluation. The diagnosis of dementia (according to the standardized DSM-III-R criteria) was carried out by expert neurologists, who were independent and blind to the scores obtained in the MMSE and MEC.79 subjects underwent both tools and neuropsychological assessment. The MMSE1 obtained the highest accuracy (92%), followed by the MEC (90%) and the MMSE2 (83%). The analysis of the areas under receiver operating characteristic curves did not show significant statistical differences between the MMSE1 and MEC (p = 0.38), but significant differences were observed between those and the MMSE2 (p = 0.01).The diagnostic usefulness of Spanish translation of the MMSE is similar to the MEC. The proof of spelling "world" backward obtained poorer results than serial "sevens". The Spanish versions of the MMSE should be improved to be adapted to our cultural characteristics.A 2-year follow-up of 233 very mild (CDR 0.5) Alzheimer's disease patients (REAL.FR cohort).Making an early diagnosis of Alzheimer's Disease (AD) is becoming increasingly important. The Clinical Dementia Rating scale (CDR), a semi-structured interview with patient and caregiver, is a global rating scale designed for use in staging dementia. The primary objective of our study was to examine the evolution of AD in individuals with very mild AD (CDR 0.5) across a 2-year follow up.A cohort of AD patients (n=682) living in the community were followed during 2 years in 16 centres of the French AD network. Each subject underwent extensive medical examination including the MMSE and CDR every 6 months.Two hundred and thirty-three AD patients were rated CDR 0.5 at baseline (mean MMSE score: 23.15+/-2.57). They were younger and reported an average duration of symptoms of approximately 0.8 years less than patients with CDR >or= 1.During the 2-year follow-up, none of the AD CDR 0.5 subjects improved; 65% of them showed an increase in the CDR score. The rate of cognitive decline was similar between the AD CDR 0.5 and CDR >or= 1 groups. The ADL decline was more significant in patients with CDR >or= 1 at inclusion.It is certainly possible to identify AD at a very early stage focusing on intra individual change in cognitive and functional impairment. Criteria with a high sensitivity and specificity for detecting AD at an early stage will help to further develop effective pharmacological and behavioural interventions for delaying the onset and progression of the disease.New computer-based cognitive function test for the elderly.We developed a modified trail-making test using a PC and touch panel and compared it with the mini mental state examination (MMSE). The test consisted of a series of numbers from 1 to 36, randomly arranged across the display. The object of the test was for the subject to touch the numbers in order, beginning with 1 and ending with 36, in as little time as possible. The system consisted of a PC and a liquid crystal display (LCD) touch-panel screen. One hundred and thirty-four patients with dementia performed the test. Sixty of the 134 patients (15 male, 45 female; average age, 81.1 +/- 7 years) were diagnosed as having Alzheimer's disease and the others had cerebrovascular dementia. Sixty-two of 134 patients (23 male, 39 female; average age, 77.6 +/- 8 years; MMSE score, 21.5 +/- 5.6 points) completed the test. The correlation coefficient between test performance time and MMSE score was -0.534. This test may also be a useful indicator of focal frontal lesions and can be used as an early screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Prediction of probable Alzheimer disease in patients with symptoms suggestive of memory impairment. Value of the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is a widely used diagnostic tool for dementia. Its use as a predictive indicator of probable Alzheimer disease (AD) has not been established.To determine the accuracy of the MMSE in predicting emergent AD in a sample of patients who were referred because of symptoms suggestive of memory problems and to determine whether an abbreviated version of the MMSE could be developed that would be as accurate as the full MMSE in predicting emergent AD.Inception cohort of participants with symptoms suggestive of memory impairment by their family physicians were given baseline assessments, including MMSE. After 2 years, the participants' conditions were diagnosed following the standard criterion for AD. Diagnosticians were blind to baseline scores.One hundred eighty-three community-residing participants were referred by their family physicians to a university teaching hospital research investigation. After baseline screening, 165 participants were included in the study who did not have dementia and had no identifiable cause for memory impairment. After 2 years, 29 participants met criteria for AD, 98 did not develop dementia, 18 developed vascular lesions or non-AD dementia, and 20 did not return.Diagnostic classification of AD or no evidence of dementia.Logistic regression model was significant. At a cutoff score of 24 or less, sensitivity was 31%; specificity, 96%; with a likelihood ratio of 7.75. A reduced model of 2 subtests was identified with a sensitivity of 41%; specificity, 98%; with a likelihood ratio of 20.70.Results suggest that the full or abbreviated MMSE is useful in predicting emergent AD in patients with positive test results. However, it is not recommended for use as a screening or diagnostic instrument since a negative test result did not rule out emergent AD. It is recommended as a tool to identify those needing closer monitoring.Cross-sectional versus longitudinal estimates of cognitive change in nondemented older people: a CERAD study. Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease.To investigate the effect of increasing age on cognition in nondemented older people.A cross-sectional and longitudinal analysis.A total of 454 control subjects for Alzheimer's cases from the cohort assembled by the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD).The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) to assess cognitive function.Cross-sectional estimates were derived by generalized linear models and longitudinal estimates by generalized estimating equations. The cross-sectional model indicated a small but significant decline in MMSE of -.4 points per 10 years. The longitudinal model indicated a small but significant increase in MMSE of about +.6 points per 10 years. Evidence of an early learning effect and nonrandom dropout exists.The question of "normal" aging can be approached by considering cross-sectional information and, usually separately, longitudinal information. This study does both using recently developed statistical methods. We conclude that there is a small but significant decline in scores on the MMSE with increasing population age. The effect can be masked in longitudinal cohorts by a learning effect (especially early in follow-up) and other factors associated with repeated testing.Is the Folstein's Mini-Mental test an aphasia test?The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is recognized as a valid screening for dementia. It consists of 29 verbal items from a total of 30. The Brief Aphasia Evaluation (BAE) includes 10 aphasia and 12 orientation items, which are similar to most of the MMSE items. It was studied whether those BAE items (MMSE-like): (a) correlate with the rest of the BAE items (BAE-rest), and (b) differentiate patients with left cerebral lesions (LC) from both patients with right cerebral lesions (RC) and healthy participants (HP). A sample of 109 right-handed volunteers (38 HP, 37 LC, and 34 RC) was studied. The three groups were matched according to gender, age, and education. Patients were similar in multiple variables. The correlation between MMSE-like and BAE-rest was .90. MMSE-like showed a sensitivity and specificity of .81 or above to identify the LC from the other two groups. There is a risk for misdiagnosing aphasia as dementia with the MMSE.Staging the severity of dementia: comparison of clinical (CDR, DSM-III-R), functional (ADL, IADL) and cognitive (MMSE) scales.The Helsinki Aging Study is based on a random sample of 795 subjects aged 75 years (N = 274), 80 years (N = 266) and 85 years (N = 255). Ninety-three demented patients were found. All were assessed for severity of dementia by Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) scale by a general practitioner and according to the DSM-III-R criteria by a neurologist. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) was carried out by a community nurse and the Index of ADL and the IADL-scale by a close informant. The correlation of the severity of dementia between the DSM-III-R criteria and the CDR scale was moderate. The overall agreement was 64.5% and the Kappa index 0.56. The CDR scale tended to put patients in milder categories than the DSM-III-R criteria. The correlation between the clinical scales and categorized MMSE was moderate to fair. The overall agreement between MMSE and DSM-III-R criteria was 64% (Kappa 0.44) and between MMSE and CDR scale 55% (Kappa 0.33%). The dispersion of the functional scales (ADL, IADL) was much greater indicating that there were also other factors influencing the functional capacity than the degree of dementia. Different methods in staging dementia give different results thus influencing for instance the results of epidemiological studies. Functional scales are needed in clinical practice in addition to the assessment of the severity of dementia. The CDR scale is useful in assessing the need for support services.Interaction of atherosclerosis and inflammation in elderly subjects with poor cognitive function.To test the hypothesis that a pro-inflammatory response is associated with cognitive impairment among individuals with cardiovascular disease.All 85-year-old inhabitants of Leiden (n = 599) were visited at their place of residence. A history of cardiovascular disease and an EKG were used as indicators of atherosclerosis. Production of the pro-inflammatory cytokine tumor necrosis factor-alpha and the anti-inflammatory cytokine interleukin-10 was assessed in a whole-blood assay using lipopolysaccharide as a stimulus. Global cognitive functioning was determined with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE); attention, cognitive speed, and memory were determined with four neuropsychological tests; and a history of dementia was obtained.In subjects with cardiovascular disease, median MMSE scores were lower in those with a pro-inflammatory response when compared with those with an anti-inflammatory response (p = 0.02). Similar associations were found for the Stroop Test, measuring attention (p < 0.01), the Coding Test measuring cognitive speed (p = 0.02), the Word Learning Test measuring memory (p < 0.01), and the presence of dementia (p = 0.04). The associations remained unaltered after adjustments for possible confounders such as gender, level of education, use of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs, use of cardiovascular drugs, and cardiovascular risk factors. In contrast, outcomes of the cognitive tests and presence of dementia were not dependent on the inflammatory response when cardiovascular disease was absent.The combination of cardiovascular disease and a pro-inflammatory cytokine response may be associated with cognitive impairment and dementia.Relationship between blood pressure and Alzheimer's disease in Linxian County, China.To investigate the relationship between hypertension and Alzheimer's disease(AD) and the change of Alzheimer's patients' blood pressure(BP) before and after the onset of AD, we conducted this epidemiological study. Subjects for this study were individuals who participated in a large scale, randomized controlled trial of nutritional intervention from 1984 to 1991. Participants were initially screened for dementia using Chinese Mini-Mental State Examination (CMMS) and Activities of Daily Living (ADL). Positive subjects were subsequently administered a detailed neuropsychological and neurobehavioral examination. The diagnosis of AD was made by a consensus conference of psychiatrists using Diagnostic And Statistical Manual Of Mental Disorders-Fourth Edition(DSM-IV) criteria. 16488 subjects were examined and 301 were diagnosed as AD. We compared the prevalence of AD in different populations that were stratified with 1984's systolic or diastolic blood pressure(those four stratifications being high blood pressure, borderline blood pressure, normal, low blood pressure), and compared the change of blood pressure of 301 AD patients between 1984 and 1999-2000, which is before and after the onset of AD respectively. Multiple Logistic Regression (1:1 nested case-control study) was used to assess if hypertension is an independent risk factor for AD, and Trend test was used to assess the relationship between blood pressure and AD. Here we demonstrate that there was a significant difference in AD prevalence among different populations stratified by systolic or diastolic blood pressure (P < 0.01). The prevalence is highest in hypertension group, and lowest in hypotension group. Multiple Logistic Regression identified high blood pressure as a risk factor for AD (OR = 1.97, 95%CI:1.09-3.54, P = 0.02). Trend test showed that there is a significant dose-response relationship between blood pressure and AD (P < 0.0002). For hypertensive AD patients, there was no significant difference in systolic blood pressure(SBP) before and after the onset of AD, but diastolic blood pressure(DBP) decreased dramatically after the onset of AD (P < 0.01); however, the result also showed that DBP decrease occurred in the non-demented group. Based on this, we think the DBP decrease is not related to AD. We further investigated whether BP values differed crossed-sectionally between the AD-patients and non-demented individuals. We found that regardless of SBP or DBP, the BP values of the AD group were all significantly higher than that of non-demented. In summary, these data suggest there is a strong relationship between hypertension and AD; however, the mechanism remains to be studied.Association between memory complaints and incident Alzheimer's disease in elderly people with normal baseline cognition.Results of previous studies suggest that memory complaints may predict cognitive decline and dementia among elderly people in whom cognitive impairment is already apparent. However, cognitive decline is often a gradual process, and elderly people may notice that their memory deteriorates before mental status tests are able to detect any change in cognitive functioning. Therefore, the authors hypothesized that memory complaints would predict incident Alzheimer's disease in elderly subjects with no signs of cognitive impairment.In the community-based Amsterdam Study of the Elderly, a sample of 3,778 nondemented persons, 65 to 84 years old, was selected and divided into two cognitive categories: normal (Mini-Mental State scores of 26-30) and borderline and impaired (Mini-Mental State scores less than 26). At baseline, the presence or absence of memory complaints was assessed. At follow-up, incident cases of Alzheimer's disease were diagnosed in a two-step procedure.After an average of 3.2 years, 2,169 persons were reevaluated, of whom 77 had incident Alzheimer's disease. Multivariate logistic regression analyses showed that memory complaints were associated with incident Alzheimer's disease in subjects with normal baseline cognition but not in subjects with impaired baseline cognition.The findings of this study suggest that memory complaints are a relatively strong predictor of incident Alzheimer's disease in older persons in whom cognitive impairment is not yet apparent. Furthermore, they suggest that older persons may be aware of a decline in cognition at a time when mental status tests are still unable to detect a decline from premorbid functioning.Utility of the abbreviated Fuld Object Memory Evaluation and MMSE for detection of dementia and cognitive impairment not dementia in diverse ethnic groups.To address the growing need for ethnically unbiased cognitive screening, we examined whether the Mini Mental State Exam (MMSE), the abbreviated Fuld Object Memory Evaluation (FOME), or a combination of the two provided optimal detection of dementia in an ethnically diverse group of older adults with no cognitive impairment (normal); cognitive impairment not dementia (CIND); and dementia. Participants included 509 Caucasians, 124 African Americans, and 68 Latinos (>70 years old) from the Aging, Demographics, and Memory Study who completed the MMSE and FOME. Empirically derived decision trees were computed using signal detection software for receiver operator characteristics (ROC). Among the three ethnic groups, ROC analyses revealed that lower scores on both the MMSE and FOME provided better detection of CIND or dementia. Sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE was augmented by the addition of the FOME among Caucasian and African American older adults. The MMSE alone was the best screen in Latino older adults to distinguish any cognitive impairment from normal. When comparing CIND versus dementia, however, the FOME alone was best for detecting dementia among Latinos. The abbreviated FOME is recommended to increase clinical validity and thus minimize ethnic biases when administering the MMSE to Caucasian and African American older adults. The MMSE alone is preferred for older Latinos unless comparing CIND and dementia, in which case the FOME alone would then be recommended. Findings suggest that ethnicity is important in the selection of an appropriate cognitive screen and cut-score to use with older adults.Neuropsychological detection of dementia: an overview of the neuropsychological component of the Canadian Study of Health and Aging.As part of the Canadian Study of Health and Aging (CSHA), a battery of neuropsychological measures was administered to 1879 participants. Participants who received neuropsychological evaluations were selected from an age-stratified random sample on the basis of scores on a cognitive screening tool, the Modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS). Seventy-five percent of the sample seen for neuropsychological evaluation scored between 50 and 77 on the 3MS and 25% of the sample scored 78 or over. This paper provides a descriptive summary of the methodological basis of the neuropsychological component of the CSHA. The findings indicated that differences existed between participants administered the battery in English or French in terms of refusal rates and diagnoses of dementia. Cursory examination of the utility of the battery indicated that the battery was tolerated well by both the participants and the psychologists involved with the study and that measures of memory functioning were central to diagnostic decision-making. The relations between neuropsychological, preliminary medical and consensus diagnoses were examined and indicated that neuropsychological information influenced diagnostic decision-making. The neuropsychology component of the CSHA is a rich source of information on persons aged 65 years and older in Canada.Diagnostic accuracy of a new instrument for detecting cognitive dysfunction.Effective screening of cognitive disorders is limited by psychometric and practical properties of available instruments. The Brief Cognitive Screen (BCS) was developed to improve sensitivity and overall diagnostic accuracy of case detection for cognitive dysfunction in a quick and convenient format.This validation study compared psychometric properties of the BCS with the Mini mental state examination (MMSE) in 308 patients with suspected or known disorders of cognition. Diagnostic accuracy of the MMSE was determined using the traditional 23/24 clinical cutoff and area under the curve (AUC) from receiver operating characteristics (ROC) analyses. Diagnostic accuracy of BCS summary scores and components was determined by ROC analyses. Comprehensive neuropsychological evaluation served as the criterion standard for determining cognitive dysfunction.The MMSE sensitivity (34.8%) was inadequate at the 23/24 cutoff. Under ROC analyses, diagnostic accuracy of a BCS summary score was superior (AUC = 0.950) to the MMSE total score (AUC = 0.862) for the total sample. Excluding all patients with a history of cognitive deficit, classification accuracy of the BCS remained high (AUC = 0.936).Findings suggest that BCS is an effective, convenient alternative screening instrument for use in clinical populations with suspected cognitive dysfunction.The sensitivity and specificity of subjective memory complaints and the subjective memory rating scale, deterioration cognitive observee, mini-mental state examination, six-item screener and clock drawing test in dementia screening.The effectiveness of dementia screening depends on the availability of suitable screening tools with good sensitivity and specificity to confidently distinguish normal age-related cognitive decline from dementia. The aim of this study was to evaluate the discriminant validity of 7 screening measures for dementia.A sample of 140 participants aged ≥60 years living in a residential facility for the aged were assessed clinically and assigned caseness for dementia using the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th edition, text revised diagnostic criteria. Sensitivity and specificity of a selection of the following screening measures were tested using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for individual and combined tests: the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Six-Item Screener (SIS), Subjective Memory Complaint, Subjective Memory Complaint Clinical (SMCC), Subjective Memory Rating Scale (SMRS), Deterioration Cognitive Observee (DECO) and the Clock Drawing Test (CDT).Using ROC analyses, the SMCC, MMSE and CDT were found to be 'moderately accurate' in screening for dementia with an area under the curve (AUC) >0.70. The AUCs for the SIS (0.526), SMRS (0.661) and DECO (0.687) classified these measures as being 'less accurate'. At recommended cutoff scores, the SMCC had a sensitivity of 90.9% and specificity of 45.7%; the MMSE had a sensitivity of 63.6% and a specificity of 76.0%, and the CDT had a sensitivity of 44.4% and a specificity of 88.9%. Combining the SMCC and MMSE did not improve their predictive power except for a modest increase when using the sequential rule.The SMCC is composed of valid screening questions that have high sensitivity, are simple to administer and ideal for administration at the community or primary health care level as a first level of 'rule-out' screening. The MMSE can be included at a second stage of screening at the general hospital level and the CDT in specialist clinical settings. Sequential use of the SMCC and MMSE will improve the specificity of the former and the sensitivity of the latter.Risk factors for dementia in the epidemiological study of Munguialde County (Basque Country-Spain).Prevalence of degenerative dementias and dementias associated with cerebrovascular disease is increasing. Dementia is one of the most significant public health problem. In recent years, the role of vascular risk factors (hypertension, diabetes mellitus and hypercholesterolemia) and depression has been evaluated.The incidence of dementia and risk factors has not been fully investigated in Spain. The aim of this study was to identify the risk factors for dementia, Alzheimer's disease (AD) and vascular dementia (VD) in elderly people in Munguialde County (Spain).A two phase, door-to-door populational study was performed. Demographic variables and the presence of vascular risk factors and depression were recorded. The MMSE, the DSM-IV and the conventional criteria for AD and VD were used in the evaluation. The odds ratio for each risk factor was calculated by logistic regression analysis.1756 healthy subjects and 175 patients with dementia participated in the study. Of these, 133 had AD, 15 VD and the remainder other dementias. The risk factors for dementia and AD were female sex (OR = 1.67 and 1.97, respectively); age (OR = 1.14 and 1.15); stroke (OR = 7.84 and 3); and depression (OR = 53.08 and 3.19). Stroke was the only risk factor for VD (OR = 119).Greater age, female sex, stroke and depression increase the risk of suffering dementia, AD and VD. The relationship between depression, vascular risk factors and dementia has clear public health implications. Prevention and early treatment of vascular risk factors and depression may have an important impact in lowering the risk of dementia and could modify the natural history of the disease.Is the telephone interview for cognitive status a valid alternative in persons who cannot be evaluated by the Mini Mental State Examination?The Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), a widely used tool for first-line assessment of cognitive function, cannot be fully administered to persons with severe visual or upper extremity impairments. This cross-sectional study, which was performed in a sample of patients admitted to the outpatient clinic of the INRCA Geriatric Department "I Fraticini" (Firenze, Italy) and their relatives, evaluated whether the Telephone Interview for Cognitive Status (TICS), a test originally created for telephone screening of cognitive impairment, is a valid alternative for assessment of cognition in persons who cannot provide valid responses to all the MMSE items. Fifteen subjects in each of seven MMSE strata (9-11, 12-14, 15-17, 18-20, 21-23, 24-26, 27-30) were consecutively selected. Inclusion criteria were: age > or = 60 years; Italian as the main language; education > or = 3 years; medical stability; and ability to complete the MMSE. At admission, participants were examined for dementia by an expert clinician according to the DSM IV criteria. Italian versions of the TICS and the MMSE were administered face-to-face by two trained interviewers. The TICS was readministered face-to-face one week later by the same interviewer that had previously administered the test. The TICS showed good test-retest reproducibility. Assessments taken one week apart differed on average by 0.52 +/- 1.9 points (p < 0.01), indicating a systematic improvement. The TICS explained 96% of the variance in the MMSE, and this association was independent of age, gender and education. More than 90% of the cases "screening positive" (i.e., scoring below a certain cut-off) by the TICS, were also identified as "screening positive" when comparable MMSE cut-off scores were used. Using comparable cut-off scores, the sensitivity and specificity of TICS and MMSE in detecting a standard clinical diagnosis of dementia largely overlapped. In persons who cannot be evaluated with the MMSE in its full form, the face-to-face administration of the TICS is a reliable and valid alternative.Incidence of dementia and associated risk factors in Japan: The Osaki-Tajiri Project.The incidence of dementia and risk factors has not been fully investigated in Japan. Following a prevalence study in 1998, we investigated the incidence and associated factors in the same population in 2003 and 2005. Randomly selected 771 residents in Tajiri were targeted. The final participants included 204 (65.2%) healthy older adults (Clinical Dementia Rating, CDR 0) and 335 (73.1%) people with questionable dementia (CDR 0.5). We analyzed the incidence of dementia and dementing diseases, and possible risk factors. The risk factors included demographics, lifestyle-related factors, vascular risk factors, cognitive functions, and MRI findings. Overall, 3.9% of the CDR 0 and 37.0% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 5-year period, whereas 40.2% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 7-year period. Older adults had a higher incidence. Higher CDR Box scores had a higher incidence. Of the dementing diseases, 60.8% of participants developed Alzheimer' disease (AD), followed by vascular dementia (VaD), 17.9%. Logistic regression analyses showed that age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as recent memory, and generalized atrophy were significant predictors of progression to AD. Similarly, predictive factors for progression to VaD were age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as frontal function, and white matter lesions and cerebrovascular diseases. A comprehensive system including CDR, cognitive tests, and MRI, is recommended in community-based health policy planning.Longitudinal trajectories of cognitive change in preclinical Alzheimer's disease: a growth mixture modeling analysis.Preclinical Alzheimer's disease (AD) refers to a period of time prior to diagnosis during which cognitive deficits among individuals who will go on to receive a diagnosis of AD are present. There is great interest in describing the nature of cognitive change during the preclinical period, in terms of whether persons decline in a linear fashion to diagnosis, or exhibit some stability of functioning, followed by rapid losses in performance. In the current study we apply Growth Mixture Modeling to data from The Kungsholmen Project to evaluate whether decline in Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores during the preclinical period of AD follows a linear or quadratic function. At the end of a 7-year follow-up period, some individuals would be diagnosed with AD (n=71), whereas others would remain free of dementia (n=457). The results indicated that a two-group quadratic model of decline provided the best statistical fit measures, as well as the greatest estimates of sensitivity (67%) and specificity (86%). Differences in MMSE scores were apparent at baseline, but the preclinical AD group began to experience precipitous declines three years prior to diagnosis. Finally, persons who were misclassified as preclinical AD had fewer years of education and poorer MMSE scores at baseline.Identification of dementia in epidemiological research: a study on the usefulness of various data sources.Prevalence and incidence ratios of dementia in epidemiological studies vary according to the data source used. Medical records, cognitive tests, and registry information are sources frequently used to differentiate dementia from normal aging. The aim of the present study was to compare the identification of dementia from these different sources with that from consensus diagnosis.498 elderly people (age range 70-81 at baseline) enrolled in a Swedish population-based longitudinal twin study (Gender) were evaluated on physical and mental health and interviewed for their socio-demographic background three times during an eight-year period. Reviews of medical records and the Swedish Discharge Registry (DR) were conducted. The 10th percentile was used to differentiate between dementia and non-dementia in all cognitive tests. Scores of 24 or below on the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (range 1-30) indicated dementia. A consensus conference diagnosed dementia on the basis of total information. The consensus diagnosis was used as the gold standard.MMSE scores (sensitivity 64%, specificity 96%, kappa 0.65) and the review of medical records (sensitivity 57%, specificity 99%, kappa 0.65) were good sources for dementia identification. The precision of medical records increased when recordings of cognitive impairment were included (sensitivity 83%, specificity 98%, kappa 0.84). The discharge registry had low sensitivity (26%) and kappa coefficient (0.31).The present study shows that both review of medical records and MMSE scores are good although not perfect identifiers of dementia. The discharge registry is an uncertain source of dementia identification.Norms for the Mini-Mental State Examination in a healthy population.Although the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is widely used in clinical practice, few norms exist for healthy populations covering a broad range of ages.To obtain MMSE norms specific for age, gender, and education in healthy adults.From the population registers of seven communities across Italy, we selected a proportionate random sample of residents age 20 to 79 years to evaluate their health status with respect to conditions affecting cognitive performance. This sample yielded 908 persons who were deemed to be without cognitive impairment and who were then given the MMSE. We calculated fifth percentile norms and presented them as step functions. We then validated the norms as a screening tool for dementia in persons age 65 to 79 years. The validation was based on unpublished data from a separate study and involved estimates of sensitivity and specificity.The norms declined with advancing age, especially for less educated women. Given any age and sex, the norms were higher for individuals with higher educational levels. In screening for dementia, the norms had a sensitivity of 85% and a specificity of 89%.When using MMSE scores, it is important to account for age, gender, and education, especially in populations where the educational level is low. Expressing MMSE norms as step functions provides an easy-to-use tool for neurologists and other clinicians.Validation of a French version of an informant-based questionnaire as a screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Development of informant-based screening tests for dementia is an emerging field. The reliability and validity of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), an instrument that screens for dementia in general, have been established. We conducted a study to validate a French version of the IQCODE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in the elderly living in the community.In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, subjects were screened in their own homes using the modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3-MS). Those who screened positive, along with a sample of subjects who screened negative, were referred for a complete clinical examination. In Quebec, an informant was asked to complete the French version, IQCODE(F), at that time. Based on the final clinical diagnoses, performances of the IQCODE(F) and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE, converted from 3-MS) in screening for Alzheimer's disease were evaluated.Of the 237 subjects, the mean IQCODE (F) score was 3.4 (s.d. = 0.6), on a 5-point scale (1 = improvement in condition over the past 10 years, 5 = marked deterioration, 3 = no change). The mean MMSE score was 23.1 (s.d. = 4.5). The scores on the two scales were correlated (r = -0.44, P < 0.001). The IQCODE(F) scores were unrelated to education (r = -0.07, P > 0.3) in contrast to the MMSE scores (r = 0.28, P < 0.001). With respect to a diagnosis of probable Alzheimer's disease, the IQCODE(F) (cut-off point 3.6) had a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 95.6%. The sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE (cut-off point 23) were 70% and 82.3% respectively.The findings of the IQCODE(F) are consistent with those of the English version in correlation with the MMSE and apparent freedom from educational bias. The IQCODE is superior to the MMSE as a screening test for probable Alzheimer's disease in the elderly living in the community. It may be a useful addition to the screening tests already available, especially for the less well educated.Evaluation of a Japanese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination in elderly persons.This study aimed to examine the validity and item-response characteristics of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), which is used for assessing cognitive function, in Japanese older adults.Factor analysis and item response analysis were carried out for MMSE responses (n = 1971) from older adults living in the community (n = 1339) or in a nursing home (n = 632), including Alzheimer-type dementia (n = 330), vascular dementia (n = 36), frontotemporal dementia (n = 7), mixed Alzheimer-type and frontotemporal type dementia (n = 27), and age-related cognitive decline (n = 29). When choosing the cut-off score of 23 points for the MMSE, sensitivity and specificity for each item were calculated.A three-factor solution was found to be most appropriate by factor analysis: complex processing, simple processing and working memory. The item characteristics curves showed unidimensionality with high reproducibility. We identified a simplified scale comprising 10 items in all participants: "naming", "three-step command", "registration", "repeat a sentence", "write a complete sentence", "copies drawing of two polygons", "orientation to place", "delayed recall", "orientation to time" and "serial sevens" tasks. Sensitivity and specificity for both "year" task and "day" task were more than 90% ("year": sensitivity 92.5%, specificity 96.3%; "day": sensitivity 92.4%, specificity 91.7%). For the Alzheimer-type dementia patients, the five-factor solution was suggested by factor analysis and the MMSE also had unidimensionality in terms of level of difficulty.We found that the MMSE had multiple cognitive areas. We showed that the MMSE could be used as an essentially unidimensional measure of cognitive ability and the question about orientation to time might be useful in the simplest assessment to identify cognitive dysfunction.A three-year follow-up study of age-related dementia in an urban area of Beijing.A 3-year follow-up study of 1090 people aged 60 years or over in an urban area of Beijing, China, was conducted to determine the incidence of dementia and its characteristics of distribution. This cohort has been studied first in a cross-sectional survey of dementia in 1986. The follow-up examination employed the same interviewers, psychiatrists, instruments (Mini-Mental State Examination and the Crichton Royal Behavior Rating Scale) and diagnostic criteria for dementia (modified DSM-III) in 1989. The respondent rate in this study was 75.7%. The average annual incidence rate of moderate and severe dementia for greater than or equal to 60 years was 0.3% (95% confidence interval 0.08-0.52%). As expected, the rate increased sharply with aging. No sex difference was found. The prevalence rate of moderate and severe dementia was 1.10% among those aged greater than or equal to 65 years, similar to that (1.82%) in the first survey. Our results showed that the multi-infarct dementia was somewhat more common than primary degenerative dementia (ratio 3:2), both among incident cases and current prevalent ones. The average duration of dementia in the community was 8.0 years (SD 3.4). The risk for death in demented patients was 3 times higher than in the whole cohort (standardized mortality ratio = 2.95), and no specific cause of death was observed. In addition, our study showed that elderly people with less education, a history of consistent unemployment, limited physical activity and stroke history had a higher risk for developing dementia.Cognitive stability over 2 years in a rural elderly population: the MoVIES project.In an ongoing prospective community study, a random sample of rural elderly persons was screened with cognitive tests (including the CERAD neuropsychological battery) at study entry and an average of 2 years later. We examined 1,017 subjects, nondemented at study entry, at both waves, with the Mini-Mental State Exam, Story Recall, Word List Recall and Recognition, Boston Naming Test, Verbal Fluency, Praxis, Clock Drawing, and Trailmaking. Overall, the cognitive performance was stable, with either no mean change or a small mean decline over 2 years; however, standard deviations were relatively large, implying individual variation of questionable clinical significance. These data provide a set of population-based longitudinal cognitive norms and have implications for dementia screening.Sensitivity of four psychometric tests to measure cognitive changes in brain aging-population-based studies.Choosing the measure of cognition in an epidemiologic study investigating cognitive changes over time is a challenging question. A powerful measure must be able to detect small cognitive changes in all the range of cognition observed in the target population. This work aims at comparing the sensitivity to detect cognitive changes in the observed range of cognition of four widely used psychometric tests in an aging-population-based study through a nonlinear latent process model, assuming that the psychometric tests are nonlinear noisy transformations of their common factor. With data from the French prospective cohort study PAQUID (1989-2001), the authors found that the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Benton Visual Retention Test exhibited a better sensitivity to cognitive changes in low levels of cognition, while the Digit Symbol Substitution Test was more sensitive to changes in high levels of cognition. In contrast, the Isaacs Set Test shortened at 15 seconds appeared to be sensitive to small changes in all the range of cognition and, thus, represents an appropriate measure of cognition in population-based studies including both highly normal and severely impaired subjects.Mini Mental State Examination in Sinhalese: a sensitive test to screen for dementia in Sri Lanka.Although the Sri Lankan population is ageing rapidly, dementia has not been systematically investigated here. The Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) is a brief global instrument used to assess cognitive abilities in the elderly.This study aimed to develop and validate a Sinhalese translation of the MMSE, which could be used as a screening instrument to detect impaired cognition in an epidemiological investigation of dementia in Sri Lanka.Due to the high literacy rate in the country, the MMSE was translated and modified slightly without having to make major changes to the original version. 380 randomly selected subjects over 65 years in a semi-urban area were screened with the translated version of the MMSE. The cut-off score for cognitive impairment was taken as 17. Of the 380 subjects screened, 33 scored < or = 17, and were thus considered cases of suspected dementia. All 33 who scored < or = 17 and 24 randomly selected subjects who scored>17 on the MMSE, thus considered cognitively normal, underwent a brief clinical examination and neuropsychological assessment with the more comprehensive neuropsychiatric test battery, Cambridge Cognitive Score (CAMCOG), to determine the presence of dementia.Evaluated against the performance at the CAMCOG, the sensitivity and specificity of the translated MMSE were 93.5% and 84.6% respectively.Therefore, the Sinhalese translation of the MMSE described here is a sensitive instrument to screen for dementia in Sri Lanka.Diagnostic performance of the Chinese Frontal Assessment Battery in early cognitive impairment in an Asian population.The Frontal Assessment Battery (FAB) has been shown to be useful in evaluating frontal dysfunction. There is a paucity of studies validating cutoffs in the early cognitive impairment. We aim to validate the Chinese FAB in Asian subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and early dementia.Eighty subjects with MCI and mild dementia and 100 cognitively healthy community subjects were studied. ROC analysis was done to determine the Chinese FAB's optimal cutoff scores for age- and education-adjusted subgroups.Chinese FAB scores were significantly lower in early cognitive impairment compared with cognitively normal controls. The optimal cutoff score was 12/13 (sensitivity 92%, specificity 78.7%). A similar cutoff score was obtained following age-adjustment and for subjects with <6 years' education. Of note, the optimal cutoff for subjects with ≥6 years' education was 13/14 (sensitivity 91.8%, specificity 70.3%), an improved diagnostic performance compared to the earlier reported 11/12 cutoff. In comparison, the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) had lower rule-out accuracy (77% sensitivity, 91.2% specificity). The combination of the Chinese FAB and MMSE was superior to either test in isolation.The education-adjusted Chinese FAB has good diagnostic performance, which can supplement the MMSE in early cognitive impairment evaluation with construct differences observed between the Chinese FAB and MMSE.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in an elderly immigrant Gujarati population in the United Kingdom.The principal aim of this pilot study was to evaluate the performance of a Gujarati version of the MMSE as a screening instrument for dementia. The effect of ethnicity on MMSE performance was also examined.Two-stage cross-cultural survey.Elderly immigrant Gujarati and British-born white communities in Leicester.First stage: 149 Gujaratis and 148 whites. Second stage: 27 Gujaratis and 42 whites.English and Gujarati versions of the MMSE, validated against clinical diagnosis following psychiatric interview (ICD-10 criteria).Mean MMSE scores were lower in the Gujarati group, but most of this difference was due to the effects of age, education and visual impairment. Ethnic group had an independent effect on three orientation items; when these were omitted, there was no difference in the mean MMSE scores of the groups after adjustment for age, education and visual impairment. The MMSE performed comparably in both groups as a screen for moderate-severe dementia, but was less efficient at detecting milder and less certain cases in the Gujarati group. The estimated prevalence of confirmed dementia was higher in the Gujarati group, but this was not statistically significant.This Gujarati version of the MMSE performed adequately as a screen for dementia in this immigrant community population. Further evaluation of its performance is required in larger community samples, clinical samples and in native Indian Gujaratis.[Elementary test of concentration, orientation and memory. Application to the detection of dementia states in daily practice].The authors present a french version of the Katzman short orientation memory concentration test. The 6 items of the test include 3 orientation questions, 2 mental control items and an address memory phrase. Time for administration is less than 5 minutes. This french version of the test has been validated as a measure of cognitive impairment in a population of 200 subjects including 140 patients without cognitive impairment and 60 demented subjects. As defined by a 10/11 cut-off score, sensibility and specificity for the diagnosis of dementia were 91 p. 100 and 95 p. 100 respectively. Correlation of the scores with those obtained by the Mini mental state was highly significant. This fast, easy and reliable test seems particularly suitable for the detection of cognitive impairment in clinical practice.The clock drawing test in primary care: sensitivity in dementia detection and specificity against normal and depressed elderly.The aim of this study was to examine the sensitivities and specificities of the clock drawing test (CDT) in the detection of dementia among older people in primary care, with particular emphasis on the effect of depression on CDT specificity. Most previous studies have been sited in specialist settings and few have addressed the issue of specificity against depression.Comparison of cohorts identified from community-based screening with GMS-AGECAT. The CDT and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were administered to 41 elderly subjects with organic disorder (dementia), 84 elderly subjects with case level depression and 523 normal elderly subjects. Sensitivities and specificities of the CDT were calculated.The sensitivity of the CDT in the detection of dementia in the general community was 76%. The specificities of the CDT against normal elderly and depressed elderly was 81% and 77% respectively. Higher sensitivity and specificity were achieved by the MMSE.The use of the CDT in the detection of dementia syndromes is likely to be more relevant in the primary care context than in specialist settings. The CDT provides good sensitivity and specificity but may not be as sensitive or specific in the general community as previous studies have suggested, particularly in mild dementia. Community-based late life depression does not appear to alter the specificity of the CDT.Cross validation of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment in community dwelling older adults residing in the Southeastern US.Cross validation study of the MoCA for the detection of Alzheimer's disease (AD) and Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) in a community-based cohort residing in the Southeastern United States.One hundred and eighteen English-speaking older adults, who underwent diagnostic evaluation as part of an on-going prospective study, were administered the MoCA and MMSE. Twenty were diagnosed with AD, 24 met criteria for amnestic MCI and 74 were considered cognitively normal. Sensitivities and specificities were calculated using the recommended cut-off scores and ROC curve analyses were performed to determine optimal sensitivity and specificity. The influence of age, education and gender on MoCA score was also examined.Using a cut-off score of 24 or below, the MMSE was insensitive to cognitive impairment. Using the recommended cut-off score of 26, the MoCA detected 97% of those with cognitive impairment but specificity was fair (35%). Using a lower cut-off score of 23, the MoCA exhibited excellent sensitivity (96%) and specificity (95%).The MoCA appears to have utility as a cognitive screen for early detection of AD and for MCI and warrants further investigation regarding its applicability in primary care settings, varying ethnic groups, and younger at-risk individuals.Brief cognitive screening of the elderly: a comparison of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) and Mental Status Questionnaire (MSQ).One hundred and fifty unselected elderly community subjects were assessed by Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) and Mental Status Questionnaire (MSQ). The effects on cognitive test scores of potential confounding (non-cognitive) variables were evaluated. Sensitivities and specificities were: MMSE 80% and 98%; AMT 77% and 90%; and MSQ 70% and 89%. The MMSE identified significantly fewer false positives than the AMT and MSQ. The major effect of intelligence on cognitive test scores has previously been underestimated. Age, social class, sensitivity of hearing and history of stroke were also significantly correlated with cognitive test scores. Years of full time education and depression only affected the longer MMSE and CAMCOG. The MMSE (cut-off 20/21) can be recommended for routine screening. However, as scores are affected by variables other than cognitive function, particularly intelligence, further assessment of identified cases may fail to reveal significant functional impairment.The Mini-Cog as a screen for dementia: validation in a population-based sample.To test the Mini-Cog, a brief cognitive screening test, in an epidemiological study of dementia in older Americans.A population-based post hoc examination of the sensitivity and specificity of the Mini-Cog for detecting dementia in an existing data set.The Monongahela Valley in Western Pennsylvania.A random sample of 1,119 older adults enrolled in the Monongahela Valley Independent Elders Survey (MoVIES).The effectiveness of the Mini-Cog in detecting independently diagnosed dementia was compared with that of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and a standardized neuropsychological battery.The Mini-Cog, scored by an algorithm as "possibly impaired" or "probably normal," and the MMSE, at a cutpoint of 25, had similar sensitivity (76% vs 79%) and specificity (89% vs 88%) for dementia, comparable with that achieved using a conventional neuropsychological battery (75% sensitivity, 90% specificity).When applied post hoc to an existing population, the Mini-Cog was as effective in detecting dementia as longer screening and assessment instruments. Its brevity is a distinct advantage when the goal is to improve identification of older adults in a population who may be cognitively impaired. Prior evidence of good performance in a multiethnic community-based sample further supports its validity in the ethnolinguistically diverse populations of the United States in which widely used cognitive screens often fail.A normative study of the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale: comparison of demographic influences between the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale and the Mini-Mental Status Examination.We investigated the demographic influence on the performance of the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale (HDS-R) and provided normative data of the HDS-R in the elderly.The HDS-R was administered to 803 community-dwelling cognitively normal elderly subjects aged 55 years or over. Cognitive disorders and psychiatric disorders were strictly excluded using the CERAD-K assessment packet and the Mini-International Neuropsychiatric Interview. The demographic influence on the performance of the HDS-R was examined using multiple linear regression analyses, and compared with that on the performance of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) using the Chow test and t statistics. Overlapping strata were used in developing age-, education- and gender-specific normative data of the HDS-R.Age, education, and gender influenced significantly the performance of the HDS-R, and explained 22.5% of the total score variance. Older age, lower education, and male gender were associated with lower performance of the HDS-R. However, the demographic influence on the HDS-R was much weaker than that on the MMSE (t = 5.578, d.f. = 800, p < 0.001). The normative data of the HDS-R stratified by age (60-69, 70-79, > or =80), education (0-6, 7-12, > or =13), and gender were presented.The HDS-R was more robust to demographic influences than the MMSE, and normative data may contribute to improving further its diagnostic accuracy for dementia.Comparison of the Saint Louis University mental status examination and the mini-mental state examination for detecting dementia and mild neurocognitive disorder--a pilot study.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is commonly used as a screening tool to detect dementia. However, it performs poorly in identifying persons with mild neurocognitive disorder. The Saint Louis University Mental Status (SLUMS) examination is a 30-point screening questionnaire that tests for orientation, memory, attention, and executive functions.The objective of this study was to compare SLUMS and the MMSE for detecting dementia and mild neurocognitive disorder (MNCD) using Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) criteria.Patients at the Veterans' Affairs Geriatric Research, Education and Clinical Center, St. Louis, MO (N = 702) were clinically classified as having normal cognitive functioning, MNCD, or dementia based on DSM-IV criteria. The SLUMS and MMSE were administered for comparison.Mean age was 75.3 years (standard deviation: 5.5). Regarding education, 62.4% of the sample had at least completed high school and 30.6% had not. Sensitivity and specificity were calculated and receiver operator curves (ROCs) generated for SLUMS and MMSE as a function of diagnosis (MCND versus dementia) and education. Both the SLUMS and MMSE produced acceptable ROCs for the diagnosis of dementia, but the ROCs for SLUMS were better than the MMSE for the diagnosis of MNCD in both education groups.These results suggest that the SLUMS and MMSE have comparable sensitivities, specificities, and area under the curve in detecting dementia. Although the definition of MNCD is controversial, the authors believe that the SLUMS is possibly better at detecting mild neurocognitive disorder, which the MMSE failed to detect, but this needs to be further investigated.Improving screening accuracy for dementia in a community sample by augmenting cognitive testing with informant report.This study sought to determine whether the augmentation of cognitive testing with an informant report questionnaire could improve accuracy in screening for dementia in a community setting. The sample consisted of 646 subjects aged 70-93 years. Cognitive state was assessed using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Informants completed the 16-item short form of the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). Dementia was diagnosed according to DSM-III-R criteria. Combination of the IQCODE with the MMSE resulted in more accurate prediction of caseness than either test alone. Receiver Operating Characteristic analysis demonstrated the superior screening performance of a logical "or" rule and a weighted sum of scores on the two tests over other methods of combination, replicating previous clinically based research. The findings also suggest that the appropriate combination of existing tests may be a fruitful method of improving screening accuracy in a variety of situations.The usefulness of the Korean version of modified Mini-Mental State Examination (K-mMMSE) for dementia screening in community dwelling elderly people.We assessed whether the Korean version of modified Mini-Mental State Examination (K-mMMSE) has improved performance as a screening test for cognitive impairment or dementia in a general population compared with the Korean Mini-Mental State Examination (K-MMSE).Screening interviews were conducted with people aged 65 and over in Noam-dong, Namwon-city, Jeonbuk province. There were 522 community participants, of whom 235 underwent clinical and neuropsychological examination for diagnosis of dementia and Cognitive Impairment No Dementia (CIND). Sensitivity, specificity and areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves for the K-mMMSE and the K-MMSE were the main outcome measures.Cronbach's alpha for the K-mMMSE was 0.91, compared with 0.84 for the K-MMSE. The areas under the ROC curves in identifying all levels of CIND or dementia were 0.91 for the K-mMMSE and 0.89 for the K-MMSE (P < 0.05). For the K-mMMSE, the optimal cut-off score for a diagnosis of CIND was 69/70, which had a sensitivity of 0.86 and a specificity of 0.79, while, for a diagnosis of dementia, the optimal cut-off score of 59/60 had a sensitivity of 0.91 and a specificity of 0.78. The K-mMMSE also had a high test-retest reliability (r = 0.89).Our findings indicate that the K-mMMSE is more reliable and valid than the K-MMSE as a cognitive screen in a population based study of dementia. Considering the test characteristics, the K-MMSE and modified version are expected to be optimally used in clinical and epidemiologic fields.The MacNeill-Lichtenberg Decision Tree: a unique method of triaging mental health problems in older medical rehabilitation patients.Evaluation of the utility of a "decision tree" that identifies potential mental health problems in older medical patients and guides decision making for referrals.Measures of utility including sensitivity, specificity, and predictive power were examined. Independent t tests and nonparametric statistics were used to evaluate group differences where appropriate.The stroke and geriatric unit of a freestanding urban medical rehabilitation hospital.In study 1,173 older, consecutively admitted medical rehabilitation patients completed all cognitive measures. In study 2, a separate sample of 313 older adults completed the Geriatric Depression Scale during admission.The MacNeill-Lichtenberg Decision Tree (MLDT) was compared with the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE), the Mattis Dementia Rating Scale, and the 30-item Geriatric Depression Scale.Study 1: The decision tree accurately triaged 87% of mental health problems and allowed for deferral of 41% of cases, for whom further assessment was unnecessary. The MLDT was superior to the MMSE, with higher sensitivity and a lower failure rate. Study 2: The emotional status component of the MLDT was useful in triaging cases for depression evaluation.The MLDT was useful in prioritizing cases with regard to mental health problems (eg, dementia, depression) and making quick referral decisions. The MLDT is a unique instrument that not only evaluates cognitive status, but also considers psychosocial factors and emotional status in older adults.Establishing the limits of the Mini-Mental State. Examination of 'subtests'.It has been suggested that the Mini-Mental State examination can be used to examine a patient's cognitive profile. We therefore examined the validity of Mini-Mental State subtests and individual items. The memory item, attention-concentration items, and constructional item had satisfactory sensitivity-specificity and correlated significantly with scores on neuropsychological tests. In contrast, four of the five Mini-Mental State language items had very low sensitivity, and three of five failed to correlate with neuropsychological test scores. These findings establish limits with regard to the ability of the Mini-Mental State to generate a cognitive profile. Our data also provide information regarding validity, difficulty level, and optimal cutoff scores for widely used mental status tasks.Validity of the Clock-Drawing Test as a screening tool for cognitive impairment in the elderly.The authors studied the validity of the Clock-Drawing Test (CDT) in comparison with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the association between the CDT and mortality in a large general population sample of persons aged 75 years or more. Data were obtained from the MRC Trial of the Assessment and Management of Older People in the Community. Baseline assessments were conducted between 1995 and 1999 in the United Kingdom. A total of 13,557 subjects with both CDT and MMSE scores were included in the analysis. The median follow-up period was 4.7 years. The sensitivity and specificity of the CDT for detecting moderate-to-severe cognitive impairment (MMSE score <or= 17) were 77% and 87%, respectively, for nurse administration and 40% and 91%, respectively, for postal administration. Sensitivity was higher among females and increased with age. In Cox proportional hazards regression, a worse CDT score was associated with increased risk of all-cause mortality and mortality from cerebrovascular and respiratory diseases, even after adjustment for potential confounders. The authors conclude that the CDT may have value as a brief face-to-face screening tool for moderate/severe cognitive impairment in an older community population but is relatively poor at detecting milder cognitive impairment.[The Mini-Mental State Examination as a selected diagnostic test for dementia: a Colombian population study. GENECO].Folstein's Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) is widely used as screening test for cognitive impairment.To test a Spanish version of the MMSE in a population of high illiteracy rate.Population-based survey of a stratified random sample of urban and rural residents of five regions of Colombia, followed by neurological and neuropsychological evaluation of suspect cases (phase 2). Dementia was diagnosed using DSM-IV criteria.1,611 subjects age 50 or older filled out both the WHO Protocol for Epidemiologic Studies of Neurological Disorders and a Spanish version of the MMSE; 55.2% of them had three or less years of schooling; 536 individuals with scores below cutoff points were sent to phase 2. Of the population with satisfactory scores in MMSE 366 (34.0%) were evaluated by neurologists to exclude other neurological conditions. Twelve cases of dementia were diagnosed among individuals with scores below cutoff point and one among subjects with high scores. Age-adjusted prevalence was 8.1 per thousand subjects age 50 or over (95% CI: 3.7-12.5); and 34.2 per thousand for ages 75 or over (95% CI: 12.2-56.2). Sensitivity and specificity were 92.3 and 53.7%; 16 of the 19 questions show significant differences (p < 0.001) according to educational level. A gender gap is significant in low educational levels (p < 0.001) but not in subjects with more than five years of schooling.MMSE scores correlated closely with level of education. Low specificity leads to many non-demented subjects with low educational status requiring further investigation.CSF-tau, CSF-Abeta1-42, ApoE-genotype and clinical parameters in the diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease: combination of CSF-tau and MMSE yields highest sensitivity and specificity.This study evaluated the sensitivity and specificity of the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) levels of tau-protein, amyloid-beta-peptide 1-42 (Abeta1-42), ApoE-genotype and the degree of cognitive decline as diagnostic markers for Alzheimer's disease (AD). Data was obtained from 105 AD patients and 68 controls. Median CSF-tau levels were increased (512 pg/ml vs. 145 pg/ml, p<0.001) and Abeta1-42-levels were decreased (238.5 pg/ml vs. 310 pg/ml, p<0.001) in AD patients compared to controls. A weak correlation was found between CSF-Abeta1-42 and MMSE score (r=.245). Within all subjects, a correlation of CSF-Abeta1-42 (r=-.337) and CSF-tau (r=.384) with age was found. The combination of CSF-tau levels and MMSE revealed the highest sensitivity (92%) and specificity (87%). In summary, CSF-tau was a useful biological marker to discriminate AD from normal aging, neurological and psychiatric disorders. CSF-Abeta1-42 showed no additional benefit in discriminating patients from controls but might be useful for tracking the severity of the disease.Does a reliable decline in Mini Mental State Examination total score predict dementia? Diagnostic accuracy of two reliable change indices.Norms for change in Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) total score suggest that only a decline of at least 2-4 points indicates a reliable change. However, it is unknown whether change norms (Reliable Change Indices, RCIs) of the MMSE total score are suitable to predict future dementia.554 elderly individuals aged 75 and over without dementia at the first 2 visits were tested with the MMSE at a maximum of 6 visits with 1.5-year intervals. Two different RCIs for change in MMSE score (first to second visit) were computed - one RCI which corrects for practice and one RCI which corrects for regression to the mean. The main outcome measure was the diagnosis of dementia.During the study, 88 persons developed dementia. RCIs were significantly associated with future dementia diagnosis. The best cutoff for raw change in MMSE total score to predict dementia was -1 point (sensitivity = 48%, specificity = 67%, relative risk = 1.6). With the RCI + regression to the mean, the diagnostic accuracy was moderate (sensitivity = 61%, specificity = 72%, relative risk = 3.2).A change in MMSE total score is significantly associated with future dementia, but the diagnostic accuracy for dementia prediction is rather low.Variability in annual Mini-Mental State Examination score in patients with probable Alzheimer disease: a clinical perspective of data from the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease.To determine the variability in annual Mini-Mental State Examination scores of patients with Alzheimer disease enrolled in the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD).A total of 372 patients with probable Alzheimer disease with 1 or more years of follow-up.Twenty-one CERAD clinical sites throughout the United States.An average annual decline of 3.4 points in CERAD patients returning for longitudinal reassessments was close to the SD of the measurement error of 2.8 points for the Mini-Mental State Examination. There was wide variability in individual rates of decline. Even with 4 years of follow-up, 15.8% of the patients had no clinically meaningful decline in Mini-Mental State Examination score (defined as a change in initial score >3, ie, 1 SD of measurement error). Validity of measurements of the rate of change in Mini-Mental State Examination scores improved with longer observation intervals and was reliable for most patients when observations were separated by 3 or more years.Although the Mini-Mental State Examination is a useful screening instrument to assess level of cognitive function, it has limited value in measuring the progression of Alzheimer disease in individual patients for periods less than 3 years because of a large measurement error and substantial variation in change in annual score.Value of the Mini-Mental State Examination and informants' data for the detection of dementia in geriatric outpatients.The Dutch version of the Mini-Mental State Examination was administered to 138 elderly patients who were referred to a geriatric outpatient clinic for a variety of reasons. An optimal cut-off point of 24/25 was found for the detection of dementia. At this cut-off point, the Mini-Mental State Examination was 87.6% sensitive and 81.6% specific in detecting dementia. The discriminative validity was influenced by education and by the presence of psychiatric disorders other than dementia. Informants' data showed better sensitivity and specificity than the Mini-Mental State Examination for the detection of dementia. The findings suggest that informants' data are a primary source of information for the detection of dementia in geriatric outpatients.The distribution of Mini-Mental State Examination scores in an older UK African-Caribbean population compared to MRC CFA study norms.to describe normative data for the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in a UK African-Caribbean population and compare these with norms for white UK-born elders.a comparison of MMSE data from two cross-sectional surveys.the MMSE had been administered to a community UK African-Caribbean population and scores were compared to norms from the Medical Research Council Cognitive Function and Ageing Study (CFAS). MMSE data were analysed for 248 African-Caribbean participants aged 55-75 and 5379 CFAS participants aged 65-74, without visual or auditory problems. Distributions of scores were tabulated and error rates for individual items compared.Median MMSE scores were 25 (interquartile range 22-27) for the whole African-Caribbean sample, 24 (22-27) for those aged 65-75 in the African-Caribbean sample, and 27 (25-29) for CFAS. Differences in error rates were specific to particular items: naming the season, serial seven subtraction, phrase repetition, three-stage command, and copying intersecting pentagons. These differences persisted when both samples were restricted to those with statutory duration of education, who were literate and who had worked in non-manual occupations. Normative data are displayed for MMSE scores in both groups.different distributions of MMSE scores between UK African-Caribbean and Caucasian groups can be principally explained by cultural bias in certain items. If the MMSE is to be administered to older African-Caribbean people, specific normative data should be referred to or else a culturally modified version of the instrument should be used.Does the combination of the MMSE and clock drawing test (mini-clock) improve the detection of mild Alzheimer's disease and mild cognitive impairment?There is currently a need to develop tools to identify patients with mild AD and mild cognitive impairment (MCI). We determined the validity and reliability of a brief, easily administered cognitive screening battery consisting of fusion of two well-known brief tests (Mini-Mental Status Examination [MMSE] and Clock Drawing Test [CDT]) (Mini-clock) to differentiate between patients with mild AD, MCI, and healthy control subjects. 66 consecutive patients with mild AD, 21 with MCI, and 66 healthy controls seen in a memory clinic setting were compared. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was used to calculate the cut-off value permitting discrimination between mild AD, MCI, and healthy control subjects. Interrater and test-retest reliability were also assessed. Mean cognitive scores for patients with AD, MCI, and control subjects on all two individual tests were significantly different (for each, p < 0.001). The mean area under the ROC curve for Mini-clock was higher than that obtained with MMSE or CDT in differentiating mild AD from controls (0.973 vs. 0.952 and 0.881, respectively) and MCI from controls (0.855 vs. 0.821 and 0.779, respectively). Test-retest reliability for the Mini-clock was 0.99, meanwhile interrater reliability was 0.87. The mean time to complete the test for all subjects was 8 min and 50 s. The Mini-clock is highly sensitive and specific in the detection of mild AD and reasonably accurate when attempting to separate MCI from health controls. It has a high interrater and test-retest reliability, can be quickly administered, and does not require major training.Performance characteristics of a two-stage dementia screen in a population sample.We analyzed the performance of a two-stage screening protocol [the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) or the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline (IQCODE), and the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ)] in a weighted stratified sample of 839 subjects from a population survey of dementia in Cache County, UT. The subjects were subsequently examined using a standardized diagnostic assessment protocol. Using the method of receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the main outcome measure was area under the ROC curve (AUC). The overall AUC estimates were 0.956 (95% confidence interval 0.943-0.968) for the 3MS/IQCODE and 0.945 (0.931-0.960) for the DQ. After adjustment for age, the efficiency of the both 3MS/IQCODE and the DQ was better for subjects with genotype epsilon4/epsilon4 at APOE, better among women, and better in those with two or more years duration of dementia. The optimal threshold for this two-stage screen yielded sensitivity and specificity estimates of 91.0% and 92.0%, respectively.The GPCOG: a new screening test for dementia designed for general practice.To design and test a brief, efficient dementia-screening instrument for use by general practitioners (GPs).The General Practitioner Assessment of Cognition (GPCOG) consists of cognitive test items and historical questions asked of an informant. The validity of the measure was assessed by comparison with the criterion standard of diagnoses of dementia derived from the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (Fourth Edition).Primary care doctors' offices.Sixty-seven GPs administered the GPCOG to 283 community-dwelling patients aged 50 to 74 with memory complaints or aged 75 and older.The Cambridge Mental Disorder of the Elderly Examination, the Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT), the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the 15-item Geriatric Depression Scale, and the 12-item Short-Form Health Survey.The GPCOG was reliable and superior to the AMT (and possibly to the MMSE) in detecting dementia. The two-stage method of administering the GPCOG (cognitive testing followed by informant questions if necessary)had a sensitivity of 0.85, a specificity of 0.86, a misclassification rate of 14%, and positive predictive value of 71.4%. Patient interviews took less than 4 minutes to administer and informant interviews less than 2 minutes. The instrument was reported by GPs to be practical to administer and was acceptable to patients.The GPCOG is a valid, efficient, well-accepted instrument for dementia screening in primary care.The cognitive disorders examination (Codex) is a reliable 3-minute test for detection of dementia in the elderly (validation study on 323 subjects).Dementia often remains undiagnosed until it has reached moderate or severe stages, thereby preventing patients and their families from obtaining optimal care. Tools that are easy to use in primary care might facilitate earlier detection of dementia.Develop and validate a very brief test for the detection of dementia.In the derivation study, we recorded educational level, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores and subscores and results of a simplified clock-drawing test (sCDT) for consecutive patients attending a single memory clinic over a two-year period,. Dementia was diagnosed according to DSM-IV criteria. The independent variables related to dementia were determined by a multivariable logistic model (MLM) and used to develop a decision tree to predict this diagnosis. In the validation study, the decision tree was applied to consecutive patients of six memory clinics for whom status about dementia was previously determined with DSM-IV criteria. The decision tree, MLM, and MMSE were applied to detect dementia in these patients. The sensitivity and specificity of each diagnostic tool were estimated and compared.Of 242 patients in the derivation study, the following independent variables were correlated with dementia: sex, sCDT, and two MMSE subscores - the 3-word recall test and spatial orientation. We used Bayesian statistics to develop a brief 2-step decision analysis tree (2-3 min.), which we named Codex (cognitive disorders examination). The validation study applied Codex to 323 patients. Sensitivity was 93% and specificity 85%. The corresponding values were 88% and 87% for the MLM, 94% and 67% or 91% and 70% for the MMSE, depending on the MMSE cutoff score. The sensitivity of Codex was significantly higher than that of MLM, and its specificity was significantly greater than that of MMSE.Codex is a simple, brief, and reliable test for detecting dementia and requires three minutes or less to administer. Its simplicity and brevity make it appropriate for and easy to use in primary care.The AGECAT "organic" section as a screening instrument for minor cognitive deficits.In the context of increasing concern in occidental countries about dementing diseases in the geriatric population, an epidemiological study has been done in the city of Zaragoza, Spain. The sample, randomly selected from the census, was stratified by age and sex and included 1,134 elderly (aged 65 plus years) living in the community. In phase I, lay interviewers administered the Spanish versions of the Geriatric Mental State (GMS) and Mini-Mental Status Examination to the elderly. The individuals were considered to be "probable cases" on the basis of GMS "global" scores previously reported to be valid. These "probable cases" were then examined in phase II by standardized psychiatrists using both, the GMS and MEC, but also the History and Aetiology Schedule (HAS). A proportion of "probable normals" were also examined by the psychiatrists to assess the validity of the screening procedure in the community. The identified "cases" of dementia and "cases" of depression were then studied by the neurologists in what we call phase III. Specific project criteria for dementia were used but, in fact, all identified "cases" of dementia fulfilled DSM-III criteria. Some data of the application of the AGECAT computer program in both, phase I and phase II are now reported. The different severity levels of cognitive deficits according to AGECAT criteria are compared with clinical criteria. The advantages and disadvantages of the computer program in the detection of minor cognitive difficulties are discussed.Effectiveness and costs of phototest in dementia and cognitive impairment screening.To assess and compare the effectiveness and costs of Phototest, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), and Memory Impairment Screen (MIS) to screen for dementia (DEM) and cognitive impairment (CI).A phase III study was conducted over one year in consecutive patients with suspicion of CI or DEM at four Primary Care (PC) centers. After undergoing all screening tests at the PC center, participants were extensively evaluated by researchers blinded to screening test results in a Cognitive-Behavioral Neurology Unit (CBNU). The gold standard diagnosis was established by consensus of expert neurologists. Effectiveness was assessed by the proportion of correct diagnoses (diagnostic accuracy [DA]) and by the kappa index of concordance between test results and gold standard diagnoses. Costs were based on public prices and hospital accounts.The study included 140 subjects (48 with DEM, 37 with CI without DEM, and 55 without CI). The MIS could not be applied to 23 illiterate subjects (16.4%). For DEM, the maximum effectiveness of the MMSE was obtained with different cutoff points as a function of educational level [k = 0.31 (95% Confidence interval [95%CI], 0.19-0.43), DA = 0.60 (95%CI, 0.52-0.68)], and that of the MIS with a cutoff of 3/4 [k = 0.63 (95%CI, 0.48-0.78), DA = 0.83 (95%CI, 0.80-0.92)]. Effectiveness of the Phototest [k = 0.71 (95%CI, 0.59-0.83), DA = 0.87 (95%CI, 0.80-0.92)] was similar to that of the MIS and higher than that of the MMSE. Costs were higher with MMSE (275.9 ± 193.3€ [mean ± sd euros]) than with Phototest (208.2 ± 196.8€) or MIS (201.3 ± 193.4€), whose costs did not significantly differ. For CI, the effectiveness did not significantly differ between MIS [k = 0.59 (95%CI, 0.45-0.74), DA = 0.79 (95%CI, 0.64-0.97)] and Phototest [k = 0.58 (95%CI, 0.45-0.74), DA = 0.78 (95%CI, 0.64-0.95)] and was lowest for the MMSE [k = 0.27 (95%CI, 0.09-0.45), DA = 0.69 (95%CI, 0.56-0.84)]. Costs were higher for MMSE (393.4 ± 121.8€) than for Phototest (287.0 ± 197.4€) or MIS (300.1 ± 165.6€), whose costs did not significantly differ.MMSE is not an effective instrument in our setting. For both DEM and CI, the Phototest and MIS are more effective and less costly, with no difference between them. However, MIS could not be applied to the appreciable percentage of our population who were illiterate.Primary care screening for cognitive impairment in elderly veterans.The objective of this study was to examine the diagnostic accuracy of a primary care screening procedure for identifying cognitive impairment in elderly veterans, in comparison with 4 brief standardized neuropsychological tests. The sample included 100 primary care patients who met age and other criteria requiring screening for cognitive impairment. The results indicated that 3 of the tests significantly discriminated normal from mildly impaired status on the Dementia Rating Scale, but the existing procedure failed to correctly identify any cases in the entire sample. Correct classification rates were near 80% for the Mini-Mental State Exam, Clock Drawing Test, and both Trail Making Test (TMT)-A and TMT-B, with high specificity but variable sensitivity. TMT-B produced good results across eight predictive validity indicators when a cutoff of 3 minutes to completion (1 SD) was used to identify cases. There was no evidence to support the current interview-based screening procedure. Additional research with brief standardized screening is encouraged.Prevalence of alcohol-related problems in an elderly population and their association with cognitive impairment and dementia.Studies investigating the association between alcohol use and cognitive disorders in the elderly population have produced divergent results. Moreover, the role of alcohol in cognitive dysfunction is not clear. The aims of this study were to estimate the prevalence of alcohol-related problems in an elderly population from Brazil and to investigate their association with cognitive and functional impairment (CFI) and dementia.A community-based cross-sectional study was performed. A sample of 1,145 elderly people was examined in 2 phases. Several instruments were utilized in the first phase: the CAGE questionnaire was used to identify potential cases of alcohol-related problems, and a screening test for dementia was used to estimate CFI. The CAMDEX interview (Cambridge Examination) and DSM-IV (Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th edition) criteria were used for the clinical diagnosis of dementia in the second phase."Heavy alcohol use" (CAGE > or = 2) was found in 92 subjects (prevalence: 8.2%). It was associated with gender (males, p < 0.001), low education (only in females, p = 0.002), and low socioeconomic level (p = 0.001, in females; p = 0.002, in males). The Mini Mental State Examination exhibited a nonlinear relationship with alcohol-related problems in females; "mild-moderate alcohol use" (CAGE < 2) presented the highest score. A significant association between alcohol-related problems and cognitive dysfunction was found only in females. "Heavy alcohol use" was associated with higher CFI and dementia rates compared to "mild-moderate alcohol use" (p = 0.003 and p < 0.001, respectively). "Mild-moderate alcohol use" had a tendency of association with lower CFI and dementia rates when compared to "no alcohol use" (p = 0.063 and 0.050, respectively).Our findings suggest that alcohol use does not have a linear relationship with cognitive decline.Role of functional performance in diagnosis of dementia in elderly people with low educational level living in Southern Italy.Diagnosis of dementia is often difficult in subjects with low educational level. Our aim was to evaluate the role of functional performance and the possibility of preferring scores of activities of daily living (ADL) and instrumental activities of daily living (IADL) in screening elderly people for diagnosis of dementia in a rural population of Southern Italy with a very high percentage of non-educated subjects.a random sample of 300 residents, out of 1089 subjects over 60 years of age living in San Marcellino (Caserta, Campania), received door-to-door visit for information about their medical history, with clinical evaluation of general geriatric conditions, including the cumulative illness rating scale (CIRS). Dementia was diagnosed if subjects had a Clinical Dementia Rating score (CDR) > or = 1 and according to the criteria of DSMIV, but not according to scores on the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), ADL and IADL. Two hundred and nineteen normal subjects (NS) and 75 patients with dementia (DP) were evaluated.in NS, their mean age- and education-corrected MMSE score was 22.15 (lower than the normal cut-off value of 23.8) and 12.60 in DP (p<0.0001). In NS, the mean ADL score was higher than in DP (5.53 vs 2.64, p<0.0001); only age was correlated with ADL scores (coeff=-0.44, t=-4.557, p<0.0001). Assuming age as covariate, ADL scores highly differentiated DP from NS (F(1, 289)=26.083, p<0.0001). In both sexes, mean IADL scores were higher in NS than in DP (4.46 vs 1.80 in men, p<0.0001; 6.85 vs 2.31 in women, p<0.0001). Age and education did not influence IADL scores in men, but age greatly affected performance in women. IADL scores clearly differentiated NS from DP. In NS, a positive correlation was evident between ADL and IADL scores (r=0.234, p<0.0005), but neither scores correlated with the MMSE scores, even when correlation was performed separately for men and women. In DP, a strong correlation was observed between ADL and IADL scores (r=0.709, p<0.0001) and significant correlations were also evident between the scores of MMSE and both ADL (r=0.492,p<0.0001) and IADL (r=0.398, p<0.0004).in a rural community with a high prevalence of non-educated subjects, cognitive impairment is related to education, whereas independent functioning is limited mainly to age and not to cognition, if the latter remains (relatively) unimpaired. These results point to the importance of an "ecological" approach to the evaluation of elderly people, particularly those living in small rural communities, where education and the social environment may give rise to difficulties in diagnosis of dementia. The assessment of functional autonomy by ADL and IADL scales may be a better screening tool in diagnosing dementia than the MMSE scores.Preclinical syndromes predict dementia: the Sydney older persons study.To identify if preclinical syndromes for Alzheimer's disease, vascular dementia, and Parkinson's disease and related dementias exist. Identification of dementia at early or even preclinical stages has important implications for treatment.A community dwelling sample of 647 subjects aged 75 and over at recruitment were followed up for a mean period of 3.19 years (range 2.61 to 4.51 years). Each subject was asked to participate in a medical assessment which included a standardised medical history examining both past and current health and medication usage; a neuropsychological battery (mini mental state examination, Reid memory test, verbal fluency, subsets of the Boston naming test and similarities, clock drawing and copied drawings) and physical examination. Preclinical syndromes for the three predominant dementias (Alzheimer's disease, vascular dementia and Parkinson's disease, and related dementias) and their combinations were defined using cognitive, motor, and vascular features. Their longitudinal outcome as defined by death and dementia incidence was examined.Preclinical syndromes affected 55.7% (n=299) of subjects. Preclinical syndromes showed a trend for an increased odds of death (odds ratio 1.72, p=0.056) and a significantly increased odds of developing dementia (odds ratio 4.81, p<0.001). Preclinical syndromes were highly sensitive, detecting 52 of 58 (89.7%) incident dementias. Two hundred and sixteen of 268 (80.6%) preclinical subjects did not show dementia over the 3 year period (positive predictive value 19.4%). Subjects defined as having a combination of cognitive, extrapyramidal, and vascular features were at greatest risk of progressing to dementia.Preclinical syndromes were sensitive and significant predictors of dementia. In view of their poor positive predictive value, the preclinical syndromes as defined in this study remain a research tool needing both definitional refinement and greater periods of observation. Multiple coexistent preclinical disorders resulted in a greater incidence of dementia, providing evidence for an additive role between multiple disorders.Mini-Mental State Examination item scores as predictors of Alzheimer's disease: incidence data from the Kungsholmen Project, Stockholm.The present study examined the power of individual Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) items in predicting incidence of Alzheimer's disease (AD). In addition, 3-year longitudinal changes in MMSE items were contrasted between incident AD and nondemented persons.A population-based group of very old adults, 75-95 years of age, were followed longitudinally. Of the original 327 participants, 32 were diagnosed with probable or possible AD after a 3-year follow-up interval and 189 remained nondemented. Cognitive performance was indexed by the individual item scores from the MMSE. These sample from multiple domains of cognitive functioning, including visuospatial skill, recent memory, orientation to time and place, language, and the ability to sustain attention.Items dealing with delayed episodic memory and orientation to time were significant predictors of AD incidence, independent of age, gender, and years of education, as determined by logistic regression analyses. Longitudinally, changes in performance were largest among individuals diagnosed as incident AD, although the magnitude of change across items was highly variable. In particular, decline was relatively small for the delayed memory item, whereas most other measures showed dramatic decline in performance among individuals with incident AD.Individual MMSE items, especially those with some type of episodic memory referent, were the best predictors of incident cases of AD. Moreover, MMSE items displayed differential rates of changes, particularly for the incident AD participants.Brief informant screening test for mild cognitive impairment and early Alzheimer's disease.Recent research has attempted combinations of instruments to improve screening accuracy for mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and early Alzheimer's disease (AD). We compared Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Immediate and Delayed Recall (Logical Memory I and II; LM-I and LM-II, respectively), a single-item informant report of memory problem (IRMP), and a four-item Instrumental Activities of Daily Living (4IADL) scale, and combinations of these tests.The tests were administered together with Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) to subjects who were cognitively intact (CDR = 0, n = 88), and with diagnoses of MCI (CDR = 0.5, n = 37) and early AD (CDR = 1-2, n = 19).Screening accuracy (receiver operating characteristic area under curve, AUC) for identifying MCI or MCI-AD was lowest for MMSE (AUC 67.6% for MCI or 77.9% for MCI-AD), and better for IRMP (79.5 or 83.2%), 4IADL (76.9 or 84.7%), LM-I (81.2 or 87.1%) and LM-II (86.1 or 90.8%). Combining IRMP, 4IADL and LM-II was most accurate (AUC 91.7% for MCI or 94.5% for MCI-AD); sensitivity: 86.5 or 89.3%; specificity: 86.4 or 88.6%. However, combining IRMP and 4IADL gave nearly as good accuracy (AUC 87.2 or 91.6%); sensitivity: 86.5 or 85.7%; specificity: 79.5 or 85.2%.A brief instrument combining an IRMP and 4IADL items is potentially useful in screening for MCI and early AD.Cognitive deficits of patients with Alzheimer's disease with and without delusions.The goal of this investigation was to study the prevalence of delusions in Alzheimer's disease and to compare the performance of the delusional and nondelusional groups on a neuropsychological test battery.The authors studied 107 patients with Alzheimer's disease and 51 age- and education-comparable normal subjects using a standardized psychiatric interview and a neuropsychological test battery.Thirty-seven patients with Alzheimer's disease had delusions with or without hallucinations. Patients with delusions were significantly more impaired than those without delusions (and the normal comparison group) on the Mini-Mental State examination; Blessed Information-Memory-Concentration Test; Dementia Rating Scale, especially its conceptualization and memory subtests; and a test of verbal fluency. The delusional group also tended to be somewhat more impaired than the nondelusional group on the modified Wisconsin Card Sorting Test and the similarities subtest of the Wechsler Adult Intelligence Scale-revised.Approximately one-third of patients with Alzheimer's disease had developed psychotic symptoms sometime after the onset of dementia. The presence of psychotic symptoms in Alzheimer's disease was associated with greater cognitive impairment, especially frontal/temporal dysfunction, and possibly with a more rapidly progressive dementia.Ethnic and educational differences in cognitive test performance on mini-mental state examination in Asians.The objective of this study is to examine ethnic differences in Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) test performance in discriminating between demented and nondemented elderly Asians.A nationally representative population sample (N = 1,092) of community-living elderly, comprising Chinese, Malays, and Indians in Singapore, was interviewed using MMSE, Geriatric Mental State, and demographic and health questionnaires.There were significant ethnic differences in mean MMSE scores among Chinese (26.2), Indians (25.0), and Malays (23.6), but only in noneducated subjects. No ethnic differences in MMSE were observed in higher educated subjects. The sample proportion of subjects with dementia was 4.2% in Chinese, 9.4% in Malays, and 8.8% in Indians. Overall, MMSE discriminated well between subjects with and without dementia (cutoff: 23/24, area under the curve: 95%, sensitivity: 97.5%, specificity: 75.6%). MMSE test performance was much better in higher educated subjects (higher specificity: 85.2%). Lower specificities were shown in less educated subjects (57.3%), and in Malays (62.8%), and especially in less educated Malays (35.3%) and Indians (50.0%). Significant differences in MMSE scores in less educated subjects persisted after adjusting for differences in sociodemographic, health, and behavioral variablesEthnic nonequivalence in MMSE test performance should be taken into account in dementia screening in Asians in less educated subjects. Known correlates of cognitive functioning did not sufficiently explain these differences.The Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination Revised is as effective as the original to detect dementia in a French-speaking population.This paper presents the validation of the French version of the Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination Revised (ACE-R).The variability of the 3 versions of the ACE-R (A, B and C), performed by the same observer, hence mainly 2 or 3 times on 119 patients showing no progression, was first calculated by Cronbach's alpha coefficient, t test and linear regression. The alpha coefficients of the 3 versions were obtained showing that the ACE-R versions can be considered as one, and an analysis of the interobserver variability was performed by Cohen's kappa coefficient, t test and linear regression on 12 patients. Eventually, we performed a receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis to compare the sensitivities and specificities to detect dementia of the ACE, the ACE-R and Mini Mental State Examination on 319 consecutive patients.The ROC areas of sensitivities and specificities of the ACE and ACE-R were very similar. Two cutoffs were identified at 83/100 and 89/100 with a specificity to normality of 98.6% if the ACE-R score was ≥83 and a sensitivity to dementia of 98.4% if the ACE-R score was ≤89.ACE-R in French is as reliable and valid as the original version to detect dementia.Application of a Spanish version of the "Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly" in the clinical assessment of dementia.We studied the validity of a complete (S-IQCODE) and a shortened (SS- IQCODE) Spanish version of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) for the diagnosis of dementia in a clinical setting. Fifty-three consecutive outpatients were assessed with an extensive workup and followed up for 6 months in a specialized clinic for the diagnosis and management of dementia. Thirty eight (71%) were finally diagnosed as demented. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) had a slightly greater diagnostic power than did the S-IQCODE and the SS-IQCODE (sensitivity 89% vs. 84% and 79%; specificity 80% vs. 73% for both; positive predictive value 92% vs. 89% and 88%; negative predictive value 75% vs. 65% and 58%), but without statistical significance. Both the S-IQCODE and SS-IQCODE were independent of previous education of the patients. The best diagnostic results were obtained when the cognitive scores of the patient in the MMSE and the report of the relative in the S-IQCODE were simultaneously considered. We conclude that the IQCODE, in a complete as well as in a shortened form, is a good diagnostic instrument in the clinical setting that can enhance the validity of other cognitive tests.Mini-Mental State exam scores vary with education in blacks and whites.Previous studies have suggested that education and race may affect performance on standardized mental status tests. In order to more clearly define these relationships, a prospective longitudinal study was devised to answer two questions: (1) whether race or level of education affects scores on the Mini-Mental State (MMS) exam in non-demented people and (2) what numerical cutpoints maximize the sensitivity and specificity of utilizing the MMS to help diagnose dementia in blacks of varying educational attainment. A total of 100 white and 258 black individuals, recruited from two city hospital primary care geriatric clinics, were evaluated and subsequently followed longitudinally over a 2 1/2 year period in order to assess accurately the presence or absence of dementia. In the non-demented, total MMS scores and performance on each item of the MMS were analyzed, revealing that people with an 8th grade or less education consistently had significantly (P less than .01) worse results than the better educated (9th grade or better) on borough, attention items, recall of table and dog, copying, sentence writing, phrase repeating, and total score. Furthermore, a total of 25% of the lower education group had an MMS score in the 18-23 range, traditionally thought to suggest dementia. There were no consistently significant differences between blacks and whites of equal education. In the better educated groups, using a score of 23 or less to define dementia maximizes the sensitivity and specificity of using the MMS in this diagnosis at 93% and 100%, respectively. In the lower education group, using 17 or less to define dementia maximizes sensitivity and specificity at 81% and 100%, respectively.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Improving precision in the quantification of cognition using the Montreal Cognitive Assessment and the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) can be used to quantify cognitive ability in older persons undergoing screening for cognitive impairment. Although highly sensitive in detecting mild cognitive impairment, its measurement precision is weakest among persons with milder forms of impairment. We sought to overcome this limitation by integrating information from the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) into the calculation of cognitive ability.Data from 185 geriatric outpatients screened for cognitive impairment with the MoCA and the MMSE were Rasch analyzed to evaluate the extent to which the MMSE items improved measurement precision in the upper ability ranges of the population.Adding information from the MMSE resulted in a 13.8% (13.3-14.3%) reduction in measurement error, with significant improvements in all quartiles of patient ability. The addition of three-word repetition and recall, copy pentagons, repeat sentence, and write sentence improved measurement of cognition in the upper levels of ability.The algorithm presented here maximizes the yield of available clinical data while improving measurement of cognitive ability, which is particularly important for tracking changes over time in patients with milder levels of impairment.[Revalidation and standardization of the cognition mini-exam (first Spanish version of the Mini-Mental Status Examination) in the general geriatric population].The revalidation of the Mini Examen Cognoscitivo (MEC), first Spanish version (1978) of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) and documentation of "population-based norms" should clarify the potential confusion induced by later versions of MMSE.Validation of Addenbrooke's cognitive examination (ACE) in a Persian-speaking population.Use of reliable screening and diagnostic tests for assessment of cognitive abilities in neurological patients is rapidly increasing in clinical practice. This is due to the increase in the prevalence of dementias and the raised awareness of cognitive impairment in neurological disorders. Two well-known bedside screening tests for dementias among the English-speaking population are the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination (ACE). However, such tests have not been developed for the Persian-speaking population, which is estimated at 120 million worldwide. In this study we developed the Persian ACE and MMSE, adopted from the English version. We also assessed the sensitivity and specificity of these tests in the identification of Alzheimer's disease (AD) and mild cognitive impairment (MCI). We found that the Persian ACE at a cutoff point of 84, has a sensitivity of 93% and a specificity of 91% in discriminating MCI from a normal population; at 78, the test has a sensitivity of 73% and a specificity of 93% in differentiating MCI from AD, and at a similar cutoff point has a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 96% in discriminating AD from a normal population. We conclude that the Persian ACE is a valuable tool in clinical practice in the Persian-speaking population.Do memory complaints indicate the presence of cognitive impairment? Results of a field study.In the context of suspected cognitive disorders, the validity of memory complaints is subject to considerable debate. This investigation documents the prevalence of memory complaints and assesses the validity of memory complaints for detecting cognitive impairment.The sample comprises 349 randomly selected non-institutionalized individuals, aged 75 and over living in the city of Leipzig. Twenty individuals who suffer from moderate and severe dementia according to DSM-III-R were excluded. Memory complaints were measured by means of a single item question. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and a wider range of cognitive tests which constitute the short neuropsychological battery of the SIDAM (Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of dementia of Alzheimer type, Multi-infarct dementia and dementias of other etiology according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R) were used to test cognitive performance.One in three individuals aged 75 and over complained about memory deficits. The MMSE is not significantly related to memory complaints, whereas poorer performance on 2 out of 8 tests regarding specific areas of cognitive function (immediate recall, short-term memory) were found to be significantly associated with memory complaints. Despite these statistically significant associations, it is shown that memory complaints do not have diagnostic validity in detecting cognitive impairment on the individual level.Memory self-assessment should not be used as a substitute measure of cognitive performance. Initiation of further diagnostic and therapeutic steps should be based on cognitive performance testing. Relaying solely on memory complaints would miss individuals in need and allocate resources to worried but cognitively healthy persons.Diagnostic accuracy of a new instrument for detecting cognitive dysfunction in an emergent psychiatric population: the Brief Cognitive Screen.In certain clinical contexts, the sensitivity of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is limited. The authors developed a new cognitive screening instrument, the Brief Cognitive Screen (BCS), with the aim of improving diagnostic accuracy for cognitive dysfunction in the psychiatric emergency department (ED) in a quick and convenient format.The BCS, consisting of the Oral Trail Making Test (OTMT), animal fluency, the Clock Drawing Test (CDT), and the MMSE, was administered to 32 patients presenting with emergent psychiatric conditions. Comprehensive neuropsychological evaluation served as the criterion standard for determining cognitive dysfunction. Diagnostic accuracy of the MMSE was determined using the traditional clinical cutoff and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analyses. Diagnostic accuracy of individual BCS components and BCS Summary Scores was determined by ROC analyses.At the traditional clinical cutoff, MMSE sensitivity (46.4%) and total diagnostic accuracy (53.1%) were inadequate. Under ROC analyses, the diagnostic accuracy of the full BCS Summary Score (area under the curve [AUC]=0.857) was comparable to the MMSE (AUC=0.828). However, a reduced BCS Summary Score consisting of OTMT Part B (OTMT-B), animal fluency, and the CDT yielded classification accuracy (AUC=0.946) that was superior to the MMSE.Preliminary findings suggest the BCS is an effective, convenient alternative cognitive screening instrument for use in emergent psychiatric populations.A pilot study of the sensitivity and specificity analysis of the standard-Spanish version of the Culture-Fair Assessment of Neurocognitive Abilities and the Examen Cognoscitivo Mini-Mental in the Dominican Republic.This pilot study purports to address the need for culturally validated, evidence-based assessments and to serve as a springboard for future culturally sensitive research. This study was conducted in the Dominican Republic. It entailed counterbalanced administration of a standard Spanish translation of the Culture-Fair Assessment of Neurocognitive Abilities (S-S CANA) and the standard Spanish translation of the Mini-Mental State Examination (Examen Cognoscitivo Mini-Mental; ECM-M). The sample was composed of 30 Spanish-speaking Dominican adults who met the inclusion criteria for the normative and clinical groups. In an effort to initiate the validation process for the S-S CANA, as well as norm it to the given population, the efficacy of the S-S CANA in determining neuropathology was then compared to that of the ECM-M. Analyses of variance and covariance and t-tests were conducted, and a receiver-operating characteristic curve was computed. Results indicated significantly greater sensitivity and specificity of the S-S CANA relative to the ECM-M.Comparison of the short test of mental status and the mini-mental state examination in mild cognitive impairment.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is the most widely used brief screening measure of cognition, but it is not sensitive in detecting mild memory or other cognitive impairments. The Short Test of Mental Status (STMS) was specifically developed for use in dementia assessment and was intended to be more sensitive to problems of learning and mental agility that may be seen in mild cognitive impairment (MCI).To compare the STMS and MMSE for detecting or predicting MCI.Comparison of STMS and MMSE scores at baseline among 4 groups of patients: 788 patients with stable normal cognition, 75 patients with normal cognition at baseline but who developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease during follow-up, 129 patients with prevalent MCI at baseline, and 235 patients with prevalent mild Alzheimer disease. All patients and control subjects for this study were evaluated through the Mayo Alzheimer's Disease Patient Registry or the Mayo Clinic Alzheimer's Disease Research Center, Rochester, Minn, using a standardized diagnostic approach.The STMS was slightly more sensitive than the MMSE in discriminating between patients with stable normal cognition and patients with prevalent MCI. The STMS was superior to the MMSE in detecting deficits in cognition in individuals who had normal cognition at baseline but later developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease.Compared with the MMSE, the STMS was better able to document MCI and was more sensitive in detecting deficits in cognition in individuals who had normal cognition at baseline but later developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease.Validity of the clinical dementia rating scale for the detection and staging of dementia in Brazilian patients.The aim of this study was to determine the diagnostic value and agreement analyses between Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) and dementia diagnostic criteria (gold standard), Blessed Dementia Rating scale (BDRS), and Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 3rd Edition, Revised (DSM III-R) criteria for severity. In a sample of 343 Southern Brazilian participants, CDR was consecutively assessed in 295 dementia patients (Alzheimer disease, vascular dementia, and questionable) and 48 healthy elderly. The National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Diseases and Stroke/Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association (NINCDS-ADRDA) criteria for probable Alzheimer disease and the National Institute of Neurological Disorders and Stroke and Association Internationale pour la Recherché et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences (NINDS-AIREN) for probable vascular dementia were the gold standard. A battery of cognitive tests and the Mini Mental State Examination (as a screening test at study entry) were also applied. Sensitivity and specificity were obtained through contingency tables. Validity and reliability were measured through kappa coefficient, Kendall b, and percent agreement. CDR agreement among raters was demonstrated by percent agreement. Agreement to gold standard was good (kappa=0.75), as well as to the Blessed scale (kappa=0.73), and excellent to the DSM III-R (kappa=0.78). CDR detection of dementia among healthy elderly or questionable dementia was 86% and 80% sensitive, respectively, and 100% specific for both settings. In conclusion, agreement of CDR global score with the gold standard was good, and diagnostic values were high.Mini-Mental Status Examination: a short form of MMSE was as accurate as the original MMSE in predicting dementia.This study assesses the properties of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) with the purpose of improving the efficiencies of the methods of screening for cognitive impairment and dementia. A specific purpose was to determine whether an abbreviated version would be as accurate as the original MMSE in predicting dementia.A population-based post hoc examination of the performance characteristics of the MMSE for detecting dementia in an existing data set of 243 elderly persons.Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values were computed for the original MMSE as well as new MMSE scale models derived from a Rasch model item analysis. The optimal threshold for the original MMSE screen yielded sensitivity and specificity estimates of 72.5% and 91.3%, respectively. The use of a subscale resulted in a slightly lower sensitivity (71.0%), specificity (88.4%), and positive predictive value (71.0%) but equal area under the receiver operating characteristic curve. Cross-validation on follow-up data confirmed the results.A short, valid MMSE, which is as sensitive and specific as the original MMSE for the screening of cognitive impairments and dementia is attractive for research and clinical practice, particularly if predictive power can be enhanced by combining the short MMSE with neuropsychological tests or informant reports.The effects of metrifonate on the cognitive, behavioral, and functional performance of Alzheimer's disease patients. Metrifonate Study Group.The objective of this study was to evaluate the efficacy and safety of metrifonate, a long-acting acetylcholinesterase inhibitor, in patients clinically diagnosed with probable Alzheimer's disease of mild-to-moderate severity.This was a prospective, multicenter, 26-week, double-blind, parallel group study. The 264 randomized patients met diagnostic criteria of the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Diseases and Stroke and the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association for probable Alzheimer's disease. Patients had Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores of 10-26 and ischemic scores (Rosen modification) of <4. Metrifonate-treated patients received a single 50-mg dose once daily. The efficacy of metrifonate was investigated with respect to 3 symptom domains. Cognitive performance was analyzed using the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive Subscale (ADAS-Cog) and the MMSE. Psychiatric and behavioral disturbances were analyzed using the Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI) and the ADAS-Noncognitive subscale (ADAS-Noncog). The ability to perform instrumental and basic activities of daily living was evaluated using the Disability Assessment for Dementia (DAD) scale. Additionally, global state was assessed using the Clinician Interview-Based Impression of Change with Caregiver Input (CIBIC-Plus) scale.After 26 weeks of metrifonate therapy, a statistically significant benefit of metrifonate was observed in the cognitive performance of Alzheimer's disease patients (ADAS-Cog, t = 2.55, df = 237, p = .012; MMSE, t = 4.60, df = 237, p = .0001). Metrifonate also significantly attenuated the deterioration in activities of daily living of the patients (DAD total score, t = -2.11, df = 233, p = .036) and relieved patients' psychiatric and behavioral disturbances (NPI total score, t = 2.51, df = 233, p = .013). In addition, metrifonate significantly improved the scores for the global state of the patients (CIBIC-Plus, t = 2.07, df = 232, p = .039). Metrifonate was well tolerated; adverse events were predominantly mild in intensity, and no hepatotoxicity was observed.In this study, metrifonate was safe and well tolerated. It benefited the cognitive decline, psychiatric and behavioral disturbances, impaired ability to perform instrumental and basic activities of daily living, and global state of patients diagnosed with mild-to-moderate Alzheimer's disease.Misclassification of dementia by the mini-mental state examination--are education and social class the only factors?The 1988 Melton Mowbray Study of the Elderly comprised an initial screen with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) followed by a detailed clinical assessment using the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination (CAMDEX) for all those scoring 21 and under on the MMSE, a one in two sample of those scoring 22 or 23 and a one in ten of the remainder. A total of 1579 subjects completed the initial screen with 438 subjects undergoing the CAMDEX assessment. Analysis of those subjects who were found to be free of dementia at the clinical assessment (n = 155) demonstrated that the very elderly, those from the manual social classes and subjects with visual impairments had an increased chance of being misclassified as demented by the MMSE. Low educational level and various measures of physical disability also showed a tendency to result in misclassification as falsely positive by the MMSE when viewed alone but these effects appeared to be due solely to their association with extreme age and/or manual social class.Mapping scores onto stages: mini-mental state examination and clinical dementia rating.Although the clinical course of Alzheimer disease (AD) is gradual, it is useful for a number of reasons to distinguish between different levels of severity. The Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) has demonstrated high validity and reliability for this purpose, but it requires a considerable amount of data to be collected both from the patient and from an informant. In the present study, the authors mapped Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores onto CDR categories to determine how well the MMSE performs as a surrogate of the CDR as a timesaving method of staging dementia.Eight hundred sixty-three probands, including 524 patients with probable AD, 92 patients with questionable dementia, and 247 with memory complaints but no objective cognitive impairment, were included. Cutoff scores were identified on one-half of the sample using a receiver operating characteristic analysis. The cutoff values were then applied to the other half of the sample, and the agreement between MMSE score ranges and CDR stages was determined by calculating Cohen's kappa.The MMSE discriminated well between CDR stages 0.5, 1, 2, and 3 but performed poorly in the separation between CDR stages zero and 0.5. The MMSE ranges were 30 for no, 26-29 for questionable, 21-25 for mild, 11-20 for moderate, and 0-10 for severe dementia. Substantial agreement between the two instruments was obtained for the categories mild (kappa=0.62, p<0.001, N=115), moderate (kappa=0.69, p<0.001, N=114), and severe dementia (kappa=0.76, p<0.001, N=39), whereas the agreement was moderate for no (kappa=0.44, p<0.001, N=120) and only fair for questionable dementia (kappa=0.28, p<0.001, N=42).The MMSE can be used as a surrogate measure for the CDR for the staging of dementia in AD.Cognitive assessment of older primary care patients with and without memory complaints.Dementia screening is currently recommended only for symptomatic patients.To evaluate memory complaints, a mental status test, and several cognitive tests as dementia screens in primary care.Cross-sectional clinical epidemiologic study.Three hundred thirty-nine comprehensively assessed, primary care patients aged > or = 65 years.Memory complaints were abstracted from chart review. Scores on Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and domain-specific cognitive testing were compared to a dementia diagnosis based on Clinical Dementia Rating score > or = 1, and areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) were calculated. Classification and regression tree analyses were performed on memory complaints and tests with the highest AUCs.Of 33 patients with dementia, only 5 had documented memory complaints. In 25 patients with documented memory complaints, no cognitive tests further improved identification of the 5 with dementia. In 28 patients with dementia but without memory complaints, an MMSE score < 20 identified 8 cases; among those with MMSE scores 20-21, a visual memory test identified a further 11 cases. Further cognitive testing could not detect 9 dementia cases without memory complaints and with MMSE scores > or = 22.In older primary care patients with memory complaints, cognitive screening does not help identify those who require further examination for dementia. Most patients with dementia do not report memory complaints. In these asymptomatic individuals, general mental status testing, supplemented by a memory test when the mental status score is equivocal, will identify lower-scoring patients who need dementia assessment. However, high-scoring asymptomatic dementia cases will remain undetected.Prevalence of dementia in an urban Indian population.This article reports the findings of a 3-year epidemiological survey for dementia in an urban community-resident population in Mumbai (Bombay), India, wherein the prevalence of all types of dementia was determined.The study was conducted in three stages. Stage 1: From a potential pool of 30,000 subjects aged 40 years or more, 24,488 (male = 11,875; female = 12,613) persons completed self-report or interviewer-rated protocols based on the Sandoz Clinical Assessment Geriatric Scale, but 5,512 (18.37%) persons refused to participate. Scores on the protocol had a possible range from 0 through 34. Stage 2: Persons with a score +2 SD above the mean were selected in this stage where the persons were screened for cognitive functioning using a modified and translated version of the Mini-Mental State Examination. Individuals who scored below the 5th percentile were included in Stage 3 and underwent a detailed neurological, psychiatric, and neuropsychological evaluation as well as hematological, radiological, electrocardiographic, and electroencephalographic investigations. Diagnoses were made jointly by a neurologist, psychiatrist, and psychologist using the DSM-IV diagnostic criteria. Subjects were also rated on the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) scale and assessed for activities of daily living.One hundred five subjects with dementia (CDR > or = 0.5) were identified in this population of 24,488 persons. The prevalence rate for dementia in those aged 40 years and more was 0.43% and for persons aged 65 and above was 2.44%. Seventy-eight individuals had a CDR of > or = 1 yielding an overall prevalence rate of 0.32%, and a prevalence rate of 1.81% for those aged 65 years and older. The overall prevalence rate for Alzheimer's disease (AD) in the population was 0.25%, and 1.5% for those aged 65 years and above. AD (n = 62; 65%) was the most common cause of dementia followed byvascular dementia (n = 23; 22%). There were more women (n = 38) than men (n = 24) in the AD group. Increasing age was associated with a higher prevalence of the dementia syndrome in general as well as AD specifically.In the population surveyed, the prevalence of AD and other dementias is less than that reported from developed countries but similar to results of other studies in India. Prevalence of the dementia syndrome increased with age and was not related to gender. AD was the most common dementia and the prevalence was higher in women than in men. Results are discussed with respect to shorter life expectancy, relocation of affected persons, and differences in the risk factors as compared to developed countries.Mild cognitive impairment: cognitive screening or neuropsychological assessment?To describe the neuropsychological profile of mild cognitive impairment subtypes (amnestic, non-amnestic and multiple-domain) of a clinical sample. We further address the diagnostic properties of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Cambridge Cognitive Examination for the identification of the different mild cognitive impairment subtypes in clinical practice.Cross-sectional clinical and neuropsychological evaluation of 249 elderly patients attending a memory clinic at a university hospital in Sao Paulo, Brazil.The performance of patients with mild cognitive impairment was heterogeneous across the different subtests of the neuropsychological battery, with a trend towards an overall worse performance for amnestic (particularly multiple domain) mild cognitive impairment as compared to non-amnestic subtypes. Screening tests for dementia (Mini-Mental State Examination and Cambridge Cognitive Examination) adequately discriminated cases of mild Alzheimer's disease from controls, but they were not accurate to discriminate patients with mild cognitive impairment (all subtypes) from control subjects.The discrimination of mild cognitive impairment subtypes was possible only with the aid of a comprehensive neuropsychological assessment. It is necessary to develop new strategies for mild cognitive impairment screening in clinical practice.Age and education correction of Mini-Mental State Examination for English and Spanish-speaking elderly.Previous research has shown that the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMS) is biased as a measure of cognitive impairment in minority and low-education patients. The purpose of this study was to (1) develop a statistical correction for effects of age and education and (2) test the efficacy of the statistically adjusted MMS (MMSAdj) as a screening test for dementia using different ethnic groups and education levels. We used a population-base community survey sample (n=590) composed of 46.6% Hispanics and 53.4% non-Hispanics to derive the statistical correction, defined as:MMSAdj = Raw MMS - (0.471 X [Education-12]) + (0.131 X [Age-70]). Ethnicity and language of test administration were not significantly related to MMSAdj in the community survey sample, but the raw MMS was strongly influenced by these factors. We used an independent sample (n=2,983) of patients evaluated through the California Alzheimer's Disease Diagnostic and Treatment Centers to test the diagnostic accuracy of the MMS and the MMSAdj across low- and high-education groups and across whites, Hispanics, and blacks. Results showed greater stability of sensitivity and specificity across education levels and ethnic groups for the MMSAdj than for the raw MMS and suggest that the MMSAdj is a preferable measure of cognitive impairment for low- education and minority individuals.Selective memory impairment on an adapted Mini-Mental State Examination increases risk of future dementia.To determine whether selective memory impairment (SMI) on an adapted Mini-Mental State Examination (aMMSE) test increases risk of future dementia in a population-based survey of central Spain.SMI is a strong predictor of dementia in the elderly. However, most approaches have used extensive memory batteries, which are not always suitable for screening purposes.The basal cohort consisted of 2982 poorly educated individuals aged 65 or over. Dementia, stroke and parkinsonism cases were previously excluded. At entry, participants received a structured interview including an aMMSE. Two groups were created according to basal cognitive performance, namely: (1) aMMSE > 23 and no word remembered on the aMMSE delayed-recall task (SMI group); and (2) aMMSE > 23 and at least one word remembered on the delayed-recall task (control group). In a three-year follow-up wave, conversion rate to dementia was calculated and logistic regression was performed.Of a total of 2507 subjects who completed the two evaluations, 280 qualified for SMI at entry. In the SMI group, 25 subjects (8.9%) developed dementia vs 26 subjects (1.2%) in the control group. Taking the two groups together, and once demographic and medical variables had been controlled, a low delayed-recall score increased dementia conversion rate (OR 0.47, 95% CI 0.34-0.64). Alzheimer's disease was the main cause of dementia (79.8%).Memory impairment is a risk factor for future dementia in the neurologically-healthy elderly. This can be observed in a subgroup of subjects with SMI defined on the aMMSE delayed-recall subscore. Some other measurements should be added to the SMI construct to improve its predictive validity.Can Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) replace Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) for dementia screening in a Thai geriatric outpatient setting?Mini-mental-State Examination (MMSE) is a widely used tool for dementia screening. However, several limitations are found and the Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) appears to be an alternative test. The objective in this study was to compare the performance of MMSE-Thai 2002 and RUDAS-Thai for dementia screening, and to determine their performances and identify their optimal cut-off points. The participants were older patients from a Geriatric and Neurology Outpatient Clinic, Srinagarind Hospital, Khon Kaen University. The RUDAS-Thai and the MMSE-Thai 2002 were administered to each participant. Subsequently, a specialist physician assessed each participant for dementia. Results showed the area under receiver operating characteristic curve for both RUDAS-Thai (81.0%; 95%CI, 74.8-87.2) and MMSE-Thai 2002 (81.2%; 95%CI, 74.9-87.4) were equal. A score of 24 or lower provided an optimal cut-off point. Our finding supports that the RUDAS-Thai can be an effective alternative test for dementia screening. For both test scores, a score of 24 or lower is an optimal cut-off point to provide an indication of developing dementia.Six-item screener to identify cognitive impairment among potential subjects for clinical research.To design a brief cognitive screener with acceptable sensitivity and specificity for identifying subjects with cognitive impairment.Cohort one is assembled from a community-based survey coupled with a second-stage diagnostic evaluation using formal diagnostic criteria for dementia. Cohort two is assembled from referrals to a specialty clinic for dementing disorders that completed the same diagnostic evaluation.Urban neighborhoods in Indianapolis, Indiana and the Indiana Alzheimer Disease Center.Cohort one consists of 344 community-dwelling black persons identified from a random sample of 2212 black persons aged 65 and older residing in Indianapolis; cohort two consists of 651 subject referrals to the Alzheimer Disease Center.Formal diagnostic clinical assessments for dementia including scores on the Mini-mental state examination (MMSE), a six-item screener derived from the MMSE, the Blessed Dementia Rating Scale (BDRS), and the Word List Recall. Based on clinical evaluations, subjects were categorized as no cognitive impairment, cognitive impairment-not demented, or demented.The mean age of the community-based sample was 74.4 years, 59.4% of the sample were women, and the mean years of education was 10.1. The prevalence of dementia in this sample was 4.3% and the prevalence of cognitive impairment was 24.6%. Using a cut-off of three or more errors, the sensitivity and specificity of the six-item screener for a diagnosis of dementia was 88.7 and 88.0, respectively. In the same sample, the corresponding sensitivity and specificity for the MMSE using a cut-off score of 23 was 95.2 and 86.7. The performance of the two scales was comparable across the two populations studied and using either cognitive impairment or dementia as the gold standard. An increasing number of errors on the six-item screener is highly correlated with poorer scores on longer measures of cognitive impairment.The six-item screener is a brief and reliable instrument for identifying subjects with cognitive impairment and its diagnostic properties are comparable to the full MMSE. It can be administered by telephone or face-to-face interview and is easily scored by a simple summation of errors.Mini-mental Parkinson (MMP) as a dementia screening test: comparison with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE).As populations age, screening instruments for cognitive impairment and dementia will become of increasing importance in clinical practice. Mini-Mental Parkinson (MMP), a derivative of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), was originally described as a cognitive screening instrument for use in Parkinson's disease. Its item content addresses some of the acknowledged shortcomings of the MMSE. Pragmatic use of MMP in general cognitive clinics has not previously been examined.To compare the performance of two scales, Mini-Mental Parkinson (MMP) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), as cognitive screening instruments for dementia in a memory clinic population.MMP was administered prospectively to 201 consecutive new patient referrals independent of other tests used to establish dementia diagnosis according to standard diagnostic criteria (DSM-IV). Diagnostic utility of MMP for dementia was measured and compared with MMSE.MMP proved easy to use and acceptable to patients. Optimal test accuracy (0.86) was at MMP cutoff of ≤ 17/32, with sensitivity 0.51, specificity 0.97, positive predictive value 0.83, negative predictive value 0.87, and area under Receiver Operating Characteristic curve 0.89. Using a higher cutoff (≤ 29/32), MMP sensitivity was 1.00 with specificity 0.70. MMP scores correlated with MMSE (r = 0.93) and diagnostic agreement was high (κ = 0.85).MMP is a useful screening instrument in the memory clinic setting, with patients who fall below the designated cutoff requiring further investigation to ascertain a cause for their cognitive impairment.Cognitive test performance predicts change in functional status at the population level: the MYHAT Project.In the community at large, many older adults with minimal cognitive and functional impairment remain stable or improve over time, unlike patients in clinical research settings, who typically progress to dementia. Within a prospective population-based study, we identified neuropsychological tests predicting improvement or worsening over 1 year in cognitively driven everyday functioning as measured by Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR). Participants were 1682 adults aged 65+ and dementia-free at baseline. CDR change was modeled as a function of baseline test scores, adjusting for demographics. Among those with baseline CDR = 0.5, 29.8% improved to CDR = 0; they had significantly better baseline scores on most tests. In a stepwise multiple logistic regression model, tests which remained independently associated with subsequent CDR improvement were Category Fluency, a modified Token Test, and the sum of learning trials on Object Memory Evaluation. In contrast, only 7.1% with baseline CDR = 0 worsened to CDR = 0.5. They had significantly lower baseline scores on most tests. In multiple regression analyses, only the Mini-Mental State Examination, delayed memory for visual reproduction, and recall susceptible to proactive interference, were independently associated with CDR worsening. At the population level, changes in both directions are observable in functional status, with different neuropsychological measures predicting the direction of change.Effects of general medical health on Alzheimer's progression: the Cache County Dementia Progression Study.Several observational studies have suggested a link between health status and rate of decline among individuals with Alzheimer's disease (AD). We sought to quantify the relationship in a population-based study of incident AD, and to compare global comorbidity ratings to counts of comorbid conditions and medications as predictors of AD progression.This was a case-only cohort study arising from a population-based longitudinal study of memory and aging, in Cache County, Utah. Participants comprised 335 individuals with incident AD followed for up to 11 years. Patient descriptors included sex, age, education, dementia duration at baseline, and APOE genotype. Measures of health status made at each visit included the General Medical Health Rating (GMHR), number of comorbid medical conditions, and number of non-psychiatric medications. Dementia outcomes included the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Clinical Dementia Rating - sum of boxes (CDR-sb), and the Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI).Health status tended to fluctuate over time within individuals. None of the baseline medical variables (GMHR, comorbidities, and non-psychiatric medications) was associated with differences in rates of decline in longitudinal linear mixed effects models. Over time, low GMHR ratings, but not comorbidities or medications, were associated with poorer outcomes (MMSE: β = -1.07 p = 0.01; CDR-sb: β = 1.79 p < 0.001; NPI: β = 4.57 p = 0.01).Given that time-varying GMHR, but not baseline GMHR, was associated with the outcomes, it seems likely that there is a dynamic relationship between medical and cognitive health. GMHR is a more sensitive measure of health than simple counts of comorbidities or medications. Since health status is a potentially modifiable risk factor, further study is warranted.Sensitivity and specificity of the mini-mental state examination for identifying dementia in the oldest-old: the 90+ study.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in identifying dementia in the oldest-old when stratified by age and education.Cross-sectional.Research clinic and in-home visits.Population-based sample of adults aged 90 and older (n=435) who are enrolled in the 90+ Study, a longitudinal, population-based study.Neurological examination to determine dementia diagnosis, MMSE, and demographic data.Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analyses indicated that the MMSE had high diagnostic accuracy for identifying dementia in subjects aged 90 and older across different age and education groups (area under the ROC curve values ranged from 0.82 to 0.98). A range of possible cutoff values and corresponding sensitivity and specificity are provided for the following age groups: 90-93, 94-96, and >or=97. Age groups were subdivided by educational attainment (<or=high school, vocational school or some college, college degree or higher). In subjects aged 90 to 93 with a college degree or higher, the suggested MMSE cutoff score is <or=25 (sensitivity=0.82, specificity=0.80). In those aged 94 to 96 with a college degree or higher, the suggested cutoff is <or=24 (sensitivity=0.85, specificity=0.80). Those aged 97 and older with an education of high school or less had the lowest suggested cutoff <or=22 (sensitivity=0.80, specificity=0.76).Overall, the MMSE had good sensitivity and specificity across all age and educational groups. Optimal cutoff points were lower in the older age groups and those with less education, primarily to preserve specificity. This screening instrument is appropriate for use with the oldest-old.An epidemiological survey of age-related dementia in an urban area of Beijing.An epidemiological survey of age-related dementia among community residents of an urban of Beijing was conducted in 1986. Initial screening of 1331 subjects aged 60 and above was made using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) with a cutoff point of 17. All suspected cases of dementia and 5.5% of all others were then given a full clinical examination, with subjects being diagnosed and classified according to DSM-III criteria. The MMSE was found to have satisfactory sensitivity, although scores were significantly correlated with education. Prevalence rates of moderate and severe dementia were 1.28% for those aged 60 and above and 1.82% for those aged 65 and above. Rates for multi-infarct dementia were higher than those for primary degenerative dementia; females had higher rates than males and rates increased sharply with age. All the dementia cases were cared for in their own homes, by relatives. There is a need for increased knowledge and services for elderly people in the community.The milan overall dementia assessment and the mini-mental state examination compared: an epidemiological investigation of dementia.We assessed the validity of two screening tests [the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Milan Overall Dementia Assessment or (MODA)] in a population study on the prevalence of Alzheimer's disease, carried out in a small town in the north of Italy. A random sample of 1000 subjects aged 60 years or over entered the study. Subjects who scored below the cut-off points on MODA or on MMSE, or both, were further investigated with neuropsychological, laboratory and instrumental tests to ascertain a final diagnosis, which was considered as the gold standard. Our findings show that MODA has a higher sensitivity than MMSE in detecting subjects affected by dementing illnesses, while MMSE shows a higher specificity. MODA seems to be preferable to MMSE as a screening test for studies where a very high sensitivity is required.[The clock test: a simple method to assess dementia].to validate an easy and simple test to measure cognitive function: the clock drawing test.138 hospitalized and free living elders (96 female, mean age 77.9 years) were studied. They were requested to draw a clock, using standardized instructions. The drawings were independently analyzed and scored by the authors. The Mini Mental State test was used as reference and the scores of both tests were correlated.there was a correlation of 0.73 between the scores of the clock drawing and Mini Mental State tests. Using a score of 7 points in tye clock drawing and 26 points in the Mini Mental State test as cut of points for the diagnosis of dementia, the former's sensitivity and specificity was 0.82 and 0.71 respectively.the clock drawing test appears as a simple and effective test for the initial assessment of cognitive functions in patients with suspected dementia.The prevalence of dementia and depression in the elderly community in a southern European population. The Zaragoza study.Provocative international disparities reported in the prevalence rates of dementia and depression require further investigation. This is the first psychiatric study, to the best of our knowledge, about the prevalence of DSM-III-R dementing and depressive disorders and their relationships in a representative, stratified community sample of the elderly in both a Spanish-speaking country and southern Europe.A two-stage screening was completed in 1080 elderly. Sampling with replacement was done, and the cumulative response rate was 88%. In phase 1, lay interviewers administered the Spanish versions of the Mini-Mental State examination and the Geriatric Mental State Schedule-Automated Geriatric Examination for Computer Assisted Taxonomy package. In phase 2, research psychiatrists administered the same instruments and the History and Aetiology Schedule to all the probable cases and a similar number of randomly selected, probably normal subjects.An estimated 5.5% of the elderly were considered to have a dementing disorder, the most prevalent types being primary degenerative dementia, Alzheimer's type (4.3%), and multi-infarct dementia (0.6%). Depressive disorders were found in 4.8% of the elderly. Psychiatric morbidity, specifically depression, was associated with lower educational levels. "Case levels" of depression were documented in 25.4% of the demented cases and case levels of "organic" disturbance were seen in 18.2% of cases of major depression.Among the elderly, the prevalence of Alzheimer's disease and multi-infarct dementia, as opposed to depression, increases steeply with age. The overlap found between dementia and depression may have nosological implications. There could be an effect of lower education levels on psychiatric morbidity, particularly on depression.Cognitive screening in community-dwelling elders: performance on the clock-in-the-box.The Clock-in-the-Box is a rapid (2-minute) cognitive screening tool. The purpose of this study was to compare the Clock-in-the-Box with the Mini-Mental State Exam and neuropsychologic tests; to determine Clock-in-the-Box score normative values by age and education group; and to determine if the Clock-in-the-Box score is associated with measures of physical function.Community-dwelling older participants in the Boston area were recruited for a prospective, longitudinal study in which they completed a variety of cognitive and functional assessments.At baseline, participants (n=798; mean age [± standard deviation]=78.2 [±5.5] years; 14 [±3] mean years of education) completed in-home assessments of cognition (Clock-in-the-Box and Mini-Mental State Exam), measures of independent function (Activities of Daily Living and Instrumental Activities of Daily Living), and measures of physical function (Short Physical Performance Battery). The mean Mini-Mental State Exam score was 27.1 (±1.6; range 0-30 [0 worst]), and the mean Clock-in-the-Box score was 6.2 (±1.6; range 0-8 [0 worst]). Performance on the Clock-in-the-Box was correlated (Spearman) with the Mini-Mental State Exam (r=0.49, P<.001) and neuropsychologic measures (r=0.37-0.50; P<.001). Higher Clock-in-the-Box score was significantly associated with no difficulty in Activities of Daily Living (χ(2) = 39.6, P<.001) and Instrumental Activities of Daily Living (χ(2) = 35.5, P<.001). In addition, higher Clock-in-the-Box scores were associated with higher scores on the Short Physical Performance Battery (F=5.4, P<.001).The Clock-in-the-Box is a brief cognitive screening test that is correlated with the Mini-Mental State Exam, neuropsychologic tests, and measures of independent and physical function in community-dwelling older adults.Prevalence of dementia in an urban area in taiwan.This two-stage epidemiologic study was to investigate the prevalence and types of dementia among elderly people in the Saa-Min district of Kaohsiung City in Taiwan. In stage one, the Chinese Mini-Mental Status Examination (CMMSE) and Blessed Dementia Rating Scale were employed. In stage two, a comprehensive neurobehavioral examination and neuropsychologic tests were administered by neurologists and neuropsychologists. Dementia was defined by DSM-III-R criteria. The National Institute of Neurological and Communication Disorders and Stroke-Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD) and the National Institute of Neurological Disorder and Stroke-Association international pour la Recherche et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences criteria for vascular dementia (VaD) were applied. A total of 1,016 randomly selected elderly people participated in phase one: 131 people with CMMSE below cutoff values participated in phase two, of whom 45 were confirmed to have a form of dementia. The prevalence of dementia in this sample was 4.4% (3.2% in men and 5.8% in women): 2.0% for those 65 to 74 years old, 8.3% for those 75 to 84 and 24.4% for those > or = 85 years old; 6.0% for those who were illiterate, 3.3% for those who attended grade-school; and 2.8% for those who finished junior-high-school. AD (22 cases, 48.9%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (11 cases, 24.4%) and mixed dementia (MIX: 5 cases, 11.1%). Old age and being female were significant high risk factors for AD. Medical history indicated that stroke and hypertension were significant risk factors for VaD. A relatively high prevalence of dementia was observed in this study, probably because we assessed neurobehavior in great detail. Although AD was the leading cause of dementia in the present population sample. VaD and MIX also comprised an important proportion, reflecting the high prevalence of stroke in Taiwan. Older women had high risk for AD, not for VaD; and those with a history of stroke and hypertension had high risk for VaD, not for AD.Prevalence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan: impact of age, sex, education, and urbanization.To determine the prevalence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan, a two-phase study consisting of a phase I screening survey using the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) and a phase II diagnostic examination using the CERAD neuropsychological battery and the neurobehavioral examination was conducted. According to the household records, stratified random sampling by the degree of urbanization of the community was used, and 2915 inhabitants aged 65 and over participated in this study. The ICD-10NA criteria for dementia, NINCDS-ADRDA guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD), and NINDS-AIREN criteria for vascular dementia (VaD) were employed. Three hundred and ninety-eight persons who had MMSE scores below the cutoff values were recruited into the phase II study, of whom 108 had dementia. The prevalence rate (PR) of dementia was 3.7%, increasing from 1.3% in people 65-69 years old to 16.5% in people 85 years old and older. The age-standardized PR (ASPR) was 4.0%. AD (58 cases, 53.7%, PR=2.0%, ASPR=2.3%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (25 cases, 23.1%, PR=0.9%, ASPR=0.9%), and mixed dementia (eight cases, 7.4%). After adjusting for age, sex and education using logistic regression analysis, aging was a significant risk factor for AD, VaD and total dementia. Female sex and illiteracy were significant risk factors for AD only. We concluded that the prevalence of dementia in Taiwan is lower than in the developed countries, which could be due to a relatively young elderly population and a high mortality from dementia in Taiwan. AD is the leading cause of dementia in Taiwan. Considering the high stroke prevalence, the relatively lower prevalence of VaD in Taiwan deserves further investigation.Validation of the General Practitioner Assessment of Cognition - Chinese version (GPCOG-C) in China.To assess the reliability, validity, and diagnostic utility of the Chinese version of General Practitioner Assessment of Cognition (GPCOG-C). The GPCOG, which is specifically designed for use in primary care to screen for cognitive impairment, consists of a patient section testing cognition, and an informant section asking about decline in cognitive and functional abilities.The English version of GPCOG was translated, back-translated, and subsequently revised to determine the final GPCOG-C. Our sample comprised 253 community-dwelling volunteers with memory concerns aged 50 years and over and 103 outpatients of a psychogeriatric clinic with memory complaints. Participants were assessed by one of the four general practitioners or six psychogeriatricians. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the Hasegawa's Dementia Scale (HDS), and the GPCOG-C were compared against the DSM-IV-defined dementia diagnosis.The internal consistency (Cronbach's α) was 0.68 for the GPCOG patient section. The test-retest was 0.98 for the GPCOG-C total. The sequential administration of both components of GPCOG-C had a sensitivity of 97% and a specificity of 89%, with a positive predictive value of 72% and a negative predictive value of 99%. Both the GPCOG-C total and sequential two-stage scoring methods performed at least well as the MMSE and HDS in detecting dementia. The administration time for the two-stage approach was 4.3 ± 2.4 min.The GPCOG-C is a valid, time efficient instrument for dementia screening in China.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment is superior to the Mini-Mental State Examination in detecting patients at higher risk of dementia.To examine the discriminant validity of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in detecting patients with cognitive impairment at higher risk for dementia at a memory clinic setting.Memory clinic patients were administered the MoCA, MMSE, and a comprehensive formal neuropsychological battery. Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) subtypes were dichotomized into two groups: single domain-MCI (sd-MCI) and multiple domain-MCI (md-MCI). Area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) analysis was used to compare the discriminatory ability of the MoCA and the MMSE.Two hundred thirty patients were recruited, of which 136 (59.1%) were diagnosed with dementia, 61 (26.5%) with MCI, and 33 (14.3%) with no cognitive impairment (NCI). The majority of MCI patients had md-MCI (n = 36, 59%). The MoCA had significantly larger AUCs than the MMSE in discriminating md-MCI from the lower risk group for incident dementia (NCI and sd-MCI) [MoCA 0.92 (95% CI, 0.86-0.98) vs. MMSE 0.84 (95% CI, 0.75-0.92), p = 0.02). At their optimal cut-off points, the MoCA (19/20) remained superior to the MMSE (23/24) in detecting md-MCI [sensitivity: 0.83 vs. 0.72; specificity: 0.86 vs. 0.83; PPV: 0.79 vs. 0.72; NPV: 0.89 vs. 0.83; correctly classified: 85.1% vs. 78.7%].The MoCA is superior to the MMSE in the detection of patients with cognitive impairment at higher risk for incident dementia at a memory clinic setting.Validation study of the Mini-Mental State Examination in a Malay-speaking elderly population in Malaysia.In view of the differing sensitivity and specificity of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the non-English-speaking populations, we conducted the first validation study of the Malay version (M-MMSE) in Malaysia among 300 subjects (from the community and outpatient clinics).Three versions were used: M-MMSE-7 (serial 7), M-MMSE-3 (serial 3) and M-MMSE-S (spell 'dunia' backwards). Dementia was assessed using the criteria of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders IV. The optimal cutoff scores were obtained from the receiver operating characteristics curves.Seventy-three patients (24.3%) had dementia and 227 (75.7%) were controls. Three hundred patients completed the M-MMSE-7, 160 the M-MMSE-3 and 145 the M-MMSE-S. All 3 versions were valid and reliable in the diagnosis of dementia. The optimal cutoff scores varied with each version and gender. In the control group, significant gender differences were observed in the patients with the lowest educational status. Increasing educational levels significantly improved the M-MMSE performance in both genders.All 3 versions of the M-MMSE are valid and reliable as a screening tool for dementia in the Malaysian population, but at different cutoff scores. In those with the lowest educational background, gender-adjusted cutoff scores should be applied.Non-cognitive psychopathological symptoms associated with incident mild cognitive impairment and dementia, Alzheimer's type.To test the hypothesis that specific psychopathological non-cognitive symptoms are associated with incident mild cognitive impairment (MCI), while different symptoms are associated with incident dementia of Alzheimer's type (DAT).A representative community sample of 4,803 individuals aged 55+ years was interviewed in a two-phase screening, in Wave I or ZARADEMP I. This is the baseline, cross-sectional study of the ZARADEMP Project, a longitudinal study to document incidence and risk factors of dementia. The main instrument for assessment of participants was the ZARADEMP Interview, which includes standardized Spanish versions of instruments such as the Mini-Mental Status Examination and the Geriatric Mental State GMS-AGECAT. Two years later, in Wave II or ZARADEMP II, the cognitively non-deteriorated elderly were reassessed in a similar, two-phase procedure. "Incident cases" of both dementia and DAT (DSM-IV-TR criteria), as well as MCI (operationally defined Petersen's criteria) were diagnosed by a panel of psychiatrists. Statistical, logistic regression models, adjusted by age, sex and education were used to test the hypothesized association."Irritability", "neurovegetative symptoms", "sleep problems", "concentration difficulties", "loneliness" and "subjective slowing" documented at baseline were associated with incident MCI (odds ratio, OR range 1.71-2.67). A different profile of non-cognitive symptoms was associated with incident DAT, specifically "tension" (OR= 2.45), "sleep problems" (OR= 2.81), and "observed slowing" (OR= 4.35). On the contrary, "subjective restriction of activities" seemed to be negatively associated with DAT (OR= 0.12).To our knowledge, this is the first report about some specific psychopathological, non-cognitive symptoms associated with incident MCI and/ or incident DAT, when controlling by each other. The psychopathological profile associated with MCI is different from the profile preceding DAT.Test-retest reliable coefficients and 5-year change scores for the MMSE and 3MS.The present study explored several different procedures for determining the amount of change that occurred on the Mini-Mental State Exam [MMSE; Folstein, M. F., Folstein, S. E., & McHugh, P. R. (1975). "Mini-Mental State": A practical method for grading the cognitive state of patients for the clinician. Journal of Psychiatric Research, 12, 189-198] and Modified Mini-Mental State Exam [3MS; Teng, E. L., & Chui, H. C. (1987). The Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS) examination. Journal of Clinical Psychiatry, 48, 314-318] over short and extended test-retest intervals. The test-retest scores were drawn from a selected sample of elderly individuals who participated in the Canadian Study of Health and Aging [Canadian Study of Health and Aging. (1994). The Canadian study of health and aging: Study methods and prevalence of dementia. Canadian Medical Association Journal, 150, 899-913] and were tested on two occasions (CSHA-1 and CSHA-2) separated by 5 years. On each occasion the MMSE and 3MS were administered twice at approximately 3-month intervals. Thus, the mental status tests were administered four times: times 1 and 2 at CSHA-1 and times 3 and 4 at CSHA-2. Mean difference scores and percent of baseline scores showed relatively small group changes over both short and long test-retest intervals for the MMSE and the 3MS. A reliable change index based on a linear regression model controlled for practice effects, psychometric errors due to low reliability, regression to the mean, and accounted for the effects of various demographic variables. Consequently, this reliable change index provided a better estimate of the amount of change that occurred for individual participants than did the mean Retest-Test 1 difference, percent of baseline change, or a reliable change index based on a Retest-Test 1 difference score. Normative data for the change scores are provided.Accuracy of the Mini-Mental Status Examination as a screening test for dementia in a Swedish elderly population.The aim of this study was to determine the accuracy of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) as a screening test for dementia in an elderly Swedish population. All the inhabitants over 74 years of age in one area of Stockholm took the MMSE. The test was then compared to the clinical diagnosis of dementia. With a cut-off point of 23/24, the MMSE had a sensitivity of 87%, specificity of 92%, and positive predictive value (PPV) of 69%. Age, sex, and education did not substantially affect the specificity and the PPV, but had a slight effect on the sensitivity. The main causes of the false positives were somatic and psychiatric disorders. These results are in agreement with studies performed with similar methods and comparable populations.Screening for dementia in an Irish community sample using MMSE: a comparison of norm-adjusted versus fixed cut-points.The MMSE is a widely-used instrument in screening for dementia in the community. The traditional cut-point of <24/30 may be unsuitable for use in some settings, due to biases in age and education.This study aimed to investigate whether cut-points derived from age- and education-specific norms would improve the performance of the MMSE as a screening tool for dementia and cognitive impairment in an Irish community setting, potentially reducing the number of onward referrals. A secondary aim was to obtain score norms in an Irish sample.One thousand one hundred and fifteen people aged over 65 (mean age 74.8+/-6.8 years; 68% female) were assessed in their own homes, using MMSE (world) and the AGECAT computerised diagnostic system for mental illness in the elderly. The performance of the MMSE in identifying case- and sub-case-level dementia was investigated using cut-points of <24 and <23, as well as adjusted cut-points based on published norms and norms derived from the Irish sample.Published norms did not prove useful in improving screening accuracy. Cut-points based on 10th percentile Irish norms and the <23 cut-point performed comparably well, both yielding 93% specificity, with overall accuracy of 90% and 91% respectively (as sensitivity was higher for the <23 cut-point).Locally-derived norms yielded better screening accuracy than did published norms or the traditional <24 cut-point. The importance of selecting an appropriate percentile cut-off when using norms is discussed. The best results were obtained with a simple <23 cut-point, and this may be optimal when screening for dementia in an Irish community setting.Detection of Alzheimer's disease and dementia in the preclinical phase: population based cohort study.To evaluate a simple three step procedure to identify people in the general population who are in the preclinical phase of Alzheimer's disease and dementia.Three year population based cohort study.Kungsholmen cohort, Stockholm, Sweden.1435 people aged 75-95 years without dementia.Single question asking about memory complaints, assessment by mini-mental state examination, and neuropsychological testing.Alzheimer's disease and dementia at three year follow up.None of the three instruments was sufficiently predictive of Alzheimer's disease and dementia when administered separately. After participants had been screened for memory complaints and global cognitive impairment, specific tests of word recall and verbal fluency had positive predictive values for dementia of 85-100% (95% confidence intervals range from 62% to 100%). However, only 18% of future dementia cases were identified in the preclinical phase by this three step procedure. Memory complaints were the most sensitive indicator of Alzheimer's disease and dementia in the whole population, but only half the future dementia cases reported memory problems three years before diagnosis.This three step procedure, which simulates what might occur in clinical practice, has a high positive predictive value for dementia, although only a small number of future cases can be identified.The performance of the Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) for cognitive screening in a geriatric outpatient setting.Dementia is prevalent in the elderly but it is usually unrecognized. The Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) appears to be a good screening tool for dementia detection. The objectives are to validate RUDAS-Thai for detecting dementia according to Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders- IV-Text Revised (DSM-IV-TR) criteria in a geriatric outpatient setting and to determine its optimal cut point.This is a cross-sectional study in which the target population is patients from a Geriatric and Neurology Outpatient Clinic, Srinagarind Hospital, Khon Kaen University who were aged 60 years or above. The content validity and test-retest reliability of the RUDAS-Thai were performed initially. It was administered to each participant. Then a specialist physician assessed each participant for dementia.Eighty-nine (44.5%) subjects had dementia, 89 (44.5%) had normal cognition and 22 (11%) had mild cognitive impairment. The area under the Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was 0.82 (0.75-0.87). The optimal cut point was 24/30; it provided sensitivity and specificity of 78.7% and 61.8%, respectively. It was not influenced by age and gender but by educational level.The RUDAS-Thai is a good screening tool for dementia detection in a geriatric outpatient setting. It is portable, short-time consuming, and avoids some limitations of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). However, education does affect the scores. The scores of 24 or lower is an optimal cut point for an indication of developing dementia.Contribution of informant and patient ratings to the accuracy of the mini-mental state examination in predicting probable Alzheimer's disease.To determine whether the accuracy of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in predicting future Alzheimer's disease (AD) could be improved by the addition of patient and informant ratings of cognitive difficulties.An inception cohort of nondemented patients followed longitudinally for 2 years.Patients referred to a university teaching hospital research investigation by their family physicians because of concerns about memory impairment.One hundred sixty-five community-residing patients were included who did not have dementia or any identifiable cause for memory impairment. After 2 years, 29 met criteria for AD, and 95 were not demented.Baseline assessments included MMSE, an Informant Rating Scale, and a Patient Rating Scale of cognitive difficulties. After 2 years, patients were diagnosed following the reference standard for probable AD. Diagnosticians were blind to baseline scores.Age and education were included in all analyses as covariates. The best logistic regression model included the Informant Rating Scale and the MMSE (sensitivity = 83%, specificity = 79%). An empirically reduced six-item model that included two items each from the MMSE, the Patient Rating Scale, and the Informant Rating Scale produced a significantly better model than the one with the full test scores (sensitivity = 90%, specificity = 94%).Results indicate that inclusion of informant ratings with the MMSE significantly improved its accuracy in the prediction of probable AD. Replication in a new prospective cohort of nondemented patients is necessary to confirm these findings.Relationship of dementia screening tests with biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease.Screening tests for Alzheimer's disease lack sensitivity and specificity. We developed the AD8, a brief dementia screening interview validated against clinical and cognitive evaluations, as an improvement over current screening methods. Because insufficient follow-up has occurred to validate the AD8 against the neuropathologic findings of Alzheimer's disease, we investigated whether AD8 scores correspond to impairment in episodic memory testing and changes in biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease (cerebrospinal fluid and amyloid imaging with Pittsburgh compound B) characteristic of symptomatic Alzheimer's disease. We also compared informant-based assessments with brief performance-based dementia screening measurements such as the Mini Mental State Exam. The sample (n = 257) had a mean age of 75.4 years with 15.1 years of education; 88.7% were Caucasian and 45.5% were male. The sample was divided into two groups based on their AD8 scores: those with a negative dementia screening test (AD8 score 0 or 1, n = 137) and those with a positive dementia screening test (AD8 score ≥2, n = 120). Individuals with positive AD8 scores had abnormal Pittsburgh compound B binding (P < 0.001) and cerebrospinal fluid biomarkers (P < 0.001) compared with individuals with negative AD8 scores. Individuals with positive AD8 tests and positive biomarkers scored in the impaired range on the Wechsler Logical Memory Story A (mean score 7.0 ± 4.5 for Pittsburgh compound B; mean score 7.6 ± 5.3 for cerebrospinal fluid amyloid beta protein 1-42). The AD8 area under the curve for Pittsburgh compound B was 0.737 (95% confidence interval: 0.64-0.83) and for cerebrospinal fluid amyloid beta protein 1-42 was 0.685 (95% confidence interval: 0.60-0.77) suggesting good discrimination. The AD8 had superior sensitivity in detecting early stages of dementia compared with the Mini Mental State Examination. The AD8 had a likelihood ratio of a positive test of 5.8 (95% confidence interval: 5.4-6.3) and likelihood ratio of a negative test of 0.04 (95% confidence interval: 0.03-0.06), increasing the pre-test probability of an individual having symptomatic Alzheimer's disease. Individuals with AD8 scores of ≥2 had a biomarker phenotype consistent with Alzheimer's disease and lower performance on episodic memory tests, supporting a diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease. Informant-based assessments may be superior to performance-based screening measures such as the Mini Mental State Examination in corresponding to underlying Alzheimer's disease pathology, particularly at the earliest stages of decline. The use of a brief test such as the AD8 may improve strategies for detecting dementia in community settings where biomarkers may not be readily available, and may enrich clinical trial recruitment by increasing the likelihood that participants have underlying biomarker abnormalities.MMSE cross-domain variability predicts cognitive decline in centenarians.Early detection of dementia is one of the key issues in cognitive gerontology. However, so far the detection of early stages in cognitive decline has been rather unreliable. One central limitation of current assessment strategies is that they rely on information about a person's level of performance obtained from a single assessment.In the first part of the present paper, we propose three strategies for overcoming this limitation by using information from several measurement occasions to improve diagnostic reliability.In the second part, we present one exemplary empirical analysis of one of these approaches reporting data from the Heidelberg Centenarian Study.In this sample of very old individuals tested at baseline and at a follow-up 18 months later, the intra-individual cross-domain variability across MMSE subscales [1]at baseline predicted cognitive decline (i.e. change in an external cognitive functioning rating from baseline to follow-up) much better than baseline mean MMSE scores.In conclusion, we discuss the advantage of performance variability as a predictor for cognitive decline.Validating screening instruments for cognitive impairment in older South Asians in the United Kingdom.The numbers of older South Asians in the United Kingdom are rising. Investigation of their mental health has been neglected compared to their physical health.This study aimed to determine the sensitivity and specificity of modified versions of two screening instruments for cognitive impairment (Mini-Mental State Examination and Abbreviated Mental Test) in a community-based population.Two-stage study comparing screening instruments against diagnostic interview.South, central and north Manchester.Community-resident South Asians aged 60 years and over.Subjects were approached via their general practitioners and interviewed at home. Sensitivity and specificity for the screening instruments were calculated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.For the Gujarati population, the MMSE cutoff was >/=24 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 95%) and AMT>/=6 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 95%). For the Pakistani population, the MMSE cutoff was >/=27 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 77%) and AMT>/=7 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 87%).Culturally modified versions of the Mini-Mental State Examination and Abbreviated Mental Test are acceptable and may have a high degree of sensitivity. They may assist with the recognition of cognitive impairment, if an appropriate cutoff is used.The Mini-Mental State Examination score and the clinical diagnosis of dementia.To set a working cutoff score for the referral to diagnostic examination, we evaluated 150 consecutive patients with complaints potentially related to dementia, using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). All patients were later given a complete, standardized work-up and diagnosis as part of our Alzheimer's Disease Patient Registry protocol. Dementia diagnosis was made, consistent with accepted criteria, by consensus of the physicians and psychologist. Diagnosis was reaffirmed after 1-year follow-up exam; 133 of the 150 original patients completed follow-up (80 dementia, 53 no dementia). We evaluated the initial MMSE score compared with the follow-up diagnosis. Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values were calculated for MMSE scores ranging from 22 through 29. The conventional cutoff score of < 24 shows a sensitivity of 0.63 and a specificity of 0.96; sensitivity increased at higher cutoff scores. Multivariate analysis showed that educational level added significant prediction only at scores of > or = 27. We conclude that an MMSE score of 26 or 27 should be used as a cutoff score in symptomatic populations with similar educational and socioeconomic backgrounds when the goal is to miss few true cases. Population surveys where the expected prevalence is low may require a different cutoff score to indicate the need for further diagnostic evaluation.Mental status testing in the elderly nursing home population.The clinical utility of selected brief cognitive screening instruments in detecting dementia in an elderly nursing home population was examined. One hundred twenty nursing home residents (mean age 87.9) were administered the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS). The majority of the subjects (75%) were also administered the Dementia Rating Scale (DRS). Both clinically diagnosed demented (n = 57) and non-demented (n = 63) subjects participated in the study. Dementia was diagnosed in accordance with DSM-III-R criteria by physicians specializing in geriatric medicine. Using standard cutoffs for impairment, the 3MS, MMSE, and DRS achieved high sensitivity (82% to 100%) but low specificity (33% to 52%) in the detection of dementia among nursing home residents. Positive predictive values ranged from 52% to 61%, and negative predictive values from 77% to 100%. Higher age, lower education, and history of depression were significantly associated with misclassification of non-demented elderly subjects. Receiver Operating Characteristic (ROC) curve analyses revealed optimal classification of dementia with cutoff values of 74 for the 3MS, 22 for the MMSE, and 110 for the DRS. The results suggest that the 3MS, MMSE, and DRS do not differ significantly with respect to classification accuracy of dementia in a nursing home population. Elderly individuals of advanced age (i.e., the oldest-old) with lower education and a history of depression appear at particular risk for dementia misclassification with these instruments. Revised cutoff values for impairment should be employed when these instruments are applied to elderly residents of nursing homes and the oldest-old.Statistical description of the Mini-Mental State Examination for French elderly community residents. Paquid Study Group.The distribution of total Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores, individual items, and groups of items were studied in French elderly community residents from a random sample of 2727 subjects. Serial seven, recall three objects, and copy pentagons had the lowest percentage of correct responses, while orientation to place, naming two objects, and three objects registration had the highest percentage of correct responses. The structure of correlation of the items was studied using Principal Components Analysis. The projection of the items on the first axis reflects the tendency of the items to vary in the same direction and is compatible with the fact that the MMSE items are all indicators of the same concept: cognitive performance. The second and third axes identify clusters of highly correlated variables and provide support for the internal validity of the MMSE score for a French population. The full MMSE score seems to be a valid instrument for the evaluation of cognitive performance in community-based elderly residents.Canadian study of health and aging: study methods and prevalence of dementia.To estimate the prevalence of dementia and its subtypes by sex and age group for five regions of Canada.Prevalence survey.Community and institutional settings in Canada, excluding those in the two territories, Indian reserves and military units.Representative sample of people aged 65 and over interviewed between February 1991 and May 1992. Those in the community (9008 subjects) were chosen randomly from medicare lists in nine provinces or from the Enumeration Composite Record in Ontario. People in institutions (1255) were randomly selected from residents in stratified random samples of institutions in each region.Screening with the Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS) Examination to identify cognitive impairment. Clinical examination of all those in institutions, those in the community with a 3MS score of less than 78 and a sample of those in the community with a 3MS score of 78 or more to diagnose dementia. Dementia and Alzheimer's disease were defined according to established criteria.Prevalence of dementia of all types, by region, sex and age group, the estimated number of cases in the population by type of dementia and the age-standardized rate per 1000 population.The prevalence estimates suggested that 252,600 (8.0%) of all Canadians aged 65 and over met the criteria for dementia (95% confidence interval [CI] 236,800 to 268,400). These were divided roughly equally between the community and institutional samples; the female:male ratio was 2:1. The age-standardized rate ranged from 2.4%, among those aged 65 to 74 years, to 34.5%, among those aged 85 and over. The corresponding figures for Alzheimer's disease were 5.1% overall (161,000 cases; 95% CI 148,100 to 173,900), ranging from 1.0% to 26.0%; for vascular dementia it was 1.5% overall, ranging from 0.6% to 4.8%. If the prevalence estimates remain constant, the number of Canadians with dementia will rise to 592,000 by 2021.These Canadian estimates of the prevalence of dementia fall toward the upper end of the ranges in other studies, whereas the estimates for Alzheimer's disease fall in the middle of the ranges. This may suggest an unusual balance between Alzheimer's and other forms of dementia in the Canadian population.The reliability and validity of the Mini-Mental State in a British community survey.The Mini-Mental State (MMSE) was administered to 2302 general practice patients aged 75 yr and over. Those scoring 23 or less and a sample of those scoring 24 or 25 were selected for further investigation using the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination. Inter-observer reliability was high with a mean kappa value of 0.97. Eighty-six per cent of respondents judged to have organic mental disorders scored 23 or less on the MMSE and 92% of those judged to be cognitively intact scored 24 or more. However, only 55% of respondents who scored 23 or less were demented or delirious while a number of relatively well educated, mildly demented subjects scored 24 and 25. The customary cut-off point of 23/24 may need to be revised in future community studies. MMSE scores cannot be used to make even tentative psychiatric diagnoses; more detailed investigation of low scorers is essential.[Usefulness of the 'Mini-Mental State Test'for the diagnosis of dementia; study of criterion validity in a Dutch rural population].To establish the criterion validity of the MMSE for dementia in a community-based population.Descriptive.Eight rural general practices and eight adherent institutions for long-term care near Zwolle, the Netherlands.In the first (screening) stage, the MMSE was applied, in the second (diagnostic) stage the 'Cambridge examination for mental disorders of the elderly' (CAMDEX) was used. After exclusion of subjects with clinically relevant impairment of hearing and (or) vision, analyses were based on 2151 screened subjects. Based on a non-proportional, stratified randomized sampling procedure using the MMSE score as the stratification variable, 390 of the screened subjects were examined with the CAMDEX. Seventy-seven cases of DSM-III-R dementia were identified. Based on 390 paired observations the relationship between MMSE score and DSM-III-R dementia was modelled by logistic regression. After extrapolation of this relationship to the total screened population, sensitivity and specificity figures were calculated at several cut-offs of the MMSE, and Receiver Operating Characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed for the total population as well as for four subpopulations. (men, women, < 80, > or = 80 years).At the cut-off of 23/24, sensitivity was 0.76 and specificity 0.91 in the total population. However, the criterion validity of the MMSE varied substantially between the four sex-age combinations. Criterion validity was especially poor for women in the younger age range.The MMSE has only limited value in clinical practice. Use of uniform cut-offs has to be rejected.Use of the MC-FAQ and MMSE-FAQ in cognitive screening of older African Americans, Hispanic Americans, and European Americans.The purpose of this study was to examine the performance of the Mini-Cog-Functional Activities Questionnaire (MC-FAQ) and the Mini-Mental State Examination-Functional Activities Questionnaire (MMSE-FAQ) in cognitive screening of a multiethnic sample of older adults.This is a descriptive psychometric study.Cognitive screening was done in senior centers, at health fairs, and within the nine participating memory disorder centers in the State of Florida.African American, Hispanic American, and European American older adults who participated in this screening were matched on gender, age within 3 years and education within 3 years yielding a sample of 225.The MC-FAQ is a combination of the Mini-Cog and Functional Activities Questionnaire. The MMSE-FAQ combines the MMSE with the FAQ. The Geriatric Depression Scale was used to assess depressive symptoms.African Americans reported significantly less depressive symptoms (F[2, 217] = 10.31, p <0.001) and European Americans had significantly higher mean MMSE scores than the other two groups (F[2, 222] = 3.33, p = 0.037). Participants did not differ by ethnic group on the MC-FAQ or MMSE-FAQ classifications of normal, mild cognitive impairment, or dementia. Age, years of education, and depressive symptoms were significant predictors of MC-FAQ and MMSE-FAQ classifications.The results suggest that these combinations of screening measures may have less culture bias than the MMSE alone. Sensitivity and specificity should be evaluated in these groups with confirmatory neurological and psychiatric diagnosis.Cases with mild cognitive impairment and Alzheimer's disease fail to benefit from repeated exposure to episodic memory tests as compared with controls.Memory tests may be predictive for cognitive decline. We investigated the sensitivity and change in performance over time of the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) for Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) and Alzheimer's Disease (AD) when compared to cognitively healthy controls. Participants included elderly controls (n = 54), MCI (n = 19) and AD cases (n = 28) from OPTIMA. The MMSE and the HVLT (version 1) were administered twice to all subjects with an interval of 2-3 years.MCI and AD cases had poorer performance than controls on the HVLT and MMSE at both testing episodes (p < 0.05). The HVLT profile over time showed a learning effect in the control group (P < 0.0001), a trend to decline in the AD group (p = 0.09) and no change in the MCI group (P = 0.8). A subgroup of MCI subjects had lower HVLT scores at follow-up. The MMSE profile showed no significant change over time for all three groups (P > 0.05). The HVLT had better sensitivity and specificity compared to the MMSE for detecting MCI and AD. The HVLT is not only valuable for cross-sectional designs but has also proved to be valuable in a longitudinal design. Cognitively healthy controls showed evidence of learning strategies on the HVLT after a 2-3 year interval, with improved scores at the second testing episode. By contrast, an MCI group showed no benefits of previous exposure to this test. Lack of use of learning strategies on the HVLT may be an important marker of the likelihood of cognitive decline to MCI or dementia.[Validity of the Portuguese version of Clinical Dementia Rating].To evaluate the validity of the Portuguese version of the Clinical Dementia Rating for classifying the cognitive function among the elderly.The Mini Mental State Examination was utilized as a screening method for cognitive deficit among a cohort of 424 elderly. All those who scored <26 points (108 elderly) and 48 elderly with scores > or =26 were included in the study. The 156 subjects selected were submitted to clinical evaluation and neuropsychological tests for the diagnosis of dementia. Afterwards, both cases and non-cases were classified, according to the Portuguese version of the Clinical Dementia Rating, in the categories normal, borderline, mild, moderate and severe dementia.Among the 156 subjects selected, 122 were non-cases, 62 (51%) were classified as normal (CDR=0) and 60 (49%) as borderline (CDR=0.5). Among the 34 cases of dementia, 17 (50%) were classified as mild dementia (CDR=1), eight (23%) as moderate (CDR=2) and six (18%) as severe dementia (CDR=3). Only three (9%) of the cases were considered borderline cases by the Clinical Dementia Rating. Its sensibility was 91.2% and the specificity was 100%. The positive predictive value was 100% and the negative predictive value was 97.6%. The Mini Mental State Examination scores declined significantly according to the degree of dementia.The Portuguese version of the Clinical Dementia Rating is a valid instrument for classifying the dementia status of the elderly. Almost half the cases considered normal by the diagnostic criteria of the Mini Mental State Examination were borderline cases according to the Clinical Dementia Rating and might correspond to cases of mild cognitive impairment, with an increased risk of conversion to dementia cases.Consistency of clinical diagnosis of dementia in NEDICES: A population-based longitudinal study in Spain.Few longitudinal studies have verified the clinical diagnosis of dementia based on clinical examinations. We evaluated the consistency of the clinical diagnosis of dementia over a period of 3 years of follow-up in a population-based, cohort study of older people in central Spain.Individuals (N = 5278) were evaluated at baseline (1994-1995) and at follow-up (1997-1998). The evaluation included a screening questionnaire for dementia and a neurological assessment.Dementia screening consisted of a 37-item version of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Pfeffer Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ). Study neurologists investigated those participants who screened positively (N = 713) as well as 843 who had screened negatively to test the sensitivity of the screening instruments or because they had a positive screening for other chronic neurological diseases. We detected 295 patients among those who screened positive and 13 among those who screened negatively. Three years follow-up evaluation demonstrated 14 diagnostic errors at baseline (4.5%) leading to a final number of 306 patients with dementia. The corrected prevalence of dementia was 5.8% (95% confidence interval [CI] 5.2-6.5).The diagnosis of dementia was highly accurate in this population-based, Spanish cohort study, and our prevalence figures agree with other European surveys. Given the high cost and difficulties of population rescreening and its relatively low yield, we conclude that a single 2-phase investigation (screening followed by clinical examination) provides accurate information for most population-based prevalence studies of dementia.Sensitivity and specificity of standardized screens of cognitive impairment and dementia among elderly black and white community residents.Six standardized published measures of cognitive function were evaluated as screens of dementia in a sample of 164 (83 black, 81 white) community residents aged 65 and over selected from the Duke University EPESE (Established Populations for Epidemiologic Studies of the Elderly), a biracial cohort of 4164 residents in a five county area of piedmont North Carolina. Of these 164 persons, 26 were subsequently diagnosed as demented. The weighted data from this sample represent the estimated performance of these measures among elderly blacks and whites in a five county area. The 6 measures evaluated in this study (specificity figures for blacks precede those for whites) were (1) Orientation-Memory-Concentration Test (38%, 79%), (2) Mental Status Questionnaire (71%, 96%), (3) Mini-Mental State (58%, 94%), (4) Storandt et al. Battery (42%, 69%), (5) Iowa Battery (26%, 69%) and (6) Kendrick Cognitive Tests (92%, 97%). All but the Kendrick Cognitive Tests showed substantial sensitivity (90-100%) in detecting the presence of dementia. The specificity of the tests was particularly poor for blacks. The briefer, simpler measures tended to have greater accuracy than the longer and more complex measures. With rare exceptions, the scores obtained on these screens correlated with race and education.The limited utility of the Mini-Mental State Examination in screening people over the age of 75 years for dementia in primary care.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is used worldwide to assess cognitive status and it has been recommended for use in primary care to detect dementia. In this study, the MMSE was administered during annual health checks for patients over 75 years of age in nine practices by a member of the primary care team. The mean age was 80 years. Of the 709 patients screened, 286 scored at or below the cut-off point, which was set at 26/30 on the MMSE, and they were invited to be assessed further by a researcher, using the well-validated GMS-AGECAT diagnostic system. Eighty-four of these patients refused, 173 were identified as not having dementia, and 29 (14%) were identified as having dementia. These results, with an 86% false-positive rate, raise concerns regarding the utility of the MMSE as a screening instrument for dementia in primary care.Detecting cognitive impairment in primary care: performance assessment of three screening instruments.Early detection of Alzheimer's disease and related disorders (ADRD) is important, especially in primary care settings. We compared performances of two common screening tests, the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Clock Drawing Test (CDT), with that of the MCI Screen ({MCIS}) in 254 patients over 65. None had previous diagnosis of ADRD, and 81% were asymptomatic by Functional Assessment Staging Test ({FAST}) (FAST=1). 215 patients completed all screening tests - 141 had >or= 1 abnormal result, 121/141 completed standardized diagnostic assessment, and the remaining 74/215 (34%) screened entirely normally and weren't further evaluated. Potential bias due to unevaluated cases was statistically adjusted. Among diagnosed cases: AD=43%, cerebrovascular disease=36%, other causes=21%. Bias-adjusted MCI prevalence for FAST stages 1 and 1-3 were 13.9-20.3% and 23.0-28.3%. Bias-adjusted results for the CDT, MMSE and MCIS were: clinical diagnosis validity (kappa statistic)={-0.02 (p=0.61), 0.06 (p=0.23), 0.92 (p< 0.0001)}; sensitivity={59%, 71%, 94%}; specificity={39%, 36%, 97%}; overall accuracy={54%, 62%, 96%}; positive predictive value={16%, 17%, 86%}; and negative predictive value={83%, 87%, 96%}. The MMSE and CDT were not valid for early detection, while the MCIS had high validity and accuracy in the primary care cohort.Clinical diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease and other dementias in a population survey. Agreement and causes of disagreement in applying Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Revised Third Edition, Criteria.In a population survey aimed to detect cases of Alzheimer's disease and other dementias, two preliminary diagnoses were made independently with the purpose of using the concordant diagnoses as final diagnoses. Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Revised Third Edition, diagnostic criteria were followed. The 668 subjects examined were selected from the population of an area in Stockholm, Sweden, aged 75 years or more, with the Mini-Mental State Examination used as a screening test. The agreement on dementia diagnosis was moderate (kappa = .54) and could be clearly improved (kappa = .70) with modifications to the diagnostic criteria, such as adding a category of questionable dementia and giving more guidelines in the definition of impairment of a function. The agreement on the diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease vs vascular dementia vs secondary dementia was substantial (kappa = .67) when the cases with concordant dementia diagnoses were examined.Epidemiology research on dementia in Antwerp, Belgium.Epidemiological research on dementia in Belgium started in 1990 with a prevalence study. In the first phase of the MMSE was used for screening a random sample, stratified by age, of 1,800 aged people. In the second phase the diagnostic work was done by a psychiatrist using the CAMDEX. An incidence study will start after 2 years. Potential risk factors will be examined in a case-control study.The prevalence of dementia in Girona.To provide a preliminary assessment of the prevalence of dementia and its subtypes in a rural area. From a total of 2,469 people over 65 who were not committed to any institution, 273 were randomly chosen and stratified by age and sex. Of these 273 individuals, 244 (89.4%) took part in the study. Family doctors administered the miniexamen cognoscitivo (MEC), a Spanish version of the Mini Mental State Exam to screen all individuals taking part in the first phase. Enrolled in the second phase were all those whose scores on the MEC were below the cut-off point, plus a similar number of individuals whose scores were above this level and who were used as controls. The CAMDEX was the instrument used for diagnosis by clinical psychologists. The overall prevalence of dementia in the area under study was 13.93 +/- 4.34%. This prevalence includes the three levels of diagnosis certainty for CAMDEX (definitive, probable and possible) and the three levels of severity (minimum, mild, moderate, and severe) defined by the instrument. The number of individuals with dementia increased with age. Females showed more dementia than males in all age groups. The distribution of dementia by subtypes was 41.18% for both Alzheimer's type senile and presenile forms, and for vascular dementia, and 17.64% for mixed dementia. Our results show a prevalence of dementia that is higher than rates observed in other studies using similar materials and methods.Comorbidity of dementia and psychiatric disorders in older persons.To further investigate the relationship between psychiatric disorders and dementia in elderly patients, the authors drew a population-based, age-stratified random sample from residents of Rochester, Minnesota, age 65 and older. A trained paramedic completed a 90-minute screening interview, including the Symptom Checklist-90, Mini-Mental State Exam, and Auditory-Verbal Learning Test. Persons failing the screens were interviewed by a psychiatrist and a neurologist. DSM-III-R diagnoses were assigned for dementia and other psychiatric disorders. Of 201 participants, 37 were evaluated further by both neurologist and psychiatrist. One received a psychiatric diagnosis alone. Dementia alone was present in four people. Concurrent psychiatric diagnoses and dementia were found in 17 subjects. Much of the psychopathology found in older persons occurs in people with cognitive impairment. Current diagnostic nosology may not be able to capture the interrelatedness of psychiatric syndromes and cognitive impairment in elderly patients.Correction for age, education and other demographic variables in the use of the Mini Mental State Examination in Finland.The population-based Helsinki Aging Study was comprised of three age groups: 75-, 80- and 85-year-olds. A random sample of 511 subjects completed the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and were assessed on the Clinical Dementia Rating-scale (CDR). According to the CDR results 446 subjects were screened as non-demented. Of these subjects 30% scored below or at 24 MMSE points. Age, education and social group had a significant effect on the MMSE scores, even after excluding the demented cases. Together they explained 10% of the total variance within the MMSE. Social group correlated with education. The MMSE scores were corrected according to age and education. Adjustment of the originally used cutpoint of 24 resulted in cutpoints of 25 and 26 among the 75-year-olds, in the low and high education groups respectively; 23 and 26 in the 80-year-olds; 22 and 23 in the 85-year-olds.Community screening for dementia: the Mini Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) compared.The objectives of this study were to assess whether Teng's modification of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) improves its performance as a screening test for cognitive impairment and dementia, and to replicate this comparison in French and English language groups, and for differing assumptions concerning the relative importance of false negative and false positive errors. Screening interviews were conducted with representative samples of people aged 65 or over, set in 36 communities in 10 Canadian provinces. There were 8900 community participants in the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, of whom 1600 also underwent an extensive clinical and neuropsychological examination. Sensitivity, specificity and areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve for the original MMSE and modified version (the 3MS) were the main outcome measures. Results are reported for French and English versions of the tests. The results indicate the alpha internal consistency for the 3MS was 0.87, compared to 0.78 for the MMSE. The area under the ROC curve in identifying dementia was 0.93 for the 3MS and 0.89 for the MMSE (p < 0.001). There was less difference between the two tests in identifying all levels of cognitive impairment (AUC 0.80 versus 0.77, p < 0.01). The superiority of the 3MS appears more due to its extended scoring system than to its additional questions. The validity of the MMSE was comparable in English and French samples; results for the 3MS were inconsistent between the two samples, suggesting possible translation problems. In conclusion, the 3MS was superior to the MMSE, justifying the slightly greater burden for its administration and scoring. Neither test worked well in identifying lower levels of cognitive impairment.[Validation of a screening test for age associated cognitive impairment, in Chile].The real prevalence of dementia in a given population must be determined through prevalence studies, using validated screening tests.To validate and determine cutoff points for a cognitive impairment screening test composed by the Folstein Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Pfeffer Functional Activities Questionnaire (PFAQ).Validation of the diagnostic test in a sample of 100 subjects over 65 years old (85 from the project "Age associated dementias" and 15 with a confirmed diagnosis of dementia). All were subjected to a complete neuropsychological test by a trained neurologist, that constituted the "gold standard" for the diagnosis of dementia. An independent interviewer applied the MMSE to the subjects and the PFAQ to a next of kin informer. Cutoff points were calculated using ROC curves. The points with the better equilibrium between sensitivity and specificity were selected, considering differences in results between groups with low and high educational level.The cutoff point for MMSE was 21/22, with a sensitivity of 93.6% (95% CI 70.6-99.7%) and a specificity of 46.1% (95% CI 34.7-57.8%). The figure for PFAQ was 5/6, with a sensitivity of 89.2% (95% CI 70.6-99.7%) and a specificity of 70.7% (95% CI 58.9-80.3%). The combination of both instruments gave a sensitivity of 94.4% (95% CI 58.9-80.3%) and a specificity of 83.3% (95% CI 72.3-90.7%).This screening test, using MMSE and PFAQ, has a good sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of dementia in Chile. Being simple and of low cost, it can be applied in primary health care.Four sensitive screening tools to detect cognitive dysfunction in geriatric emergency department patients: brief Alzheimer's Screen, Short Blessed Test, Ottawa 3DY, and the caregiver-completed AD8.Cognitive dysfunction, including dementia and delirium, is prevalent in geriatric emergency department (ED) patients, but often remains undetected. One barrier to reliable identification of acutely or chronically impaired cognitive function is the lack of an acceptable screening tool. While multiple brief screening instruments have been derived, ED validation trials have not previously demonstrated tools that are appropriately sensitive for clinical use.The primary objective was to evaluate and compare the Ottawa 3DY (O3DY), Brief Alzheimer's Screen (BAS), Short Blessed Test (SBT), and caregiver-completed AD8 (cAD8) diagnostic test performance for cognitive dysfunction in geriatric ED patients using the Mini Mental Status Exam (MMSE) as the criterion standard. A secondary objective was to assess the diagnostic accuracy for the cAD8 (which is an informant-based instrument) when used in combination with the other performance-based screening tools.In an observational cross-sectional cohort study at one urban academic university-affiliated medical center, trained research assistants (RAs) collected patients' responses on the Confusion Assessment Method for the Intensive Care Unit, BAS, and SBT. When available, reliable caregivers completed the cAD8. The MMSE was then obtained. The O3DY was reconstructed from elements of the MMSE and the BAS. Consenting subjects were non-critically ill, English-speaking adults over age 65 years, who had not received potentially sedating medications prior to or during cognitive testing. Using an MMSE score of ≤23 as the criterion standard for cognitive dysfunction, the sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) area under the curve (AUC) were computed. Venn diagrams were constructed to quantitatively compare the degree of overlap among positive test results between the performance-based instruments.The prevalence of cognitive dysfunction for the 163 patients enrolled with complete data collection was 37%, including 5.5% with delirium. Dementia was self-reported in 3%. Caregivers were available to complete the cAD8 for 56% of patients. The SBT, BAS, and O3DY each demonstrated 95% sensitivity, compared with 83% sensitivity for the cAD8. The SBT had a superior specificity of 65%. No combination of instruments with the cAD8 significantly improved diagnostic accuracy. The SBT provided the optimal overlap with the MMSE.The SBT, BAS, and O3DY are three brief performance-based screening instruments to identify geriatric patients with cognitive dysfunction more rapidly than the MMSE. Among these three instruments, the SBT provides the best diagnostic test characteristics and overlap with MMSE results. The addition of the cAD8 to the other instruments does not enhance diagnostic accuracy.Detecting dementia with the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test and the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were administered to 323 non-demented elderly and 70 individuals who meet DSM-IV criteria for dementia in order to compare the validity of these two measures for detecting mild dementia and for the two most common dementia subtypes, Alzheimer's disease (AD) and vascular dementia (VaD). The study was conducted in an elderly, ethnically diverse community-dwelling population. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values were calculated over a range of clinically relevant cut scores for each test. We analyzed the influence of age, education, reading ability and sex on test performance using logistic regression models. When sensitivity is held constant at 0.69, the specificity for the HVLT total recall was 0.89 and the MMSE 0.82 for all dementias (P=.10). Age, sex and education did not significantly influence test performance for either test in this sample. Results were similar for AD and VaD. However, while adding a measure of reading ability to the regression models did not affect the overall dementia model, it resulted in improved specificities when combined with the MMSE for AD and combined with the HVLT for VaD. Additional tests such as reading ability can improve discrimination of dementia subtypes. The modest sensitivity of either the HVLT or the MMSE alone suggests that further neuropsychological evaluation is required to confirm dementia diagnosis.Detection of MCI in the clinic: evaluation of the sensitivity and specificity of a computerised test battery, the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test and the MMSE.the sensitive detection of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) in older adults is an important problem that requires objective assessment. We evaluated whether the computerised cognitive test battery, CogState, was as sensitive to MCI as two well-validated 'paper-and-pencil' tests, the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE).these tests were administered with a subjective memory questionnaire and an 'Activities of Daily Living' scale to 21 individuals with MCI and 98 cognitively healthy controls matched for sex, education and IQ levels. The sensitivity and specificity of the tests and their discrimination between groups were determined.the HVLT had a maximum discrimination between controls and MCI cases of 90%, compared with 86% for CogState and 65% for the MMSE. Only CogState showed correlations with subjective memory complaints (SMC) and activities of daily living for the whole cohort when controlled for age, sex and years of education. Logistic regression analyses showed that diagnosis (control:MCI) was predicted by HVLT and a CogState ratio score. Age was a significant predictor of HVLT performance, while age and SMC predicted CogState performance. The computerised test battery was well tolerated by older adults, but presentation speed was a limiting factor for some participants.overall, we conclude that the HVLT has better sensitivity for the detection of MCI in older adults than the CogState, but that CogState may enable the identification of cognitive deficits above and beyond impairments in memory.A new systematic method of measurement and diagnosis of "mild cognitive impairment" and dementia according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R criteria.Normative data were collected in a study population of 150 randomly selected elderly subjects. Using the SIDAM (Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of Dementia of the Alzheimer Type, multi-infarct dementia, and dementias of other etiology according to DSM-III-R and ICD-10), both the dimensional and the categorical aspects of dementia and "mild cognitive impairment" are considered. With the SIDAM score (SISCO) [range 0 (minimum)-55 (maximum, no cognitive impairment)] and the SIDAM Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (range 0-30), appropriate cutoffs for the category of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia and "mild cognitive impairment" were defined. MMSE scores of 0-22 were found to be indicative of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia. For "mild cognitive impairment," MMSE scores ranged from 23-27 according to a DSM-III-R definition (ICD-10: 23-28). An MMSE score of 22 or less was found to differentiate between DSM-III-R/ICD-10 dementia and "mild cognitive impairment," with a specificity of 92% (ICD-10: 95.6) and a sensitivity of 96% (ICD-10: 96%). With the SIDAM-based DSM-III-R/ICD-10 diagnoses of dementia as the criterion, the SISCO was 97.3% specific (ICD-10: 99%) and 94% sensitive (ICD-10: 94%) in detecting dementia. A SISCO of 0-33 was highly indicative of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia. For "mild cognitive impairment," a SISCO between 34-47 (ICD-10: 34-51) was found. The SISCO covers a broader range of cognitive functions than the MMSE and is more useful in detecting even very mild cognitive decline. Furthermore, the newly defined category of "mild cognitive impairment" could be validated successfully by means of GDS Stages 2-3 and CDR Stage 0.5. These findings confirm the value of the SIDAM as a short diagnostic instrument for measurement and diagnosis of dementia and "mild cognitive impairment."The prevalence of dementia in a total population: a comparison of two screening instruments.Two short screening tests for dementia, the Information/Orientation (IO) sub-test of the Clifton Assessment Scale (CAPE) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were included in a survey of 1579 elderly people of a large general practice. All those scoring 21 and under on the MMSE, a one in two sample of those scoring 22, 23 and a one in ten sample of the remainder were investigated further using the Cambridge Examination for Mental Disorders of the elderly (CAMDEX). The prevalences of moderate to severe dementia and mild to severe dementia determined from the CAMDEX interview were 4.8% and 14.2%, respectively. For detection of moderate to severe dementia, a cut-point of 21/22 on the MMSE gave a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 85% and an overall prevalence of 19.7%; mild to severe dementia was best detected by a cut-point of 23/24 giving a sensitivity of 89%, specificity of 81% and prevalence of 28.5%. A cut-point of 7/8 on the IO sub-test gave a sensitivity and specificity for detecting moderate to severe dementia of 87% and 97%, respectively, with a prevalence of 7.3%; for mild to severe dementia a cut-point of 10/11 gave a sensitivity of 67%, specificity of 94% and prevalence of 14.7%.Effect of education on the mini-mental state examination as a screening test for dementia.We studied whether Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) norms for detecting dementia in elderly outpatients vary according to educational attainment. Subjects were 109 elderly outpatients with Alzheimer's dementia and 100 non-demented outpatient controls. Receiver operating characteristics (ROC) of the MMSE were examined among three strata of educational attainment: middle school, high school, and college/graduate school. MMSE ROC curve areas were .95-.96 in the three educational strata. Assuming a dementia prevalence of 10%-30%, the most accurate lower limits of normal for MMSE scores and their attendant sensitivities and specificities were 21 for middle school (.82/.94), 23 for high school (.79/.97), and 24 for college/graduate school (.83/1.00) attainment. These norms accurately classified over 90% of subjects in all three educational strata. We conclude that education-specific norms optimize performance of the MMSE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in elderly outpatients.Prevalence and subtypes of dementia in Taiwan: a community survey of 5297 individuals.To study the prevalence rate of dementia in Taiwan, the relative frequencies of its subtypes, and its associations with age, education, gender, and residence location.A total of 2753 men and 2544 women from four urban and four rural communities participated. Their age ranged from 41 to 88 years; 28% of them were at least 65 years old. Their education ranged from 0 to 20 years; 27% of them had less than 1 year of formal schooling.Phase I was a screening survey by trained nurses who administered a Chinese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination, the MMSE-T1, to all participants. Phase II involved the assessment for dementia by neurologists on the 1521 individuals who had scored less than 24 on the 30-point MMSE-T1.Thirty-one cases of dementia were identified by the DSM-III-R criteria, including 18 cases of Alzheimer's disease, 10 cases of vascular dementia, and three cases of other dementias. The prevalence rate in individuals aged 65 and over was 2.0%. Aging and illiteracy were associated with higher rates of dementia; gender and residence location made no difference.The prevalence rate of dementia was low in this Chinese population. Consistent with common findings from other parts of the world, a high rate of dementia was associated with older age and illiteracy, and Alzheimer's disease was the most frequent cause.Incidence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan: impact of socio-demographic factors.To determine the incidence rate (IR) and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan.From a cohort of 2,915 community inhabitants aged 65 years and over, 2,507 and 2,175 subjects participated in the first- and second-year follow-up surveys, respectively. A two-phase study used the Mini-Mental State Examination in phase I and the Consortium to Establish a Registry of Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) neuropsychological battery and the neurobehavioral examination in phase II. We applied International Classification of Diseases (ICD)-10NA criteria for dementia, National Institute of Neurological and Communication Disorders and Stroke-Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association (NINCDS-ADRDA) guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD), and National Institute of Neurological Disorders and Stroke-Association Internationale pour la Recherche et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences (NINDS-AIREN) criteria for vascular dementia (VaD).The annual IR for total dementia was 1.28%, which increased with age from 0.77% for 65- to 74-year-olds to 6.19% for persons aged 85 years or older. AD (25 cases, 41.7%, IR=0.54%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (19 cases, 31.7%, IR=0.41%) and mixed dementia (9 cases, 15.0%). After adjusting for sex, increasing age was significantly associated with total dementia and AD (p < 0.01). Illiteracy was associated with a marginally increased risk for total dementia (aRR=1.59, p < 0.1) as was being female for AD (aRR = 1.92, p < 0.1). The 2-year mortality rate was high among the demented (48% in total dementia, 38% in AD, and 60% in VaD).The age-specific incidence of dementia in Taiwan is approaching that of developed countries and the low prevalence of dementia (especially VaD) may be mainly due to the high mortality. Age was the major risk factor for total dementia and AD. Being female was probably a risk factor for AD, as was illiteracy for total dementia.Dementia and cognitive impairment in the oldest old in the community. Prevalence and comorbidity.The study focuses on the prevalence of dementia in the oldest old.A community sample (n = 402) of the oldest old in Munich (> or = 85 years) was assessed with different methods. Four instruments and a clinical examination were used for case identification: (a) the Geriatric Mental State Interview (GMS-A); (b) the Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of Dementia (SIDAM); (c) the Global Deterioration Scale (GDS); and (d) the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE). The clinical examination was performed by the interviewing physicians, who made their diagnoses according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R.The structured interviews (GMS-A: 25.4%; SIDAM/SISCO: 28.0%; SIDAM/DSM-III-R: 27.8%; SIDAM/ICD-10: 16.1%) gave lower point prevalence rates of dementia than physicians' clinical diagnoses (43.1%). The rates were 21.2% based on the MMSE. Depressive syndromes and anxiety syndromes were the most frequent psychiatric disturbances associated with dementia in the very old.Dementia rates were high in the oldest old, showed an increase with age but no sex differences. Interview methodology has a major impact on results.Usefulness of repeated presentation of Mini-Mental State Examination as a diagnostic procedure--a population-based study.The 280 subjects who achieved 24 points or less in the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the first survey of 1449 subjects were invited for a comprehensive diagnostic examination for dementia including medical history, thorough neurological and cardiovascular examinations and detailed neuropsychological evaluation, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI)-study, cerebrospinal fluid (CSF)-analysis, electrocardiogram (ECG), chest radiograph and blood tests after the first assessment. The MMSE was presented again.Out of 240 persons, 57 subjects were diagnosed as having dementia. When the cut-off point of 24 or less in the second MMSE was used, the sensitivity of the second MMSE was 82% and the specificity was 64%. The positive predictive value of the second MMSE was 42% and negative predictive value 92%. The non-demented subjects improved their MMSE score at the second examination. In contrast, the demented subjects maintained their low MMSE score at the second examination.Primary care screen for early dementia.To determine whether the Alzheimer's Disease Screen for Primary Care (ADS-PC) is more sensitive to early dementia than the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and whether it has as high a misclassification rate in minority patients and patients with limited education.Cross-sectional validation study.Urban geriatric primary care practice.Three hundred sixteen African-American and Caucasian patients, including 55 patients with early dementia (Clinical Demential Rating of 0.5).The ADS-PC is a two-stage strategy for identifying early dementia that consists of a brief high-sensitivity dementia screen, applied to all patients aged 65 and older, and a second stage to identify memory impairment, applied to patients who fail the first stage. Differences in the sensitivities or specificities of the ADS-PC and the MMSE were evaluated using the McNemar test.Receiver operating characteristic curves were used to examine differences in the operating characteristics of the ADS-PC across a range of cutscores. When the specificities of both tests were equated (0.90), the sensitivities were significantly different (ADS-PC, 0.75; MMSE, 0.56). The MMSE failed to identify five times as many cases of dementia as the ADS-PC. When the sensitivities were equated, the specificities differed significantly (ADS-PC, 0.95; MMSE, 0.73). The MMSE misclassified five times as many noncases as the ADS-PC. This pattern of significantly higher sensitivity and specificity for the ADS-PC than for the MMSE was repeated in the results according to race and for individuals with high school or more education but not in individuals with less education.The ADS-PC outperformed the MMSE in identifying early dementia in a racially and educationally diverse primary care cohort.The validity of psychometric instruments for detection of dementia in the elderly general population.To compare the validity of different instruments for screening and diagnosis of dementia and to provide threshold scores for these purposes, ie screening focusing on a high sensitivity and diagnosis focusing on a high specificity.287 subjects from a general population sample who had completed more than one of these psychometric tests.The performances of the Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of Dementia of the Alzheimer Type, Multi-Infarct Dementia and Dementias of Other Aetiology according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R, the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Blessed Dementia Rating Scale, the Global Deterioration Scale, the Verbal Fluency Test, the Word list Learning Task, the Trail Making Test and the Labyrinth Test were compared using receiver operating characteristics analysis.The validity of composite instruments for the discrimination of dementia and cognitive health was higher than the validity of individual tests. However, some cognitive tests, ie verbal fluency and immediate recall of words, reached a high validity, making them useful and short screening instruments for dementia.There is no perfect instrument for screening and diagnosis of dementia. Different threshold scores for different purposes were provided in the present study. Recommendations for improving the validity of the Delayed Word List Learning Task for discriminating dementia and cognitive health include the expansion of list length and shortening of delay.A comparison of five clock scoring methods using ROC (receiver operating characteristic) curve analysis.To compare the accuracy of five clock scoring methods for detecting dementia in English-speaking patients.A prospective cohort study.A general geriatric outpatient clinic in southwest Sydney, Australia.A total of 127 consecutive new referrals to the clinic, of mean age 78.2 years.The clock drawing test was conducted at the beginning of each clinic appointment by a blinded observer. Each patient was then assessed by a geriatrician, who collected demographic data, administered the modified Barthel index, the geriatric depression scale, and the Folstein Mini-Mental State Examination, and categorised each patient as demented or not demented, according to DSM-4 criteria. Each clock was scored according to the methods of Mendez, Shulman, Sunderland, Watson and Wolf-Klein, and evaluated for reliability, and predictive accuracy, using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.The area under the ROC curve was largest for the Shulman (0.79, 95% CI 0.70-0.85) and Mendez (0.78, 95% CI 0.70-0.85) methods. Both predicted dementia more accurately than the Sunderland (area = 0.71) and Watson (area = 0.65) methods (p < 0.05). The inter-rater (0.81-0.93) and intra-rater (0.87-0.96) correlation coefficients were high for all five methods.While substantial differences among the clock scoring methods were evident in our sample, the accuracy of each was modest at best. Unless further studies in relevant settings suggest otherwise, we caution on the use of clock drawing alone to screen for dementia.Psychometric analysis of the selective reminding procedure in a sample from the general elderly population.The selective reminding procedure (SRP) has been proposed for the assessment of distinct aspects of episodic memory, i.e. storage to and retrieval from short-term and long-term memory, item learning and list learning, and as dementia screening tool. In the present study SRP results were analysed in 256 probands from the general elderly population. SRP scores were highly intercorrelated, and principal component analysis yielded only one single factor. The SRP scores were moderately and not differentially correlated with immediate and delayed free recall and recognition and with verbal fluency. All SRP scores discriminated nondemented probands with episodic long-term memory impairment from those without. The MMSE performed significantly better than any SRP score in detecting dementia. The theory-based assumption that the SRP allows assessment of different, independent aspects of memory could not be validated. It is suggested that the SRP is a mixed measure of semantic memory, episodic long-term and short-term memory, and working memory, and that the different SRP scores do not allow to assess different memory functions. Thus, the SRP may neither be recommended for assessment of different subfunctions of memory nor for dementia screening.Mild dementia or cognitive impairment: the Modified Mini-Mental State examination (3MS) as a screen for dementia.To examine the Modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS) as a screen for dementia.A group of 1092 elderly Edmonton community residents completed the 3MS and the Geriatric Mental State Examination (GMS). 3MS sensitivity and specificity were determined by comparing positive 3MS screens (score < or = 77) with those classified as GMS "organic" (severity level 3, equivalent to a clinical diagnosis). In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging (CSHA), 2914 subjects received the 3MS and a clinical examination. A group described as having "cognitive impairment but no dementia (CIND)" was identified.In Edmonton, the 3MS showed 88% sensitivity, 90% specificity, 29% positive predictive value (PPV), and 99% negative predictive value (NPV). In the CSHA, 30% of subjects receiving both the 3MS and a clinical examination were classified as CIND. One-half of these were classified as having "age associated memory impairment (AAMI)" or as "unspecified."The 3MS with a cutting score of 77/78 proved a reasonable screening instrument; 1 case in 3 screening "positive" has dementia, but few (0.64%) will be missed by screening "negative." CIND, accounting for 2 out of 3 cases screened positive by the 3MS in the Edmonton study, is a substantial, heterogeneous group that is not necessarily "predementia" but that in many cases merits further investigation.Executive function impairment in community elderly subjects with questionable dementia.The neurocognitive profile of community-dwelling Chinese subjects with 'questionable' dementia was studied.One hundred and fifty-four ambulatory Chinese subjects were recruited from local social centers for the elderly. Each subject was examined using the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR), the Cantonese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination (CMMSE), the Chinese version of the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive Subscale (ADAS-Cog), the Category Verbal Fluency Test (CVFT), digit and visual span tests, and the Cambridge Neurological Inventory. The neurocognitive profile of nondemented subjects (CDR 0) was compared with that of subjects with 'questionable' dementia (CDR 0.5).Subjects with 'questionable' dementia were older, and had lower educational levels and global cognitive assessment scores than the controls (CMMSE and ADAS-Cog; t tests, p < 0.001). In addition, they also had significantly lower scores in delayed recall, reverse span, verbal fluency tests and worse performance in complex motor tasks related to executive function (Mann-Whitney tests, p < 0.001). Logistic regression analysis revealed that ADAS-Cog, CVFT, and reverse visual span were significant predictors for the CDR of 'questionable' dementia.Aside from memory impairment, executive function deficits were also present in subjects with 'questionable' dementia. To identify groups cognitively at risk for dementia, concomitant assessments of memory and executive function are suggested.Videoconference-based mini mental state examination: a validation study.Neuropsychological testing is a prime criterion of good practice to document cognitive deficits in a rapidly aging population. Telecommunication technologies may overcome limitations related to test administration. We compared performance of the Italian videoconference-based version of the Mini Mental State Examination (VMMSE) with performance of the standard MMSE administered face-to-face (F2F), to validate the Italian version of the 28-item VMMSE.To validate the Italian version of the VMMSE, we compared its performance with standard F2F. The sample (n=342) was administered three VMMSEs within 6 weeks after F2F testing. We identified the optimal cutoff through the receiver operating characteristic curve, as well as the VMMSE consistency through inter- and intrarater reliability (Inter/RR and Intra/RR) analysis.We found high levels of sensitivity and specificity for the optimal VMMSE cutoff identification and an accuracy of 0.96 (95% confidence interval 0.94-0.98). Intra/RR and inter/RR were highly significant.This study demonstrates that VMMSE is a valid instrument in clinical and research screening and monitoring of subjects affected by cognitive disorders. This study shows a significant correlation between videoconference assessment and the F2F one, providing an important impetus to expand studies and the knowledge about the usefulness of tele-assistance services. Our findings have important implications for both longitudinal assistance and clinical care of demented patients.Cognitive screening for dementia and mild cognitive impairment in assisted living: comparison of 3 tests.Compare diagnostic characteristics of brief cognitive screening tests in residential care/assisted living (RC/AL) residents.Cross-sectional study involving a comprehensive clinical examination to ascertain a consensus diagnosis of probable dementia, no significant cognitive impairment, or mild cognitive impairment (MCI), including both amnestic and non-amnestic subtypes.Fourteen RC/AL facilities in North Carolina.Participants were 146 RC/AL residents, aged 65 years or older, who did not have diagnosed cognitive impairment.Diagnostic characteristics of the Mini-Cog, the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE), and a new 50-point test based on expanding selected MMSE items (MMX).Overall, 55/146 (38%) participants were diagnosed with probable dementia, and 76 (52%) met criteria for MCI (most non-amnestic). Both the Mini-Cog and the MMSE showed high sensitivity and negative predictive value for dementia, but had relatively low sensitivity and negative predictive value for MCI. The Mini-Cog had low specificity and was less accurate as a dementia screen than either the MMSE or MMX. Reliability and validity data for the MMX were satisfactory, and it performed better as a screening test for MCI than either the MMSE or Mini-Cog.Although the MMSE and Mini-Cog are both sensitive to dementia, modest specificity and positive predictive value may limit their utility as screening tools. Preliminary MMX data suggest it improves screening for MCI compared to the Mini-Cog or MMSE, while providing a similar level of screening for dementia. Further work is needed to identify suitable instruments for cognitive screening across the range of MCI and dementia.The Clock Drawing Test: utility for dementia detection in multiethnic elders.Disproportionate increases in dementia morbidity in ethnic minorities challenge established screening methodologies because of language and culture barriers, varying access to health services, and a relative paucity of cross-cultural data validating their use. Simple screening techniques adapted to a range of health and social service settings would accelerate dementia detection and social and health services planning for demented minority elders.The effectiveness of the Clock Drawing Test (CDT) for dementia detection was compared with that of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI) in community-dwelling elders of diverse linguistic, ethnic, and educational backgrounds. Subjects (N = 295) were tested at home in their native languages (English, n = 141; another language, n = 154). An informant-based clinical dementia history and functional severity index derived from the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) protocols were used to classify subjects as probably demented (n = 170), and probably not demented (n = 125).All tests were significantly affected by education (p < .001) but not by primary language (p > .05). Sensitivities and specificities for probable dementia were 82% and 92%, respectively, for the CDT; 92% and 92% for the MMSE; and 93% and 97% for the CASI for subjects completing each test. However, in poorly educated non-English speakers, the CDT detected demented subjects with higher sensitivity than the two longer instruments (sensitivity and specificity 85% and 94% for the CDT, 46% and 100% for the MMSE, and 75% and 95% for the CASI). Moreover less information was lost due to noncompletion of the CDT than the MMSE or CASI (severe dementia or refusal: CDT 8%, MMSE 12%, and CASI 16%).Overall, the CDT may be as effective as the MMSE or CASI as a first-level dementia screen for clinical use in multiethnic, multilingual samples of older adults. Its brevity (1-5 minutes), minimal language requirements, high acceptability, and lack of dependence on specialized testing materials are well adapted for screening of non-English-speaking elderly persons in settings where bilingual interpreters are not readily available and screening time is at a premium.Limitations of the Mini-Mental State Examination in diagnosing dementia in general practice.The aim of the study was to investigate the value of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) for use by general practitioners (GPs) in a group of elderly patients in whom the GPs are considering a dementia diagnosis. The study population consisted of 533 elderly patients (aged 65 and older) judged by 36 GPs as suffering from 'minimal to severe' dementia. Cross-sectional data were used to determine the criterion validity of separate items, a set of items and the total MMSE. The GMS/AGECAT diagnosis was used as an external criterion. MMSE items were analysed and two items testing general knowledge were added. The most effective set of items was determined using a stepwise logistic regression analysis. Adjusted for age, sex and education, the differentiating ability of the set of items was compared to that of the total MMSE score. The total MMSE score was divided into three categories (cutoffs 21/22 and 26/27) and into two categories (cutoff 23/24). In total, 114 patients (21%) were diagnosed as having an 'organic syndrome' by the GMS/AGECAT. The differentiating ability of separate items was poor. The following combination of items had the best predictive ability: items concerning the date, the day of the week, the patient's address and the current prime minister. This set of items was just as adequate in differentiating dementia from non-dementia as the total MMSE score (sensitivity 64.9% and 64.8% respectively, specificity 96.4% and 93.3%). The value of the MMSE in diagnosing dementia in general practice is limited. The score on cognitive test items can be one aspect of the individual's overall clinical picture, on which the diagnosis should be based.The prevalence of dementia in older people in an urban population of Korea: the Seoul study.To estimate prevalence of dementia and its subtypes in older people in Seoul, a metropolitan area of Korea, and compare these findings with estimates reported for other populations.The study employed a two-stage design for case identification. Initially, the Mini-Mental State Examination in the Korean version (MMSE-KC) of the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) assessment packet was administered to all participants. Two hundred seventeen persons sampled from three levels of performance on MMSE-KC underwent the second-stage clinical evaluation based on the Korean Version of the CERAD assessment packet.The study was conducted in an urban community setting.Six hundred forty-three persons aged 65 and over participated in the study.Dementia was defined using the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition diagnostic features of dementia.Dementia prevalence ranged from 2.6% in persons aged 65 to 69 to 32.6% in persons aged 85 and older. Age-standardized prevalence was 8.2% for dementia, 5.4% for Alzheimer's disease, and 2.0% for vascular dementia. The prevalence estimates, which excluded very mild cases (clinical dementia rating index 0.5), were approximately 5.3% for dementia and 4.3% for Alzheimer's disease.The prevalence of dementia in older people in Seoul appears to be somewhat lower than in rural areas of Korea. Considering the difficulties involved in establishing a diagnostic threshold for dementia, actual differences in dementia prevalence between Asian populations are probably minimal.Identification of factorial structure of MMSE based on elderly cognitive destiny: the Italian Longitudinal Study on Aging.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is one of the most commonly used instruments in the evaluation of global cognitive status, but only few studies have investigated the relationship among its components in terms of factorial structure. We have considered data from the Italian Longitudinal Study on Aging (ILSA), carried out in Italy in 1992 on a sample of 5,632 subjects aged 65-84 years, and followed up in 1996. The aim of our study was to investigate static factorial structure in three groups of elderly (subjects with a diagnosis of dementia at baseline; subjects free of dementia at baseline, but incident cases at follow-up; subjects who never developed dementia during the 4-year follow-up). Considering our results, we could hypothesize that MMSE static structure reflects the cognitive profile of elderly, and is thus influenced by subjects' potential to develop dementia.The mini-cog: a cognitive 'vital signs' measure for dementia screening in multi-lingual elderly.The Mini-Cog, a composite of three-item recall and clock drawing, was developed as a brief test for discriminating demented from non-demented persons in a community sample of culturally, linguistically, and educationally heterogeneous older adults.All 129 who met criteria for probable dementia based on informant interviews and 120 with no history of cognitive decline were included; 124 were non-English speakers.Sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic value of the Mini-Cog were compared with those of the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI).The Mini-Cog had the highest sensitivity (99%) and correctly classified the greatest percentage (96%) of subjects. Moreover, its diagnostic value was not influenced by education or language, while that of the CASI was adversely influenced by low education, and both education and language compromised the diagnostic value of the MMSE. Administration time for the Mini-Cog was 3 minutes vs 7 minutes for the MMSE.The Mini-Cog required minimal language interpretation and training to administer, and no test forms of scoring modifications were needed to compensate for the extensive linguistic and educational heterogeneity of the sample. Validation in clinical and population-based samples is warranted, as its brevity and ease of administration suggest that the Mini-Cog might be readily incorporated into general practice and senior care settings as a routine 'cognitive vital signs' measure.Validity of the Mini-Mental State examination as a screening instrument for cognitive impairment and dementia in French elderly community residents.A survey was made of 2,792 subjects aged 65 and older living in the community of Gironde (South-Western France). The predictive value of the Mini-Mental state examination (MMS) as a screening instrument for the detection of cognitive impairment was tested against DSM-III criteria for dementing syndromes. Of the 2,792 subjects who consented to participate in the study, 101 met the DSM-III criteria for dementia, giving a 3.62% prevalence rate. With an MMS threshold of 24, the sensitivity was 100%, the specificity was 78%, and the positive predictive value was equal to 15%. Using the same MMS threshold, 572 subjects (85%) were false-positive for the diagnosis of dementia. A multiple logistic regression analysis revealed that age, sex, depressive symptomatology and educational level were independently correlated with false-positive cases of the MMS. Several issues are raised for using the MMS as the only screening instrument for cognitive impairment in elderly community residents.Factors associated with inconsistent diagnosis of dementia between physicians and neuropsychologists.To explore reasons for discrepancy in the diagnosis of cognitive impairment between physicians and neuropsychologists.Retrospective analysis of national survey data.Canadian Study of Health and Aging Phase 1, a national survey of community-dwelling and institutionalized older Canadians.1879 subjects who completed all components of a clinical examination.Data available to both disciplines (demographic data, functional status, Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS), schedule H of the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination (CAMDEX)), results of the physician's history and physical examination, and results of a psychometric test battery. Subjects were classified as No Cognitive Impairment, Cognitive Impairment Not Dementia (CIND), and Dementia, the latter according to the criteria of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual, 3rd Ed., Revised. Preliminary diagnoses by physicians and neuropsychologists were compared.In univariate modeling, higher education increased consistency. Lower scores on the 3MS, depression reported in the CAMDEX, focal neurological signs, and all neuropsychological variables decreased agreement. In multivariate modeling, higher education and identification of long-term memory impairment by the neuropsychologist increased agreement; lower scores on the 3MS, depression reported on the CAMDEX, and identification of short-term memory impairment or constructional impairment led to disagreement. When the category of CIND was removed, kappa for agreement increased from 0.51 to 0.92.Physicians and neuropsychologists have different, complementary approaches to the diagnosis of dementia, and a consensus approach should be used. The category of CIND requires elucidation. Identification of dementia in subjects with depression or low education is difficult, and new strategies are required.[Mini mental state examination and the diagnosis of dementia in Brazil].The diagnosis of dementia is based on the presence of memory deficits and decline of other cognitive functions. Many scales have been designed to aid the clinician in the assessment of at risk subjects, such as the elderly. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is the most widely used of such scales, although its use as an aid to the diagnosis of dementia has not as yet been studied in a Brazilian sample of patients. The current study was designed with 2 main aims: (1) to determine the best cut-off point of the MMSE for the diagnosis of dementia in a sample of elderly subjects assessed in a mental health outpatient unit and; (2) evaluate the impact of age and schooling on MMSE scores. Two hundred and eleven subjects aged 60 or over assessed at the Mental Health Outpatient Unit for the elderly at "Santa Casa de São Paulo" between February 1997 and February 1998 were included in the study. They were assessed with the SRQ-20, MMSE, and a clinical interview for the diagnosis of dementia according to the ICD-10. Seventy patients received the diagnosis of dementia. The MMSE cut-off point of 23/24 (cases/non-cases) was associated with a sensitivity of 84.3% and specificity of 60.3%. MMSE scores were associated with age (r = -0.41, p < 0.001) and schooling (F = 12.69, p < 0.001). Analysis of covariance taking age into account showed that MMSE scores were significantly lower among those with no formal education (F = 10.51, p < 0.001). A cut-off point of 19/20 on the MMSE was associated with sensitivity of 80.0% and specificity of 70.9% for the diagnosis of dementia in this particular group. Subjects with previous school history were better classified to the diagnosis of dementia with the cut-off point of 23/24: sensitivity of 77.8% and specificity of 75.4%. The evaluation of elderly subjects with the MMSE should take education into account, and different cut-off points should be used accordingly as a guideline to the diagnosis of dementia.Incidence of mild cognitive impairment and Alzheimer disease in Southern Brazil.The objective of the study was to evaluate incident cases of Alzheimer disease (AD) and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) in an elderly community cohort in a major city of southern Brazil and to determine the variables associated with the development of cognitive dysfunction. Data were drawn from a cohort to investigate healthy aging among community elderly (N = 345) and were derived from the follow-up for a maximum of 8 years. Sociodemographic, psychiatric and medical information, the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), and the Clinical Dementia Rating scale were obtained in each assessment. The Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (Fourth Edition; DSM-IV), NINCDS-ADRDA (National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and the Alzheimer's Disease and related Disorders Association), and the Mayo Clinic criteria were applied to ascertain diagnoses of AD and MCI. The incidence rate per 1000 persons-year for MCI was 13.2 (95% confidence interval [CI] 7.79-20.91) and for AD was 14.8 (95% CI 9.04-22.94). Cognitive dysfunction was associated with education (odds ratio [OR] = 0.86; confidence limit [CL] 0.76-0.97 95%) and baseline MMSE (OR = 0.81; CL 0.70-0.94 95%). The AD incidence in this sample was higher than those reported in a previous Brazilian study. The study filled the epidemiological gap in the evaluation of MCI in Brazil.[Mini-Cog: a simple method for very brief screening of mental decline].Physicians do not detect majority of the demented people, and many patients appear only in an advanced stage of their mental decline at the first medical visit. Role of general practitioner is crucial; a brief and effective screening method can basically change the present situation. Borson et al (2000) has investigated a new, very brief method named Mini-Cog that consists of the combination of the 3-word recall and the clock-drawing test.of the present study was to evaluate this method in Hungarian patient population.Authors have analysed the charts of patients examined by the first author in the outpatient part of the Memory clinic of the National Institute of Psychiatry and Neurology in a 2-year interval (between 11.01. 1999 and 31.10.2001). Data of 186 patients were analysed. From the Mini-Mental State the total score, score of three-word recall (possible scores between 0-3), serial counting backward with 7 from 100 were taken into consideration; the clock-drawing test was analysed quantitatively (1 = failure, 2 = borderland, 3 = acceptable solution).The algorithm which considers the patient demented if she or he does not remember of any word, or remembers only of 1-2 and the clock-drawing is pathologic, has a high sensitivity (100%) and specificity (80.9%) in cases using the < or = 24 Mini-Mental State value, while the sensitivity and specificity is 98.8% and 88.0% respectively if drawing the limit at < or = 26 points. Combination of the two tests (word-recall, clock drawing) gives a better value than either of them alone. Based on their experiences they propose to apply in a short test the serial backwards with seven from 100 too, while patients with very high Mini-Mental State scores (29-30) not infrequently can not perfectly solve this subtest (7/11 = 64 p.c.).In agreement with the Hungarian Protocol for diagnosing and treating dementias (1999) authors stress the importance of the consultation with a specialist (neurologist or psychiatrist) in cases of suspected dementia to reveal the underlying disease.Validation of a 6 item cognitive impairment test with a view to primary care usage.To validate the 6 Item Cognitive Impairment Test (6CIT) against the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) with a view to usage as a screening tool.Three groups with varying levels of dementia were tested using the MMSE, 6CIT and Global Deterioration Scale (GDS).Testing was carried out within Wiltshire, both in the community and outpatients.Patients were selected from a hospital database of dementia patients and were stratified into two groups according to GDS; a control group was also tested.Two hundred and eighty-seven patients were tested: 135 controls (GDS 1-2), 70 with mild dementia (GDS 3-5) and 82 with more severe dementia (GDS 6-7). The 6CIT and MMSE were found to correlate well, r(2)=-0.911 (p<0.01), when all groups were analysed. Correlation falls to r(2)=-0.754 (p<0.01) in the mild dementia group. In the GDS 3-5 group, the MMSE has a sensitivity and specificity of 51.43% and 100% respectively (cutoff 23/24). The 6CIT gives a sensitivity and specificity of 78.57% and 100% (cutoff 7/8).The 6CIT is a brief and simple test of cognition, which correlates well with the MMSE but outperforms it in milder dementia. The MMSE is of little value as a screening test for dementia.The cognitive assessment screening test (CAST) for dementia.The purpose of this study was to assess the usefulness, the sensitivity, and the specificity of the Cognitive Assessment. Screening Test (CAST), a paper-and-pencil self-administered cognitive test designed to screen elderly people for possible dementia, for use in general physicians' offices, requiring little expertise or staff time. CAST consists of three parts: part A (relatively easy), part B (more demanding), and part C (self-report of concerns). CAST was administered in two studies to: (1) 19 patients known to be mildly to moderately demented versus 24 age-matched normal controls (to establish cutoff standards); and (2) a "real world" sample of 26 elderly patients not known to be demented, attending a general medicine clinic. The sensitivity and specificity of CAST were compared with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Blessed Dementia Scale cognitive portion (BDS-cog). In study 1, controls were given a detailed neuropsychological battery; in study 2, all patients were given the neuropsychological battery, which served as the "gold standard" to identify individuals with cognitive impairment. In study 1, the cutoff scores for dementia using CAST (Parts A and B) were established. CAST discriminated demented patients from controls with a sensitivity of 95% and a specificity of 88%; the MMSE had a sensitivity of 74% and a specificity of 100%; and the BDS-cog had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 96%. In study 2, CAST discriminated cognitive impairment with a sensitivity of 88% and a specificity of 100%, the MMSE had a sensitivity of 38% and a specificity of 100%; and the BDS-cog had a sensitivity of 50% and a specificity of 94%. Part C was not used to discriminate demented from normal elderly individuals, but to screen for those concerned about their cognitive functioning. CAST is highly useful as a dementia screening test, with sensitivity and specificity equal to or better than the MMSE and BDS-cog, yet requiring minimal examiner time and little training or experience to administer.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.[The Mini Mental Status test inadequate as screening test for cognitive deterioration in a neurological department].To study the validity of the Mini-mental state (MMS) in a neurological population.Comparing the results of a neuropsychological examination and the MMS score.Departments of Neurology/Neuropsychology of the University Hospital Leiden.One hundred and forty-seven patients participated in the study. One hundred and eight patients were classified into two diagnostic groups according to the deterioration index (obtained from test results of the neuropsychological examination) and DSM-III-R criteria: 63 patients had dementia, 45 did not; the other 39 patients were found to have specific cognitive impairments and were excluded from the group comparisons. The discriminative powers of the deterioration index and the MMS were compared; sensitivity and specificity were determined with several cut-off scores of the MMS.The MMS had limited power to discriminate between demented and non-demented patients. The MMS score was strongly related to premorbid intelligence, occupational level and age. Increasing the original cut-off score to 25 points improved sensitivity and specificity to 79% and 84% respectively (with the original cut-off level these were 68% and 93%).The diagnostic value of the MMS is limited, especially in patients for whom a correct diagnosis is most relevant.Correcting the 3MS for bias does not improve accuracy when screening for cognitive impairment or dementia.We investigated the effects of correcting for demographic biases on the sensitivity and specificity of the Modified Mini Mental Status Exam (3MS) using a sample of English-speaking older adults (N=8901) from the Canadian Studies of Health and Aging. The sensitivity and specificity of the original 3MS were compared to the 3MS regression-adjusted for the influence of demographic variables and then to 3MS percentiles based on published normative data with age and education corrected cutoff scores. According to receiver operating characteristic curve analyses, the regression-adjusted 3MS was no more accurate than the original 3MS when screening for dementia, and it was less accurate when screening for cognitive impairment. The use of 3MS percentiles based on normative data with age and education corrected cut-off points were less accurate than the original 3MS when screening for both cognitive impairment and when screening for dementia.The prevalence of dementia in Belgium: a population-based door-to-door survey in a rural community.The project Epidemiology Research on Dementia in Antwerp (ERDA) estimated the prevalence of dementia in a random, population-based sample, stratified for age and sex. The sample of 1,736 elderly was screened at home with the Mini-Mental State Examination. All elderly under the cutoff of 23-24/30 got a diagnostic examination with the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination and the DSM-IIIR criteria. The prevalence of dementia in the population above 65 years was estimated at 9%. The following age-specific prevalences of dementia (included mild dementia) were found in the age-groups 65-69, 70-74, 75-79, 80-84, 85+: 0.6, 5.1, 7.6, 16.2 and 33.6%. The prevalence of at least moderate dementia was 0.3, 3.9, 4.0, 11.2 and 25.0%, respectively. The prevalence of dementia, vascular dementia and dementia of the Alzheimer type was markedly higher in women than in men.Which two questions of Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) should we start from?The MMSE is a simple and commonly used instrument to evaluate cognitive impairment. With the aim of enabling the examiner to skip a large portion of the MMSE when screening subjects with lower possibility of cognitive impairment, we examined the internal distribution of the MMSE scores among 792 older adults visiting a teaching hospital, a long-term care hospital, nursing homes, and a geriatric clinic. The correlation coefficients between the summed scores of any two items of MMSE and the total score were compared. A receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was drawn to show the sensitivity and the specificity of predicting cognitive impairment, which was defined by the total MMSE score being less than 24. The mean MMSE score was 20.5 +/- 6.9 (+/-S.D.). A good predictor for cognitive impairment was the summed scores of the time orientation and serial sevens with a sensitivity of 98.2% and a specificity of 69.2% if cut-off was set at 7/7+. This finding appears to help streamline the screening process for cognitive impairment in general elderly population.[Mini-Mental State Examination: psychometric characteristics in elderly outpatients].To assess the psychometric characteristics of the Mini-Mental State Examination in elderly outpatients who seek primary health care.A total of 303 subjects (>65 years) underwent comprehensive geriatric assessment with functional tools, including Mini-Mental State Examination. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and ROC curve were calculated.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and area under ROC curve were 80.8%, 65.3%, 44.7%, 90.7% and 0.807 respectively (cutoff point =23/24). The best cutoff point for illiterate was 18/19 (sensitivity =73.5%; specificity =73.9%); and for literate was 24/25 (sensitivity =75%; specificity =69.7%).While screening elderly outpatients for dementia, schooling must be considered in the choice of the best cutoff point in the Mini-Mental State Examination.Sensitivity and specificity for dementia of population-based criteria for cognitive impairment: the MoVIES project.Few norms exist for the elderly on the cognitive tests commonly used to screen for dementia; conventional cutpoints used in clinical settings may be of limited value in population screening. A particular problem is posed by elderly populations with low educational levels, as performance on most cognitive tests is affected by education. Thus, a healthy but poorly educated population may obtain test scores in the range considered impaired in the clinical setting.A random sample of 1,367 subjects aged 65+ years was screened for dementia in a rural community in Southwestern Pennsylvania. Two sets of cognitive measures were used: a global cognitive scale (the MMSE) and a brief battery of tests tapping a variety of cognitive domains. Rather than using a priori cutoff scores, we examined the specificity and sensitivity for dementia of two operationally defined levels of cognitive impairment, at the 5th and 10th percentiles of the study sample on each set of measures.Results suggest that the screening of multiple cognitive domains at the 10th percentile had significantly greater sensitivity but not lower specificity for definite dementia than did the use of the single global scale.Our data support the use of population-based cutpoints over standard cutoff scores, in that the global scale at the conventional cutoff was less sensitive than the battery at the same percentile, and because adequate norms do not exist for tests such as those in the battery.The psychogeriatric assessment scales (PAS): further data on psychometric properties and validity from a longitudinal study of the elderly.The PAS is a standardized interview which assesses the changes seen in dementia and depression using a set of scales. There are three scales derived from an interview with the subject (cognitive impairment, depression, stroke) and three from an interview with an informant (cognitive decline, behaviour change, stroke). The aim was to provide data on the psychometric properties and validity of the PAS. The scales were originally developed using data from the first wave of a longitudinal study of the elderly. Reported here are further data on the PAS from the second wave of the same study, carried out 3 1/2 years later. The setting was a community survey carried out in the Australian city of Canberra. Seven hundred and nine elderly persons, with a mean age of 80 years, and 641 informants participated. Besides the PAS, participants were administered several other scales: the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly, the National Adult Reading Test and the Goldberg anxiety and depression scales. Diagnoses of dementia and depression were made with the Canberra Interview for the Elderly, from which the PAS is derived. Confirmatory factor analysis replicated the five-factor model which underpins the PAS. The PAS was found to correlate with the other scales having similar content and showed correspondence with diagnoses of dementia and depression derived from the Canberra Interview for the Elderly. Longitudinal data supported the validity of the cognitive decline scale as a measure of change. Overall, the results support the original psychometric and validity research on the PAS.Detecting dementia with the mini-mental state examination in highly educated individuals.To evaluate the utility of Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores in detecting cognitive dysfunction in a sample of highly educated individuals.Archival data were reviewed on 4248 participants enrolled in the Mayo Clinic Alzheimer Disease Research Center and Alzheimer Disease Patient Registry.A total of 1141 primarily white (93%) individuals with 16 or more years of self-reported education were identified. These included 307 (164 men and 143 women) patients with dementia (any type), 176 (106 men and 70 women) patients with mild cognitive impairment, and 658 (242 men and 416 women) control participants without dementia.Mayo Clinic Alzheimer Disease Research Center and Alzheimer Disease Patient Registry cohort.Diagnostic accuracy estimates (sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive power) of MMSE cut scores in detecting cognitive dysfunction.In this sample of highly educated, largely white older adults, the standard MMSE cut score of 24 (23 or below) yielded a sensitivity of 0.66, a specificity of 0.99, and an overall correct classification rate of 89% in detecting dementia. A cut score of up to 27 (26 or below) resulted in an optimal balance of sensitivity and specificity (0.89 and 0.91, respectively) with an overall correct classification rate of 90%. In a cognitively impaired group (dementia and mild cognitive impairment), a cut score of 27 (sensitivity, 0.69; specificity, 0.91) or 28 (sensitivity and specificity, 0.78) might be more appropriate.Older patients with a college education who present with complaints of cognitive decline (reported by themselves or others) and score less than 27 on the MMSE are at a greater risk of being diagnosed with dementia and should be referred for a comprehensive dementia evaluation, including formal neuropsychological testing.Relation between education and dementia: the role of test bias revisited.Several authors have suggested that dementia screening tests may be biased against low levels of education, whereas others find that a low level of education is a genuine risk factor for dementia. The present paper attempts to reconcile these conflicting views by examining item bias and test bias indices of the mini mental state examination (MMSE). Psychometric calculations and receiver operating characteristics (ROC) analyses of sensitivity and specificity as performed by earlier studies were replicated and extended from the database of the Amsterdam Study of the Elderly. This is a population survey on cognitive decline and dementia (age range 65-84). Subjects with a low level of education (primary school) were compared with better educated subjects (at least some secondary education). Cases were matched by age and sex. The results indicate that the MMSE is not educationally biased as far as item characteristics, reliability, and construct validity are concerned. Yet its predictive validity as a screening test for dementia is educationally biased. This bias will effectively be eliminated with a two point higher cut off score for the subjects whose education extends beyond primary school. Even after such score correction, a low level of education probably remains a genuine risk factor for dementia.Effects of sequential neuropsychological testing of an elderly community-based sample.The magnitude and importance of changes in scores of neuropsychological tests on retest in the elderly, especially over long time periods, is not well established. Three neuropsychological tests and one mental status test were initially administered to screen for potential dementia and were readministered to 380 of the surviving individuals 2.4 years later who either failed the screening examination or were an age matched control. Of the 380 women and men aged 65 and older, 56 were diagnosed as having Alzheimer disease (AD), 82 as at risk for developing AD, and 242 as having normal cognition. The present report focuses on changes in test scores between the two visits. In the normal and at risk groups, significant improvements were seen on retest of the Visual Reproduction Test (VRT), the Trails B test, and the Mini-Mental Status examination; verbal fluency decreased, and savings score of the VRT showed small variations. On most tests, scores of the AD group decreased. Practice effects, biases, and other variables may have played a role in the improvements seen in those labeled normal and at risk. If these results are confirmed, savings score of the VRT (which remained stable over time in normals and individuals at risk and decreased in patients with dementia) and verbal fluency (which decreased in all groups) may be better measures of true cognitive performance than the other tests that we evaluated.The validity of informant report for grading the severity of Alzheimer's dementia.The validity of informant-based techniques has been established for the detection of dementia cases by non-pathological individuals, but is still controversial for the assessment of the severity of dementia. This study aimed at ascertaining whether informant-based evaluation (the so-called informant report) of the cognitive and behavioral impairment of a patient is valid for grading the severity of dementia, and consistent with objective assessment of the patient's cognitive and behavioral functioning. We enrolled 96 community-dwelling outpatients and 56 controls assessed at the Geriatric Evaluation Unit of the University of Modena, Italy. All patients scored lower than 27 on the MMSE, and met DSM-IV inclusion criteria for Alzheimer's dementia. Patients and controls were administered the CAMDEX interview, containing a section which collects participant (patient or control) and informant evaluations on dementia-related cognitive and behavioral deficits. The informant report resulted effective at MANOVA for grading the severity of dementia in 4 of its 5 measures (namely, memory, everyday activities, general mental functioning and depressed mood), and was correlated with the scores of several scales of the CAMDEX cognitive section (i.e., CAMCOG). Instead, the participant's (patient or control) report showed a lower capacity for grading dementia, and was poorly correlated with the psychometric outcomes of cognitive functioning. On the whole, the results corroborated the validity of the informant report in the diagnostic work-up for grading dementia, given its sensitivity to the severity of dementia, and its consistency with cognitive psychometric outcomes.Comparison of the Saint Louis University Mental Status Examination, the Mini-Mental State Examination, and the Montreal Cognitive Assessment in detection of cognitive impairment in Chinese elderly from the geriatric department.The Saint Louis University Mental Status (SLUMS) examination is a popular screening scale for cognitive impairment in North America but has not been studied in Chinese populations. The aim of this study is to compare consistency of the SLUMS with the Chinese version of Mini-Mental Status Examination (CMMSE) and the Beijing version of Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA-B) in Chinese elderly.Two hundred seventy-eight Chinese elderly with chronic diseases and geriatric syndromes from the geriatrics department were screened for cognitive impairment, including dementia and mild cognitive impairment, using SLUMS, CMMSE, and MoCA-B. The modified education level cutoff in the diagnostic criteria of SLUMS (mSLUMS) was explored. Scores of the scales and classifications for cognitive status by them were compared using Spearman and κ statistics, respectively.Spearman correlation coefficient between scores of the scales were 0.747 (SLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .001), 0.839 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .001), and 0.773 (CMMSE vs MoCA-B, P < .001). For detection of dementia, κ values were 0.462 (SLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .000) and 0.484 (mSLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .000). For mild cognitive impairment, κ values were 0.123 (SLUMS vs CMMSE plus MoCA-B in parallel, P = .089) and 0.148 (mSLUMS vs CMMSE plus MoCA-B in parallel, P = .031). For all cognitive impairment, κ values were 0.562 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .000) and 0.650 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .000).Findings from our study indicate that the scores of SLUMS are fairly consistent with MoCA-B and CMMSE in Chinese elderly. Discrepancies of classifications for cognitive status by SLUMS and the other 2 scales implies that further work is needed to explore optimal cutoffs of SLUMS for screening mild cognitive impairment and dementia in elderly Chinese.A longitudinal population study of the mini-mental state examination in the very old: relation to dementia and education.We examined the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in relation to the prevalence and incidence of dementia in a representative population sample (n = 494), followed from age 85 to 88. The study included a neuropsychiatric examination (including the MMSE) and a key informant interview conducted by a psychiatrist. Dementia was defined according to the DSM-III-R. Among non-demented 85-year-olds, 75% of those who scored below the cut-off score of 23/24 and 37% of those scoring 24-25 became demented during the follow-up. Non-demented 85-year-olds who did not develop dementia during the following 3 years had a mean decline in MMSE score of 0.6 per year, while those who became demented decreased by 2.3 points per year. A decrease of 4 or more points during the 3 years had a sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 80% for a diagnosis of dementia. High and low MMSE score at base-line was related to a smaller decrease in MMSE score between age 85 and 88. Higher education was related to higher scores on MMSE at age 85 and to a smaller decline in scores between age 85 and 88. Change in MMSE score in non-demented individuals is small especially among individuals with high education. Non-demented individuals scoring below 26 should receive close attention, as a high proportion are at risk of developing dementia.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment and the mini-mental state examination as screening instruments for cognitive impairment: item analyses and threshold scores.To perform an item analysis of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) versus the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the prediction of cognitive impairment, and to examine the characteristics of different MoCA threshold scores.135 subjects enrolled in a longitudinal clinicopathologic study were administered the MoCA by a single physician and the MMSE by a trained research assistant. Subjects were classified as cognitively impaired or cognitively normal based on independent neuropsychological testing.89 subjects were found to be cognitively normal, and 46 cognitively impaired (20 with dementia, 26 with mild cognitive impairment). The MoCA was superior in both sensitivity and specificity to the MMSE, although not all MoCA tasks were of equal predictive value. A MoCA threshold score of 26 had a sensitivity of 98% and a specificity of 52% in this population. In a population with a 20% prevalence of cognitive impairment, a threshold of 24 was optimal (negative predictive value 96%, positive predictive value 47%).This analysis suggests the potential for creating an abbreviated MoCA. For screening in primary care, the MoCA threshold of 26 appears optimal. For testing in a memory disorders clinic, a lower threshold has better predictive value.Reliability and validity of revised Turkish version of Mini Mental State Examination (rMMSE-T) in community-dwelling educated and uneducated elderly.To evaluate the reliability and validity of the revised Turkish version of Mini Mental State Examination (rMMSE-T) in educated and uneducated community-dwelling elderly, to re-organize the present Turkish version of MMSE and to determine cut-off point of the revised test.This cross-sectional and analytical study involved totally 490 elderly subjects selected by cluster sampling method. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, kappa analysis and Cronbach's alpha coefficients were used for statistical analysis.Areas under ROC curve in educated and uneducated elderly were found as 0.953 and 0.907. Cut-off point of 22/23 of rMMSE-T in educated elderly had the highest sensitivity (90.9), specificity (97.0) and positive likelihood ratio (30.3), whereas cut-off point of 18/19 of the test in uneducated elderly had the highest sensitivity (82.7), specificity (92.3) and positive likelihood ratio (10.7). The Cronbach's alpha values of the rMMSE-T for educated and uneducated elderly were higher than 0.7 (sign of good internal consistency of the test). A significant correlations between intrarater and interrater test-retest in educated elderly subjects were observed (0.966 (p = 0.000); 0.855 (p = 0.000), respectively), and also in uneducated elderly (0.988 (p = 0.000); 0.934 (p = 0.000), respectively). Kappa value of the test in educated and uneducated elderly showed a perfect agreement interraters (1.000) and a substantial agreement in intraraters (1.000, 0.784; 0.826, 0.656, respectively).rMMSE-T had a high reliability and validity. It will be more appropriate to use the revised test and the new cut-off point for the diagnosis and screening of dementia among community-dwelling Turkish elderly population.Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination: agreement in a cross-sectional study with an elderly sample.We aimed to compare the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) with the Mini-Cog, measuring agreement in participants' classification, using a general population sample.Cross-sectional evaluation of 609 community dwellers aged ≥60 years was performed by trained interviewers. Cohen's kappa and 95% confidence intervals (CI) were calculated to assess overall agreement, and Cronbach alphas computed to assess reliability. Two-parameter Item Response Theory models (difficulty and discrimination parameters) were used to assess discrimination.Considering MMSE cut-point for scores <24, 3.1% of the participants would be 'cognitive impaired' and 6.2% considering cut-point scores <25. Following Mini-Cog's cut-point score <3, 11.3% would be impaired. For MMSE cut-point <24 and Mini-Cog <3, we observed a Cohen's kappa of 0.116 (95% CI: -0.073 to 0.305), and of 0.258 (95% CI: 0.101-0.415) for cut-point <25. The highest kappa was obtained for cut-point <26 on the MMSE and Mini-Cog <3 (kappa = 0.413). MMSE Cronbach alpha was 0.6108 and Mini-Cog's alpha was 0.2776. Co-calibration according to inherent ability is graphically presented.Agreement between scales seems fragile in our sample. The discriminative and reliability analysis suggests a better performance for subsets of the MMSE compared with the Mini-Cog. Usefulness of calibrated scores is discussed.The validity of the MMSE and SMQ as screening tests for dementia in the elderly general population-- a study of one rural community in Japan.To compare the validity of the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Short-Memory Questionnaire (SMQ) as screening tests to detect dementia in the elderly general population.Six hundred and sixty-two subjects and their informants from the elderly general population sample who had completed these tests.One rural community survey in Japan.We used receiver-operating characteristic analysis to compare the performance of the MMSE and the SMQ with the clinical diagnosis of dementia according to DSM-III-R.The areas under the receiver-operating characteristic curve of the MMSE and the SMQ were 0.980 (SE = 0.006) and 0.982 (SE = 0.008), respectively. This differed from chance to a highly significant degree for both the MMSE and the SMQ, but the difference between the two scales was not statistically significant.As screening tests to detect dementia in the elderly general population, the SMQ which is assessed by informants demonstrates a statistically significant discriminating ability as well as the MMSE.A low, 'normal' score on the Mini-Mental State Examination predicts development of dementia after three years.To study whether a low, "normal" sumscore (i.e., 24 or higher) on the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) near the cutpoint usually employed for identifying persons with cognitive impairment predicts later development of dementia.A prospective study of a random sample of nondemented persons aged 75 years and older, according to DSM-III criteria, with follow-ups after 3 and 6 years.The subjects were 215 persons living at home, mean age 81 years, 81% women. Their mean MMSE sumscore at the start of the study (T0) was 27.9 (range 24-30).A low MMSE sumscore at T0 was identified as a statistically strongly significant predictor of dementia after 3 years (P < .001), when more than 40% of those with a sumscore of 24 or 25 at T0 had become demented. A similar, although weaker and statistically nonsignificant, trend was observed for the risk after 6 years in relation to MMSE scoring at baseline.Persons with a sumscore of 24 or 25 and classified as not suffering from dementia according to the DSM-III criteria are at high risk of developing dementia within 3 years.Validation study of a French version of the modified telephone interview for cognitive status (F-TICS-m) in elderly women.To evaluate the performance of a French version of the modified Telephone Interview for Cognitive Status (F-TICS-m) in identifying cognitive decline among elderly women.All women aged 72-86 participating in the 'Etude Epidémiologique auprès de Femmes de l'Education Nationale' (E3N) cohort and living in or near Paris constituted the target population of the validation study. Volunteer women (n = 120) underwent both a 20-min telephone interview and a face-to-face neuropsychological examination at an interval of few days (median interval: 10 days). The telephone interview included F-TICS-m, as well as a recall of key elements of a short story, arithmetic/verbal problems and two verbal fluency tests. Neuropsychological examination consisted of a standardized battery of cognitive tests (including the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the Free and Cued Selective Reminding Test-FCSRT, Trailmaking tests A and B, the similarities subtest of the Wechsler Adult Intelligence Scale-III, etc.) the Instrumental Activities of Daily Living questionnaire, and the Geriatric Depression Scale. Neuropsychological examination led to classification of each subject as cognitively normal (n = 92) or impaired/demented (n = 28).F-TICS-m showed satisfactory internal consistency (Cronbach's alpha = 0.69). It correlated linearly with MMSE (Pearson's r = 0.72). Concurrent validity against the gold-standard classification was satisfactory, with an area under the ROC curve (AUC) of 0.83. The combination of F-TICS-m and the other telephone tests had no additional effect on discrimination power in our sample (AUC = 0.81).F-TICS-m is a valid instrument for assessing the overall cognitive status of French elderly women. Its validity in men and its reproducibility warrant further studies.Subjective memory complaints in Chinese subjects with mild cognitive impairment and early Alzheimer's disease.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) represents a transitional state between normal aging and dementia. However, there is inconsistent opinion as to the validity of subjective memory complaints as a criterion for diagnosis.This study aimed to examine the potential significance of applying a short memory questionnaire in the assessment of Chinese subjects with MCI and early dementia.Three hundred and six ambulatory Chinese subjects were recruited. Each participant completed a short memory questionnaire. They were also assessed with the Chinese versions of the mini-mental state examination (CMMSE), Alzheimer's disease assessment scale-cognitive subscale (ADAS-Cog), category verbal fluency test (CVFT) and span tests. Severity of cognitive impairment was evaluated using the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR); subjects with CDR 0.5 were further classified into MCI not demented (MCIND) and MCI possible incipient dementia (MCIID) depending on the subscale scores of CDR.An increasing frequency of memory complaints with increasing CDR was observed (Kruskal Wallis test, chi square = 21.29, df 3, p < 0.001). With a cutoff of 3 or more memory complaints, the memory questionnaire demonstrated a sensitivity of 65.3% and 70.4% in identifying subjects with incipient and early dementia respectively. Significant associations between memory complaints and most cognitive test performance were found (Spearman's correlations, p < 0.01). Logistic regression analysis revealed that educational level, the memory questionnaire, ADAS-Cog total and delayed recall scores were significant predictors of MCIID status.The findings suggested that a short memory questionnaire is useful in the screening of MCI, particularly in subjects who already present with subtle functioning disturbances. Subjective memory complaints were significant correlated with objective performance of memory functions, reflecting the usefulness of memory complaints in the assessment of MCI.Performance on the Mini-Mental State Examination and Mattis Dementia Rating Scale among older American Indians.Optimal methods for assessing cognitive impairment among older American Indians have not been established. This study sought to examine the cultural relevance and performance of two common cognitive screening measures, the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Mattis Dementia Rating Scale (MDRS), in one American Indian population. One hundred forty American Indians ages 60 to 89 were assessed; nearly 11% scored more than 2 standard deviation points below performance expectations on the MMSE, as did 27% to 81% on the MDRS. Complex relationships were found between gender, health conditions (with possible effects on cognitive functioning), and MMSE and MDRS scores. The authors discuss implications and future directions.Assessment of instrumental activities of daily living in dementia: diagnostic value of the Amsterdam Instrumental Activities of Daily Living Questionnaire.Measuring impairments in "instrumental activities of daily living" (IADL) is important in dementia, but challenging due to the lack of reliable and valid instruments. We recently developed the Amsterdam Instrumental Activities of Daily Living Questionnaire (A-IADL-Q; note 1). We aim to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of the A-IADL-Q for dementia in a memory clinic setting.Patients visiting the Alzheimer Center of the VU University Medical Center with their informants between 2009 and 2011 were included (N = 278). Diagnoses were established in a multidisciplinary consensus meeting, independent of the A-IADL-Q scores. An optimal A-IADL-Q cutoff point was determined, and sensitivity and specificity were calculated. Area under the curves (AUCs) were compared between A-IADL-Q and "disability assessment of dementia" (DAD). The additional diagnostic value of the A-IADL-Q to Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) was examined using logistic regression analyses.Dementia prevalence was 50.5%. Overall diagnostic accuracy based on the AUC was 0.75 (95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.70-0.81) for the A-IADL-Q and 0.70 (95% CI: 0.63-0.77) for the DAD, which did not differ significantly. The optimal cutoff score for the A-IADL-Q was 51.4, resulting in sensitivity of 0.74 and specificity of 0.64. Combining the A-IADL-Q with the MMSE improved specificity (0.94), with a decline in sensitivity (0.55). Logistic regression models showed that adding A-IADL-Q improved the diagnostic accuracy (Z = 2.55, P = .011), whereas the DAD did not.In this study, we showed a fair diagnostic accuracy for A-IADL-Q and an additional value in the diagnosis of dementia. These results support the role of A-IADL-Q as a valuable diagnostic tool.Brief cognitive assessment in a UK population sample -- distributional properties and the relationship between the MMSE and an extended mental state examination.Despite the MMSE's known flaws, it is still used extensively as both a screening instrument for dementia and a population measure of cognitive ability. The aim of this paper is to provide data on the distribution of MMSE scores in a representative sample from the UK population and to compare it with an extended cognitive assessment (EMSE) which covers a wider range of cognitive domains and provides a wider range of difficulty levels.The MMSE and the EMSE were administered to over 12,000 participants at the screening stage of the MRC Cognitive Function and Ageing Study (MRC CFAS). MRC CFAS is a multi-centre population-based study in England and Wales with respondents aged 65 years and older.Normative values on the MMSE and EMSE are presented by age group, sex and level of education. There are very large differences between age groups, with smaller differences seen between the sexes and by level of education. The EMSE extends the scores at the high end of the ability range, but is no better than the MMSE at differentiating between dementia and non-dementia.Population-derived norms are valuable for comparing an individual's score to the score that would be expected among the general population, given the individual's specific demographic characteristics.Limitations of the Mini-Mental State Examination for screening dementia in a community with low socioeconomic status: results from the Sao Paulo Ageing & Health Study.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is the most widely used instrument for the screening of cognitive impairment worldwide, but its ability to produce valid estimates of dementia in populations of low socioeconomic status and minimal literacy skills has not been adequately established. The authors investigated the psychometric properties of the MMSE in a community-based sample of older Brazilians.Cross-sectional one-phase population-based study of all residents of pre-defined areas of the city of Sao Paulo, aged 65 years or over. The Brazilian version of the MMSE was compared with DSM-IV diagnosis of dementia assessed with a harmonized one-phase procedure developed by the 10/66 Dementia Research Group.Analyses were performed with 1,933 participants of the SPAH study. Receiver operating characteristic analysis showed that the MMSE cut-point of 14/15 was associated with 78.7% sensitivity and 77.8% specificity for the diagnosis of dementia amongst participants with no formal education, and the cut-point 17/18 with 91.9% sensitivity and 89.5% specificity for those with at least 1 year of formal education (areas under the curves 0.87 and 0.94, respectively; P = 0.03). Even with these best fitting cut-points, the MMSE estimate of the prevalence of dementia was four times higher than determined by the DSM-IV criteria. Education, age, sex and income influenced MMSE scores, independently of dementia caseness.The MMSE is an adequate tool for screening dementia in older adults with minimum literacy skills, but misclassification is unacceptably high for older adults who are illiterate, which has serious consequences for research and clinical practice in low and middle income countries, where the proportion of illiteracy among older adults is high.Comparison of two scoring systems of the Mini-Mental State Examination as a screening test for dementia.The difference in validity in detecting dementia of two different scoring systems (age- and education-adjusted versus raw scores) of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), was assessed in an epidemiological study on the prevalence of dementia. A second, independent, psychometric screening tool, the Milan Overall Dementia Assessment (MODA), was also used. A group of 829 subjects over age 59 took part in the study. Subjects scoring below the cut-off point of the MMSE and/or MODA were clinically evaluated. Clinical diagnoses were adopted as the gold standard. Sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of the two tests were calculated. Our findings show that the correction for age and education of the raw score of the MMSE causes the loss of the mildest demented patients and heavily reduces the sensitivity of the screening test (from 85.7% to 71.4%), while it accounts for a moderate improvement in the specificity (from 90.0% to 96.3%). A possible explanation for this seeming paradox is proposed.Clinical utility of the mini-mental status examination when assessing decision-making capacity.The main objectives of this study were to examine the relationship between cognitive deficits, as measured by the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE), and decision-making capacity and to determine whether the sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE varied based upon the patient population assessed. Using a sample size of 152 patients and varying cutoff scores, the MMSE demonstrated extremely poor sensitivity. In contrast, the MMSE had excellent specificity when scores of 19 or less were obtained. In our sample, not one patient, regardless of diagnosis, was deemed to have capacity if their MMSE score was below 20. However, reliance on the MMSE for scores above 19 would too frequently lead to misclassification and incorrect assumptions about a patient's decision-making abilities. Although a score below 20 consistently yielded findings of incapability in our sample, it remains our opinion that the MMSE should not be used as a stand-alone tool to make determinations related to capacity, especially when considering the complexities associated with capacity evaluations and the vital areas, such as executive functioning and individual values and beliefs, which are omitted by the MMSE.Screening for cognitive impairment: comparing the performance of four instruments in primary care.To determine whether brief cognitive screening tests perform as well as a longer screening test in diagnosis of cognitive impairment, no dementia (CIND) or dementia.A cross-sectional comparison of cognitive screening tests to an independent criterion standard evaluation using Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) criteria. Performance of the cognitive screening tests for identifying dementia, and separately for identifying dementia or CIND, was characterized using sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios, and diagnostic odds ratios.Three Department of Veterans Affairs primary care clinics.Of 826 independently living veterans aged 65 and older without a prior diagnosis of dementia, 639 participated and 630 were assigned a research diagnosis.Screening tests included the modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS; average time to administer, 17 minutes) and three brief instruments: the Memory Impairment Screen (MIS; 4 minutes), the Mini-Cog (3 minutes), and a novel two-item functional memory screen (MF-2; 1.5 minutes).Participants were aged 74.8 on average and were mostly white or black. They were mostly male (92.9%) and had been prescribed a mean of 7.7 medications for chronic conditions. The prevalence of dementia and CIND was 3.3% and 39.2%, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity for dementia were 86% and 79% for the 3MS, 76% and 73% for the Mini-Cog, 43% and 93% for the MIS, and 38% and 87% for the MF-2, respectively.In individuals without a prior diagnosis of cognitive impairment, the prevalence of dementia was low, but the prevalence of CIND was high. The 3MS and Mini-Cog had reasonable performance characteristics for detecting dementia, but a definitive diagnosis requires additional evaluation.Epidemiological dementia index: a screening instrument for Alzheimer's disease and other types of dementia suitable for use in populations with low education level.MMSE and CAMCOG are neuropsychological scales developed for use in everyday clinical practice and epidemiological surveys.These two instruments were used as part of the assessment during an epidemiological survey in the municipality of Pylaia, Greece. The project was based on the World Health Organization Program for Research on Aging and Age-Associated Dementias (1992). It had two phases. During phase I, nursing students collected demographic data, risk factors, personal and family history data and they applied MMSE, CAMCOG and scales of everyday life functioning. During phase II, 4 physicians examined all subjects that manifested possible cognitive deterioration (MMSE<27), in order to reach a final diagnosis. The final diagnosis was made according to DSM-IV and NINCDS-ADRDA criteria. MMSE and CAMCOG were not taken into consideration in the diagnostic process. Three hundred and eighty subjects were initially screened. All were aged over 70 years. After the exclusion of subjects who were illiterate, blind, etc., the results of 277 subjects were finally analyzed. Subjects with 6 years of education or less accounted for 92.42% of the total study sample. Twelve of them (5.33%) suffered from Alzheimer's disease, 7 from vascular dementia (2.52%) and 1 suffered from secondary dementia (0.36%).MMSE exceeded 90% sensitivity at the level 22/23 and specificity at 14/15. The levels for CAMCOG were 56/57 and 43/44, respectively. This low performance of both tests is to a large extent due to the functional illiteracy of elderly individuals in Greece, to possible coexistence of mood disorders or simply to lack of cooperation. The analysis of data led to the development of an Epidemiological Dementia Index (EDI), with a scale ranging from 0 to 7. Nondemented subjects had a mean EDI of 5.12 (SD = 1.67) and demented patients had a mean EDI of 1.6 (SD = 1. 92). At the level 4/5 sensitivity was 93.33. Specificity was 93.56 at the level 2/3.Improving screening for dementia in the elderly using, Mini-Mental State Examination subscores, Benton's Visual Retention Test, and Isaacs' Set Test.The Mini-Mental State Examination score is often used as a screening test for dementia. We studied its properties for a population of French community residents, using a sample of 2,792 randomly selected subjects in Gironde, France. When the traditional cutoff point 23-24 was used, we observed a sensitivity of 1.0 and a specificity of 0.77. We sought to increase the specificity of the test, while keeping sensitivity at 1.0, with the use of logistic regression analysis. We found (1) a specificity of 0.81 when "recall three objects" and "orientation to time" were added to the Mini-Mental State Examination score; (2) a specificity of 0.90 when Benton's Visual Retention Tests and Isaacs' Set Test of Verbal Fluency were added to the Mini-Mental State Examination score and subscores; and (3) no improvement in specificity when age and educational level were included in the analyses.Predicting dementia from the Mini-Mental State Examination in an elderly population: the role of education.Our study aimed to assess whether education affects the positive predictive value of the MMSE when it is used as a screening test for dementia. The MMSE has been consistently found to correlate with education and, at the same time, education is regarded by some researchers as being of potential etiological significance for dementia. In the present study, results on the MMSE from a community-based study in Sweden were compared with two standards: the clinical diagnosis of dementia and the Katz index of daily living activities. For both these comparisons, education did not substantially change the predictive ability of the MMSE. Our data, when compared with previous studies, show that the influence of education on the predictive ability of the MMSE varies in different populations. We conclude that differential MMSE cut-off points for different educational levels or adjustment techniques for education are not universally applicable.Is the montreal cognitive assessment superior to the mini-mental state examination in detecting subtle cognitive impairment among middle-aged outpatient U.S. Military veterans?The Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) is a relatively newly designed test that was developed as a tool to screen patients with mild cognitive problems that are not typically detected by the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE). While early research suggests that the MoCA is more sensitive to subtle cognitive impairment than the MMSE, there is concern about potential decreased specificity when using the MoCA. The aim of the present study was to examine the comparative utility of using the MoCA and the MMSE to detect subtle cognitive impairment among a group of 82 middle-aged U.S. military veterans referred for outpatient neuropsychological testing. Using receiver operating characteristic analyses, the MoCA was shown to be a better predictor of subtle cognitive impairment on neuropsychological testing than the MMSE. When using an adjusted cutoff, the MoCA was shown to be more sensitive (i.e., 0.72 vs. 0.52) and nearly as specific as the MMSE (0.75 vs. 0.77).Memory testing in dementia: how much is enough?Analyses of eight widely used memory measures (Word List Acquisition and Recall used in the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale and the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease neuropsychology battery, Wechsler Memory Scale-Revised [WMS-R] Logical Memory I and II, WMS-R Visual Reproduction I and II, the memory scores from the Neurobehavioral Cognitive Status Examination [NCSE], memory scores from the Mini-Mental State Examination [MMSE]), and the MMSE total score showed each to have moderate predictive power in differentiating between patients with mild dementia and healthy normal controls. When these instruments were combined in a logistic regression analysis, three of them had substantial predictive power. Together, the Word List Acquisition, WMS-R Logical Memory II, and WMS-R Visual Reproduction II were 97.26% accurate (100% sensitive and 94.59% specific) in distinguishing these two groups. The Word List Acquisition is a brief test that alone had high accuracy (92%). These memory tests are highly useful in the diagnosis of mild dementia.General practitioner diagnosis of depression and dementia in the elderly: can academic detailing make a difference?The objective was to improve the ability of general practitioners (GPs) to diagnose depression and dementia compared with standard screening measures. The setting was a retirement village on the outskirts of Sydney, Australia. The study used a prepost design with a 6 month follow-up. The intervention involved a visit to the GP by an academic detailer who spent 15 minutes discussing the diagnosis of depression and dementia. Ratings of depression and dementia on two occasions by GPs, and by independent interviews were made using the Geriatric Depression Scale, Mini-mental State Examination and Canberra Interview for the Elderly. In the case of depression, the level of agreement (Kappa) between the GPs and all instruments increased significantly by a factor of between 2.3 and 3.3. The doctors did not significantly improve in their agreement with the instruments on the diagnosis of dementia. An academic detailing approach to improving GPs' abilities in the diagnosis of depression can be effective. A controlled trial would be justified to confirm this finding.Social and leisure activities and risk of dementia: a prospective longitudinal study.To study the relationship between social and leisure activities and risk of subsequent dementia in older community residents.A cohort study of people aged 65 and older were followed-up 1 and 3 years after a baseline screening (the Paquid study).2040 older subjects living at home in Gironde (France) were randomly selected and followed for at least 3 years.Information about social and leisure activities was collected during the baseline screening with an interview by a psychologist. Incident cases of dementia were detected during the first and third year follow-up screenings according to the DSM-III-R criteria.All but one of the social and leisure activities noted were significantly associated with a lower risk of dementia. Only golden club participation was not significantly associated with this risk. After adjustment for age and cognitive performance measured by the Mini-Mental State Exam, visual memory test, and verbal fluency test, only traveling (Relative risk (RR) = .48,95% Confidence Interval (95% CI) = .24-.94), odd jobs or knitting (RR = .46,95% CI = .26-.85), and gardening (RR = .53, 95% CI = .28-.99) remained significant.Regular participation in social or leisure activities such as traveling, odd jobs, knitting, or gardening were associated with a lower risk of subsequent dementia.AD8-Brazil: cross-cultural validation of the ascertaining dementia interview in Portuguese.Dementia is a global public health problem and detection in the primary care setting, particularly in developing countries, is challenging. The aim of this research was to produce the cross-cultural validation of the AD8 interview to the Brazilian Portuguese Language. The original version of the AD8 was submitted to translation, back-translation, and application of the questionnaire to 20 elderly informants for face validation. The AD8-Brazil was then evaluated in 109 community-dwelling elderly with a sociodemographic questionnaire, clinical examination, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), Katz Inventory of Activities of Daily Living (ADL), and Clinical Dementia Rating scale (CDR). The AD8-Brazil was compared with the other instruments and with the clinical diagnosis (DSM-IV) for criterion validation. There was significant agreement of AD8-Brazil with diagnosis of dementia (p < 0.001), MMSE (p = 0.047), and ADL (PFisher = 0.004). Also, the AD8-Brazil was able to differentiate the stages of dementia by CDR scale. The reliability was high (alpha = 0.818) and reproducibility analysis showed excellent inter-rater (kappa = 0.889) and test-retest consistency (kappa = 0.814). The AD8-Brazil showed excellent discrimination between CDR 0 and CDR > 0 (area under the curve 86.1%) and between CDR 0 and CDR 0.5 (area under the curve 76.9%). The administration of the questionnaire took 2.3 ± 0.1 minutes. The Brazilian version of the AD8 is a valid, reliable, quick, and easy screening instrument for dementia.Cut-off values of blessed dementia rating scale and its clinical application in elderly Taiwanese.Although the Blessed Dementia Rating Scale (BDRS), a clinical screening instrument, has been applied extensively, no suitable cut-off values and clinical application have been proposed, particularly in mild cognitive impairment (MCI), the precursor of dementia. The BDRS, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), and Clinical Dementia Rating Scale (CDR) were administrated in people aged 65 years and above, who were enrolled from southern Taiwan with multistep stratified random sampling and followed-up for 2 years. All subjects (total number = 3,027), with new onset of MCI (defined as CDR = 0.5) in the first year and dementia (defined as CDR > or = 1) in the second and third years were subjected to statistical analysis. In distinguishing normal from MCI, except in the literate group aged 65-74 years, MMSE was superior to BDRS, with cut-off values of 1 in both literate groups aged 65-74 years and > or = 75 years, and 1.5 and 2 in less educated groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, respectively. In distinguishing MCI from dementia, BDRS had cut-off values of 2.5 in both literate groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, and 2.5 and 3 in less educated groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, respectively. These values were better than those for MMSE in all groups. BDRS might be considered as a better tool than MMSE to screen for MCI and dementia in the increasing proportion of literate elderly aged 65-74 years in the aging population.Prevalence of mild cognitive impairment by multiple classifications: The Monongahela-Youghiogheny Healthy Aging Team (MYHAT) project.To estimate and compare the frequency and prevalence of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and related entities using different classification approaches at the population level.Cross-sectional epidemiologic study of population-based cohort recruited by age-stratified random sampling from electoral rolls.Small-town communities in western Pennsylvania.Of 2,036 individuals aged 65 years and older, 1,982 participants with normal or mildly impaired cognition (age-education-corrected Mini-Mental State scores ≥ 21).Demographics, neuropsychological assessment expressed as cognitive domains, functional ability, and subjective reports of cognitive difficulties; based on these measurements, operational criteria for the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) scale, the 1999 criteria for amnestic MCI, the 2004 Expanded criteria for MCI, and new, purely cognitive criteria for MCI.A CDR rating of 0.5 (uncertain/very mild dementia) was obtained by 27.6% of participants, whereas 1.2% had CDR ≥ 1 (mild or moderate dementia). Among those with CDR <1, 2.27% had amnestic MCI and 17.66% had expanded MCI, whereas 35.17% had MCI by purely cognitive classification. Isolated executive function impairment was the least common, whereas impairment in multiple domains including executive function was the most common. Prevalence estimates weighted against the U.S. Census are also provided.The manner in which criteria for MCI are operationalized determines the proportion of individuals who are thus classified and the degree of overlap with other criteria. Prospective follow-up is needed to determine progression from MCI to dementia and thus empirically develop improved MCI criteria with good predictive value.Improving detection of dementia in Asian patients with low education: combining the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly.Previous work combining the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) has been conducted in western populations. We ascertained, in an Asian population, (1) the best method of combining the tests, (2) the effects of educational level, and (3) the effect of different dementia etiologies.Data from 576 patients were analyzed (407 nondemented controls, 87 Alzheimer's disease and 82 vascular dementia patients). Sensitivity, specificity and AUC values were obtained using three methods, the 'And' rule, the 'Or' rule, and the 'weighted sum' method.The 'weighted sum' rule had statistically superior AUC and specificity results, while the 'Or' rule had the best sensitivity results. The IQCODE outperformed the MMSE in all analyses. Patients with no education benefited more from combined tests. There was no difference between Alzheimer's disease and vascular dementia populations in the predictive value of any of the combined methods.We recommend that the IQCODE be used to supplement the MMSE whenever available and that the 'weighted sum' method be used to combine the MMSE and the IQCODE, particularly in populations with low education. As the study population selected may not be representative of the general population, further studies are required before generalization to nonclinical samples.Prevalence of very mild and mild dementia in community-dwelling older Chinese people in Hong Kong.In this report, the results of a household survey were used to examine the prevalence of very mild and mild dementia in Chinese older persons in Hong Kong.The study adopted a two-phase design. At Phase 1, 6100 subjects were screened using the Cantonese version of the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) and a short memory inventory. At Phase 2, 2073 subjects were screened positive and 737 were evaluated by psychiatrists. Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) and cognitive assessment were used for diagnosis of dementia. Very mild dementia (VMD) was defined as a global CDR of 0.5, with memory and non-memory subscale scores of 0.5 or more. Mild dementia was classified for subjects with a CDR of 1.The overall prevalence of VMD and mild dementia for persons aged 70 years or above was 8.5% (95%CI: 7.4-9.6) and 8.9% (95%CI: 7.8-10.0) respectively. Among subjects with clinical dementia, 84.6% had mild (CDR1) dementia. Logistic regression analyses revealed that older age, lower educational level and significant cerebrovascular risk factors were risk factors for dementia, while regular physical exercise was a protective factor for dementia.A sizable proportion of community-living subjects suffered from milder forms of dementia. They represent a high risk for early intervention to reduce potential physical and psychiatric morbidity.Development and validation of a brief cognitive assessment tool: the sweet 16.Cognitive impairment is often unrecognized among older adults. Meanwhile, current assessment instruments are underused, lack sensitivity, or may be restricted by copyright laws. To address these limitations, we created a new brief cognitive assessment tool: the Sweet 16.The Sweet 16 was developed in a cohort from a large post-acute hospitalization study (n=774) and compared with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Equipercentile equating identified Sweet 16 cut points that correlated with widely used MMSE cut points. Sweet 16 performance characteristics were independently validated in a cohort from the Aging, Demographics, and Memory Study (n=709) using clinical consensus diagnosis, the modified Blessed Dementia Rating Scale, and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE).The Sweet 16 correlated highly with the MMSE (Spearman r, 0.94; P<.001). Validated against the IQCODE, the area under the curve was 0.84 for the Sweet 16 and 0.81 for the MMSE (P=.06). A Sweet 16 score of less than 14 (approximating an MMSE score <24) demonstrated a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 70%, whereas an MMSE score of less than 24 showed a sensitivity of 64% and a specificity of 86% against the IQCODE. When compared with clinical diagnosis, a Sweet 16 score of less than 14 showed a sensitivity of 99% and a specificity of 72% in contrast to an MMSE score with a sensitivity of 87% and a specificity of 89%. For education of 12 years or more, the area under the curve was 0.90 for the Sweet 16 and 0.84 for the MMSE (P=.03).The Sweet 16 is simple, quick to administer, and will be available open access. The performance of the Sweet 16 is equivalent or superior to that of the MMSE.[Five by five test. A brief instrument for the detection of cognitive impediment in clinical settings].Many psychological tests for the detection of cognitive impediment and dementia are inadequate by being too prolonged, inconsistent or with poor specificity or sensibility. It is presented a brief test of evocation of proper names by classes (TIG) and their properties psicometrics and utility are compared with the Mini-mental State Examination (MEM).We selected 196 patients from a neurological clinic, with suggestive symptoms of cognitive impediment. We excluded individuals with focal or chronic cerebral disorders, sensorial disturbances, severe psychiatric diseases and toxicity by drugs. Patients were by grouped the Clinical Dementia Rating scale and they were evaluated neuropsychologically. The internal consistency of TIG was examined and a cross-validation procedure was performed to test for the predictive validity. Likewise, the convergent validity was tested against the scale of dementia of Blessed and the MEM. Finally the diagnostic efficiency of both tests, the effects of the demographics variables and the clinical utility were analyzed. We used non-parametrics statistics, analysis of sensibility upon curves ROC and analysis of the post-test probabilities.The TIG has adequate internal consistency and validity. The diagnostic efficiency was high (area under the curve ROC 0,939 [IC 95%: 0,908-0,971], p < 0,0001). The introduction of the demographics covariates in a logistic model wisely improved the diagnostic efficiency. The TIG has some better fulfillment than the MEM. Neither the MEM nor the TIG are tests suitable for communitary screening of cognitive defect.The TIG is briefer, easier to apply and more efficient than the MEM. Possibly it is useful to detect cognitive impediment in clinical contexts. This study is preliminary.The Mini-Mental-37 test for dementia screening in the Spanish population: an analysis using the Rasch Model.Our aim was to analyze the psychometric properties of the Mini-Mental State Examination-37 using the Rasch Model (RM) in order to identify the cognitive domains that optimize detection of dementia in the Spanish population. All participants (n = 3955) were part of the NEDICES (Neurological Disorders in Central Spain) cohort study designed to detect dementia in persons aged 65 years and older. Clinical diagnosis of dementia (n = 178) was established by consensus of expert neurologists according to the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM-IV) criteria. Results indicate that the items on the MMSE-37 have a good fit with the assumptions of the RM. None of the items on the MMSE-37 exhibits differential item functioning in relation to the groups. The items that assess orientation, attention, and language (repetition and comprehension) are those that best enable us to discriminate between the group with dementia and the group without dementia. The implications of the education and other sociodemographic characteristics of the population are discussed.Premorbid cognitive testing predicts the onset of dementia and Alzheimer's disease better than and independently of APOE genotype.To determine whether a cognitive test package can predict the onset of dementia up to 11 years later, and the extent to which this prediction is independent of that provided by APOE genotype.Prospective cohort study based on 54 general practices in the UK; 657 survivors of the 1088 participants in the MRC treatment trial of hypertension in older adults were followed for up to 11 years; 370 participants (57% of survivors) were traced, screened for dementia, and genotyped for APOE in 1994. Baseline assessments included trail making test A, paired associated learning test, Raven's progressive matrices, and national adult reading test. At follow up, both mini-mental state examination and CAMCOG were used. Outcome measures were DSM-IIIR dementia and NINCDS-ADRDA possible and probable Alzheimer's disease.All the cognitive tests completed in 1983 predicted onset of dementia and Alzheimer's disease up to 11 years later, as did APOE genotype. Cognitive test performance was not associated with APOE genotype. Addition of cognitive tests increased the area under the ROC curve for the prediction of Alzheimer's disease provided by age, family history, and APOE genotype (0.81 v 0.69, p = 0.048); addition of APOE genotype did not increase the area under the ROC curve for the prediction provided by age, family history, and cognitive tests (0.81 v 0.77, p = 0.28).Simple tests of cognitive ability provide useful predictive information up to a decade before the onset of dementia. The predictive information provided is independent of, but not enhanced by, the addition of APOE genotype.The accuracy of the MMSE in detecting cognitive impairment when administered by general practitioners: a prospective observational study.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) has contributed to detecting cognitive impairment, yet few studies have evaluated its accuracy when used by general practitioners (GP) in an actual public-health setting.We evaluated the accuracy of MMSE scores obtained by GPs by comparing them to scores obtained by Alzheimer's Evaluation Units (UVA).The study was observational in design and involved 59 voluntary GPs who, after having undergone training, administered the MMSE to patients with symptoms of cognitive disturbances. Individuals who scored < or = 24 (adjusted by age and educational level) were referred to Alzheimer's Evaluation Units (UVA) for diagnosis (including the MMSE). UVAs were unblinded to the MMSE score of the GP. To measure interrater agreement, the weighted Kappa statistic was calculated. To evaluate factors associated with the magnitude of the difference between paired scores, a linear regression model was applied. To quantify the accuracy in discriminating no cognitive impairment from any cognitive impairment and from Alzheimer's disease (AD), the ROC curves (AUC) were calculated.For the 317 patients, the mean score obtained by GPs was significantly lower (15.8 vs. 17.4 for the UVAs; p < 0.01). However, overall concordance was good (Kappa = 0.86). Only the diagnosis made by the UVA was associated with the difference between paired scores: the adjusted mean difference was 3.1 for no cognitive impairment and 3.8 for mild cognitive impairment. The AUC of the scores for GPs was 0.80 (95%CI: 0.75-0.86) for discriminating between no impairment and any impairment and 0.89 (95%CI: 0.84-0.94) for distinguishing patients with AD, though the UVA scores discriminated better.In a public-health setting involving patients with symptoms of cognitive disturbances, the MMSE used by the GPs was sufficiently accurate to detect patients with cognitive impairment, particularly those with dementia.Simplifying detection of cognitive impairment: comparison of the Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination in a multiethnic sample.To compare detection of cognitive impairment using the Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and to identify sociodemographic variables that influence detection in an ethnoculturally diverse sample.Cross-sectional.A registry of the University of Washington Alzheimer's Disease Research Center Satellite.A heterogeneous community sample (n=371) of predominantly ethnic minority elderly assessed using a standardized research protocol, 231 of whom met criteria for dementia or mild cognitive impairment (MCI).Demographic data, a standardized research protocol for cognitive assessment and dementia diagnosis, MMSE, and Mini-Cog.Both screens effectively detected cognitive impairment, the Mini-Cog slightly better than the MMSE (P<.01). Overall accuracy of classification was 83% for the Mini-Cog and 81% for the MMSE. The Mini-Cog was superior in recognizing patients with Alzheimer-type dementias (P=.05). Low education negatively affected detection using the MMSE (P<.001), whereas education did not affect the Mini-Cog, and low literacy minimally affected it.The Mini-Cog detects clinically significant cognitive impairment as well as or better than the MMSE in multiethnic elderly individuals, is easier to administer to non-English speakers, and is less biased by low education and literacy.[A comparison between 2 abbreviated Spanish versions of mental status assessment in the diagnosis of dementia. Study data on elderly community residents].There are several Spanish versions and adaptations of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the most used abbreviated test for screening of the cognitive decline in clinical and epidemiological setting. Among them, the Mini-Examen Cognoscitivo (MEC) is highlighted. The aim of this study was to compare the diagnostic usefulness between the Spanish translation of the MMSE (the MMSE1 which incorporates the proof of serial "sevens" and the MMSE2 which includes spelling "world" backward) and the MEC for the diagnosis of dementia.A sample of elderly persons (65 years or over), included in a population-based study of dementia prevalence. The diagnosis of dementia was assessed through exhaustive neuropsychological evaluation. The diagnosis of dementia (according to the standardized DSM-III-R criteria) was carried out by expert neurologists, who were independent and blind to the scores obtained in the MMSE and MEC.79 subjects underwent both tools and neuropsychological assessment. The MMSE1 obtained the highest accuracy (92%), followed by the MEC (90%) and the MMSE2 (83%). The analysis of the areas under receiver operating characteristic curves did not show significant statistical differences between the MMSE1 and MEC (p = 0.38), but significant differences were observed between those and the MMSE2 (p = 0.01).The diagnostic usefulness of Spanish translation of the MMSE is similar to the MEC. The proof of spelling "world" backward obtained poorer results than serial "sevens". The Spanish versions of the MMSE should be improved to be adapted to our cultural characteristics.A 2-year follow-up of 233 very mild (CDR 0.5) Alzheimer's disease patients (REAL.FR cohort).Making an early diagnosis of Alzheimer's Disease (AD) is becoming increasingly important. The Clinical Dementia Rating scale (CDR), a semi-structured interview with patient and caregiver, is a global rating scale designed for use in staging dementia. The primary objective of our study was to examine the evolution of AD in individuals with very mild AD (CDR 0.5) across a 2-year follow up.A cohort of AD patients (n=682) living in the community were followed during 2 years in 16 centres of the French AD network. Each subject underwent extensive medical examination including the MMSE and CDR every 6 months.Two hundred and thirty-three AD patients were rated CDR 0.5 at baseline (mean MMSE score: 23.15+/-2.57). They were younger and reported an average duration of symptoms of approximately 0.8 years less than patients with CDR >or= 1.During the 2-year follow-up, none of the AD CDR 0.5 subjects improved; 65% of them showed an increase in the CDR score. The rate of cognitive decline was similar between the AD CDR 0.5 and CDR >or= 1 groups. The ADL decline was more significant in patients with CDR >or= 1 at inclusion.It is certainly possible to identify AD at a very early stage focusing on intra individual change in cognitive and functional impairment. Criteria with a high sensitivity and specificity for detecting AD at an early stage will help to further develop effective pharmacological and behavioural interventions for delaying the onset and progression of the disease.New computer-based cognitive function test for the elderly.We developed a modified trail-making test using a PC and touch panel and compared it with the mini mental state examination (MMSE). The test consisted of a series of numbers from 1 to 36, randomly arranged across the display. The object of the test was for the subject to touch the numbers in order, beginning with 1 and ending with 36, in as little time as possible. The system consisted of a PC and a liquid crystal display (LCD) touch-panel screen. One hundred and thirty-four patients with dementia performed the test. Sixty of the 134 patients (15 male, 45 female; average age, 81.1 +/- 7 years) were diagnosed as having Alzheimer's disease and the others had cerebrovascular dementia. Sixty-two of 134 patients (23 male, 39 female; average age, 77.6 +/- 8 years; MMSE score, 21.5 +/- 5.6 points) completed the test. The correlation coefficient between test performance time and MMSE score was -0.534. This test may also be a useful indicator of focal frontal lesions and can be used as an early screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Prediction of probable Alzheimer disease in patients with symptoms suggestive of memory impairment. Value of the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is a widely used diagnostic tool for dementia. Its use as a predictive indicator of probable Alzheimer disease (AD) has not been established.To determine the accuracy of the MMSE in predicting emergent AD in a sample of patients who were referred because of symptoms suggestive of memory problems and to determine whether an abbreviated version of the MMSE could be developed that would be as accurate as the full MMSE in predicting emergent AD.Inception cohort of participants with symptoms suggestive of memory impairment by their family physicians were given baseline assessments, including MMSE. After 2 years, the participants' conditions were diagnosed following the standard criterion for AD. Diagnosticians were blind to baseline scores.One hundred eighty-three community-residing participants were referred by their family physicians to a university teaching hospital research investigation. After baseline screening, 165 participants were included in the study who did not have dementia and had no identifiable cause for memory impairment. After 2 years, 29 participants met criteria for AD, 98 did not develop dementia, 18 developed vascular lesions or non-AD dementia, and 20 did not return.Diagnostic classification of AD or no evidence of dementia.Logistic regression model was significant. At a cutoff score of 24 or less, sensitivity was 31%; specificity, 96%; with a likelihood ratio of 7.75. A reduced model of 2 subtests was identified with a sensitivity of 41%; specificity, 98%; with a likelihood ratio of 20.70.Results suggest that the full or abbreviated MMSE is useful in predicting emergent AD in patients with positive test results. However, it is not recommended for use as a screening or diagnostic instrument since a negative test result did not rule out emergent AD. It is recommended as a tool to identify those needing closer monitoring.Cross-sectional versus longitudinal estimates of cognitive change in nondemented older people: a CERAD study. Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease.To investigate the effect of increasing age on cognition in nondemented older people.A cross-sectional and longitudinal analysis.A total of 454 control subjects for Alzheimer's cases from the cohort assembled by the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD).The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) to assess cognitive function.Cross-sectional estimates were derived by generalized linear models and longitudinal estimates by generalized estimating equations. The cross-sectional model indicated a small but significant decline in MMSE of -.4 points per 10 years. The longitudinal model indicated a small but significant increase in MMSE of about +.6 points per 10 years. Evidence of an early learning effect and nonrandom dropout exists.The question of "normal" aging can be approached by considering cross-sectional information and, usually separately, longitudinal information. This study does both using recently developed statistical methods. We conclude that there is a small but significant decline in scores on the MMSE with increasing population age. The effect can be masked in longitudinal cohorts by a learning effect (especially early in follow-up) and other factors associated with repeated testing.Is the Folstein's Mini-Mental test an aphasia test?The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is recognized as a valid screening for dementia. It consists of 29 verbal items from a total of 30. The Brief Aphasia Evaluation (BAE) includes 10 aphasia and 12 orientation items, which are similar to most of the MMSE items. It was studied whether those BAE items (MMSE-like): (a) correlate with the rest of the BAE items (BAE-rest), and (b) differentiate patients with left cerebral lesions (LC) from both patients with right cerebral lesions (RC) and healthy participants (HP). A sample of 109 right-handed volunteers (38 HP, 37 LC, and 34 RC) was studied. The three groups were matched according to gender, age, and education. Patients were similar in multiple variables. The correlation between MMSE-like and BAE-rest was .90. MMSE-like showed a sensitivity and specificity of .81 or above to identify the LC from the other two groups. There is a risk for misdiagnosing aphasia as dementia with the MMSE.Staging the severity of dementia: comparison of clinical (CDR, DSM-III-R), functional (ADL, IADL) and cognitive (MMSE) scales.The Helsinki Aging Study is based on a random sample of 795 subjects aged 75 years (N = 274), 80 years (N = 266) and 85 years (N = 255). Ninety-three demented patients were found. All were assessed for severity of dementia by Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) scale by a general practitioner and according to the DSM-III-R criteria by a neurologist. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) was carried out by a community nurse and the Index of ADL and the IADL-scale by a close informant. The correlation of the severity of dementia between the DSM-III-R criteria and the CDR scale was moderate. The overall agreement was 64.5% and the Kappa index 0.56. The CDR scale tended to put patients in milder categories than the DSM-III-R criteria. The correlation between the clinical scales and categorized MMSE was moderate to fair. The overall agreement between MMSE and DSM-III-R criteria was 64% (Kappa 0.44) and between MMSE and CDR scale 55% (Kappa 0.33%). The dispersion of the functional scales (ADL, IADL) was much greater indicating that there were also other factors influencing the functional capacity than the degree of dementia. Different methods in staging dementia give different results thus influencing for instance the results of epidemiological studies. Functional scales are needed in clinical practice in addition to the assessment of the severity of dementia. The CDR scale is useful in assessing the need for support services.Interaction of atherosclerosis and inflammation in elderly subjects with poor cognitive function.To test the hypothesis that a pro-inflammatory response is associated with cognitive impairment among individuals with cardiovascular disease.All 85-year-old inhabitants of Leiden (n = 599) were visited at their place of residence. A history of cardiovascular disease and an EKG were used as indicators of atherosclerosis. Production of the pro-inflammatory cytokine tumor necrosis factor-alpha and the anti-inflammatory cytokine interleukin-10 was assessed in a whole-blood assay using lipopolysaccharide as a stimulus. Global cognitive functioning was determined with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE); attention, cognitive speed, and memory were determined with four neuropsychological tests; and a history of dementia was obtained.In subjects with cardiovascular disease, median MMSE scores were lower in those with a pro-inflammatory response when compared with those with an anti-inflammatory response (p = 0.02). Similar associations were found for the Stroop Test, measuring attention (p < 0.01), the Coding Test measuring cognitive speed (p = 0.02), the Word Learning Test measuring memory (p < 0.01), and the presence of dementia (p = 0.04). The associations remained unaltered after adjustments for possible confounders such as gender, level of education, use of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs, use of cardiovascular drugs, and cardiovascular risk factors. In contrast, outcomes of the cognitive tests and presence of dementia were not dependent on the inflammatory response when cardiovascular disease was absent.The combination of cardiovascular disease and a pro-inflammatory cytokine response may be associated with cognitive impairment and dementia.Relationship between blood pressure and Alzheimer's disease in Linxian County, China.To investigate the relationship between hypertension and Alzheimer's disease(AD) and the change of Alzheimer's patients' blood pressure(BP) before and after the onset of AD, we conducted this epidemiological study. Subjects for this study were individuals who participated in a large scale, randomized controlled trial of nutritional intervention from 1984 to 1991. Participants were initially screened for dementia using Chinese Mini-Mental State Examination (CMMS) and Activities of Daily Living (ADL). Positive subjects were subsequently administered a detailed neuropsychological and neurobehavioral examination. The diagnosis of AD was made by a consensus conference of psychiatrists using Diagnostic And Statistical Manual Of Mental Disorders-Fourth Edition(DSM-IV) criteria. 16488 subjects were examined and 301 were diagnosed as AD. We compared the prevalence of AD in different populations that were stratified with 1984's systolic or diastolic blood pressure(those four stratifications being high blood pressure, borderline blood pressure, normal, low blood pressure), and compared the change of blood pressure of 301 AD patients between 1984 and 1999-2000, which is before and after the onset of AD respectively. Multiple Logistic Regression (1:1 nested case-control study) was used to assess if hypertension is an independent risk factor for AD, and Trend test was used to assess the relationship between blood pressure and AD. Here we demonstrate that there was a significant difference in AD prevalence among different populations stratified by systolic or diastolic blood pressure (P < 0.01). The prevalence is highest in hypertension group, and lowest in hypotension group. Multiple Logistic Regression identified high blood pressure as a risk factor for AD (OR = 1.97, 95%CI:1.09-3.54, P = 0.02). Trend test showed that there is a significant dose-response relationship between blood pressure and AD (P < 0.0002). For hypertensive AD patients, there was no significant difference in systolic blood pressure(SBP) before and after the onset of AD, but diastolic blood pressure(DBP) decreased dramatically after the onset of AD (P < 0.01); however, the result also showed that DBP decrease occurred in the non-demented group. Based on this, we think the DBP decrease is not related to AD. We further investigated whether BP values differed crossed-sectionally between the AD-patients and non-demented individuals. We found that regardless of SBP or DBP, the BP values of the AD group were all significantly higher than that of non-demented. In summary, these data suggest there is a strong relationship between hypertension and AD; however, the mechanism remains to be studied.Association between memory complaints and incident Alzheimer's disease in elderly people with normal baseline cognition.Results of previous studies suggest that memory complaints may predict cognitive decline and dementia among elderly people in whom cognitive impairment is already apparent. However, cognitive decline is often a gradual process, and elderly people may notice that their memory deteriorates before mental status tests are able to detect any change in cognitive functioning. Therefore, the authors hypothesized that memory complaints would predict incident Alzheimer's disease in elderly subjects with no signs of cognitive impairment.In the community-based Amsterdam Study of the Elderly, a sample of 3,778 nondemented persons, 65 to 84 years old, was selected and divided into two cognitive categories: normal (Mini-Mental State scores of 26-30) and borderline and impaired (Mini-Mental State scores less than 26). At baseline, the presence or absence of memory complaints was assessed. At follow-up, incident cases of Alzheimer's disease were diagnosed in a two-step procedure.After an average of 3.2 years, 2,169 persons were reevaluated, of whom 77 had incident Alzheimer's disease. Multivariate logistic regression analyses showed that memory complaints were associated with incident Alzheimer's disease in subjects with normal baseline cognition but not in subjects with impaired baseline cognition.The findings of this study suggest that memory complaints are a relatively strong predictor of incident Alzheimer's disease in older persons in whom cognitive impairment is not yet apparent. Furthermore, they suggest that older persons may be aware of a decline in cognition at a time when mental status tests are still unable to detect a decline from premorbid functioning.Utility of the abbreviated Fuld Object Memory Evaluation and MMSE for detection of dementia and cognitive impairment not dementia in diverse ethnic groups.To address the growing need for ethnically unbiased cognitive screening, we examined whether the Mini Mental State Exam (MMSE), the abbreviated Fuld Object Memory Evaluation (FOME), or a combination of the two provided optimal detection of dementia in an ethnically diverse group of older adults with no cognitive impairment (normal); cognitive impairment not dementia (CIND); and dementia. Participants included 509 Caucasians, 124 African Americans, and 68 Latinos (>70 years old) from the Aging, Demographics, and Memory Study who completed the MMSE and FOME. Empirically derived decision trees were computed using signal detection software for receiver operator characteristics (ROC). Among the three ethnic groups, ROC analyses revealed that lower scores on both the MMSE and FOME provided better detection of CIND or dementia. Sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE was augmented by the addition of the FOME among Caucasian and African American older adults. The MMSE alone was the best screen in Latino older adults to distinguish any cognitive impairment from normal. When comparing CIND versus dementia, however, the FOME alone was best for detecting dementia among Latinos. The abbreviated FOME is recommended to increase clinical validity and thus minimize ethnic biases when administering the MMSE to Caucasian and African American older adults. The MMSE alone is preferred for older Latinos unless comparing CIND and dementia, in which case the FOME alone would then be recommended. Findings suggest that ethnicity is important in the selection of an appropriate cognitive screen and cut-score to use with older adults.Neuropsychological detection of dementia: an overview of the neuropsychological component of the Canadian Study of Health and Aging.As part of the Canadian Study of Health and Aging (CSHA), a battery of neuropsychological measures was administered to 1879 participants. Participants who received neuropsychological evaluations were selected from an age-stratified random sample on the basis of scores on a cognitive screening tool, the Modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS). Seventy-five percent of the sample seen for neuropsychological evaluation scored between 50 and 77 on the 3MS and 25% of the sample scored 78 or over. This paper provides a descriptive summary of the methodological basis of the neuropsychological component of the CSHA. The findings indicated that differences existed between participants administered the battery in English or French in terms of refusal rates and diagnoses of dementia. Cursory examination of the utility of the battery indicated that the battery was tolerated well by both the participants and the psychologists involved with the study and that measures of memory functioning were central to diagnostic decision-making. The relations between neuropsychological, preliminary medical and consensus diagnoses were examined and indicated that neuropsychological information influenced diagnostic decision-making. The neuropsychology component of the CSHA is a rich source of information on persons aged 65 years and older in Canada.Diagnostic accuracy of a new instrument for detecting cognitive dysfunction.Effective screening of cognitive disorders is limited by psychometric and practical properties of available instruments. The Brief Cognitive Screen (BCS) was developed to improve sensitivity and overall diagnostic accuracy of case detection for cognitive dysfunction in a quick and convenient format.This validation study compared psychometric properties of the BCS with the Mini mental state examination (MMSE) in 308 patients with suspected or known disorders of cognition. Diagnostic accuracy of the MMSE was determined using the traditional 23/24 clinical cutoff and area under the curve (AUC) from receiver operating characteristics (ROC) analyses. Diagnostic accuracy of BCS summary scores and components was determined by ROC analyses. Comprehensive neuropsychological evaluation served as the criterion standard for determining cognitive dysfunction.The MMSE sensitivity (34.8%) was inadequate at the 23/24 cutoff. Under ROC analyses, diagnostic accuracy of a BCS summary score was superior (AUC = 0.950) to the MMSE total score (AUC = 0.862) for the total sample. Excluding all patients with a history of cognitive deficit, classification accuracy of the BCS remained high (AUC = 0.936).Findings suggest that BCS is an effective, convenient alternative screening instrument for use in clinical populations with suspected cognitive dysfunction.The sensitivity and specificity of subjective memory complaints and the subjective memory rating scale, deterioration cognitive observee, mini-mental state examination, six-item screener and clock drawing test in dementia screening.The effectiveness of dementia screening depends on the availability of suitable screening tools with good sensitivity and specificity to confidently distinguish normal age-related cognitive decline from dementia. The aim of this study was to evaluate the discriminant validity of 7 screening measures for dementia.A sample of 140 participants aged ≥60 years living in a residential facility for the aged were assessed clinically and assigned caseness for dementia using the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th edition, text revised diagnostic criteria. Sensitivity and specificity of a selection of the following screening measures were tested using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for individual and combined tests: the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Six-Item Screener (SIS), Subjective Memory Complaint, Subjective Memory Complaint Clinical (SMCC), Subjective Memory Rating Scale (SMRS), Deterioration Cognitive Observee (DECO) and the Clock Drawing Test (CDT).Using ROC analyses, the SMCC, MMSE and CDT were found to be 'moderately accurate' in screening for dementia with an area under the curve (AUC) >0.70. The AUCs for the SIS (0.526), SMRS (0.661) and DECO (0.687) classified these measures as being 'less accurate'. At recommended cutoff scores, the SMCC had a sensitivity of 90.9% and specificity of 45.7%; the MMSE had a sensitivity of 63.6% and a specificity of 76.0%, and the CDT had a sensitivity of 44.4% and a specificity of 88.9%. Combining the SMCC and MMSE did not improve their predictive power except for a modest increase when using the sequential rule.The SMCC is composed of valid screening questions that have high sensitivity, are simple to administer and ideal for administration at the community or primary health care level as a first level of 'rule-out' screening. The MMSE can be included at a second stage of screening at the general hospital level and the CDT in specialist clinical settings. Sequential use of the SMCC and MMSE will improve the specificity of the former and the sensitivity of the latter.Risk factors for dementia in the epidemiological study of Munguialde County (Basque Country-Spain).Prevalence of degenerative dementias and dementias associated with cerebrovascular disease is increasing. Dementia is one of the most significant public health problem. In recent years, the role of vascular risk factors (hypertension, diabetes mellitus and hypercholesterolemia) and depression has been evaluated.The incidence of dementia and risk factors has not been fully investigated in Spain. The aim of this study was to identify the risk factors for dementia, Alzheimer's disease (AD) and vascular dementia (VD) in elderly people in Munguialde County (Spain).A two phase, door-to-door populational study was performed. Demographic variables and the presence of vascular risk factors and depression were recorded. The MMSE, the DSM-IV and the conventional criteria for AD and VD were used in the evaluation. The odds ratio for each risk factor was calculated by logistic regression analysis.1756 healthy subjects and 175 patients with dementia participated in the study. Of these, 133 had AD, 15 VD and the remainder other dementias. The risk factors for dementia and AD were female sex (OR = 1.67 and 1.97, respectively); age (OR = 1.14 and 1.15); stroke (OR = 7.84 and 3); and depression (OR = 53.08 and 3.19). Stroke was the only risk factor for VD (OR = 119).Greater age, female sex, stroke and depression increase the risk of suffering dementia, AD and VD. The relationship between depression, vascular risk factors and dementia has clear public health implications. Prevention and early treatment of vascular risk factors and depression may have an important impact in lowering the risk of dementia and could modify the natural history of the disease.Is the telephone interview for cognitive status a valid alternative in persons who cannot be evaluated by the Mini Mental State Examination?The Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), a widely used tool for first-line assessment of cognitive function, cannot be fully administered to persons with severe visual or upper extremity impairments. This cross-sectional study, which was performed in a sample of patients admitted to the outpatient clinic of the INRCA Geriatric Department "I Fraticini" (Firenze, Italy) and their relatives, evaluated whether the Telephone Interview for Cognitive Status (TICS), a test originally created for telephone screening of cognitive impairment, is a valid alternative for assessment of cognition in persons who cannot provide valid responses to all the MMSE items. Fifteen subjects in each of seven MMSE strata (9-11, 12-14, 15-17, 18-20, 21-23, 24-26, 27-30) were consecutively selected. Inclusion criteria were: age > or = 60 years; Italian as the main language; education > or = 3 years; medical stability; and ability to complete the MMSE. At admission, participants were examined for dementia by an expert clinician according to the DSM IV criteria. Italian versions of the TICS and the MMSE were administered face-to-face by two trained interviewers. The TICS was readministered face-to-face one week later by the same interviewer that had previously administered the test. The TICS showed good test-retest reproducibility. Assessments taken one week apart differed on average by 0.52 +/- 1.9 points (p < 0.01), indicating a systematic improvement. The TICS explained 96% of the variance in the MMSE, and this association was independent of age, gender and education. More than 90% of the cases "screening positive" (i.e., scoring below a certain cut-off) by the TICS, were also identified as "screening positive" when comparable MMSE cut-off scores were used. Using comparable cut-off scores, the sensitivity and specificity of TICS and MMSE in detecting a standard clinical diagnosis of dementia largely overlapped. In persons who cannot be evaluated with the MMSE in its full form, the face-to-face administration of the TICS is a reliable and valid alternative.Incidence of dementia and associated risk factors in Japan: The Osaki-Tajiri Project.The incidence of dementia and risk factors has not been fully investigated in Japan. Following a prevalence study in 1998, we investigated the incidence and associated factors in the same population in 2003 and 2005. Randomly selected 771 residents in Tajiri were targeted. The final participants included 204 (65.2%) healthy older adults (Clinical Dementia Rating, CDR 0) and 335 (73.1%) people with questionable dementia (CDR 0.5). We analyzed the incidence of dementia and dementing diseases, and possible risk factors. The risk factors included demographics, lifestyle-related factors, vascular risk factors, cognitive functions, and MRI findings. Overall, 3.9% of the CDR 0 and 37.0% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 5-year period, whereas 40.2% of the CDR 0.5 participants developed dementia during the 7-year period. Older adults had a higher incidence. Higher CDR Box scores had a higher incidence. Of the dementing diseases, 60.8% of participants developed Alzheimer' disease (AD), followed by vascular dementia (VaD), 17.9%. Logistic regression analyses showed that age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as recent memory, and generalized atrophy were significant predictors of progression to AD. Similarly, predictive factors for progression to VaD were age, MMSE, cognitive functions such as frontal function, and white matter lesions and cerebrovascular diseases. A comprehensive system including CDR, cognitive tests, and MRI, is recommended in community-based health policy planning.Longitudinal trajectories of cognitive change in preclinical Alzheimer's disease: a growth mixture modeling analysis.Preclinical Alzheimer's disease (AD) refers to a period of time prior to diagnosis during which cognitive deficits among individuals who will go on to receive a diagnosis of AD are present. There is great interest in describing the nature of cognitive change during the preclinical period, in terms of whether persons decline in a linear fashion to diagnosis, or exhibit some stability of functioning, followed by rapid losses in performance. In the current study we apply Growth Mixture Modeling to data from The Kungsholmen Project to evaluate whether decline in Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores during the preclinical period of AD follows a linear or quadratic function. At the end of a 7-year follow-up period, some individuals would be diagnosed with AD (n=71), whereas others would remain free of dementia (n=457). The results indicated that a two-group quadratic model of decline provided the best statistical fit measures, as well as the greatest estimates of sensitivity (67%) and specificity (86%). Differences in MMSE scores were apparent at baseline, but the preclinical AD group began to experience precipitous declines three years prior to diagnosis. Finally, persons who were misclassified as preclinical AD had fewer years of education and poorer MMSE scores at baseline.Identification of dementia in epidemiological research: a study on the usefulness of various data sources.Prevalence and incidence ratios of dementia in epidemiological studies vary according to the data source used. Medical records, cognitive tests, and registry information are sources frequently used to differentiate dementia from normal aging. The aim of the present study was to compare the identification of dementia from these different sources with that from consensus diagnosis.498 elderly people (age range 70-81 at baseline) enrolled in a Swedish population-based longitudinal twin study (Gender) were evaluated on physical and mental health and interviewed for their socio-demographic background three times during an eight-year period. Reviews of medical records and the Swedish Discharge Registry (DR) were conducted. The 10th percentile was used to differentiate between dementia and non-dementia in all cognitive tests. Scores of 24 or below on the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (range 1-30) indicated dementia. A consensus conference diagnosed dementia on the basis of total information. The consensus diagnosis was used as the gold standard.MMSE scores (sensitivity 64%, specificity 96%, kappa 0.65) and the review of medical records (sensitivity 57%, specificity 99%, kappa 0.65) were good sources for dementia identification. The precision of medical records increased when recordings of cognitive impairment were included (sensitivity 83%, specificity 98%, kappa 0.84). The discharge registry had low sensitivity (26%) and kappa coefficient (0.31).The present study shows that both review of medical records and MMSE scores are good although not perfect identifiers of dementia. The discharge registry is an uncertain source of dementia identification.Norms for the Mini-Mental State Examination in a healthy population.Although the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is widely used in clinical practice, few norms exist for healthy populations covering a broad range of ages.To obtain MMSE norms specific for age, gender, and education in healthy adults.From the population registers of seven communities across Italy, we selected a proportionate random sample of residents age 20 to 79 years to evaluate their health status with respect to conditions affecting cognitive performance. This sample yielded 908 persons who were deemed to be without cognitive impairment and who were then given the MMSE. We calculated fifth percentile norms and presented them as step functions. We then validated the norms as a screening tool for dementia in persons age 65 to 79 years. The validation was based on unpublished data from a separate study and involved estimates of sensitivity and specificity.The norms declined with advancing age, especially for less educated women. Given any age and sex, the norms were higher for individuals with higher educational levels. In screening for dementia, the norms had a sensitivity of 85% and a specificity of 89%.When using MMSE scores, it is important to account for age, gender, and education, especially in populations where the educational level is low. Expressing MMSE norms as step functions provides an easy-to-use tool for neurologists and other clinicians.Validation of a French version of an informant-based questionnaire as a screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Development of informant-based screening tests for dementia is an emerging field. The reliability and validity of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), an instrument that screens for dementia in general, have been established. We conducted a study to validate a French version of the IQCODE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in the elderly living in the community.In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, subjects were screened in their own homes using the modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3-MS). Those who screened positive, along with a sample of subjects who screened negative, were referred for a complete clinical examination. In Quebec, an informant was asked to complete the French version, IQCODE(F), at that time. Based on the final clinical diagnoses, performances of the IQCODE(F) and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE, converted from 3-MS) in screening for Alzheimer's disease were evaluated.Of the 237 subjects, the mean IQCODE (F) score was 3.4 (s.d. = 0.6), on a 5-point scale (1 = improvement in condition over the past 10 years, 5 = marked deterioration, 3 = no change). The mean MMSE score was 23.1 (s.d. = 4.5). The scores on the two scales were correlated (r = -0.44, P < 0.001). The IQCODE(F) scores were unrelated to education (r = -0.07, P > 0.3) in contrast to the MMSE scores (r = 0.28, P < 0.001). With respect to a diagnosis of probable Alzheimer's disease, the IQCODE(F) (cut-off point 3.6) had a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 95.6%. The sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE (cut-off point 23) were 70% and 82.3% respectively.The findings of the IQCODE(F) are consistent with those of the English version in correlation with the MMSE and apparent freedom from educational bias. The IQCODE is superior to the MMSE as a screening test for probable Alzheimer's disease in the elderly living in the community. It may be a useful addition to the screening tests already available, especially for the less well educated.Evaluation of a Japanese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination in elderly persons.This study aimed to examine the validity and item-response characteristics of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), which is used for assessing cognitive function, in Japanese older adults.Factor analysis and item response analysis were carried out for MMSE responses (n = 1971) from older adults living in the community (n = 1339) or in a nursing home (n = 632), including Alzheimer-type dementia (n = 330), vascular dementia (n = 36), frontotemporal dementia (n = 7), mixed Alzheimer-type and frontotemporal type dementia (n = 27), and age-related cognitive decline (n = 29). When choosing the cut-off score of 23 points for the MMSE, sensitivity and specificity for each item were calculated.A three-factor solution was found to be most appropriate by factor analysis: complex processing, simple processing and working memory. The item characteristics curves showed unidimensionality with high reproducibility. We identified a simplified scale comprising 10 items in all participants: "naming", "three-step command", "registration", "repeat a sentence", "write a complete sentence", "copies drawing of two polygons", "orientation to place", "delayed recall", "orientation to time" and "serial sevens" tasks. Sensitivity and specificity for both "year" task and "day" task were more than 90% ("year": sensitivity 92.5%, specificity 96.3%; "day": sensitivity 92.4%, specificity 91.7%). For the Alzheimer-type dementia patients, the five-factor solution was suggested by factor analysis and the MMSE also had unidimensionality in terms of level of difficulty.We found that the MMSE had multiple cognitive areas. We showed that the MMSE could be used as an essentially unidimensional measure of cognitive ability and the question about orientation to time might be useful in the simplest assessment to identify cognitive dysfunction.A three-year follow-up study of age-related dementia in an urban area of Beijing.A 3-year follow-up study of 1090 people aged 60 years or over in an urban area of Beijing, China, was conducted to determine the incidence of dementia and its characteristics of distribution. This cohort has been studied first in a cross-sectional survey of dementia in 1986. The follow-up examination employed the same interviewers, psychiatrists, instruments (Mini-Mental State Examination and the Crichton Royal Behavior Rating Scale) and diagnostic criteria for dementia (modified DSM-III) in 1989. The respondent rate in this study was 75.7%. The average annual incidence rate of moderate and severe dementia for greater than or equal to 60 years was 0.3% (95% confidence interval 0.08-0.52%). As expected, the rate increased sharply with aging. No sex difference was found. The prevalence rate of moderate and severe dementia was 1.10% among those aged greater than or equal to 65 years, similar to that (1.82%) in the first survey. Our results showed that the multi-infarct dementia was somewhat more common than primary degenerative dementia (ratio 3:2), both among incident cases and current prevalent ones. The average duration of dementia in the community was 8.0 years (SD 3.4). The risk for death in demented patients was 3 times higher than in the whole cohort (standardized mortality ratio = 2.95), and no specific cause of death was observed. In addition, our study showed that elderly people with less education, a history of consistent unemployment, limited physical activity and stroke history had a higher risk for developing dementia.Cognitive stability over 2 years in a rural elderly population: the MoVIES project.In an ongoing prospective community study, a random sample of rural elderly persons was screened with cognitive tests (including the CERAD neuropsychological battery) at study entry and an average of 2 years later. We examined 1,017 subjects, nondemented at study entry, at both waves, with the Mini-Mental State Exam, Story Recall, Word List Recall and Recognition, Boston Naming Test, Verbal Fluency, Praxis, Clock Drawing, and Trailmaking. Overall, the cognitive performance was stable, with either no mean change or a small mean decline over 2 years; however, standard deviations were relatively large, implying individual variation of questionable clinical significance. These data provide a set of population-based longitudinal cognitive norms and have implications for dementia screening.Sensitivity of four psychometric tests to measure cognitive changes in brain aging-population-based studies.Choosing the measure of cognition in an epidemiologic study investigating cognitive changes over time is a challenging question. A powerful measure must be able to detect small cognitive changes in all the range of cognition observed in the target population. This work aims at comparing the sensitivity to detect cognitive changes in the observed range of cognition of four widely used psychometric tests in an aging-population-based study through a nonlinear latent process model, assuming that the psychometric tests are nonlinear noisy transformations of their common factor. With data from the French prospective cohort study PAQUID (1989-2001), the authors found that the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Benton Visual Retention Test exhibited a better sensitivity to cognitive changes in low levels of cognition, while the Digit Symbol Substitution Test was more sensitive to changes in high levels of cognition. In contrast, the Isaacs Set Test shortened at 15 seconds appeared to be sensitive to small changes in all the range of cognition and, thus, represents an appropriate measure of cognition in population-based studies including both highly normal and severely impaired subjects.Mini Mental State Examination in Sinhalese: a sensitive test to screen for dementia in Sri Lanka.Although the Sri Lankan population is ageing rapidly, dementia has not been systematically investigated here. The Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) is a brief global instrument used to assess cognitive abilities in the elderly.This study aimed to develop and validate a Sinhalese translation of the MMSE, which could be used as a screening instrument to detect impaired cognition in an epidemiological investigation of dementia in Sri Lanka.Due to the high literacy rate in the country, the MMSE was translated and modified slightly without having to make major changes to the original version. 380 randomly selected subjects over 65 years in a semi-urban area were screened with the translated version of the MMSE. The cut-off score for cognitive impairment was taken as 17. Of the 380 subjects screened, 33 scored < or = 17, and were thus considered cases of suspected dementia. All 33 who scored < or = 17 and 24 randomly selected subjects who scored>17 on the MMSE, thus considered cognitively normal, underwent a brief clinical examination and neuropsychological assessment with the more comprehensive neuropsychiatric test battery, Cambridge Cognitive Score (CAMCOG), to determine the presence of dementia.Evaluated against the performance at the CAMCOG, the sensitivity and specificity of the translated MMSE were 93.5% and 84.6% respectively.Therefore, the Sinhalese translation of the MMSE described here is a sensitive instrument to screen for dementia in Sri Lanka.Diagnostic performance of the Chinese Frontal Assessment Battery in early cognitive impairment in an Asian population.The Frontal Assessment Battery (FAB) has been shown to be useful in evaluating frontal dysfunction. There is a paucity of studies validating cutoffs in the early cognitive impairment. We aim to validate the Chinese FAB in Asian subjects with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and early dementia.Eighty subjects with MCI and mild dementia and 100 cognitively healthy community subjects were studied. ROC analysis was done to determine the Chinese FAB's optimal cutoff scores for age- and education-adjusted subgroups.Chinese FAB scores were significantly lower in early cognitive impairment compared with cognitively normal controls. The optimal cutoff score was 12/13 (sensitivity 92%, specificity 78.7%). A similar cutoff score was obtained following age-adjustment and for subjects with <6 years' education. Of note, the optimal cutoff for subjects with ≥6 years' education was 13/14 (sensitivity 91.8%, specificity 70.3%), an improved diagnostic performance compared to the earlier reported 11/12 cutoff. In comparison, the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) had lower rule-out accuracy (77% sensitivity, 91.2% specificity). The combination of the Chinese FAB and MMSE was superior to either test in isolation.The education-adjusted Chinese FAB has good diagnostic performance, which can supplement the MMSE in early cognitive impairment evaluation with construct differences observed between the Chinese FAB and MMSE.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in an elderly immigrant Gujarati population in the United Kingdom.The principal aim of this pilot study was to evaluate the performance of a Gujarati version of the MMSE as a screening instrument for dementia. The effect of ethnicity on MMSE performance was also examined.Two-stage cross-cultural survey.Elderly immigrant Gujarati and British-born white communities in Leicester.First stage: 149 Gujaratis and 148 whites. Second stage: 27 Gujaratis and 42 whites.English and Gujarati versions of the MMSE, validated against clinical diagnosis following psychiatric interview (ICD-10 criteria).Mean MMSE scores were lower in the Gujarati group, but most of this difference was due to the effects of age, education and visual impairment. Ethnic group had an independent effect on three orientation items; when these were omitted, there was no difference in the mean MMSE scores of the groups after adjustment for age, education and visual impairment. The MMSE performed comparably in both groups as a screen for moderate-severe dementia, but was less efficient at detecting milder and less certain cases in the Gujarati group. The estimated prevalence of confirmed dementia was higher in the Gujarati group, but this was not statistically significant.This Gujarati version of the MMSE performed adequately as a screen for dementia in this immigrant community population. Further evaluation of its performance is required in larger community samples, clinical samples and in native Indian Gujaratis.[Elementary test of concentration, orientation and memory. Application to the detection of dementia states in daily practice].The authors present a french version of the Katzman short orientation memory concentration test. The 6 items of the test include 3 orientation questions, 2 mental control items and an address memory phrase. Time for administration is less than 5 minutes. This french version of the test has been validated as a measure of cognitive impairment in a population of 200 subjects including 140 patients without cognitive impairment and 60 demented subjects. As defined by a 10/11 cut-off score, sensibility and specificity for the diagnosis of dementia were 91 p. 100 and 95 p. 100 respectively. Correlation of the scores with those obtained by the Mini mental state was highly significant. This fast, easy and reliable test seems particularly suitable for the detection of cognitive impairment in clinical practice.The clock drawing test in primary care: sensitivity in dementia detection and specificity against normal and depressed elderly.The aim of this study was to examine the sensitivities and specificities of the clock drawing test (CDT) in the detection of dementia among older people in primary care, with particular emphasis on the effect of depression on CDT specificity. Most previous studies have been sited in specialist settings and few have addressed the issue of specificity against depression.Comparison of cohorts identified from community-based screening with GMS-AGECAT. The CDT and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were administered to 41 elderly subjects with organic disorder (dementia), 84 elderly subjects with case level depression and 523 normal elderly subjects. Sensitivities and specificities of the CDT were calculated.The sensitivity of the CDT in the detection of dementia in the general community was 76%. The specificities of the CDT against normal elderly and depressed elderly was 81% and 77% respectively. Higher sensitivity and specificity were achieved by the MMSE.The use of the CDT in the detection of dementia syndromes is likely to be more relevant in the primary care context than in specialist settings. The CDT provides good sensitivity and specificity but may not be as sensitive or specific in the general community as previous studies have suggested, particularly in mild dementia. Community-based late life depression does not appear to alter the specificity of the CDT.Cross validation of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment in community dwelling older adults residing in the Southeastern US.Cross validation study of the MoCA for the detection of Alzheimer's disease (AD) and Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) in a community-based cohort residing in the Southeastern United States.One hundred and eighteen English-speaking older adults, who underwent diagnostic evaluation as part of an on-going prospective study, were administered the MoCA and MMSE. Twenty were diagnosed with AD, 24 met criteria for amnestic MCI and 74 were considered cognitively normal. Sensitivities and specificities were calculated using the recommended cut-off scores and ROC curve analyses were performed to determine optimal sensitivity and specificity. The influence of age, education and gender on MoCA score was also examined.Using a cut-off score of 24 or below, the MMSE was insensitive to cognitive impairment. Using the recommended cut-off score of 26, the MoCA detected 97% of those with cognitive impairment but specificity was fair (35%). Using a lower cut-off score of 23, the MoCA exhibited excellent sensitivity (96%) and specificity (95%).The MoCA appears to have utility as a cognitive screen for early detection of AD and for MCI and warrants further investigation regarding its applicability in primary care settings, varying ethnic groups, and younger at-risk individuals.Brief cognitive screening of the elderly: a comparison of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) and Mental Status Questionnaire (MSQ).One hundred and fifty unselected elderly community subjects were assessed by Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) and Mental Status Questionnaire (MSQ). The effects on cognitive test scores of potential confounding (non-cognitive) variables were evaluated. Sensitivities and specificities were: MMSE 80% and 98%; AMT 77% and 90%; and MSQ 70% and 89%. The MMSE identified significantly fewer false positives than the AMT and MSQ. The major effect of intelligence on cognitive test scores has previously been underestimated. Age, social class, sensitivity of hearing and history of stroke were also significantly correlated with cognitive test scores. Years of full time education and depression only affected the longer MMSE and CAMCOG. The MMSE (cut-off 20/21) can be recommended for routine screening. However, as scores are affected by variables other than cognitive function, particularly intelligence, further assessment of identified cases may fail to reveal significant functional impairment.The Mini-Cog as a screen for dementia: validation in a population-based sample.To test the Mini-Cog, a brief cognitive screening test, in an epidemiological study of dementia in older Americans.A population-based post hoc examination of the sensitivity and specificity of the Mini-Cog for detecting dementia in an existing data set.The Monongahela Valley in Western Pennsylvania.A random sample of 1,119 older adults enrolled in the Monongahela Valley Independent Elders Survey (MoVIES).The effectiveness of the Mini-Cog in detecting independently diagnosed dementia was compared with that of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and a standardized neuropsychological battery.The Mini-Cog, scored by an algorithm as "possibly impaired" or "probably normal," and the MMSE, at a cutpoint of 25, had similar sensitivity (76% vs 79%) and specificity (89% vs 88%) for dementia, comparable with that achieved using a conventional neuropsychological battery (75% sensitivity, 90% specificity).When applied post hoc to an existing population, the Mini-Cog was as effective in detecting dementia as longer screening and assessment instruments. Its brevity is a distinct advantage when the goal is to improve identification of older adults in a population who may be cognitively impaired. Prior evidence of good performance in a multiethnic community-based sample further supports its validity in the ethnolinguistically diverse populations of the United States in which widely used cognitive screens often fail.A normative study of the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale: comparison of demographic influences between the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale and the Mini-Mental Status Examination.We investigated the demographic influence on the performance of the Revised Hasegawa Dementia Scale (HDS-R) and provided normative data of the HDS-R in the elderly.The HDS-R was administered to 803 community-dwelling cognitively normal elderly subjects aged 55 years or over. Cognitive disorders and psychiatric disorders were strictly excluded using the CERAD-K assessment packet and the Mini-International Neuropsychiatric Interview. The demographic influence on the performance of the HDS-R was examined using multiple linear regression analyses, and compared with that on the performance of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) using the Chow test and t statistics. Overlapping strata were used in developing age-, education- and gender-specific normative data of the HDS-R.Age, education, and gender influenced significantly the performance of the HDS-R, and explained 22.5% of the total score variance. Older age, lower education, and male gender were associated with lower performance of the HDS-R. However, the demographic influence on the HDS-R was much weaker than that on the MMSE (t = 5.578, d.f. = 800, p < 0.001). The normative data of the HDS-R stratified by age (60-69, 70-79, > or =80), education (0-6, 7-12, > or =13), and gender were presented.The HDS-R was more robust to demographic influences than the MMSE, and normative data may contribute to improving further its diagnostic accuracy for dementia.Comparison of the Saint Louis University mental status examination and the mini-mental state examination for detecting dementia and mild neurocognitive disorder--a pilot study.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is commonly used as a screening tool to detect dementia. However, it performs poorly in identifying persons with mild neurocognitive disorder. The Saint Louis University Mental Status (SLUMS) examination is a 30-point screening questionnaire that tests for orientation, memory, attention, and executive functions.The objective of this study was to compare SLUMS and the MMSE for detecting dementia and mild neurocognitive disorder (MNCD) using Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) criteria.Patients at the Veterans' Affairs Geriatric Research, Education and Clinical Center, St. Louis, MO (N = 702) were clinically classified as having normal cognitive functioning, MNCD, or dementia based on DSM-IV criteria. The SLUMS and MMSE were administered for comparison.Mean age was 75.3 years (standard deviation: 5.5). Regarding education, 62.4% of the sample had at least completed high school and 30.6% had not. Sensitivity and specificity were calculated and receiver operator curves (ROCs) generated for SLUMS and MMSE as a function of diagnosis (MCND versus dementia) and education. Both the SLUMS and MMSE produced acceptable ROCs for the diagnosis of dementia, but the ROCs for SLUMS were better than the MMSE for the diagnosis of MNCD in both education groups.These results suggest that the SLUMS and MMSE have comparable sensitivities, specificities, and area under the curve in detecting dementia. Although the definition of MNCD is controversial, the authors believe that the SLUMS is possibly better at detecting mild neurocognitive disorder, which the MMSE failed to detect, but this needs to be further investigated.Improving screening accuracy for dementia in a community sample by augmenting cognitive testing with informant report.This study sought to determine whether the augmentation of cognitive testing with an informant report questionnaire could improve accuracy in screening for dementia in a community setting. The sample consisted of 646 subjects aged 70-93 years. Cognitive state was assessed using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Informants completed the 16-item short form of the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). Dementia was diagnosed according to DSM-III-R criteria. Combination of the IQCODE with the MMSE resulted in more accurate prediction of caseness than either test alone. Receiver Operating Characteristic analysis demonstrated the superior screening performance of a logical "or" rule and a weighted sum of scores on the two tests over other methods of combination, replicating previous clinically based research. The findings also suggest that the appropriate combination of existing tests may be a fruitful method of improving screening accuracy in a variety of situations.The usefulness of the Korean version of modified Mini-Mental State Examination (K-mMMSE) for dementia screening in community dwelling elderly people.We assessed whether the Korean version of modified Mini-Mental State Examination (K-mMMSE) has improved performance as a screening test for cognitive impairment or dementia in a general population compared with the Korean Mini-Mental State Examination (K-MMSE).Screening interviews were conducted with people aged 65 and over in Noam-dong, Namwon-city, Jeonbuk province. There were 522 community participants, of whom 235 underwent clinical and neuropsychological examination for diagnosis of dementia and Cognitive Impairment No Dementia (CIND). Sensitivity, specificity and areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves for the K-mMMSE and the K-MMSE were the main outcome measures.Cronbach's alpha for the K-mMMSE was 0.91, compared with 0.84 for the K-MMSE. The areas under the ROC curves in identifying all levels of CIND or dementia were 0.91 for the K-mMMSE and 0.89 for the K-MMSE (P < 0.05). For the K-mMMSE, the optimal cut-off score for a diagnosis of CIND was 69/70, which had a sensitivity of 0.86 and a specificity of 0.79, while, for a diagnosis of dementia, the optimal cut-off score of 59/60 had a sensitivity of 0.91 and a specificity of 0.78. The K-mMMSE also had a high test-retest reliability (r = 0.89).Our findings indicate that the K-mMMSE is more reliable and valid than the K-MMSE as a cognitive screen in a population based study of dementia. Considering the test characteristics, the K-MMSE and modified version are expected to be optimally used in clinical and epidemiologic fields.The MacNeill-Lichtenberg Decision Tree: a unique method of triaging mental health problems in older medical rehabilitation patients.Evaluation of the utility of a "decision tree" that identifies potential mental health problems in older medical patients and guides decision making for referrals.Measures of utility including sensitivity, specificity, and predictive power were examined. Independent t tests and nonparametric statistics were used to evaluate group differences where appropriate.The stroke and geriatric unit of a freestanding urban medical rehabilitation hospital.In study 1,173 older, consecutively admitted medical rehabilitation patients completed all cognitive measures. In study 2, a separate sample of 313 older adults completed the Geriatric Depression Scale during admission.The MacNeill-Lichtenberg Decision Tree (MLDT) was compared with the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE), the Mattis Dementia Rating Scale, and the 30-item Geriatric Depression Scale.Study 1: The decision tree accurately triaged 87% of mental health problems and allowed for deferral of 41% of cases, for whom further assessment was unnecessary. The MLDT was superior to the MMSE, with higher sensitivity and a lower failure rate. Study 2: The emotional status component of the MLDT was useful in triaging cases for depression evaluation.The MLDT was useful in prioritizing cases with regard to mental health problems (eg, dementia, depression) and making quick referral decisions. The MLDT is a unique instrument that not only evaluates cognitive status, but also considers psychosocial factors and emotional status in older adults.Establishing the limits of the Mini-Mental State. Examination of 'subtests'.It has been suggested that the Mini-Mental State examination can be used to examine a patient's cognitive profile. We therefore examined the validity of Mini-Mental State subtests and individual items. The memory item, attention-concentration items, and constructional item had satisfactory sensitivity-specificity and correlated significantly with scores on neuropsychological tests. In contrast, four of the five Mini-Mental State language items had very low sensitivity, and three of five failed to correlate with neuropsychological test scores. These findings establish limits with regard to the ability of the Mini-Mental State to generate a cognitive profile. Our data also provide information regarding validity, difficulty level, and optimal cutoff scores for widely used mental status tasks.Validity of the Clock-Drawing Test as a screening tool for cognitive impairment in the elderly.The authors studied the validity of the Clock-Drawing Test (CDT) in comparison with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the association between the CDT and mortality in a large general population sample of persons aged 75 years or more. Data were obtained from the MRC Trial of the Assessment and Management of Older People in the Community. Baseline assessments were conducted between 1995 and 1999 in the United Kingdom. A total of 13,557 subjects with both CDT and MMSE scores were included in the analysis. The median follow-up period was 4.7 years. The sensitivity and specificity of the CDT for detecting moderate-to-severe cognitive impairment (MMSE score <or= 17) were 77% and 87%, respectively, for nurse administration and 40% and 91%, respectively, for postal administration. Sensitivity was higher among females and increased with age. In Cox proportional hazards regression, a worse CDT score was associated with increased risk of all-cause mortality and mortality from cerebrovascular and respiratory diseases, even after adjustment for potential confounders. The authors conclude that the CDT may have value as a brief face-to-face screening tool for moderate/severe cognitive impairment in an older community population but is relatively poor at detecting milder cognitive impairment.[The Mini-Mental State Examination as a selected diagnostic test for dementia: a Colombian population study. GENECO].Folstein's Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) is widely used as screening test for cognitive impairment.To test a Spanish version of the MMSE in a population of high illiteracy rate.Population-based survey of a stratified random sample of urban and rural residents of five regions of Colombia, followed by neurological and neuropsychological evaluation of suspect cases (phase 2). Dementia was diagnosed using DSM-IV criteria.1,611 subjects age 50 or older filled out both the WHO Protocol for Epidemiologic Studies of Neurological Disorders and a Spanish version of the MMSE; 55.2% of them had three or less years of schooling; 536 individuals with scores below cutoff points were sent to phase 2. Of the population with satisfactory scores in MMSE 366 (34.0%) were evaluated by neurologists to exclude other neurological conditions. Twelve cases of dementia were diagnosed among individuals with scores below cutoff point and one among subjects with high scores. Age-adjusted prevalence was 8.1 per thousand subjects age 50 or over (95% CI: 3.7-12.5); and 34.2 per thousand for ages 75 or over (95% CI: 12.2-56.2). Sensitivity and specificity were 92.3 and 53.7%; 16 of the 19 questions show significant differences (p < 0.001) according to educational level. A gender gap is significant in low educational levels (p < 0.001) but not in subjects with more than five years of schooling.MMSE scores correlated closely with level of education. Low specificity leads to many non-demented subjects with low educational status requiring further investigation.CSF-tau, CSF-Abeta1-42, ApoE-genotype and clinical parameters in the diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease: combination of CSF-tau and MMSE yields highest sensitivity and specificity.This study evaluated the sensitivity and specificity of the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) levels of tau-protein, amyloid-beta-peptide 1-42 (Abeta1-42), ApoE-genotype and the degree of cognitive decline as diagnostic markers for Alzheimer's disease (AD). Data was obtained from 105 AD patients and 68 controls. Median CSF-tau levels were increased (512 pg/ml vs. 145 pg/ml, p<0.001) and Abeta1-42-levels were decreased (238.5 pg/ml vs. 310 pg/ml, p<0.001) in AD patients compared to controls. A weak correlation was found between CSF-Abeta1-42 and MMSE score (r=.245). Within all subjects, a correlation of CSF-Abeta1-42 (r=-.337) and CSF-tau (r=.384) with age was found. The combination of CSF-tau levels and MMSE revealed the highest sensitivity (92%) and specificity (87%). In summary, CSF-tau was a useful biological marker to discriminate AD from normal aging, neurological and psychiatric disorders. CSF-Abeta1-42 showed no additional benefit in discriminating patients from controls but might be useful for tracking the severity of the disease.Does a reliable decline in Mini Mental State Examination total score predict dementia? Diagnostic accuracy of two reliable change indices.Norms for change in Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) total score suggest that only a decline of at least 2-4 points indicates a reliable change. However, it is unknown whether change norms (Reliable Change Indices, RCIs) of the MMSE total score are suitable to predict future dementia.554 elderly individuals aged 75 and over without dementia at the first 2 visits were tested with the MMSE at a maximum of 6 visits with 1.5-year intervals. Two different RCIs for change in MMSE score (first to second visit) were computed - one RCI which corrects for practice and one RCI which corrects for regression to the mean. The main outcome measure was the diagnosis of dementia.During the study, 88 persons developed dementia. RCIs were significantly associated with future dementia diagnosis. The best cutoff for raw change in MMSE total score to predict dementia was -1 point (sensitivity = 48%, specificity = 67%, relative risk = 1.6). With the RCI + regression to the mean, the diagnostic accuracy was moderate (sensitivity = 61%, specificity = 72%, relative risk = 3.2).A change in MMSE total score is significantly associated with future dementia, but the diagnostic accuracy for dementia prediction is rather low.Variability in annual Mini-Mental State Examination score in patients with probable Alzheimer disease: a clinical perspective of data from the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease.To determine the variability in annual Mini-Mental State Examination scores of patients with Alzheimer disease enrolled in the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD).A total of 372 patients with probable Alzheimer disease with 1 or more years of follow-up.Twenty-one CERAD clinical sites throughout the United States.An average annual decline of 3.4 points in CERAD patients returning for longitudinal reassessments was close to the SD of the measurement error of 2.8 points for the Mini-Mental State Examination. There was wide variability in individual rates of decline. Even with 4 years of follow-up, 15.8% of the patients had no clinically meaningful decline in Mini-Mental State Examination score (defined as a change in initial score >3, ie, 1 SD of measurement error). Validity of measurements of the rate of change in Mini-Mental State Examination scores improved with longer observation intervals and was reliable for most patients when observations were separated by 3 or more years.Although the Mini-Mental State Examination is a useful screening instrument to assess level of cognitive function, it has limited value in measuring the progression of Alzheimer disease in individual patients for periods less than 3 years because of a large measurement error and substantial variation in change in annual score.Value of the Mini-Mental State Examination and informants' data for the detection of dementia in geriatric outpatients.The Dutch version of the Mini-Mental State Examination was administered to 138 elderly patients who were referred to a geriatric outpatient clinic for a variety of reasons. An optimal cut-off point of 24/25 was found for the detection of dementia. At this cut-off point, the Mini-Mental State Examination was 87.6% sensitive and 81.6% specific in detecting dementia. The discriminative validity was influenced by education and by the presence of psychiatric disorders other than dementia. Informants' data showed better sensitivity and specificity than the Mini-Mental State Examination for the detection of dementia. The findings suggest that informants' data are a primary source of information for the detection of dementia in geriatric outpatients.The distribution of Mini-Mental State Examination scores in an older UK African-Caribbean population compared to MRC CFA study norms.to describe normative data for the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in a UK African-Caribbean population and compare these with norms for white UK-born elders.a comparison of MMSE data from two cross-sectional surveys.the MMSE had been administered to a community UK African-Caribbean population and scores were compared to norms from the Medical Research Council Cognitive Function and Ageing Study (CFAS). MMSE data were analysed for 248 African-Caribbean participants aged 55-75 and 5379 CFAS participants aged 65-74, without visual or auditory problems. Distributions of scores were tabulated and error rates for individual items compared.Median MMSE scores were 25 (interquartile range 22-27) for the whole African-Caribbean sample, 24 (22-27) for those aged 65-75 in the African-Caribbean sample, and 27 (25-29) for CFAS. Differences in error rates were specific to particular items: naming the season, serial seven subtraction, phrase repetition, three-stage command, and copying intersecting pentagons. These differences persisted when both samples were restricted to those with statutory duration of education, who were literate and who had worked in non-manual occupations. Normative data are displayed for MMSE scores in both groups.different distributions of MMSE scores between UK African-Caribbean and Caucasian groups can be principally explained by cultural bias in certain items. If the MMSE is to be administered to older African-Caribbean people, specific normative data should be referred to or else a culturally modified version of the instrument should be used.Does the combination of the MMSE and clock drawing test (mini-clock) improve the detection of mild Alzheimer's disease and mild cognitive impairment?There is currently a need to develop tools to identify patients with mild AD and mild cognitive impairment (MCI). We determined the validity and reliability of a brief, easily administered cognitive screening battery consisting of fusion of two well-known brief tests (Mini-Mental Status Examination [MMSE] and Clock Drawing Test [CDT]) (Mini-clock) to differentiate between patients with mild AD, MCI, and healthy control subjects. 66 consecutive patients with mild AD, 21 with MCI, and 66 healthy controls seen in a memory clinic setting were compared. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was used to calculate the cut-off value permitting discrimination between mild AD, MCI, and healthy control subjects. Interrater and test-retest reliability were also assessed. Mean cognitive scores for patients with AD, MCI, and control subjects on all two individual tests were significantly different (for each, p < 0.001). The mean area under the ROC curve for Mini-clock was higher than that obtained with MMSE or CDT in differentiating mild AD from controls (0.973 vs. 0.952 and 0.881, respectively) and MCI from controls (0.855 vs. 0.821 and 0.779, respectively). Test-retest reliability for the Mini-clock was 0.99, meanwhile interrater reliability was 0.87. The mean time to complete the test for all subjects was 8 min and 50 s. The Mini-clock is highly sensitive and specific in the detection of mild AD and reasonably accurate when attempting to separate MCI from health controls. It has a high interrater and test-retest reliability, can be quickly administered, and does not require major training.Performance characteristics of a two-stage dementia screen in a population sample.We analyzed the performance of a two-stage screening protocol [the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) or the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline (IQCODE), and the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ)] in a weighted stratified sample of 839 subjects from a population survey of dementia in Cache County, UT. The subjects were subsequently examined using a standardized diagnostic assessment protocol. Using the method of receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the main outcome measure was area under the ROC curve (AUC). The overall AUC estimates were 0.956 (95% confidence interval 0.943-0.968) for the 3MS/IQCODE and 0.945 (0.931-0.960) for the DQ. After adjustment for age, the efficiency of the both 3MS/IQCODE and the DQ was better for subjects with genotype epsilon4/epsilon4 at APOE, better among women, and better in those with two or more years duration of dementia. The optimal threshold for this two-stage screen yielded sensitivity and specificity estimates of 91.0% and 92.0%, respectively.The GPCOG: a new screening test for dementia designed for general practice.To design and test a brief, efficient dementia-screening instrument for use by general practitioners (GPs).The General Practitioner Assessment of Cognition (GPCOG) consists of cognitive test items and historical questions asked of an informant. The validity of the measure was assessed by comparison with the criterion standard of diagnoses of dementia derived from the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (Fourth Edition).Primary care doctors' offices.Sixty-seven GPs administered the GPCOG to 283 community-dwelling patients aged 50 to 74 with memory complaints or aged 75 and older.The Cambridge Mental Disorder of the Elderly Examination, the Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT), the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the 15-item Geriatric Depression Scale, and the 12-item Short-Form Health Survey.The GPCOG was reliable and superior to the AMT (and possibly to the MMSE) in detecting dementia. The two-stage method of administering the GPCOG (cognitive testing followed by informant questions if necessary)had a sensitivity of 0.85, a specificity of 0.86, a misclassification rate of 14%, and positive predictive value of 71.4%. Patient interviews took less than 4 minutes to administer and informant interviews less than 2 minutes. The instrument was reported by GPs to be practical to administer and was acceptable to patients.The GPCOG is a valid, efficient, well-accepted instrument for dementia screening in primary care.The cognitive disorders examination (Codex) is a reliable 3-minute test for detection of dementia in the elderly (validation study on 323 subjects).Dementia often remains undiagnosed until it has reached moderate or severe stages, thereby preventing patients and their families from obtaining optimal care. Tools that are easy to use in primary care might facilitate earlier detection of dementia.Develop and validate a very brief test for the detection of dementia.In the derivation study, we recorded educational level, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores and subscores and results of a simplified clock-drawing test (sCDT) for consecutive patients attending a single memory clinic over a two-year period,. Dementia was diagnosed according to DSM-IV criteria. The independent variables related to dementia were determined by a multivariable logistic model (MLM) and used to develop a decision tree to predict this diagnosis. In the validation study, the decision tree was applied to consecutive patients of six memory clinics for whom status about dementia was previously determined with DSM-IV criteria. The decision tree, MLM, and MMSE were applied to detect dementia in these patients. The sensitivity and specificity of each diagnostic tool were estimated and compared.Of 242 patients in the derivation study, the following independent variables were correlated with dementia: sex, sCDT, and two MMSE subscores - the 3-word recall test and spatial orientation. We used Bayesian statistics to develop a brief 2-step decision analysis tree (2-3 min.), which we named Codex (cognitive disorders examination). The validation study applied Codex to 323 patients. Sensitivity was 93% and specificity 85%. The corresponding values were 88% and 87% for the MLM, 94% and 67% or 91% and 70% for the MMSE, depending on the MMSE cutoff score. The sensitivity of Codex was significantly higher than that of MLM, and its specificity was significantly greater than that of MMSE.Codex is a simple, brief, and reliable test for detecting dementia and requires three minutes or less to administer. Its simplicity and brevity make it appropriate for and easy to use in primary care.The AGECAT "organic" section as a screening instrument for minor cognitive deficits.In the context of increasing concern in occidental countries about dementing diseases in the geriatric population, an epidemiological study has been done in the city of Zaragoza, Spain. The sample, randomly selected from the census, was stratified by age and sex and included 1,134 elderly (aged 65 plus years) living in the community. In phase I, lay interviewers administered the Spanish versions of the Geriatric Mental State (GMS) and Mini-Mental Status Examination to the elderly. The individuals were considered to be "probable cases" on the basis of GMS "global" scores previously reported to be valid. These "probable cases" were then examined in phase II by standardized psychiatrists using both, the GMS and MEC, but also the History and Aetiology Schedule (HAS). A proportion of "probable normals" were also examined by the psychiatrists to assess the validity of the screening procedure in the community. The identified "cases" of dementia and "cases" of depression were then studied by the neurologists in what we call phase III. Specific project criteria for dementia were used but, in fact, all identified "cases" of dementia fulfilled DSM-III criteria. Some data of the application of the AGECAT computer program in both, phase I and phase II are now reported. The different severity levels of cognitive deficits according to AGECAT criteria are compared with clinical criteria. The advantages and disadvantages of the computer program in the detection of minor cognitive difficulties are discussed.Effectiveness and costs of phototest in dementia and cognitive impairment screening.To assess and compare the effectiveness and costs of Phototest, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), and Memory Impairment Screen (MIS) to screen for dementia (DEM) and cognitive impairment (CI).A phase III study was conducted over one year in consecutive patients with suspicion of CI or DEM at four Primary Care (PC) centers. After undergoing all screening tests at the PC center, participants were extensively evaluated by researchers blinded to screening test results in a Cognitive-Behavioral Neurology Unit (CBNU). The gold standard diagnosis was established by consensus of expert neurologists. Effectiveness was assessed by the proportion of correct diagnoses (diagnostic accuracy [DA]) and by the kappa index of concordance between test results and gold standard diagnoses. Costs were based on public prices and hospital accounts.The study included 140 subjects (48 with DEM, 37 with CI without DEM, and 55 without CI). The MIS could not be applied to 23 illiterate subjects (16.4%). For DEM, the maximum effectiveness of the MMSE was obtained with different cutoff points as a function of educational level [k = 0.31 (95% Confidence interval [95%CI], 0.19-0.43), DA = 0.60 (95%CI, 0.52-0.68)], and that of the MIS with a cutoff of 3/4 [k = 0.63 (95%CI, 0.48-0.78), DA = 0.83 (95%CI, 0.80-0.92)]. Effectiveness of the Phototest [k = 0.71 (95%CI, 0.59-0.83), DA = 0.87 (95%CI, 0.80-0.92)] was similar to that of the MIS and higher than that of the MMSE. Costs were higher with MMSE (275.9 ± 193.3€ [mean ± sd euros]) than with Phototest (208.2 ± 196.8€) or MIS (201.3 ± 193.4€), whose costs did not significantly differ. For CI, the effectiveness did not significantly differ between MIS [k = 0.59 (95%CI, 0.45-0.74), DA = 0.79 (95%CI, 0.64-0.97)] and Phototest [k = 0.58 (95%CI, 0.45-0.74), DA = 0.78 (95%CI, 0.64-0.95)] and was lowest for the MMSE [k = 0.27 (95%CI, 0.09-0.45), DA = 0.69 (95%CI, 0.56-0.84)]. Costs were higher for MMSE (393.4 ± 121.8€) than for Phototest (287.0 ± 197.4€) or MIS (300.1 ± 165.6€), whose costs did not significantly differ.MMSE is not an effective instrument in our setting. For both DEM and CI, the Phototest and MIS are more effective and less costly, with no difference between them. However, MIS could not be applied to the appreciable percentage of our population who were illiterate.Primary care screening for cognitive impairment in elderly veterans.The objective of this study was to examine the diagnostic accuracy of a primary care screening procedure for identifying cognitive impairment in elderly veterans, in comparison with 4 brief standardized neuropsychological tests. The sample included 100 primary care patients who met age and other criteria requiring screening for cognitive impairment. The results indicated that 3 of the tests significantly discriminated normal from mildly impaired status on the Dementia Rating Scale, but the existing procedure failed to correctly identify any cases in the entire sample. Correct classification rates were near 80% for the Mini-Mental State Exam, Clock Drawing Test, and both Trail Making Test (TMT)-A and TMT-B, with high specificity but variable sensitivity. TMT-B produced good results across eight predictive validity indicators when a cutoff of 3 minutes to completion (1 SD) was used to identify cases. There was no evidence to support the current interview-based screening procedure. Additional research with brief standardized screening is encouraged.Prevalence of alcohol-related problems in an elderly population and their association with cognitive impairment and dementia.Studies investigating the association between alcohol use and cognitive disorders in the elderly population have produced divergent results. Moreover, the role of alcohol in cognitive dysfunction is not clear. The aims of this study were to estimate the prevalence of alcohol-related problems in an elderly population from Brazil and to investigate their association with cognitive and functional impairment (CFI) and dementia.A community-based cross-sectional study was performed. A sample of 1,145 elderly people was examined in 2 phases. Several instruments were utilized in the first phase: the CAGE questionnaire was used to identify potential cases of alcohol-related problems, and a screening test for dementia was used to estimate CFI. The CAMDEX interview (Cambridge Examination) and DSM-IV (Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 4th edition) criteria were used for the clinical diagnosis of dementia in the second phase."Heavy alcohol use" (CAGE > or = 2) was found in 92 subjects (prevalence: 8.2%). It was associated with gender (males, p < 0.001), low education (only in females, p = 0.002), and low socioeconomic level (p = 0.001, in females; p = 0.002, in males). The Mini Mental State Examination exhibited a nonlinear relationship with alcohol-related problems in females; "mild-moderate alcohol use" (CAGE < 2) presented the highest score. A significant association between alcohol-related problems and cognitive dysfunction was found only in females. "Heavy alcohol use" was associated with higher CFI and dementia rates compared to "mild-moderate alcohol use" (p = 0.003 and p < 0.001, respectively). "Mild-moderate alcohol use" had a tendency of association with lower CFI and dementia rates when compared to "no alcohol use" (p = 0.063 and 0.050, respectively).Our findings suggest that alcohol use does not have a linear relationship with cognitive decline.Role of functional performance in diagnosis of dementia in elderly people with low educational level living in Southern Italy.Diagnosis of dementia is often difficult in subjects with low educational level. Our aim was to evaluate the role of functional performance and the possibility of preferring scores of activities of daily living (ADL) and instrumental activities of daily living (IADL) in screening elderly people for diagnosis of dementia in a rural population of Southern Italy with a very high percentage of non-educated subjects.a random sample of 300 residents, out of 1089 subjects over 60 years of age living in San Marcellino (Caserta, Campania), received door-to-door visit for information about their medical history, with clinical evaluation of general geriatric conditions, including the cumulative illness rating scale (CIRS). Dementia was diagnosed if subjects had a Clinical Dementia Rating score (CDR) > or = 1 and according to the criteria of DSMIV, but not according to scores on the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), ADL and IADL. Two hundred and nineteen normal subjects (NS) and 75 patients with dementia (DP) were evaluated.in NS, their mean age- and education-corrected MMSE score was 22.15 (lower than the normal cut-off value of 23.8) and 12.60 in DP (p<0.0001). In NS, the mean ADL score was higher than in DP (5.53 vs 2.64, p<0.0001); only age was correlated with ADL scores (coeff=-0.44, t=-4.557, p<0.0001). Assuming age as covariate, ADL scores highly differentiated DP from NS (F(1, 289)=26.083, p<0.0001). In both sexes, mean IADL scores were higher in NS than in DP (4.46 vs 1.80 in men, p<0.0001; 6.85 vs 2.31 in women, p<0.0001). Age and education did not influence IADL scores in men, but age greatly affected performance in women. IADL scores clearly differentiated NS from DP. In NS, a positive correlation was evident between ADL and IADL scores (r=0.234, p<0.0005), but neither scores correlated with the MMSE scores, even when correlation was performed separately for men and women. In DP, a strong correlation was observed between ADL and IADL scores (r=0.709, p<0.0001) and significant correlations were also evident between the scores of MMSE and both ADL (r=0.492,p<0.0001) and IADL (r=0.398, p<0.0004).in a rural community with a high prevalence of non-educated subjects, cognitive impairment is related to education, whereas independent functioning is limited mainly to age and not to cognition, if the latter remains (relatively) unimpaired. These results point to the importance of an "ecological" approach to the evaluation of elderly people, particularly those living in small rural communities, where education and the social environment may give rise to difficulties in diagnosis of dementia. The assessment of functional autonomy by ADL and IADL scales may be a better screening tool in diagnosing dementia than the MMSE scores.Preclinical syndromes predict dementia: the Sydney older persons study.To identify if preclinical syndromes for Alzheimer's disease, vascular dementia, and Parkinson's disease and related dementias exist. Identification of dementia at early or even preclinical stages has important implications for treatment.A community dwelling sample of 647 subjects aged 75 and over at recruitment were followed up for a mean period of 3.19 years (range 2.61 to 4.51 years). Each subject was asked to participate in a medical assessment which included a standardised medical history examining both past and current health and medication usage; a neuropsychological battery (mini mental state examination, Reid memory test, verbal fluency, subsets of the Boston naming test and similarities, clock drawing and copied drawings) and physical examination. Preclinical syndromes for the three predominant dementias (Alzheimer's disease, vascular dementia and Parkinson's disease, and related dementias) and their combinations were defined using cognitive, motor, and vascular features. Their longitudinal outcome as defined by death and dementia incidence was examined.Preclinical syndromes affected 55.7% (n=299) of subjects. Preclinical syndromes showed a trend for an increased odds of death (odds ratio 1.72, p=0.056) and a significantly increased odds of developing dementia (odds ratio 4.81, p<0.001). Preclinical syndromes were highly sensitive, detecting 52 of 58 (89.7%) incident dementias. Two hundred and sixteen of 268 (80.6%) preclinical subjects did not show dementia over the 3 year period (positive predictive value 19.4%). Subjects defined as having a combination of cognitive, extrapyramidal, and vascular features were at greatest risk of progressing to dementia.Preclinical syndromes were sensitive and significant predictors of dementia. In view of their poor positive predictive value, the preclinical syndromes as defined in this study remain a research tool needing both definitional refinement and greater periods of observation. Multiple coexistent preclinical disorders resulted in a greater incidence of dementia, providing evidence for an additive role between multiple disorders.Mini-Mental State Examination item scores as predictors of Alzheimer's disease: incidence data from the Kungsholmen Project, Stockholm.The present study examined the power of individual Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) items in predicting incidence of Alzheimer's disease (AD). In addition, 3-year longitudinal changes in MMSE items were contrasted between incident AD and nondemented persons.A population-based group of very old adults, 75-95 years of age, were followed longitudinally. Of the original 327 participants, 32 were diagnosed with probable or possible AD after a 3-year follow-up interval and 189 remained nondemented. Cognitive performance was indexed by the individual item scores from the MMSE. These sample from multiple domains of cognitive functioning, including visuospatial skill, recent memory, orientation to time and place, language, and the ability to sustain attention.Items dealing with delayed episodic memory and orientation to time were significant predictors of AD incidence, independent of age, gender, and years of education, as determined by logistic regression analyses. Longitudinally, changes in performance were largest among individuals diagnosed as incident AD, although the magnitude of change across items was highly variable. In particular, decline was relatively small for the delayed memory item, whereas most other measures showed dramatic decline in performance among individuals with incident AD.Individual MMSE items, especially those with some type of episodic memory referent, were the best predictors of incident cases of AD. Moreover, MMSE items displayed differential rates of changes, particularly for the incident AD participants.Brief informant screening test for mild cognitive impairment and early Alzheimer's disease.Recent research has attempted combinations of instruments to improve screening accuracy for mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and early Alzheimer's disease (AD). We compared Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Immediate and Delayed Recall (Logical Memory I and II; LM-I and LM-II, respectively), a single-item informant report of memory problem (IRMP), and a four-item Instrumental Activities of Daily Living (4IADL) scale, and combinations of these tests.The tests were administered together with Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) to subjects who were cognitively intact (CDR = 0, n = 88), and with diagnoses of MCI (CDR = 0.5, n = 37) and early AD (CDR = 1-2, n = 19).Screening accuracy (receiver operating characteristic area under curve, AUC) for identifying MCI or MCI-AD was lowest for MMSE (AUC 67.6% for MCI or 77.9% for MCI-AD), and better for IRMP (79.5 or 83.2%), 4IADL (76.9 or 84.7%), LM-I (81.2 or 87.1%) and LM-II (86.1 or 90.8%). Combining IRMP, 4IADL and LM-II was most accurate (AUC 91.7% for MCI or 94.5% for MCI-AD); sensitivity: 86.5 or 89.3%; specificity: 86.4 or 88.6%. However, combining IRMP and 4IADL gave nearly as good accuracy (AUC 87.2 or 91.6%); sensitivity: 86.5 or 85.7%; specificity: 79.5 or 85.2%.A brief instrument combining an IRMP and 4IADL items is potentially useful in screening for MCI and early AD.Cognitive deficits of patients with Alzheimer's disease with and without delusions.The goal of this investigation was to study the prevalence of delusions in Alzheimer's disease and to compare the performance of the delusional and nondelusional groups on a neuropsychological test battery.The authors studied 107 patients with Alzheimer's disease and 51 age- and education-comparable normal subjects using a standardized psychiatric interview and a neuropsychological test battery.Thirty-seven patients with Alzheimer's disease had delusions with or without hallucinations. Patients with delusions were significantly more impaired than those without delusions (and the normal comparison group) on the Mini-Mental State examination; Blessed Information-Memory-Concentration Test; Dementia Rating Scale, especially its conceptualization and memory subtests; and a test of verbal fluency. The delusional group also tended to be somewhat more impaired than the nondelusional group on the modified Wisconsin Card Sorting Test and the similarities subtest of the Wechsler Adult Intelligence Scale-revised.Approximately one-third of patients with Alzheimer's disease had developed psychotic symptoms sometime after the onset of dementia. The presence of psychotic symptoms in Alzheimer's disease was associated with greater cognitive impairment, especially frontal/temporal dysfunction, and possibly with a more rapidly progressive dementia.Ethnic and educational differences in cognitive test performance on mini-mental state examination in Asians.The objective of this study is to examine ethnic differences in Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) test performance in discriminating between demented and nondemented elderly Asians.A nationally representative population sample (N = 1,092) of community-living elderly, comprising Chinese, Malays, and Indians in Singapore, was interviewed using MMSE, Geriatric Mental State, and demographic and health questionnaires.There were significant ethnic differences in mean MMSE scores among Chinese (26.2), Indians (25.0), and Malays (23.6), but only in noneducated subjects. No ethnic differences in MMSE were observed in higher educated subjects. The sample proportion of subjects with dementia was 4.2% in Chinese, 9.4% in Malays, and 8.8% in Indians. Overall, MMSE discriminated well between subjects with and without dementia (cutoff: 23/24, area under the curve: 95%, sensitivity: 97.5%, specificity: 75.6%). MMSE test performance was much better in higher educated subjects (higher specificity: 85.2%). Lower specificities were shown in less educated subjects (57.3%), and in Malays (62.8%), and especially in less educated Malays (35.3%) and Indians (50.0%). Significant differences in MMSE scores in less educated subjects persisted after adjusting for differences in sociodemographic, health, and behavioral variablesEthnic nonequivalence in MMSE test performance should be taken into account in dementia screening in Asians in less educated subjects. Known correlates of cognitive functioning did not sufficiently explain these differences.The Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination Revised is as effective as the original to detect dementia in a French-speaking population.This paper presents the validation of the French version of the Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination Revised (ACE-R).The variability of the 3 versions of the ACE-R (A, B and C), performed by the same observer, hence mainly 2 or 3 times on 119 patients showing no progression, was first calculated by Cronbach's alpha coefficient, t test and linear regression. The alpha coefficients of the 3 versions were obtained showing that the ACE-R versions can be considered as one, and an analysis of the interobserver variability was performed by Cohen's kappa coefficient, t test and linear regression on 12 patients. Eventually, we performed a receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis to compare the sensitivities and specificities to detect dementia of the ACE, the ACE-R and Mini Mental State Examination on 319 consecutive patients.The ROC areas of sensitivities and specificities of the ACE and ACE-R were very similar. Two cutoffs were identified at 83/100 and 89/100 with a specificity to normality of 98.6% if the ACE-R score was ≥83 and a sensitivity to dementia of 98.4% if the ACE-R score was ≤89.ACE-R in French is as reliable and valid as the original version to detect dementia.Application of a Spanish version of the "Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly" in the clinical assessment of dementia.We studied the validity of a complete (S-IQCODE) and a shortened (SS- IQCODE) Spanish version of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) for the diagnosis of dementia in a clinical setting. Fifty-three consecutive outpatients were assessed with an extensive workup and followed up for 6 months in a specialized clinic for the diagnosis and management of dementia. Thirty eight (71%) were finally diagnosed as demented. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) had a slightly greater diagnostic power than did the S-IQCODE and the SS-IQCODE (sensitivity 89% vs. 84% and 79%; specificity 80% vs. 73% for both; positive predictive value 92% vs. 89% and 88%; negative predictive value 75% vs. 65% and 58%), but without statistical significance. Both the S-IQCODE and SS-IQCODE were independent of previous education of the patients. The best diagnostic results were obtained when the cognitive scores of the patient in the MMSE and the report of the relative in the S-IQCODE were simultaneously considered. We conclude that the IQCODE, in a complete as well as in a shortened form, is a good diagnostic instrument in the clinical setting that can enhance the validity of other cognitive tests.Mini-Mental State exam scores vary with education in blacks and whites.Previous studies have suggested that education and race may affect performance on standardized mental status tests. In order to more clearly define these relationships, a prospective longitudinal study was devised to answer two questions: (1) whether race or level of education affects scores on the Mini-Mental State (MMS) exam in non-demented people and (2) what numerical cutpoints maximize the sensitivity and specificity of utilizing the MMS to help diagnose dementia in blacks of varying educational attainment. A total of 100 white and 258 black individuals, recruited from two city hospital primary care geriatric clinics, were evaluated and subsequently followed longitudinally over a 2 1/2 year period in order to assess accurately the presence or absence of dementia. In the non-demented, total MMS scores and performance on each item of the MMS were analyzed, revealing that people with an 8th grade or less education consistently had significantly (P less than .01) worse results than the better educated (9th grade or better) on borough, attention items, recall of table and dog, copying, sentence writing, phrase repeating, and total score. Furthermore, a total of 25% of the lower education group had an MMS score in the 18-23 range, traditionally thought to suggest dementia. There were no consistently significant differences between blacks and whites of equal education. In the better educated groups, using a score of 23 or less to define dementia maximizes the sensitivity and specificity of using the MMS in this diagnosis at 93% and 100%, respectively. In the lower education group, using 17 or less to define dementia maximizes sensitivity and specificity at 81% and 100%, respectively.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Improving precision in the quantification of cognition using the Montreal Cognitive Assessment and the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) can be used to quantify cognitive ability in older persons undergoing screening for cognitive impairment. Although highly sensitive in detecting mild cognitive impairment, its measurement precision is weakest among persons with milder forms of impairment. We sought to overcome this limitation by integrating information from the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) into the calculation of cognitive ability.Data from 185 geriatric outpatients screened for cognitive impairment with the MoCA and the MMSE were Rasch analyzed to evaluate the extent to which the MMSE items improved measurement precision in the upper ability ranges of the population.Adding information from the MMSE resulted in a 13.8% (13.3-14.3%) reduction in measurement error, with significant improvements in all quartiles of patient ability. The addition of three-word repetition and recall, copy pentagons, repeat sentence, and write sentence improved measurement of cognition in the upper levels of ability.The algorithm presented here maximizes the yield of available clinical data while improving measurement of cognitive ability, which is particularly important for tracking changes over time in patients with milder levels of impairment.[Revalidation and standardization of the cognition mini-exam (first Spanish version of the Mini-Mental Status Examination) in the general geriatric population].The revalidation of the Mini Examen Cognoscitivo (MEC), first Spanish version (1978) of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) and documentation of "population-based norms" should clarify the potential confusion induced by later versions of MMSE.Validation of Addenbrooke's cognitive examination (ACE) in a Persian-speaking population.Use of reliable screening and diagnostic tests for assessment of cognitive abilities in neurological patients is rapidly increasing in clinical practice. This is due to the increase in the prevalence of dementias and the raised awareness of cognitive impairment in neurological disorders. Two well-known bedside screening tests for dementias among the English-speaking population are the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination (ACE). However, such tests have not been developed for the Persian-speaking population, which is estimated at 120 million worldwide. In this study we developed the Persian ACE and MMSE, adopted from the English version. We also assessed the sensitivity and specificity of these tests in the identification of Alzheimer's disease (AD) and mild cognitive impairment (MCI). We found that the Persian ACE at a cutoff point of 84, has a sensitivity of 93% and a specificity of 91% in discriminating MCI from a normal population; at 78, the test has a sensitivity of 73% and a specificity of 93% in differentiating MCI from AD, and at a similar cutoff point has a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 96% in discriminating AD from a normal population. We conclude that the Persian ACE is a valuable tool in clinical practice in the Persian-speaking population.Do memory complaints indicate the presence of cognitive impairment? Results of a field study.In the context of suspected cognitive disorders, the validity of memory complaints is subject to considerable debate. This investigation documents the prevalence of memory complaints and assesses the validity of memory complaints for detecting cognitive impairment.The sample comprises 349 randomly selected non-institutionalized individuals, aged 75 and over living in the city of Leipzig. Twenty individuals who suffer from moderate and severe dementia according to DSM-III-R were excluded. Memory complaints were measured by means of a single item question. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and a wider range of cognitive tests which constitute the short neuropsychological battery of the SIDAM (Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of dementia of Alzheimer type, Multi-infarct dementia and dementias of other etiology according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R) were used to test cognitive performance.One in three individuals aged 75 and over complained about memory deficits. The MMSE is not significantly related to memory complaints, whereas poorer performance on 2 out of 8 tests regarding specific areas of cognitive function (immediate recall, short-term memory) were found to be significantly associated with memory complaints. Despite these statistically significant associations, it is shown that memory complaints do not have diagnostic validity in detecting cognitive impairment on the individual level.Memory self-assessment should not be used as a substitute measure of cognitive performance. Initiation of further diagnostic and therapeutic steps should be based on cognitive performance testing. Relaying solely on memory complaints would miss individuals in need and allocate resources to worried but cognitively healthy persons.Diagnostic accuracy of a new instrument for detecting cognitive dysfunction in an emergent psychiatric population: the Brief Cognitive Screen.In certain clinical contexts, the sensitivity of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is limited. The authors developed a new cognitive screening instrument, the Brief Cognitive Screen (BCS), with the aim of improving diagnostic accuracy for cognitive dysfunction in the psychiatric emergency department (ED) in a quick and convenient format.The BCS, consisting of the Oral Trail Making Test (OTMT), animal fluency, the Clock Drawing Test (CDT), and the MMSE, was administered to 32 patients presenting with emergent psychiatric conditions. Comprehensive neuropsychological evaluation served as the criterion standard for determining cognitive dysfunction. Diagnostic accuracy of the MMSE was determined using the traditional clinical cutoff and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analyses. Diagnostic accuracy of individual BCS components and BCS Summary Scores was determined by ROC analyses.At the traditional clinical cutoff, MMSE sensitivity (46.4%) and total diagnostic accuracy (53.1%) were inadequate. Under ROC analyses, the diagnostic accuracy of the full BCS Summary Score (area under the curve [AUC]=0.857) was comparable to the MMSE (AUC=0.828). However, a reduced BCS Summary Score consisting of OTMT Part B (OTMT-B), animal fluency, and the CDT yielded classification accuracy (AUC=0.946) that was superior to the MMSE.Preliminary findings suggest the BCS is an effective, convenient alternative cognitive screening instrument for use in emergent psychiatric populations.A pilot study of the sensitivity and specificity analysis of the standard-Spanish version of the Culture-Fair Assessment of Neurocognitive Abilities and the Examen Cognoscitivo Mini-Mental in the Dominican Republic.This pilot study purports to address the need for culturally validated, evidence-based assessments and to serve as a springboard for future culturally sensitive research. This study was conducted in the Dominican Republic. It entailed counterbalanced administration of a standard Spanish translation of the Culture-Fair Assessment of Neurocognitive Abilities (S-S CANA) and the standard Spanish translation of the Mini-Mental State Examination (Examen Cognoscitivo Mini-Mental; ECM-M). The sample was composed of 30 Spanish-speaking Dominican adults who met the inclusion criteria for the normative and clinical groups. In an effort to initiate the validation process for the S-S CANA, as well as norm it to the given population, the efficacy of the S-S CANA in determining neuropathology was then compared to that of the ECM-M. Analyses of variance and covariance and t-tests were conducted, and a receiver-operating characteristic curve was computed. Results indicated significantly greater sensitivity and specificity of the S-S CANA relative to the ECM-M.Comparison of the short test of mental status and the mini-mental state examination in mild cognitive impairment.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is the most widely used brief screening measure of cognition, but it is not sensitive in detecting mild memory or other cognitive impairments. The Short Test of Mental Status (STMS) was specifically developed for use in dementia assessment and was intended to be more sensitive to problems of learning and mental agility that may be seen in mild cognitive impairment (MCI).To compare the STMS and MMSE for detecting or predicting MCI.Comparison of STMS and MMSE scores at baseline among 4 groups of patients: 788 patients with stable normal cognition, 75 patients with normal cognition at baseline but who developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease during follow-up, 129 patients with prevalent MCI at baseline, and 235 patients with prevalent mild Alzheimer disease. All patients and control subjects for this study were evaluated through the Mayo Alzheimer's Disease Patient Registry or the Mayo Clinic Alzheimer's Disease Research Center, Rochester, Minn, using a standardized diagnostic approach.The STMS was slightly more sensitive than the MMSE in discriminating between patients with stable normal cognition and patients with prevalent MCI. The STMS was superior to the MMSE in detecting deficits in cognition in individuals who had normal cognition at baseline but later developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease.Compared with the MMSE, the STMS was better able to document MCI and was more sensitive in detecting deficits in cognition in individuals who had normal cognition at baseline but later developed incident MCI or Alzheimer disease.Validity of the clinical dementia rating scale for the detection and staging of dementia in Brazilian patients.The aim of this study was to determine the diagnostic value and agreement analyses between Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) and dementia diagnostic criteria (gold standard), Blessed Dementia Rating scale (BDRS), and Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 3rd Edition, Revised (DSM III-R) criteria for severity. In a sample of 343 Southern Brazilian participants, CDR was consecutively assessed in 295 dementia patients (Alzheimer disease, vascular dementia, and questionable) and 48 healthy elderly. The National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Diseases and Stroke/Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association (NINCDS-ADRDA) criteria for probable Alzheimer disease and the National Institute of Neurological Disorders and Stroke and Association Internationale pour la Recherché et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences (NINDS-AIREN) for probable vascular dementia were the gold standard. A battery of cognitive tests and the Mini Mental State Examination (as a screening test at study entry) were also applied. Sensitivity and specificity were obtained through contingency tables. Validity and reliability were measured through kappa coefficient, Kendall b, and percent agreement. CDR agreement among raters was demonstrated by percent agreement. Agreement to gold standard was good (kappa=0.75), as well as to the Blessed scale (kappa=0.73), and excellent to the DSM III-R (kappa=0.78). CDR detection of dementia among healthy elderly or questionable dementia was 86% and 80% sensitive, respectively, and 100% specific for both settings. In conclusion, agreement of CDR global score with the gold standard was good, and diagnostic values were high.Mini-Mental Status Examination: a short form of MMSE was as accurate as the original MMSE in predicting dementia.This study assesses the properties of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) with the purpose of improving the efficiencies of the methods of screening for cognitive impairment and dementia. A specific purpose was to determine whether an abbreviated version would be as accurate as the original MMSE in predicting dementia.A population-based post hoc examination of the performance characteristics of the MMSE for detecting dementia in an existing data set of 243 elderly persons.Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values were computed for the original MMSE as well as new MMSE scale models derived from a Rasch model item analysis. The optimal threshold for the original MMSE screen yielded sensitivity and specificity estimates of 72.5% and 91.3%, respectively. The use of a subscale resulted in a slightly lower sensitivity (71.0%), specificity (88.4%), and positive predictive value (71.0%) but equal area under the receiver operating characteristic curve. Cross-validation on follow-up data confirmed the results.A short, valid MMSE, which is as sensitive and specific as the original MMSE for the screening of cognitive impairments and dementia is attractive for research and clinical practice, particularly if predictive power can be enhanced by combining the short MMSE with neuropsychological tests or informant reports.The effects of metrifonate on the cognitive, behavioral, and functional performance of Alzheimer's disease patients. Metrifonate Study Group.The objective of this study was to evaluate the efficacy and safety of metrifonate, a long-acting acetylcholinesterase inhibitor, in patients clinically diagnosed with probable Alzheimer's disease of mild-to-moderate severity.This was a prospective, multicenter, 26-week, double-blind, parallel group study. The 264 randomized patients met diagnostic criteria of the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Diseases and Stroke and the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association for probable Alzheimer's disease. Patients had Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores of 10-26 and ischemic scores (Rosen modification) of <4. Metrifonate-treated patients received a single 50-mg dose once daily. The efficacy of metrifonate was investigated with respect to 3 symptom domains. Cognitive performance was analyzed using the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive Subscale (ADAS-Cog) and the MMSE. Psychiatric and behavioral disturbances were analyzed using the Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI) and the ADAS-Noncognitive subscale (ADAS-Noncog). The ability to perform instrumental and basic activities of daily living was evaluated using the Disability Assessment for Dementia (DAD) scale. Additionally, global state was assessed using the Clinician Interview-Based Impression of Change with Caregiver Input (CIBIC-Plus) scale.After 26 weeks of metrifonate therapy, a statistically significant benefit of metrifonate was observed in the cognitive performance of Alzheimer's disease patients (ADAS-Cog, t = 2.55, df = 237, p = .012; MMSE, t = 4.60, df = 237, p = .0001). Metrifonate also significantly attenuated the deterioration in activities of daily living of the patients (DAD total score, t = -2.11, df = 233, p = .036) and relieved patients' psychiatric and behavioral disturbances (NPI total score, t = 2.51, df = 233, p = .013). In addition, metrifonate significantly improved the scores for the global state of the patients (CIBIC-Plus, t = 2.07, df = 232, p = .039). Metrifonate was well tolerated; adverse events were predominantly mild in intensity, and no hepatotoxicity was observed.In this study, metrifonate was safe and well tolerated. It benefited the cognitive decline, psychiatric and behavioral disturbances, impaired ability to perform instrumental and basic activities of daily living, and global state of patients diagnosed with mild-to-moderate Alzheimer's disease.Misclassification of dementia by the mini-mental state examination--are education and social class the only factors?The 1988 Melton Mowbray Study of the Elderly comprised an initial screen with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) followed by a detailed clinical assessment using the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination (CAMDEX) for all those scoring 21 and under on the MMSE, a one in two sample of those scoring 22 or 23 and a one in ten of the remainder. A total of 1579 subjects completed the initial screen with 438 subjects undergoing the CAMDEX assessment. Analysis of those subjects who were found to be free of dementia at the clinical assessment (n = 155) demonstrated that the very elderly, those from the manual social classes and subjects with visual impairments had an increased chance of being misclassified as demented by the MMSE. Low educational level and various measures of physical disability also showed a tendency to result in misclassification as falsely positive by the MMSE when viewed alone but these effects appeared to be due solely to their association with extreme age and/or manual social class.Mapping scores onto stages: mini-mental state examination and clinical dementia rating.Although the clinical course of Alzheimer disease (AD) is gradual, it is useful for a number of reasons to distinguish between different levels of severity. The Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) has demonstrated high validity and reliability for this purpose, but it requires a considerable amount of data to be collected both from the patient and from an informant. In the present study, the authors mapped Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores onto CDR categories to determine how well the MMSE performs as a surrogate of the CDR as a timesaving method of staging dementia.Eight hundred sixty-three probands, including 524 patients with probable AD, 92 patients with questionable dementia, and 247 with memory complaints but no objective cognitive impairment, were included. Cutoff scores were identified on one-half of the sample using a receiver operating characteristic analysis. The cutoff values were then applied to the other half of the sample, and the agreement between MMSE score ranges and CDR stages was determined by calculating Cohen's kappa.The MMSE discriminated well between CDR stages 0.5, 1, 2, and 3 but performed poorly in the separation between CDR stages zero and 0.5. The MMSE ranges were 30 for no, 26-29 for questionable, 21-25 for mild, 11-20 for moderate, and 0-10 for severe dementia. Substantial agreement between the two instruments was obtained for the categories mild (kappa=0.62, p<0.001, N=115), moderate (kappa=0.69, p<0.001, N=114), and severe dementia (kappa=0.76, p<0.001, N=39), whereas the agreement was moderate for no (kappa=0.44, p<0.001, N=120) and only fair for questionable dementia (kappa=0.28, p<0.001, N=42).The MMSE can be used as a surrogate measure for the CDR for the staging of dementia in AD.Cognitive assessment of older primary care patients with and without memory complaints.Dementia screening is currently recommended only for symptomatic patients.To evaluate memory complaints, a mental status test, and several cognitive tests as dementia screens in primary care.Cross-sectional clinical epidemiologic study.Three hundred thirty-nine comprehensively assessed, primary care patients aged > or = 65 years.Memory complaints were abstracted from chart review. Scores on Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and domain-specific cognitive testing were compared to a dementia diagnosis based on Clinical Dementia Rating score > or = 1, and areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) were calculated. Classification and regression tree analyses were performed on memory complaints and tests with the highest AUCs.Of 33 patients with dementia, only 5 had documented memory complaints. In 25 patients with documented memory complaints, no cognitive tests further improved identification of the 5 with dementia. In 28 patients with dementia but without memory complaints, an MMSE score < 20 identified 8 cases; among those with MMSE scores 20-21, a visual memory test identified a further 11 cases. Further cognitive testing could not detect 9 dementia cases without memory complaints and with MMSE scores > or = 22.In older primary care patients with memory complaints, cognitive screening does not help identify those who require further examination for dementia. Most patients with dementia do not report memory complaints. In these asymptomatic individuals, general mental status testing, supplemented by a memory test when the mental status score is equivocal, will identify lower-scoring patients who need dementia assessment. However, high-scoring asymptomatic dementia cases will remain undetected.Prevalence of dementia in an urban Indian population.This article reports the findings of a 3-year epidemiological survey for dementia in an urban community-resident population in Mumbai (Bombay), India, wherein the prevalence of all types of dementia was determined.The study was conducted in three stages. Stage 1: From a potential pool of 30,000 subjects aged 40 years or more, 24,488 (male = 11,875; female = 12,613) persons completed self-report or interviewer-rated protocols based on the Sandoz Clinical Assessment Geriatric Scale, but 5,512 (18.37%) persons refused to participate. Scores on the protocol had a possible range from 0 through 34. Stage 2: Persons with a score +2 SD above the mean were selected in this stage where the persons were screened for cognitive functioning using a modified and translated version of the Mini-Mental State Examination. Individuals who scored below the 5th percentile were included in Stage 3 and underwent a detailed neurological, psychiatric, and neuropsychological evaluation as well as hematological, radiological, electrocardiographic, and electroencephalographic investigations. Diagnoses were made jointly by a neurologist, psychiatrist, and psychologist using the DSM-IV diagnostic criteria. Subjects were also rated on the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) scale and assessed for activities of daily living.One hundred five subjects with dementia (CDR > or = 0.5) were identified in this population of 24,488 persons. The prevalence rate for dementia in those aged 40 years and more was 0.43% and for persons aged 65 and above was 2.44%. Seventy-eight individuals had a CDR of > or = 1 yielding an overall prevalence rate of 0.32%, and a prevalence rate of 1.81% for those aged 65 years and older. The overall prevalence rate for Alzheimer's disease (AD) in the population was 0.25%, and 1.5% for those aged 65 years and above. AD (n = 62; 65%) was the most common cause of dementia followed byvascular dementia (n = 23; 22%). There were more women (n = 38) than men (n = 24) in the AD group. Increasing age was associated with a higher prevalence of the dementia syndrome in general as well as AD specifically.In the population surveyed, the prevalence of AD and other dementias is less than that reported from developed countries but similar to results of other studies in India. Prevalence of the dementia syndrome increased with age and was not related to gender. AD was the most common dementia and the prevalence was higher in women than in men. Results are discussed with respect to shorter life expectancy, relocation of affected persons, and differences in the risk factors as compared to developed countries.Mild cognitive impairment: cognitive screening or neuropsychological assessment?To describe the neuropsychological profile of mild cognitive impairment subtypes (amnestic, non-amnestic and multiple-domain) of a clinical sample. We further address the diagnostic properties of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Cambridge Cognitive Examination for the identification of the different mild cognitive impairment subtypes in clinical practice.Cross-sectional clinical and neuropsychological evaluation of 249 elderly patients attending a memory clinic at a university hospital in Sao Paulo, Brazil.The performance of patients with mild cognitive impairment was heterogeneous across the different subtests of the neuropsychological battery, with a trend towards an overall worse performance for amnestic (particularly multiple domain) mild cognitive impairment as compared to non-amnestic subtypes. Screening tests for dementia (Mini-Mental State Examination and Cambridge Cognitive Examination) adequately discriminated cases of mild Alzheimer's disease from controls, but they were not accurate to discriminate patients with mild cognitive impairment (all subtypes) from control subjects.The discrimination of mild cognitive impairment subtypes was possible only with the aid of a comprehensive neuropsychological assessment. It is necessary to develop new strategies for mild cognitive impairment screening in clinical practice.Age and education correction of Mini-Mental State Examination for English and Spanish-speaking elderly.Previous research has shown that the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMS) is biased as a measure of cognitive impairment in minority and low-education patients. The purpose of this study was to (1) develop a statistical correction for effects of age and education and (2) test the efficacy of the statistically adjusted MMS (MMSAdj) as a screening test for dementia using different ethnic groups and education levels. We used a population-base community survey sample (n=590) composed of 46.6% Hispanics and 53.4% non-Hispanics to derive the statistical correction, defined as:MMSAdj = Raw MMS - (0.471 X [Education-12]) + (0.131 X [Age-70]). Ethnicity and language of test administration were not significantly related to MMSAdj in the community survey sample, but the raw MMS was strongly influenced by these factors. We used an independent sample (n=2,983) of patients evaluated through the California Alzheimer's Disease Diagnostic and Treatment Centers to test the diagnostic accuracy of the MMS and the MMSAdj across low- and high-education groups and across whites, Hispanics, and blacks. Results showed greater stability of sensitivity and specificity across education levels and ethnic groups for the MMSAdj than for the raw MMS and suggest that the MMSAdj is a preferable measure of cognitive impairment for low- education and minority individuals.Selective memory impairment on an adapted Mini-Mental State Examination increases risk of future dementia.To determine whether selective memory impairment (SMI) on an adapted Mini-Mental State Examination (aMMSE) test increases risk of future dementia in a population-based survey of central Spain.SMI is a strong predictor of dementia in the elderly. However, most approaches have used extensive memory batteries, which are not always suitable for screening purposes.The basal cohort consisted of 2982 poorly educated individuals aged 65 or over. Dementia, stroke and parkinsonism cases were previously excluded. At entry, participants received a structured interview including an aMMSE. Two groups were created according to basal cognitive performance, namely: (1) aMMSE > 23 and no word remembered on the aMMSE delayed-recall task (SMI group); and (2) aMMSE > 23 and at least one word remembered on the delayed-recall task (control group). In a three-year follow-up wave, conversion rate to dementia was calculated and logistic regression was performed.Of a total of 2507 subjects who completed the two evaluations, 280 qualified for SMI at entry. In the SMI group, 25 subjects (8.9%) developed dementia vs 26 subjects (1.2%) in the control group. Taking the two groups together, and once demographic and medical variables had been controlled, a low delayed-recall score increased dementia conversion rate (OR 0.47, 95% CI 0.34-0.64). Alzheimer's disease was the main cause of dementia (79.8%).Memory impairment is a risk factor for future dementia in the neurologically-healthy elderly. This can be observed in a subgroup of subjects with SMI defined on the aMMSE delayed-recall subscore. Some other measurements should be added to the SMI construct to improve its predictive validity.Can Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) replace Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) for dementia screening in a Thai geriatric outpatient setting?Mini-mental-State Examination (MMSE) is a widely used tool for dementia screening. However, several limitations are found and the Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) appears to be an alternative test. The objective in this study was to compare the performance of MMSE-Thai 2002 and RUDAS-Thai for dementia screening, and to determine their performances and identify their optimal cut-off points. The participants were older patients from a Geriatric and Neurology Outpatient Clinic, Srinagarind Hospital, Khon Kaen University. The RUDAS-Thai and the MMSE-Thai 2002 were administered to each participant. Subsequently, a specialist physician assessed each participant for dementia. Results showed the area under receiver operating characteristic curve for both RUDAS-Thai (81.0%; 95%CI, 74.8-87.2) and MMSE-Thai 2002 (81.2%; 95%CI, 74.9-87.4) were equal. A score of 24 or lower provided an optimal cut-off point. Our finding supports that the RUDAS-Thai can be an effective alternative test for dementia screening. For both test scores, a score of 24 or lower is an optimal cut-off point to provide an indication of developing dementia.Six-item screener to identify cognitive impairment among potential subjects for clinical research.To design a brief cognitive screener with acceptable sensitivity and specificity for identifying subjects with cognitive impairment.Cohort one is assembled from a community-based survey coupled with a second-stage diagnostic evaluation using formal diagnostic criteria for dementia. Cohort two is assembled from referrals to a specialty clinic for dementing disorders that completed the same diagnostic evaluation.Urban neighborhoods in Indianapolis, Indiana and the Indiana Alzheimer Disease Center.Cohort one consists of 344 community-dwelling black persons identified from a random sample of 2212 black persons aged 65 and older residing in Indianapolis; cohort two consists of 651 subject referrals to the Alzheimer Disease Center.Formal diagnostic clinical assessments for dementia including scores on the Mini-mental state examination (MMSE), a six-item screener derived from the MMSE, the Blessed Dementia Rating Scale (BDRS), and the Word List Recall. Based on clinical evaluations, subjects were categorized as no cognitive impairment, cognitive impairment-not demented, or demented.The mean age of the community-based sample was 74.4 years, 59.4% of the sample were women, and the mean years of education was 10.1. The prevalence of dementia in this sample was 4.3% and the prevalence of cognitive impairment was 24.6%. Using a cut-off of three or more errors, the sensitivity and specificity of the six-item screener for a diagnosis of dementia was 88.7 and 88.0, respectively. In the same sample, the corresponding sensitivity and specificity for the MMSE using a cut-off score of 23 was 95.2 and 86.7. The performance of the two scales was comparable across the two populations studied and using either cognitive impairment or dementia as the gold standard. An increasing number of errors on the six-item screener is highly correlated with poorer scores on longer measures of cognitive impairment.The six-item screener is a brief and reliable instrument for identifying subjects with cognitive impairment and its diagnostic properties are comparable to the full MMSE. It can be administered by telephone or face-to-face interview and is easily scored by a simple summation of errors.Mini-mental Parkinson (MMP) as a dementia screening test: comparison with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE).As populations age, screening instruments for cognitive impairment and dementia will become of increasing importance in clinical practice. Mini-Mental Parkinson (MMP), a derivative of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), was originally described as a cognitive screening instrument for use in Parkinson's disease. Its item content addresses some of the acknowledged shortcomings of the MMSE. Pragmatic use of MMP in general cognitive clinics has not previously been examined.To compare the performance of two scales, Mini-Mental Parkinson (MMP) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), as cognitive screening instruments for dementia in a memory clinic population.MMP was administered prospectively to 201 consecutive new patient referrals independent of other tests used to establish dementia diagnosis according to standard diagnostic criteria (DSM-IV). Diagnostic utility of MMP for dementia was measured and compared with MMSE.MMP proved easy to use and acceptable to patients. Optimal test accuracy (0.86) was at MMP cutoff of ≤ 17/32, with sensitivity 0.51, specificity 0.97, positive predictive value 0.83, negative predictive value 0.87, and area under Receiver Operating Characteristic curve 0.89. Using a higher cutoff (≤ 29/32), MMP sensitivity was 1.00 with specificity 0.70. MMP scores correlated with MMSE (r = 0.93) and diagnostic agreement was high (κ = 0.85).MMP is a useful screening instrument in the memory clinic setting, with patients who fall below the designated cutoff requiring further investigation to ascertain a cause for their cognitive impairment.Cognitive test performance predicts change in functional status at the population level: the MYHAT Project.In the community at large, many older adults with minimal cognitive and functional impairment remain stable or improve over time, unlike patients in clinical research settings, who typically progress to dementia. Within a prospective population-based study, we identified neuropsychological tests predicting improvement or worsening over 1 year in cognitively driven everyday functioning as measured by Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR). Participants were 1682 adults aged 65+ and dementia-free at baseline. CDR change was modeled as a function of baseline test scores, adjusting for demographics. Among those with baseline CDR = 0.5, 29.8% improved to CDR = 0; they had significantly better baseline scores on most tests. In a stepwise multiple logistic regression model, tests which remained independently associated with subsequent CDR improvement were Category Fluency, a modified Token Test, and the sum of learning trials on Object Memory Evaluation. In contrast, only 7.1% with baseline CDR = 0 worsened to CDR = 0.5. They had significantly lower baseline scores on most tests. In multiple regression analyses, only the Mini-Mental State Examination, delayed memory for visual reproduction, and recall susceptible to proactive interference, were independently associated with CDR worsening. At the population level, changes in both directions are observable in functional status, with different neuropsychological measures predicting the direction of change.Effects of general medical health on Alzheimer's progression: the Cache County Dementia Progression Study.Several observational studies have suggested a link between health status and rate of decline among individuals with Alzheimer's disease (AD). We sought to quantify the relationship in a population-based study of incident AD, and to compare global comorbidity ratings to counts of comorbid conditions and medications as predictors of AD progression.This was a case-only cohort study arising from a population-based longitudinal study of memory and aging, in Cache County, Utah. Participants comprised 335 individuals with incident AD followed for up to 11 years. Patient descriptors included sex, age, education, dementia duration at baseline, and APOE genotype. Measures of health status made at each visit included the General Medical Health Rating (GMHR), number of comorbid medical conditions, and number of non-psychiatric medications. Dementia outcomes included the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), Clinical Dementia Rating - sum of boxes (CDR-sb), and the Neuropsychiatric Inventory (NPI).Health status tended to fluctuate over time within individuals. None of the baseline medical variables (GMHR, comorbidities, and non-psychiatric medications) was associated with differences in rates of decline in longitudinal linear mixed effects models. Over time, low GMHR ratings, but not comorbidities or medications, were associated with poorer outcomes (MMSE: β = -1.07 p = 0.01; CDR-sb: β = 1.79 p < 0.001; NPI: β = 4.57 p = 0.01).Given that time-varying GMHR, but not baseline GMHR, was associated with the outcomes, it seems likely that there is a dynamic relationship between medical and cognitive health. GMHR is a more sensitive measure of health than simple counts of comorbidities or medications. Since health status is a potentially modifiable risk factor, further study is warranted.Sensitivity and specificity of the mini-mental state examination for identifying dementia in the oldest-old: the 90+ study.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in identifying dementia in the oldest-old when stratified by age and education.Cross-sectional.Research clinic and in-home visits.Population-based sample of adults aged 90 and older (n=435) who are enrolled in the 90+ Study, a longitudinal, population-based study.Neurological examination to determine dementia diagnosis, MMSE, and demographic data.Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analyses indicated that the MMSE had high diagnostic accuracy for identifying dementia in subjects aged 90 and older across different age and education groups (area under the ROC curve values ranged from 0.82 to 0.98). A range of possible cutoff values and corresponding sensitivity and specificity are provided for the following age groups: 90-93, 94-96, and >or=97. Age groups were subdivided by educational attainment (<or=high school, vocational school or some college, college degree or higher). In subjects aged 90 to 93 with a college degree or higher, the suggested MMSE cutoff score is <or=25 (sensitivity=0.82, specificity=0.80). In those aged 94 to 96 with a college degree or higher, the suggested cutoff is <or=24 (sensitivity=0.85, specificity=0.80). Those aged 97 and older with an education of high school or less had the lowest suggested cutoff <or=22 (sensitivity=0.80, specificity=0.76).Overall, the MMSE had good sensitivity and specificity across all age and educational groups. Optimal cutoff points were lower in the older age groups and those with less education, primarily to preserve specificity. This screening instrument is appropriate for use with the oldest-old.An epidemiological survey of age-related dementia in an urban area of Beijing.An epidemiological survey of age-related dementia among community residents of an urban of Beijing was conducted in 1986. Initial screening of 1331 subjects aged 60 and above was made using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) with a cutoff point of 17. All suspected cases of dementia and 5.5% of all others were then given a full clinical examination, with subjects being diagnosed and classified according to DSM-III criteria. The MMSE was found to have satisfactory sensitivity, although scores were significantly correlated with education. Prevalence rates of moderate and severe dementia were 1.28% for those aged 60 and above and 1.82% for those aged 65 and above. Rates for multi-infarct dementia were higher than those for primary degenerative dementia; females had higher rates than males and rates increased sharply with age. All the dementia cases were cared for in their own homes, by relatives. There is a need for increased knowledge and services for elderly people in the community.The milan overall dementia assessment and the mini-mental state examination compared: an epidemiological investigation of dementia.We assessed the validity of two screening tests [the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Milan Overall Dementia Assessment or (MODA)] in a population study on the prevalence of Alzheimer's disease, carried out in a small town in the north of Italy. A random sample of 1000 subjects aged 60 years or over entered the study. Subjects who scored below the cut-off points on MODA or on MMSE, or both, were further investigated with neuropsychological, laboratory and instrumental tests to ascertain a final diagnosis, which was considered as the gold standard. Our findings show that MODA has a higher sensitivity than MMSE in detecting subjects affected by dementing illnesses, while MMSE shows a higher specificity. MODA seems to be preferable to MMSE as a screening test for studies where a very high sensitivity is required.[The clock test: a simple method to assess dementia].to validate an easy and simple test to measure cognitive function: the clock drawing test.138 hospitalized and free living elders (96 female, mean age 77.9 years) were studied. They were requested to draw a clock, using standardized instructions. The drawings were independently analyzed and scored by the authors. The Mini Mental State test was used as reference and the scores of both tests were correlated.there was a correlation of 0.73 between the scores of the clock drawing and Mini Mental State tests. Using a score of 7 points in tye clock drawing and 26 points in the Mini Mental State test as cut of points for the diagnosis of dementia, the former's sensitivity and specificity was 0.82 and 0.71 respectively.the clock drawing test appears as a simple and effective test for the initial assessment of cognitive functions in patients with suspected dementia.The prevalence of dementia and depression in the elderly community in a southern European population. The Zaragoza study.Provocative international disparities reported in the prevalence rates of dementia and depression require further investigation. This is the first psychiatric study, to the best of our knowledge, about the prevalence of DSM-III-R dementing and depressive disorders and their relationships in a representative, stratified community sample of the elderly in both a Spanish-speaking country and southern Europe.A two-stage screening was completed in 1080 elderly. Sampling with replacement was done, and the cumulative response rate was 88%. In phase 1, lay interviewers administered the Spanish versions of the Mini-Mental State examination and the Geriatric Mental State Schedule-Automated Geriatric Examination for Computer Assisted Taxonomy package. In phase 2, research psychiatrists administered the same instruments and the History and Aetiology Schedule to all the probable cases and a similar number of randomly selected, probably normal subjects.An estimated 5.5% of the elderly were considered to have a dementing disorder, the most prevalent types being primary degenerative dementia, Alzheimer's type (4.3%), and multi-infarct dementia (0.6%). Depressive disorders were found in 4.8% of the elderly. Psychiatric morbidity, specifically depression, was associated with lower educational levels. "Case levels" of depression were documented in 25.4% of the demented cases and case levels of "organic" disturbance were seen in 18.2% of cases of major depression.Among the elderly, the prevalence of Alzheimer's disease and multi-infarct dementia, as opposed to depression, increases steeply with age. The overlap found between dementia and depression may have nosological implications. There could be an effect of lower education levels on psychiatric morbidity, particularly on depression.Cognitive screening in community-dwelling elders: performance on the clock-in-the-box.The Clock-in-the-Box is a rapid (2-minute) cognitive screening tool. The purpose of this study was to compare the Clock-in-the-Box with the Mini-Mental State Exam and neuropsychologic tests; to determine Clock-in-the-Box score normative values by age and education group; and to determine if the Clock-in-the-Box score is associated with measures of physical function.Community-dwelling older participants in the Boston area were recruited for a prospective, longitudinal study in which they completed a variety of cognitive and functional assessments.At baseline, participants (n=798; mean age [± standard deviation]=78.2 [±5.5] years; 14 [±3] mean years of education) completed in-home assessments of cognition (Clock-in-the-Box and Mini-Mental State Exam), measures of independent function (Activities of Daily Living and Instrumental Activities of Daily Living), and measures of physical function (Short Physical Performance Battery). The mean Mini-Mental State Exam score was 27.1 (±1.6; range 0-30 [0 worst]), and the mean Clock-in-the-Box score was 6.2 (±1.6; range 0-8 [0 worst]). Performance on the Clock-in-the-Box was correlated (Spearman) with the Mini-Mental State Exam (r=0.49, P<.001) and neuropsychologic measures (r=0.37-0.50; P<.001). Higher Clock-in-the-Box score was significantly associated with no difficulty in Activities of Daily Living (χ(2) = 39.6, P<.001) and Instrumental Activities of Daily Living (χ(2) = 35.5, P<.001). In addition, higher Clock-in-the-Box scores were associated with higher scores on the Short Physical Performance Battery (F=5.4, P<.001).The Clock-in-the-Box is a brief cognitive screening test that is correlated with the Mini-Mental State Exam, neuropsychologic tests, and measures of independent and physical function in community-dwelling older adults.Prevalence of dementia in an urban area in taiwan.This two-stage epidemiologic study was to investigate the prevalence and types of dementia among elderly people in the Saa-Min district of Kaohsiung City in Taiwan. In stage one, the Chinese Mini-Mental Status Examination (CMMSE) and Blessed Dementia Rating Scale were employed. In stage two, a comprehensive neurobehavioral examination and neuropsychologic tests were administered by neurologists and neuropsychologists. Dementia was defined by DSM-III-R criteria. The National Institute of Neurological and Communication Disorders and Stroke-Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD) and the National Institute of Neurological Disorder and Stroke-Association international pour la Recherche et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences criteria for vascular dementia (VaD) were applied. A total of 1,016 randomly selected elderly people participated in phase one: 131 people with CMMSE below cutoff values participated in phase two, of whom 45 were confirmed to have a form of dementia. The prevalence of dementia in this sample was 4.4% (3.2% in men and 5.8% in women): 2.0% for those 65 to 74 years old, 8.3% for those 75 to 84 and 24.4% for those > or = 85 years old; 6.0% for those who were illiterate, 3.3% for those who attended grade-school; and 2.8% for those who finished junior-high-school. AD (22 cases, 48.9%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (11 cases, 24.4%) and mixed dementia (MIX: 5 cases, 11.1%). Old age and being female were significant high risk factors for AD. Medical history indicated that stroke and hypertension were significant risk factors for VaD. A relatively high prevalence of dementia was observed in this study, probably because we assessed neurobehavior in great detail. Although AD was the leading cause of dementia in the present population sample. VaD and MIX also comprised an important proportion, reflecting the high prevalence of stroke in Taiwan. Older women had high risk for AD, not for VaD; and those with a history of stroke and hypertension had high risk for VaD, not for AD.Prevalence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan: impact of age, sex, education, and urbanization.To determine the prevalence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan, a two-phase study consisting of a phase I screening survey using the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) and a phase II diagnostic examination using the CERAD neuropsychological battery and the neurobehavioral examination was conducted. According to the household records, stratified random sampling by the degree of urbanization of the community was used, and 2915 inhabitants aged 65 and over participated in this study. The ICD-10NA criteria for dementia, NINCDS-ADRDA guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD), and NINDS-AIREN criteria for vascular dementia (VaD) were employed. Three hundred and ninety-eight persons who had MMSE scores below the cutoff values were recruited into the phase II study, of whom 108 had dementia. The prevalence rate (PR) of dementia was 3.7%, increasing from 1.3% in people 65-69 years old to 16.5% in people 85 years old and older. The age-standardized PR (ASPR) was 4.0%. AD (58 cases, 53.7%, PR=2.0%, ASPR=2.3%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (25 cases, 23.1%, PR=0.9%, ASPR=0.9%), and mixed dementia (eight cases, 7.4%). After adjusting for age, sex and education using logistic regression analysis, aging was a significant risk factor for AD, VaD and total dementia. Female sex and illiteracy were significant risk factors for AD only. We concluded that the prevalence of dementia in Taiwan is lower than in the developed countries, which could be due to a relatively young elderly population and a high mortality from dementia in Taiwan. AD is the leading cause of dementia in Taiwan. Considering the high stroke prevalence, the relatively lower prevalence of VaD in Taiwan deserves further investigation.Validation of the General Practitioner Assessment of Cognition - Chinese version (GPCOG-C) in China.To assess the reliability, validity, and diagnostic utility of the Chinese version of General Practitioner Assessment of Cognition (GPCOG-C). The GPCOG, which is specifically designed for use in primary care to screen for cognitive impairment, consists of a patient section testing cognition, and an informant section asking about decline in cognitive and functional abilities.The English version of GPCOG was translated, back-translated, and subsequently revised to determine the final GPCOG-C. Our sample comprised 253 community-dwelling volunteers with memory concerns aged 50 years and over and 103 outpatients of a psychogeriatric clinic with memory complaints. Participants were assessed by one of the four general practitioners or six psychogeriatricians. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the Hasegawa's Dementia Scale (HDS), and the GPCOG-C were compared against the DSM-IV-defined dementia diagnosis.The internal consistency (Cronbach's α) was 0.68 for the GPCOG patient section. The test-retest was 0.98 for the GPCOG-C total. The sequential administration of both components of GPCOG-C had a sensitivity of 97% and a specificity of 89%, with a positive predictive value of 72% and a negative predictive value of 99%. Both the GPCOG-C total and sequential two-stage scoring methods performed at least well as the MMSE and HDS in detecting dementia. The administration time for the two-stage approach was 4.3 ± 2.4 min.The GPCOG-C is a valid, time efficient instrument for dementia screening in China.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment is superior to the Mini-Mental State Examination in detecting patients at higher risk of dementia.To examine the discriminant validity of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in detecting patients with cognitive impairment at higher risk for dementia at a memory clinic setting.Memory clinic patients were administered the MoCA, MMSE, and a comprehensive formal neuropsychological battery. Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) subtypes were dichotomized into two groups: single domain-MCI (sd-MCI) and multiple domain-MCI (md-MCI). Area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) analysis was used to compare the discriminatory ability of the MoCA and the MMSE.Two hundred thirty patients were recruited, of which 136 (59.1%) were diagnosed with dementia, 61 (26.5%) with MCI, and 33 (14.3%) with no cognitive impairment (NCI). The majority of MCI patients had md-MCI (n = 36, 59%). The MoCA had significantly larger AUCs than the MMSE in discriminating md-MCI from the lower risk group for incident dementia (NCI and sd-MCI) [MoCA 0.92 (95% CI, 0.86-0.98) vs. MMSE 0.84 (95% CI, 0.75-0.92), p = 0.02). At their optimal cut-off points, the MoCA (19/20) remained superior to the MMSE (23/24) in detecting md-MCI [sensitivity: 0.83 vs. 0.72; specificity: 0.86 vs. 0.83; PPV: 0.79 vs. 0.72; NPV: 0.89 vs. 0.83; correctly classified: 85.1% vs. 78.7%].The MoCA is superior to the MMSE in the detection of patients with cognitive impairment at higher risk for incident dementia at a memory clinic setting.Validation study of the Mini-Mental State Examination in a Malay-speaking elderly population in Malaysia.In view of the differing sensitivity and specificity of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the non-English-speaking populations, we conducted the first validation study of the Malay version (M-MMSE) in Malaysia among 300 subjects (from the community and outpatient clinics).Three versions were used: M-MMSE-7 (serial 7), M-MMSE-3 (serial 3) and M-MMSE-S (spell 'dunia' backwards). Dementia was assessed using the criteria of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders IV. The optimal cutoff scores were obtained from the receiver operating characteristics curves.Seventy-three patients (24.3%) had dementia and 227 (75.7%) were controls. Three hundred patients completed the M-MMSE-7, 160 the M-MMSE-3 and 145 the M-MMSE-S. All 3 versions were valid and reliable in the diagnosis of dementia. The optimal cutoff scores varied with each version and gender. In the control group, significant gender differences were observed in the patients with the lowest educational status. Increasing educational levels significantly improved the M-MMSE performance in both genders.All 3 versions of the M-MMSE are valid and reliable as a screening tool for dementia in the Malaysian population, but at different cutoff scores. In those with the lowest educational background, gender-adjusted cutoff scores should be applied.Non-cognitive psychopathological symptoms associated with incident mild cognitive impairment and dementia, Alzheimer's type.To test the hypothesis that specific psychopathological non-cognitive symptoms are associated with incident mild cognitive impairment (MCI), while different symptoms are associated with incident dementia of Alzheimer's type (DAT).A representative community sample of 4,803 individuals aged 55+ years was interviewed in a two-phase screening, in Wave I or ZARADEMP I. This is the baseline, cross-sectional study of the ZARADEMP Project, a longitudinal study to document incidence and risk factors of dementia. The main instrument for assessment of participants was the ZARADEMP Interview, which includes standardized Spanish versions of instruments such as the Mini-Mental Status Examination and the Geriatric Mental State GMS-AGECAT. Two years later, in Wave II or ZARADEMP II, the cognitively non-deteriorated elderly were reassessed in a similar, two-phase procedure. "Incident cases" of both dementia and DAT (DSM-IV-TR criteria), as well as MCI (operationally defined Petersen's criteria) were diagnosed by a panel of psychiatrists. Statistical, logistic regression models, adjusted by age, sex and education were used to test the hypothesized association."Irritability", "neurovegetative symptoms", "sleep problems", "concentration difficulties", "loneliness" and "subjective slowing" documented at baseline were associated with incident MCI (odds ratio, OR range 1.71-2.67). A different profile of non-cognitive symptoms was associated with incident DAT, specifically "tension" (OR= 2.45), "sleep problems" (OR= 2.81), and "observed slowing" (OR= 4.35). On the contrary, "subjective restriction of activities" seemed to be negatively associated with DAT (OR= 0.12).To our knowledge, this is the first report about some specific psychopathological, non-cognitive symptoms associated with incident MCI and/ or incident DAT, when controlling by each other. The psychopathological profile associated with MCI is different from the profile preceding DAT.Test-retest reliable coefficients and 5-year change scores for the MMSE and 3MS.The present study explored several different procedures for determining the amount of change that occurred on the Mini-Mental State Exam [MMSE; Folstein, M. F., Folstein, S. E., & McHugh, P. R. (1975). "Mini-Mental State": A practical method for grading the cognitive state of patients for the clinician. Journal of Psychiatric Research, 12, 189-198] and Modified Mini-Mental State Exam [3MS; Teng, E. L., & Chui, H. C. (1987). The Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS) examination. Journal of Clinical Psychiatry, 48, 314-318] over short and extended test-retest intervals. The test-retest scores were drawn from a selected sample of elderly individuals who participated in the Canadian Study of Health and Aging [Canadian Study of Health and Aging. (1994). The Canadian study of health and aging: Study methods and prevalence of dementia. Canadian Medical Association Journal, 150, 899-913] and were tested on two occasions (CSHA-1 and CSHA-2) separated by 5 years. On each occasion the MMSE and 3MS were administered twice at approximately 3-month intervals. Thus, the mental status tests were administered four times: times 1 and 2 at CSHA-1 and times 3 and 4 at CSHA-2. Mean difference scores and percent of baseline scores showed relatively small group changes over both short and long test-retest intervals for the MMSE and the 3MS. A reliable change index based on a linear regression model controlled for practice effects, psychometric errors due to low reliability, regression to the mean, and accounted for the effects of various demographic variables. Consequently, this reliable change index provided a better estimate of the amount of change that occurred for individual participants than did the mean Retest-Test 1 difference, percent of baseline change, or a reliable change index based on a Retest-Test 1 difference score. Normative data for the change scores are provided.Accuracy of the Mini-Mental Status Examination as a screening test for dementia in a Swedish elderly population.The aim of this study was to determine the accuracy of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) as a screening test for dementia in an elderly Swedish population. All the inhabitants over 74 years of age in one area of Stockholm took the MMSE. The test was then compared to the clinical diagnosis of dementia. With a cut-off point of 23/24, the MMSE had a sensitivity of 87%, specificity of 92%, and positive predictive value (PPV) of 69%. Age, sex, and education did not substantially affect the specificity and the PPV, but had a slight effect on the sensitivity. The main causes of the false positives were somatic and psychiatric disorders. These results are in agreement with studies performed with similar methods and comparable populations.Screening for dementia in an Irish community sample using MMSE: a comparison of norm-adjusted versus fixed cut-points.The MMSE is a widely-used instrument in screening for dementia in the community. The traditional cut-point of <24/30 may be unsuitable for use in some settings, due to biases in age and education.This study aimed to investigate whether cut-points derived from age- and education-specific norms would improve the performance of the MMSE as a screening tool for dementia and cognitive impairment in an Irish community setting, potentially reducing the number of onward referrals. A secondary aim was to obtain score norms in an Irish sample.One thousand one hundred and fifteen people aged over 65 (mean age 74.8+/-6.8 years; 68% female) were assessed in their own homes, using MMSE (world) and the AGECAT computerised diagnostic system for mental illness in the elderly. The performance of the MMSE in identifying case- and sub-case-level dementia was investigated using cut-points of <24 and <23, as well as adjusted cut-points based on published norms and norms derived from the Irish sample.Published norms did not prove useful in improving screening accuracy. Cut-points based on 10th percentile Irish norms and the <23 cut-point performed comparably well, both yielding 93% specificity, with overall accuracy of 90% and 91% respectively (as sensitivity was higher for the <23 cut-point).Locally-derived norms yielded better screening accuracy than did published norms or the traditional <24 cut-point. The importance of selecting an appropriate percentile cut-off when using norms is discussed. The best results were obtained with a simple <23 cut-point, and this may be optimal when screening for dementia in an Irish community setting.Detection of Alzheimer's disease and dementia in the preclinical phase: population based cohort study.To evaluate a simple three step procedure to identify people in the general population who are in the preclinical phase of Alzheimer's disease and dementia.Three year population based cohort study.Kungsholmen cohort, Stockholm, Sweden.1435 people aged 75-95 years without dementia.Single question asking about memory complaints, assessment by mini-mental state examination, and neuropsychological testing.Alzheimer's disease and dementia at three year follow up.None of the three instruments was sufficiently predictive of Alzheimer's disease and dementia when administered separately. After participants had been screened for memory complaints and global cognitive impairment, specific tests of word recall and verbal fluency had positive predictive values for dementia of 85-100% (95% confidence intervals range from 62% to 100%). However, only 18% of future dementia cases were identified in the preclinical phase by this three step procedure. Memory complaints were the most sensitive indicator of Alzheimer's disease and dementia in the whole population, but only half the future dementia cases reported memory problems three years before diagnosis.This three step procedure, which simulates what might occur in clinical practice, has a high positive predictive value for dementia, although only a small number of future cases can be identified.The performance of the Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) for cognitive screening in a geriatric outpatient setting.Dementia is prevalent in the elderly but it is usually unrecognized. The Rowland Universal Dementia Assessment Scale (RUDAS) appears to be a good screening tool for dementia detection. The objectives are to validate RUDAS-Thai for detecting dementia according to Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders- IV-Text Revised (DSM-IV-TR) criteria in a geriatric outpatient setting and to determine its optimal cut point.This is a cross-sectional study in which the target population is patients from a Geriatric and Neurology Outpatient Clinic, Srinagarind Hospital, Khon Kaen University who were aged 60 years or above. The content validity and test-retest reliability of the RUDAS-Thai were performed initially. It was administered to each participant. Then a specialist physician assessed each participant for dementia.Eighty-nine (44.5%) subjects had dementia, 89 (44.5%) had normal cognition and 22 (11%) had mild cognitive impairment. The area under the Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was 0.82 (0.75-0.87). The optimal cut point was 24/30; it provided sensitivity and specificity of 78.7% and 61.8%, respectively. It was not influenced by age and gender but by educational level.The RUDAS-Thai is a good screening tool for dementia detection in a geriatric outpatient setting. It is portable, short-time consuming, and avoids some limitations of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). However, education does affect the scores. The scores of 24 or lower is an optimal cut point for an indication of developing dementia.Contribution of informant and patient ratings to the accuracy of the mini-mental state examination in predicting probable Alzheimer's disease.To determine whether the accuracy of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in predicting future Alzheimer's disease (AD) could be improved by the addition of patient and informant ratings of cognitive difficulties.An inception cohort of nondemented patients followed longitudinally for 2 years.Patients referred to a university teaching hospital research investigation by their family physicians because of concerns about memory impairment.One hundred sixty-five community-residing patients were included who did not have dementia or any identifiable cause for memory impairment. After 2 years, 29 met criteria for AD, and 95 were not demented.Baseline assessments included MMSE, an Informant Rating Scale, and a Patient Rating Scale of cognitive difficulties. After 2 years, patients were diagnosed following the reference standard for probable AD. Diagnosticians were blind to baseline scores.Age and education were included in all analyses as covariates. The best logistic regression model included the Informant Rating Scale and the MMSE (sensitivity = 83%, specificity = 79%). An empirically reduced six-item model that included two items each from the MMSE, the Patient Rating Scale, and the Informant Rating Scale produced a significantly better model than the one with the full test scores (sensitivity = 90%, specificity = 94%).Results indicate that inclusion of informant ratings with the MMSE significantly improved its accuracy in the prediction of probable AD. Replication in a new prospective cohort of nondemented patients is necessary to confirm these findings.Relationship of dementia screening tests with biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease.Screening tests for Alzheimer's disease lack sensitivity and specificity. We developed the AD8, a brief dementia screening interview validated against clinical and cognitive evaluations, as an improvement over current screening methods. Because insufficient follow-up has occurred to validate the AD8 against the neuropathologic findings of Alzheimer's disease, we investigated whether AD8 scores correspond to impairment in episodic memory testing and changes in biomarkers of Alzheimer's disease (cerebrospinal fluid and amyloid imaging with Pittsburgh compound B) characteristic of symptomatic Alzheimer's disease. We also compared informant-based assessments with brief performance-based dementia screening measurements such as the Mini Mental State Exam. The sample (n = 257) had a mean age of 75.4 years with 15.1 years of education; 88.7% were Caucasian and 45.5% were male. The sample was divided into two groups based on their AD8 scores: those with a negative dementia screening test (AD8 score 0 or 1, n = 137) and those with a positive dementia screening test (AD8 score ≥2, n = 120). Individuals with positive AD8 scores had abnormal Pittsburgh compound B binding (P < 0.001) and cerebrospinal fluid biomarkers (P < 0.001) compared with individuals with negative AD8 scores. Individuals with positive AD8 tests and positive biomarkers scored in the impaired range on the Wechsler Logical Memory Story A (mean score 7.0 ± 4.5 for Pittsburgh compound B; mean score 7.6 ± 5.3 for cerebrospinal fluid amyloid beta protein 1-42). The AD8 area under the curve for Pittsburgh compound B was 0.737 (95% confidence interval: 0.64-0.83) and for cerebrospinal fluid amyloid beta protein 1-42 was 0.685 (95% confidence interval: 0.60-0.77) suggesting good discrimination. The AD8 had superior sensitivity in detecting early stages of dementia compared with the Mini Mental State Examination. The AD8 had a likelihood ratio of a positive test of 5.8 (95% confidence interval: 5.4-6.3) and likelihood ratio of a negative test of 0.04 (95% confidence interval: 0.03-0.06), increasing the pre-test probability of an individual having symptomatic Alzheimer's disease. Individuals with AD8 scores of ≥2 had a biomarker phenotype consistent with Alzheimer's disease and lower performance on episodic memory tests, supporting a diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease. Informant-based assessments may be superior to performance-based screening measures such as the Mini Mental State Examination in corresponding to underlying Alzheimer's disease pathology, particularly at the earliest stages of decline. The use of a brief test such as the AD8 may improve strategies for detecting dementia in community settings where biomarkers may not be readily available, and may enrich clinical trial recruitment by increasing the likelihood that participants have underlying biomarker abnormalities.MMSE cross-domain variability predicts cognitive decline in centenarians.Early detection of dementia is one of the key issues in cognitive gerontology. However, so far the detection of early stages in cognitive decline has been rather unreliable. One central limitation of current assessment strategies is that they rely on information about a person's level of performance obtained from a single assessment.In the first part of the present paper, we propose three strategies for overcoming this limitation by using information from several measurement occasions to improve diagnostic reliability.In the second part, we present one exemplary empirical analysis of one of these approaches reporting data from the Heidelberg Centenarian Study.In this sample of very old individuals tested at baseline and at a follow-up 18 months later, the intra-individual cross-domain variability across MMSE subscales [1]at baseline predicted cognitive decline (i.e. change in an external cognitive functioning rating from baseline to follow-up) much better than baseline mean MMSE scores.In conclusion, we discuss the advantage of performance variability as a predictor for cognitive decline.Validating screening instruments for cognitive impairment in older South Asians in the United Kingdom.The numbers of older South Asians in the United Kingdom are rising. Investigation of their mental health has been neglected compared to their physical health.This study aimed to determine the sensitivity and specificity of modified versions of two screening instruments for cognitive impairment (Mini-Mental State Examination and Abbreviated Mental Test) in a community-based population.Two-stage study comparing screening instruments against diagnostic interview.South, central and north Manchester.Community-resident South Asians aged 60 years and over.Subjects were approached via their general practitioners and interviewed at home. Sensitivity and specificity for the screening instruments were calculated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.For the Gujarati population, the MMSE cutoff was >/=24 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 95%) and AMT>/=6 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 95%). For the Pakistani population, the MMSE cutoff was >/=27 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 77%) and AMT>/=7 (sensitivity 100%, specificity 87%).Culturally modified versions of the Mini-Mental State Examination and Abbreviated Mental Test are acceptable and may have a high degree of sensitivity. They may assist with the recognition of cognitive impairment, if an appropriate cutoff is used.The Mini-Mental State Examination score and the clinical diagnosis of dementia.To set a working cutoff score for the referral to diagnostic examination, we evaluated 150 consecutive patients with complaints potentially related to dementia, using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). All patients were later given a complete, standardized work-up and diagnosis as part of our Alzheimer's Disease Patient Registry protocol. Dementia diagnosis was made, consistent with accepted criteria, by consensus of the physicians and psychologist. Diagnosis was reaffirmed after 1-year follow-up exam; 133 of the 150 original patients completed follow-up (80 dementia, 53 no dementia). We evaluated the initial MMSE score compared with the follow-up diagnosis. Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values were calculated for MMSE scores ranging from 22 through 29. The conventional cutoff score of < 24 shows a sensitivity of 0.63 and a specificity of 0.96; sensitivity increased at higher cutoff scores. Multivariate analysis showed that educational level added significant prediction only at scores of > or = 27. We conclude that an MMSE score of 26 or 27 should be used as a cutoff score in symptomatic populations with similar educational and socioeconomic backgrounds when the goal is to miss few true cases. Population surveys where the expected prevalence is low may require a different cutoff score to indicate the need for further diagnostic evaluation.Mental status testing in the elderly nursing home population.The clinical utility of selected brief cognitive screening instruments in detecting dementia in an elderly nursing home population was examined. One hundred twenty nursing home residents (mean age 87.9) were administered the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS). The majority of the subjects (75%) were also administered the Dementia Rating Scale (DRS). Both clinically diagnosed demented (n = 57) and non-demented (n = 63) subjects participated in the study. Dementia was diagnosed in accordance with DSM-III-R criteria by physicians specializing in geriatric medicine. Using standard cutoffs for impairment, the 3MS, MMSE, and DRS achieved high sensitivity (82% to 100%) but low specificity (33% to 52%) in the detection of dementia among nursing home residents. Positive predictive values ranged from 52% to 61%, and negative predictive values from 77% to 100%. Higher age, lower education, and history of depression were significantly associated with misclassification of non-demented elderly subjects. Receiver Operating Characteristic (ROC) curve analyses revealed optimal classification of dementia with cutoff values of 74 for the 3MS, 22 for the MMSE, and 110 for the DRS. The results suggest that the 3MS, MMSE, and DRS do not differ significantly with respect to classification accuracy of dementia in a nursing home population. Elderly individuals of advanced age (i.e., the oldest-old) with lower education and a history of depression appear at particular risk for dementia misclassification with these instruments. Revised cutoff values for impairment should be employed when these instruments are applied to elderly residents of nursing homes and the oldest-old.Statistical description of the Mini-Mental State Examination for French elderly community residents. Paquid Study Group.The distribution of total Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores, individual items, and groups of items were studied in French elderly community residents from a random sample of 2727 subjects. Serial seven, recall three objects, and copy pentagons had the lowest percentage of correct responses, while orientation to place, naming two objects, and three objects registration had the highest percentage of correct responses. The structure of correlation of the items was studied using Principal Components Analysis. The projection of the items on the first axis reflects the tendency of the items to vary in the same direction and is compatible with the fact that the MMSE items are all indicators of the same concept: cognitive performance. The second and third axes identify clusters of highly correlated variables and provide support for the internal validity of the MMSE score for a French population. The full MMSE score seems to be a valid instrument for the evaluation of cognitive performance in community-based elderly residents.Canadian study of health and aging: study methods and prevalence of dementia.To estimate the prevalence of dementia and its subtypes by sex and age group for five regions of Canada.Prevalence survey.Community and institutional settings in Canada, excluding those in the two territories, Indian reserves and military units.Representative sample of people aged 65 and over interviewed between February 1991 and May 1992. Those in the community (9008 subjects) were chosen randomly from medicare lists in nine provinces or from the Enumeration Composite Record in Ontario. People in institutions (1255) were randomly selected from residents in stratified random samples of institutions in each region.Screening with the Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS) Examination to identify cognitive impairment. Clinical examination of all those in institutions, those in the community with a 3MS score of less than 78 and a sample of those in the community with a 3MS score of 78 or more to diagnose dementia. Dementia and Alzheimer's disease were defined according to established criteria.Prevalence of dementia of all types, by region, sex and age group, the estimated number of cases in the population by type of dementia and the age-standardized rate per 1000 population.The prevalence estimates suggested that 252,600 (8.0%) of all Canadians aged 65 and over met the criteria for dementia (95% confidence interval [CI] 236,800 to 268,400). These were divided roughly equally between the community and institutional samples; the female:male ratio was 2:1. The age-standardized rate ranged from 2.4%, among those aged 65 to 74 years, to 34.5%, among those aged 85 and over. The corresponding figures for Alzheimer's disease were 5.1% overall (161,000 cases; 95% CI 148,100 to 173,900), ranging from 1.0% to 26.0%; for vascular dementia it was 1.5% overall, ranging from 0.6% to 4.8%. If the prevalence estimates remain constant, the number of Canadians with dementia will rise to 592,000 by 2021.These Canadian estimates of the prevalence of dementia fall toward the upper end of the ranges in other studies, whereas the estimates for Alzheimer's disease fall in the middle of the ranges. This may suggest an unusual balance between Alzheimer's and other forms of dementia in the Canadian population.The reliability and validity of the Mini-Mental State in a British community survey.The Mini-Mental State (MMSE) was administered to 2302 general practice patients aged 75 yr and over. Those scoring 23 or less and a sample of those scoring 24 or 25 were selected for further investigation using the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination. Inter-observer reliability was high with a mean kappa value of 0.97. Eighty-six per cent of respondents judged to have organic mental disorders scored 23 or less on the MMSE and 92% of those judged to be cognitively intact scored 24 or more. However, only 55% of respondents who scored 23 or less were demented or delirious while a number of relatively well educated, mildly demented subjects scored 24 and 25. The customary cut-off point of 23/24 may need to be revised in future community studies. MMSE scores cannot be used to make even tentative psychiatric diagnoses; more detailed investigation of low scorers is essential.[Usefulness of the 'Mini-Mental State Test'for the diagnosis of dementia; study of criterion validity in a Dutch rural population].To establish the criterion validity of the MMSE for dementia in a community-based population.Descriptive.Eight rural general practices and eight adherent institutions for long-term care near Zwolle, the Netherlands.In the first (screening) stage, the MMSE was applied, in the second (diagnostic) stage the 'Cambridge examination for mental disorders of the elderly' (CAMDEX) was used. After exclusion of subjects with clinically relevant impairment of hearing and (or) vision, analyses were based on 2151 screened subjects. Based on a non-proportional, stratified randomized sampling procedure using the MMSE score as the stratification variable, 390 of the screened subjects were examined with the CAMDEX. Seventy-seven cases of DSM-III-R dementia were identified. Based on 390 paired observations the relationship between MMSE score and DSM-III-R dementia was modelled by logistic regression. After extrapolation of this relationship to the total screened population, sensitivity and specificity figures were calculated at several cut-offs of the MMSE, and Receiver Operating Characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed for the total population as well as for four subpopulations. (men, women, < 80, > or = 80 years).At the cut-off of 23/24, sensitivity was 0.76 and specificity 0.91 in the total population. However, the criterion validity of the MMSE varied substantially between the four sex-age combinations. Criterion validity was especially poor for women in the younger age range.The MMSE has only limited value in clinical practice. Use of uniform cut-offs has to be rejected.Use of the MC-FAQ and MMSE-FAQ in cognitive screening of older African Americans, Hispanic Americans, and European Americans.The purpose of this study was to examine the performance of the Mini-Cog-Functional Activities Questionnaire (MC-FAQ) and the Mini-Mental State Examination-Functional Activities Questionnaire (MMSE-FAQ) in cognitive screening of a multiethnic sample of older adults.This is a descriptive psychometric study.Cognitive screening was done in senior centers, at health fairs, and within the nine participating memory disorder centers in the State of Florida.African American, Hispanic American, and European American older adults who participated in this screening were matched on gender, age within 3 years and education within 3 years yielding a sample of 225.The MC-FAQ is a combination of the Mini-Cog and Functional Activities Questionnaire. The MMSE-FAQ combines the MMSE with the FAQ. The Geriatric Depression Scale was used to assess depressive symptoms.African Americans reported significantly less depressive symptoms (F[2, 217] = 10.31, p <0.001) and European Americans had significantly higher mean MMSE scores than the other two groups (F[2, 222] = 3.33, p = 0.037). Participants did not differ by ethnic group on the MC-FAQ or MMSE-FAQ classifications of normal, mild cognitive impairment, or dementia. Age, years of education, and depressive symptoms were significant predictors of MC-FAQ and MMSE-FAQ classifications.The results suggest that these combinations of screening measures may have less culture bias than the MMSE alone. Sensitivity and specificity should be evaluated in these groups with confirmatory neurological and psychiatric diagnosis.Cases with mild cognitive impairment and Alzheimer's disease fail to benefit from repeated exposure to episodic memory tests as compared with controls.Memory tests may be predictive for cognitive decline. We investigated the sensitivity and change in performance over time of the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) for Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) and Alzheimer's Disease (AD) when compared to cognitively healthy controls. Participants included elderly controls (n = 54), MCI (n = 19) and AD cases (n = 28) from OPTIMA. The MMSE and the HVLT (version 1) were administered twice to all subjects with an interval of 2-3 years.MCI and AD cases had poorer performance than controls on the HVLT and MMSE at both testing episodes (p < 0.05). The HVLT profile over time showed a learning effect in the control group (P < 0.0001), a trend to decline in the AD group (p = 0.09) and no change in the MCI group (P = 0.8). A subgroup of MCI subjects had lower HVLT scores at follow-up. The MMSE profile showed no significant change over time for all three groups (P > 0.05). The HVLT had better sensitivity and specificity compared to the MMSE for detecting MCI and AD. The HVLT is not only valuable for cross-sectional designs but has also proved to be valuable in a longitudinal design. Cognitively healthy controls showed evidence of learning strategies on the HVLT after a 2-3 year interval, with improved scores at the second testing episode. By contrast, an MCI group showed no benefits of previous exposure to this test. Lack of use of learning strategies on the HVLT may be an important marker of the likelihood of cognitive decline to MCI or dementia.[Validity of the Portuguese version of Clinical Dementia Rating].To evaluate the validity of the Portuguese version of the Clinical Dementia Rating for classifying the cognitive function among the elderly.The Mini Mental State Examination was utilized as a screening method for cognitive deficit among a cohort of 424 elderly. All those who scored <26 points (108 elderly) and 48 elderly with scores > or =26 were included in the study. The 156 subjects selected were submitted to clinical evaluation and neuropsychological tests for the diagnosis of dementia. Afterwards, both cases and non-cases were classified, according to the Portuguese version of the Clinical Dementia Rating, in the categories normal, borderline, mild, moderate and severe dementia.Among the 156 subjects selected, 122 were non-cases, 62 (51%) were classified as normal (CDR=0) and 60 (49%) as borderline (CDR=0.5). Among the 34 cases of dementia, 17 (50%) were classified as mild dementia (CDR=1), eight (23%) as moderate (CDR=2) and six (18%) as severe dementia (CDR=3). Only three (9%) of the cases were considered borderline cases by the Clinical Dementia Rating. Its sensibility was 91.2% and the specificity was 100%. The positive predictive value was 100% and the negative predictive value was 97.6%. The Mini Mental State Examination scores declined significantly according to the degree of dementia.The Portuguese version of the Clinical Dementia Rating is a valid instrument for classifying the dementia status of the elderly. Almost half the cases considered normal by the diagnostic criteria of the Mini Mental State Examination were borderline cases according to the Clinical Dementia Rating and might correspond to cases of mild cognitive impairment, with an increased risk of conversion to dementia cases.Consistency of clinical diagnosis of dementia in NEDICES: A population-based longitudinal study in Spain.Few longitudinal studies have verified the clinical diagnosis of dementia based on clinical examinations. We evaluated the consistency of the clinical diagnosis of dementia over a period of 3 years of follow-up in a population-based, cohort study of older people in central Spain.Individuals (N = 5278) were evaluated at baseline (1994-1995) and at follow-up (1997-1998). The evaluation included a screening questionnaire for dementia and a neurological assessment.Dementia screening consisted of a 37-item version of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Pfeffer Functional Activities Questionnaire (FAQ). Study neurologists investigated those participants who screened positively (N = 713) as well as 843 who had screened negatively to test the sensitivity of the screening instruments or because they had a positive screening for other chronic neurological diseases. We detected 295 patients among those who screened positive and 13 among those who screened negatively. Three years follow-up evaluation demonstrated 14 diagnostic errors at baseline (4.5%) leading to a final number of 306 patients with dementia. The corrected prevalence of dementia was 5.8% (95% confidence interval [CI] 5.2-6.5).The diagnosis of dementia was highly accurate in this population-based, Spanish cohort study, and our prevalence figures agree with other European surveys. Given the high cost and difficulties of population rescreening and its relatively low yield, we conclude that a single 2-phase investigation (screening followed by clinical examination) provides accurate information for most population-based prevalence studies of dementia.Sensitivity and specificity of standardized screens of cognitive impairment and dementia among elderly black and white community residents.Six standardized published measures of cognitive function were evaluated as screens of dementia in a sample of 164 (83 black, 81 white) community residents aged 65 and over selected from the Duke University EPESE (Established Populations for Epidemiologic Studies of the Elderly), a biracial cohort of 4164 residents in a five county area of piedmont North Carolina. Of these 164 persons, 26 were subsequently diagnosed as demented. The weighted data from this sample represent the estimated performance of these measures among elderly blacks and whites in a five county area. The 6 measures evaluated in this study (specificity figures for blacks precede those for whites) were (1) Orientation-Memory-Concentration Test (38%, 79%), (2) Mental Status Questionnaire (71%, 96%), (3) Mini-Mental State (58%, 94%), (4) Storandt et al. Battery (42%, 69%), (5) Iowa Battery (26%, 69%) and (6) Kendrick Cognitive Tests (92%, 97%). All but the Kendrick Cognitive Tests showed substantial sensitivity (90-100%) in detecting the presence of dementia. The specificity of the tests was particularly poor for blacks. The briefer, simpler measures tended to have greater accuracy than the longer and more complex measures. With rare exceptions, the scores obtained on these screens correlated with race and education.The limited utility of the Mini-Mental State Examination in screening people over the age of 75 years for dementia in primary care.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is used worldwide to assess cognitive status and it has been recommended for use in primary care to detect dementia. In this study, the MMSE was administered during annual health checks for patients over 75 years of age in nine practices by a member of the primary care team. The mean age was 80 years. Of the 709 patients screened, 286 scored at or below the cut-off point, which was set at 26/30 on the MMSE, and they were invited to be assessed further by a researcher, using the well-validated GMS-AGECAT diagnostic system. Eighty-four of these patients refused, 173 were identified as not having dementia, and 29 (14%) were identified as having dementia. These results, with an 86% false-positive rate, raise concerns regarding the utility of the MMSE as a screening instrument for dementia in primary care.Detecting cognitive impairment in primary care: performance assessment of three screening instruments.Early detection of Alzheimer's disease and related disorders (ADRD) is important, especially in primary care settings. We compared performances of two common screening tests, the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Clock Drawing Test (CDT), with that of the MCI Screen ({MCIS}) in 254 patients over 65. None had previous diagnosis of ADRD, and 81% were asymptomatic by Functional Assessment Staging Test ({FAST}) (FAST=1). 215 patients completed all screening tests - 141 had >or= 1 abnormal result, 121/141 completed standardized diagnostic assessment, and the remaining 74/215 (34%) screened entirely normally and weren't further evaluated. Potential bias due to unevaluated cases was statistically adjusted. Among diagnosed cases: AD=43%, cerebrovascular disease=36%, other causes=21%. Bias-adjusted MCI prevalence for FAST stages 1 and 1-3 were 13.9-20.3% and 23.0-28.3%. Bias-adjusted results for the CDT, MMSE and MCIS were: clinical diagnosis validity (kappa statistic)={-0.02 (p=0.61), 0.06 (p=0.23), 0.92 (p< 0.0001)}; sensitivity={59%, 71%, 94%}; specificity={39%, 36%, 97%}; overall accuracy={54%, 62%, 96%}; positive predictive value={16%, 17%, 86%}; and negative predictive value={83%, 87%, 96%}. The MMSE and CDT were not valid for early detection, while the MCIS had high validity and accuracy in the primary care cohort.Clinical diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease and other dementias in a population survey. Agreement and causes of disagreement in applying Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Revised Third Edition, Criteria.In a population survey aimed to detect cases of Alzheimer's disease and other dementias, two preliminary diagnoses were made independently with the purpose of using the concordant diagnoses as final diagnoses. Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Revised Third Edition, diagnostic criteria were followed. The 668 subjects examined were selected from the population of an area in Stockholm, Sweden, aged 75 years or more, with the Mini-Mental State Examination used as a screening test. The agreement on dementia diagnosis was moderate (kappa = .54) and could be clearly improved (kappa = .70) with modifications to the diagnostic criteria, such as adding a category of questionable dementia and giving more guidelines in the definition of impairment of a function. The agreement on the diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease vs vascular dementia vs secondary dementia was substantial (kappa = .67) when the cases with concordant dementia diagnoses were examined.Epidemiology research on dementia in Antwerp, Belgium.Epidemiological research on dementia in Belgium started in 1990 with a prevalence study. In the first phase of the MMSE was used for screening a random sample, stratified by age, of 1,800 aged people. In the second phase the diagnostic work was done by a psychiatrist using the CAMDEX. An incidence study will start after 2 years. Potential risk factors will be examined in a case-control study.The prevalence of dementia in Girona.To provide a preliminary assessment of the prevalence of dementia and its subtypes in a rural area. From a total of 2,469 people over 65 who were not committed to any institution, 273 were randomly chosen and stratified by age and sex. Of these 273 individuals, 244 (89.4%) took part in the study. Family doctors administered the miniexamen cognoscitivo (MEC), a Spanish version of the Mini Mental State Exam to screen all individuals taking part in the first phase. Enrolled in the second phase were all those whose scores on the MEC were below the cut-off point, plus a similar number of individuals whose scores were above this level and who were used as controls. The CAMDEX was the instrument used for diagnosis by clinical psychologists. The overall prevalence of dementia in the area under study was 13.93 +/- 4.34%. This prevalence includes the three levels of diagnosis certainty for CAMDEX (definitive, probable and possible) and the three levels of severity (minimum, mild, moderate, and severe) defined by the instrument. The number of individuals with dementia increased with age. Females showed more dementia than males in all age groups. The distribution of dementia by subtypes was 41.18% for both Alzheimer's type senile and presenile forms, and for vascular dementia, and 17.64% for mixed dementia. Our results show a prevalence of dementia that is higher than rates observed in other studies using similar materials and methods.Comorbidity of dementia and psychiatric disorders in older persons.To further investigate the relationship between psychiatric disorders and dementia in elderly patients, the authors drew a population-based, age-stratified random sample from residents of Rochester, Minnesota, age 65 and older. A trained paramedic completed a 90-minute screening interview, including the Symptom Checklist-90, Mini-Mental State Exam, and Auditory-Verbal Learning Test. Persons failing the screens were interviewed by a psychiatrist and a neurologist. DSM-III-R diagnoses were assigned for dementia and other psychiatric disorders. Of 201 participants, 37 were evaluated further by both neurologist and psychiatrist. One received a psychiatric diagnosis alone. Dementia alone was present in four people. Concurrent psychiatric diagnoses and dementia were found in 17 subjects. Much of the psychopathology found in older persons occurs in people with cognitive impairment. Current diagnostic nosology may not be able to capture the interrelatedness of psychiatric syndromes and cognitive impairment in elderly patients.Correction for age, education and other demographic variables in the use of the Mini Mental State Examination in Finland.The population-based Helsinki Aging Study was comprised of three age groups: 75-, 80- and 85-year-olds. A random sample of 511 subjects completed the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and were assessed on the Clinical Dementia Rating-scale (CDR). According to the CDR results 446 subjects were screened as non-demented. Of these subjects 30% scored below or at 24 MMSE points. Age, education and social group had a significant effect on the MMSE scores, even after excluding the demented cases. Together they explained 10% of the total variance within the MMSE. Social group correlated with education. The MMSE scores were corrected according to age and education. Adjustment of the originally used cutpoint of 24 resulted in cutpoints of 25 and 26 among the 75-year-olds, in the low and high education groups respectively; 23 and 26 in the 80-year-olds; 22 and 23 in the 85-year-olds.Community screening for dementia: the Mini Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) compared.The objectives of this study were to assess whether Teng's modification of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) improves its performance as a screening test for cognitive impairment and dementia, and to replicate this comparison in French and English language groups, and for differing assumptions concerning the relative importance of false negative and false positive errors. Screening interviews were conducted with representative samples of people aged 65 or over, set in 36 communities in 10 Canadian provinces. There were 8900 community participants in the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, of whom 1600 also underwent an extensive clinical and neuropsychological examination. Sensitivity, specificity and areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve for the original MMSE and modified version (the 3MS) were the main outcome measures. Results are reported for French and English versions of the tests. The results indicate the alpha internal consistency for the 3MS was 0.87, compared to 0.78 for the MMSE. The area under the ROC curve in identifying dementia was 0.93 for the 3MS and 0.89 for the MMSE (p < 0.001). There was less difference between the two tests in identifying all levels of cognitive impairment (AUC 0.80 versus 0.77, p < 0.01). The superiority of the 3MS appears more due to its extended scoring system than to its additional questions. The validity of the MMSE was comparable in English and French samples; results for the 3MS were inconsistent between the two samples, suggesting possible translation problems. In conclusion, the 3MS was superior to the MMSE, justifying the slightly greater burden for its administration and scoring. Neither test worked well in identifying lower levels of cognitive impairment.[Validation of a screening test for age associated cognitive impairment, in Chile].The real prevalence of dementia in a given population must be determined through prevalence studies, using validated screening tests.To validate and determine cutoff points for a cognitive impairment screening test composed by the Folstein Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Pfeffer Functional Activities Questionnaire (PFAQ).Validation of the diagnostic test in a sample of 100 subjects over 65 years old (85 from the project "Age associated dementias" and 15 with a confirmed diagnosis of dementia). All were subjected to a complete neuropsychological test by a trained neurologist, that constituted the "gold standard" for the diagnosis of dementia. An independent interviewer applied the MMSE to the subjects and the PFAQ to a next of kin informer. Cutoff points were calculated using ROC curves. The points with the better equilibrium between sensitivity and specificity were selected, considering differences in results between groups with low and high educational level.The cutoff point for MMSE was 21/22, with a sensitivity of 93.6% (95% CI 70.6-99.7%) and a specificity of 46.1% (95% CI 34.7-57.8%). The figure for PFAQ was 5/6, with a sensitivity of 89.2% (95% CI 70.6-99.7%) and a specificity of 70.7% (95% CI 58.9-80.3%). The combination of both instruments gave a sensitivity of 94.4% (95% CI 58.9-80.3%) and a specificity of 83.3% (95% CI 72.3-90.7%).This screening test, using MMSE and PFAQ, has a good sensitivity and specificity for the diagnosis of dementia in Chile. Being simple and of low cost, it can be applied in primary health care.Four sensitive screening tools to detect cognitive dysfunction in geriatric emergency department patients: brief Alzheimer's Screen, Short Blessed Test, Ottawa 3DY, and the caregiver-completed AD8.Cognitive dysfunction, including dementia and delirium, is prevalent in geriatric emergency department (ED) patients, but often remains undetected. One barrier to reliable identification of acutely or chronically impaired cognitive function is the lack of an acceptable screening tool. While multiple brief screening instruments have been derived, ED validation trials have not previously demonstrated tools that are appropriately sensitive for clinical use.The primary objective was to evaluate and compare the Ottawa 3DY (O3DY), Brief Alzheimer's Screen (BAS), Short Blessed Test (SBT), and caregiver-completed AD8 (cAD8) diagnostic test performance for cognitive dysfunction in geriatric ED patients using the Mini Mental Status Exam (MMSE) as the criterion standard. A secondary objective was to assess the diagnostic accuracy for the cAD8 (which is an informant-based instrument) when used in combination with the other performance-based screening tools.In an observational cross-sectional cohort study at one urban academic university-affiliated medical center, trained research assistants (RAs) collected patients' responses on the Confusion Assessment Method for the Intensive Care Unit, BAS, and SBT. When available, reliable caregivers completed the cAD8. The MMSE was then obtained. The O3DY was reconstructed from elements of the MMSE and the BAS. Consenting subjects were non-critically ill, English-speaking adults over age 65 years, who had not received potentially sedating medications prior to or during cognitive testing. Using an MMSE score of ≤23 as the criterion standard for cognitive dysfunction, the sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) area under the curve (AUC) were computed. Venn diagrams were constructed to quantitatively compare the degree of overlap among positive test results between the performance-based instruments.The prevalence of cognitive dysfunction for the 163 patients enrolled with complete data collection was 37%, including 5.5% with delirium. Dementia was self-reported in 3%. Caregivers were available to complete the cAD8 for 56% of patients. The SBT, BAS, and O3DY each demonstrated 95% sensitivity, compared with 83% sensitivity for the cAD8. The SBT had a superior specificity of 65%. No combination of instruments with the cAD8 significantly improved diagnostic accuracy. The SBT provided the optimal overlap with the MMSE.The SBT, BAS, and O3DY are three brief performance-based screening instruments to identify geriatric patients with cognitive dysfunction more rapidly than the MMSE. Among these three instruments, the SBT provides the best diagnostic test characteristics and overlap with MMSE results. The addition of the cAD8 to the other instruments does not enhance diagnostic accuracy.Detecting dementia with the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test and the Mini-Mental State Examination.The Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were administered to 323 non-demented elderly and 70 individuals who meet DSM-IV criteria for dementia in order to compare the validity of these two measures for detecting mild dementia and for the two most common dementia subtypes, Alzheimer's disease (AD) and vascular dementia (VaD). The study was conducted in an elderly, ethnically diverse community-dwelling population. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values were calculated over a range of clinically relevant cut scores for each test. We analyzed the influence of age, education, reading ability and sex on test performance using logistic regression models. When sensitivity is held constant at 0.69, the specificity for the HVLT total recall was 0.89 and the MMSE 0.82 for all dementias (P=.10). Age, sex and education did not significantly influence test performance for either test in this sample. Results were similar for AD and VaD. However, while adding a measure of reading ability to the regression models did not affect the overall dementia model, it resulted in improved specificities when combined with the MMSE for AD and combined with the HVLT for VaD. Additional tests such as reading ability can improve discrimination of dementia subtypes. The modest sensitivity of either the HVLT or the MMSE alone suggests that further neuropsychological evaluation is required to confirm dementia diagnosis.Detection of MCI in the clinic: evaluation of the sensitivity and specificity of a computerised test battery, the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test and the MMSE.the sensitive detection of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) in older adults is an important problem that requires objective assessment. We evaluated whether the computerised cognitive test battery, CogState, was as sensitive to MCI as two well-validated 'paper-and-pencil' tests, the Hopkins Verbal Learning Test (HVLT) and the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE).these tests were administered with a subjective memory questionnaire and an 'Activities of Daily Living' scale to 21 individuals with MCI and 98 cognitively healthy controls matched for sex, education and IQ levels. The sensitivity and specificity of the tests and their discrimination between groups were determined.the HVLT had a maximum discrimination between controls and MCI cases of 90%, compared with 86% for CogState and 65% for the MMSE. Only CogState showed correlations with subjective memory complaints (SMC) and activities of daily living for the whole cohort when controlled for age, sex and years of education. Logistic regression analyses showed that diagnosis (control:MCI) was predicted by HVLT and a CogState ratio score. Age was a significant predictor of HVLT performance, while age and SMC predicted CogState performance. The computerised test battery was well tolerated by older adults, but presentation speed was a limiting factor for some participants.overall, we conclude that the HVLT has better sensitivity for the detection of MCI in older adults than the CogState, but that CogState may enable the identification of cognitive deficits above and beyond impairments in memory.A new systematic method of measurement and diagnosis of "mild cognitive impairment" and dementia according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R criteria.Normative data were collected in a study population of 150 randomly selected elderly subjects. Using the SIDAM (Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of Dementia of the Alzheimer Type, multi-infarct dementia, and dementias of other etiology according to DSM-III-R and ICD-10), both the dimensional and the categorical aspects of dementia and "mild cognitive impairment" are considered. With the SIDAM score (SISCO) [range 0 (minimum)-55 (maximum, no cognitive impairment)] and the SIDAM Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (range 0-30), appropriate cutoffs for the category of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia and "mild cognitive impairment" were defined. MMSE scores of 0-22 were found to be indicative of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia. For "mild cognitive impairment," MMSE scores ranged from 23-27 according to a DSM-III-R definition (ICD-10: 23-28). An MMSE score of 22 or less was found to differentiate between DSM-III-R/ICD-10 dementia and "mild cognitive impairment," with a specificity of 92% (ICD-10: 95.6) and a sensitivity of 96% (ICD-10: 96%). With the SIDAM-based DSM-III-R/ICD-10 diagnoses of dementia as the criterion, the SISCO was 97.3% specific (ICD-10: 99%) and 94% sensitive (ICD-10: 94%) in detecting dementia. A SISCO of 0-33 was highly indicative of DSM-III-R and ICD-10 dementia. For "mild cognitive impairment," a SISCO between 34-47 (ICD-10: 34-51) was found. The SISCO covers a broader range of cognitive functions than the MMSE and is more useful in detecting even very mild cognitive decline. Furthermore, the newly defined category of "mild cognitive impairment" could be validated successfully by means of GDS Stages 2-3 and CDR Stage 0.5. These findings confirm the value of the SIDAM as a short diagnostic instrument for measurement and diagnosis of dementia and "mild cognitive impairment."The prevalence of dementia in a total population: a comparison of two screening instruments.Two short screening tests for dementia, the Information/Orientation (IO) sub-test of the Clifton Assessment Scale (CAPE) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were included in a survey of 1579 elderly people of a large general practice. All those scoring 21 and under on the MMSE, a one in two sample of those scoring 22, 23 and a one in ten sample of the remainder were investigated further using the Cambridge Examination for Mental Disorders of the elderly (CAMDEX). The prevalences of moderate to severe dementia and mild to severe dementia determined from the CAMDEX interview were 4.8% and 14.2%, respectively. For detection of moderate to severe dementia, a cut-point of 21/22 on the MMSE gave a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 85% and an overall prevalence of 19.7%; mild to severe dementia was best detected by a cut-point of 23/24 giving a sensitivity of 89%, specificity of 81% and prevalence of 28.5%. A cut-point of 7/8 on the IO sub-test gave a sensitivity and specificity for detecting moderate to severe dementia of 87% and 97%, respectively, with a prevalence of 7.3%; for mild to severe dementia a cut-point of 10/11 gave a sensitivity of 67%, specificity of 94% and prevalence of 14.7%.Effect of education on the mini-mental state examination as a screening test for dementia.We studied whether Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) norms for detecting dementia in elderly outpatients vary according to educational attainment. Subjects were 109 elderly outpatients with Alzheimer's dementia and 100 non-demented outpatient controls. Receiver operating characteristics (ROC) of the MMSE were examined among three strata of educational attainment: middle school, high school, and college/graduate school. MMSE ROC curve areas were .95-.96 in the three educational strata. Assuming a dementia prevalence of 10%-30%, the most accurate lower limits of normal for MMSE scores and their attendant sensitivities and specificities were 21 for middle school (.82/.94), 23 for high school (.79/.97), and 24 for college/graduate school (.83/1.00) attainment. These norms accurately classified over 90% of subjects in all three educational strata. We conclude that education-specific norms optimize performance of the MMSE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in elderly outpatients.Prevalence and subtypes of dementia in Taiwan: a community survey of 5297 individuals.To study the prevalence rate of dementia in Taiwan, the relative frequencies of its subtypes, and its associations with age, education, gender, and residence location.A total of 2753 men and 2544 women from four urban and four rural communities participated. Their age ranged from 41 to 88 years; 28% of them were at least 65 years old. Their education ranged from 0 to 20 years; 27% of them had less than 1 year of formal schooling.Phase I was a screening survey by trained nurses who administered a Chinese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination, the MMSE-T1, to all participants. Phase II involved the assessment for dementia by neurologists on the 1521 individuals who had scored less than 24 on the 30-point MMSE-T1.Thirty-one cases of dementia were identified by the DSM-III-R criteria, including 18 cases of Alzheimer's disease, 10 cases of vascular dementia, and three cases of other dementias. The prevalence rate in individuals aged 65 and over was 2.0%. Aging and illiteracy were associated with higher rates of dementia; gender and residence location made no difference.The prevalence rate of dementia was low in this Chinese population. Consistent with common findings from other parts of the world, a high rate of dementia was associated with older age and illiteracy, and Alzheimer's disease was the most frequent cause.Incidence and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan: impact of socio-demographic factors.To determine the incidence rate (IR) and subtypes of dementia in southern Taiwan.From a cohort of 2,915 community inhabitants aged 65 years and over, 2,507 and 2,175 subjects participated in the first- and second-year follow-up surveys, respectively. A two-phase study used the Mini-Mental State Examination in phase I and the Consortium to Establish a Registry of Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) neuropsychological battery and the neurobehavioral examination in phase II. We applied International Classification of Diseases (ICD)-10NA criteria for dementia, National Institute of Neurological and Communication Disorders and Stroke-Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association (NINCDS-ADRDA) guidelines for Alzheimer's disease (AD), and National Institute of Neurological Disorders and Stroke-Association Internationale pour la Recherche et l'Enseignement en Neurosciences (NINDS-AIREN) criteria for vascular dementia (VaD).The annual IR for total dementia was 1.28%, which increased with age from 0.77% for 65- to 74-year-olds to 6.19% for persons aged 85 years or older. AD (25 cases, 41.7%, IR=0.54%) was the most common cause of dementia, followed by VaD (19 cases, 31.7%, IR=0.41%) and mixed dementia (9 cases, 15.0%). After adjusting for sex, increasing age was significantly associated with total dementia and AD (p < 0.01). Illiteracy was associated with a marginally increased risk for total dementia (aRR=1.59, p < 0.1) as was being female for AD (aRR = 1.92, p < 0.1). The 2-year mortality rate was high among the demented (48% in total dementia, 38% in AD, and 60% in VaD).The age-specific incidence of dementia in Taiwan is approaching that of developed countries and the low prevalence of dementia (especially VaD) may be mainly due to the high mortality. Age was the major risk factor for total dementia and AD. Being female was probably a risk factor for AD, as was illiteracy for total dementia.Dementia and cognitive impairment in the oldest old in the community. Prevalence and comorbidity.The study focuses on the prevalence of dementia in the oldest old.A community sample (n = 402) of the oldest old in Munich (> or = 85 years) was assessed with different methods. Four instruments and a clinical examination were used for case identification: (a) the Geriatric Mental State Interview (GMS-A); (b) the Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of Dementia (SIDAM); (c) the Global Deterioration Scale (GDS); and (d) the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE). The clinical examination was performed by the interviewing physicians, who made their diagnoses according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R.The structured interviews (GMS-A: 25.4%; SIDAM/SISCO: 28.0%; SIDAM/DSM-III-R: 27.8%; SIDAM/ICD-10: 16.1%) gave lower point prevalence rates of dementia than physicians' clinical diagnoses (43.1%). The rates were 21.2% based on the MMSE. Depressive syndromes and anxiety syndromes were the most frequent psychiatric disturbances associated with dementia in the very old.Dementia rates were high in the oldest old, showed an increase with age but no sex differences. Interview methodology has a major impact on results.Usefulness of repeated presentation of Mini-Mental State Examination as a diagnostic procedure--a population-based study.The 280 subjects who achieved 24 points or less in the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the first survey of 1449 subjects were invited for a comprehensive diagnostic examination for dementia including medical history, thorough neurological and cardiovascular examinations and detailed neuropsychological evaluation, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI)-study, cerebrospinal fluid (CSF)-analysis, electrocardiogram (ECG), chest radiograph and blood tests after the first assessment. The MMSE was presented again.Out of 240 persons, 57 subjects were diagnosed as having dementia. When the cut-off point of 24 or less in the second MMSE was used, the sensitivity of the second MMSE was 82% and the specificity was 64%. The positive predictive value of the second MMSE was 42% and negative predictive value 92%. The non-demented subjects improved their MMSE score at the second examination. In contrast, the demented subjects maintained their low MMSE score at the second examination.Primary care screen for early dementia.To determine whether the Alzheimer's Disease Screen for Primary Care (ADS-PC) is more sensitive to early dementia than the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and whether it has as high a misclassification rate in minority patients and patients with limited education.Cross-sectional validation study.Urban geriatric primary care practice.Three hundred sixteen African-American and Caucasian patients, including 55 patients with early dementia (Clinical Demential Rating of 0.5).The ADS-PC is a two-stage strategy for identifying early dementia that consists of a brief high-sensitivity dementia screen, applied to all patients aged 65 and older, and a second stage to identify memory impairment, applied to patients who fail the first stage. Differences in the sensitivities or specificities of the ADS-PC and the MMSE were evaluated using the McNemar test.Receiver operating characteristic curves were used to examine differences in the operating characteristics of the ADS-PC across a range of cutscores. When the specificities of both tests were equated (0.90), the sensitivities were significantly different (ADS-PC, 0.75; MMSE, 0.56). The MMSE failed to identify five times as many cases of dementia as the ADS-PC. When the sensitivities were equated, the specificities differed significantly (ADS-PC, 0.95; MMSE, 0.73). The MMSE misclassified five times as many noncases as the ADS-PC. This pattern of significantly higher sensitivity and specificity for the ADS-PC than for the MMSE was repeated in the results according to race and for individuals with high school or more education but not in individuals with less education.The ADS-PC outperformed the MMSE in identifying early dementia in a racially and educationally diverse primary care cohort.The validity of psychometric instruments for detection of dementia in the elderly general population.To compare the validity of different instruments for screening and diagnosis of dementia and to provide threshold scores for these purposes, ie screening focusing on a high sensitivity and diagnosis focusing on a high specificity.287 subjects from a general population sample who had completed more than one of these psychometric tests.The performances of the Structured Interview for the Diagnosis of Dementia of the Alzheimer Type, Multi-Infarct Dementia and Dementias of Other Aetiology according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R, the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Blessed Dementia Rating Scale, the Global Deterioration Scale, the Verbal Fluency Test, the Word list Learning Task, the Trail Making Test and the Labyrinth Test were compared using receiver operating characteristics analysis.The validity of composite instruments for the discrimination of dementia and cognitive health was higher than the validity of individual tests. However, some cognitive tests, ie verbal fluency and immediate recall of words, reached a high validity, making them useful and short screening instruments for dementia.There is no perfect instrument for screening and diagnosis of dementia. Different threshold scores for different purposes were provided in the present study. Recommendations for improving the validity of the Delayed Word List Learning Task for discriminating dementia and cognitive health include the expansion of list length and shortening of delay.A comparison of five clock scoring methods using ROC (receiver operating characteristic) curve analysis.To compare the accuracy of five clock scoring methods for detecting dementia in English-speaking patients.A prospective cohort study.A general geriatric outpatient clinic in southwest Sydney, Australia.A total of 127 consecutive new referrals to the clinic, of mean age 78.2 years.The clock drawing test was conducted at the beginning of each clinic appointment by a blinded observer. Each patient was then assessed by a geriatrician, who collected demographic data, administered the modified Barthel index, the geriatric depression scale, and the Folstein Mini-Mental State Examination, and categorised each patient as demented or not demented, according to DSM-4 criteria. Each clock was scored according to the methods of Mendez, Shulman, Sunderland, Watson and Wolf-Klein, and evaluated for reliability, and predictive accuracy, using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis.The area under the ROC curve was largest for the Shulman (0.79, 95% CI 0.70-0.85) and Mendez (0.78, 95% CI 0.70-0.85) methods. Both predicted dementia more accurately than the Sunderland (area = 0.71) and Watson (area = 0.65) methods (p < 0.05). The inter-rater (0.81-0.93) and intra-rater (0.87-0.96) correlation coefficients were high for all five methods.While substantial differences among the clock scoring methods were evident in our sample, the accuracy of each was modest at best. Unless further studies in relevant settings suggest otherwise, we caution on the use of clock drawing alone to screen for dementia.Psychometric analysis of the selective reminding procedure in a sample from the general elderly population.The selective reminding procedure (SRP) has been proposed for the assessment of distinct aspects of episodic memory, i.e. storage to and retrieval from short-term and long-term memory, item learning and list learning, and as dementia screening tool. In the present study SRP results were analysed in 256 probands from the general elderly population. SRP scores were highly intercorrelated, and principal component analysis yielded only one single factor. The SRP scores were moderately and not differentially correlated with immediate and delayed free recall and recognition and with verbal fluency. All SRP scores discriminated nondemented probands with episodic long-term memory impairment from those without. The MMSE performed significantly better than any SRP score in detecting dementia. The theory-based assumption that the SRP allows assessment of different, independent aspects of memory could not be validated. It is suggested that the SRP is a mixed measure of semantic memory, episodic long-term and short-term memory, and working memory, and that the different SRP scores do not allow to assess different memory functions. Thus, the SRP may neither be recommended for assessment of different subfunctions of memory nor for dementia screening.Mild dementia or cognitive impairment: the Modified Mini-Mental State examination (3MS) as a screen for dementia.To examine the Modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS) as a screen for dementia.A group of 1092 elderly Edmonton community residents completed the 3MS and the Geriatric Mental State Examination (GMS). 3MS sensitivity and specificity were determined by comparing positive 3MS screens (score < or = 77) with those classified as GMS "organic" (severity level 3, equivalent to a clinical diagnosis). In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging (CSHA), 2914 subjects received the 3MS and a clinical examination. A group described as having "cognitive impairment but no dementia (CIND)" was identified.In Edmonton, the 3MS showed 88% sensitivity, 90% specificity, 29% positive predictive value (PPV), and 99% negative predictive value (NPV). In the CSHA, 30% of subjects receiving both the 3MS and a clinical examination were classified as CIND. One-half of these were classified as having "age associated memory impairment (AAMI)" or as "unspecified."The 3MS with a cutting score of 77/78 proved a reasonable screening instrument; 1 case in 3 screening "positive" has dementia, but few (0.64%) will be missed by screening "negative." CIND, accounting for 2 out of 3 cases screened positive by the 3MS in the Edmonton study, is a substantial, heterogeneous group that is not necessarily "predementia" but that in many cases merits further investigation.Executive function impairment in community elderly subjects with questionable dementia.The neurocognitive profile of community-dwelling Chinese subjects with 'questionable' dementia was studied.One hundred and fifty-four ambulatory Chinese subjects were recruited from local social centers for the elderly. Each subject was examined using the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR), the Cantonese version of the Mini-Mental State Examination (CMMSE), the Chinese version of the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale-Cognitive Subscale (ADAS-Cog), the Category Verbal Fluency Test (CVFT), digit and visual span tests, and the Cambridge Neurological Inventory. The neurocognitive profile of nondemented subjects (CDR 0) was compared with that of subjects with 'questionable' dementia (CDR 0.5).Subjects with 'questionable' dementia were older, and had lower educational levels and global cognitive assessment scores than the controls (CMMSE and ADAS-Cog; t tests, p < 0.001). In addition, they also had significantly lower scores in delayed recall, reverse span, verbal fluency tests and worse performance in complex motor tasks related to executive function (Mann-Whitney tests, p < 0.001). Logistic regression analysis revealed that ADAS-Cog, CVFT, and reverse visual span were significant predictors for the CDR of 'questionable' dementia.Aside from memory impairment, executive function deficits were also present in subjects with 'questionable' dementia. To identify groups cognitively at risk for dementia, concomitant assessments of memory and executive function are suggested.Videoconference-based mini mental state examination: a validation study.Neuropsychological testing is a prime criterion of good practice to document cognitive deficits in a rapidly aging population. Telecommunication technologies may overcome limitations related to test administration. We compared performance of the Italian videoconference-based version of the Mini Mental State Examination (VMMSE) with performance of the standard MMSE administered face-to-face (F2F), to validate the Italian version of the 28-item VMMSE.To validate the Italian version of the VMMSE, we compared its performance with standard F2F. The sample (n=342) was administered three VMMSEs within 6 weeks after F2F testing. We identified the optimal cutoff through the receiver operating characteristic curve, as well as the VMMSE consistency through inter- and intrarater reliability (Inter/RR and Intra/RR) analysis.We found high levels of sensitivity and specificity for the optimal VMMSE cutoff identification and an accuracy of 0.96 (95% confidence interval 0.94-0.98). Intra/RR and inter/RR were highly significant.This study demonstrates that VMMSE is a valid instrument in clinical and research screening and monitoring of subjects affected by cognitive disorders. This study shows a significant correlation between videoconference assessment and the F2F one, providing an important impetus to expand studies and the knowledge about the usefulness of tele-assistance services. Our findings have important implications for both longitudinal assistance and clinical care of demented patients.Cognitive screening for dementia and mild cognitive impairment in assisted living: comparison of 3 tests.Compare diagnostic characteristics of brief cognitive screening tests in residential care/assisted living (RC/AL) residents.Cross-sectional study involving a comprehensive clinical examination to ascertain a consensus diagnosis of probable dementia, no significant cognitive impairment, or mild cognitive impairment (MCI), including both amnestic and non-amnestic subtypes.Fourteen RC/AL facilities in North Carolina.Participants were 146 RC/AL residents, aged 65 years or older, who did not have diagnosed cognitive impairment.Diagnostic characteristics of the Mini-Cog, the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE), and a new 50-point test based on expanding selected MMSE items (MMX).Overall, 55/146 (38%) participants were diagnosed with probable dementia, and 76 (52%) met criteria for MCI (most non-amnestic). Both the Mini-Cog and the MMSE showed high sensitivity and negative predictive value for dementia, but had relatively low sensitivity and negative predictive value for MCI. The Mini-Cog had low specificity and was less accurate as a dementia screen than either the MMSE or MMX. Reliability and validity data for the MMX were satisfactory, and it performed better as a screening test for MCI than either the MMSE or Mini-Cog.Although the MMSE and Mini-Cog are both sensitive to dementia, modest specificity and positive predictive value may limit their utility as screening tools. Preliminary MMX data suggest it improves screening for MCI compared to the Mini-Cog or MMSE, while providing a similar level of screening for dementia. Further work is needed to identify suitable instruments for cognitive screening across the range of MCI and dementia.The Clock Drawing Test: utility for dementia detection in multiethnic elders.Disproportionate increases in dementia morbidity in ethnic minorities challenge established screening methodologies because of language and culture barriers, varying access to health services, and a relative paucity of cross-cultural data validating their use. Simple screening techniques adapted to a range of health and social service settings would accelerate dementia detection and social and health services planning for demented minority elders.The effectiveness of the Clock Drawing Test (CDT) for dementia detection was compared with that of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI) in community-dwelling elders of diverse linguistic, ethnic, and educational backgrounds. Subjects (N = 295) were tested at home in their native languages (English, n = 141; another language, n = 154). An informant-based clinical dementia history and functional severity index derived from the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) protocols were used to classify subjects as probably demented (n = 170), and probably not demented (n = 125).All tests were significantly affected by education (p < .001) but not by primary language (p > .05). Sensitivities and specificities for probable dementia were 82% and 92%, respectively, for the CDT; 92% and 92% for the MMSE; and 93% and 97% for the CASI for subjects completing each test. However, in poorly educated non-English speakers, the CDT detected demented subjects with higher sensitivity than the two longer instruments (sensitivity and specificity 85% and 94% for the CDT, 46% and 100% for the MMSE, and 75% and 95% for the CASI). Moreover less information was lost due to noncompletion of the CDT than the MMSE or CASI (severe dementia or refusal: CDT 8%, MMSE 12%, and CASI 16%).Overall, the CDT may be as effective as the MMSE or CASI as a first-level dementia screen for clinical use in multiethnic, multilingual samples of older adults. Its brevity (1-5 minutes), minimal language requirements, high acceptability, and lack of dependence on specialized testing materials are well adapted for screening of non-English-speaking elderly persons in settings where bilingual interpreters are not readily available and screening time is at a premium.Limitations of the Mini-Mental State Examination in diagnosing dementia in general practice.The aim of the study was to investigate the value of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) for use by general practitioners (GPs) in a group of elderly patients in whom the GPs are considering a dementia diagnosis. The study population consisted of 533 elderly patients (aged 65 and older) judged by 36 GPs as suffering from 'minimal to severe' dementia. Cross-sectional data were used to determine the criterion validity of separate items, a set of items and the total MMSE. The GMS/AGECAT diagnosis was used as an external criterion. MMSE items were analysed and two items testing general knowledge were added. The most effective set of items was determined using a stepwise logistic regression analysis. Adjusted for age, sex and education, the differentiating ability of the set of items was compared to that of the total MMSE score. The total MMSE score was divided into three categories (cutoffs 21/22 and 26/27) and into two categories (cutoff 23/24). In total, 114 patients (21%) were diagnosed as having an 'organic syndrome' by the GMS/AGECAT. The differentiating ability of separate items was poor. The following combination of items had the best predictive ability: items concerning the date, the day of the week, the patient's address and the current prime minister. This set of items was just as adequate in differentiating dementia from non-dementia as the total MMSE score (sensitivity 64.9% and 64.8% respectively, specificity 96.4% and 93.3%). The value of the MMSE in diagnosing dementia in general practice is limited. The score on cognitive test items can be one aspect of the individual's overall clinical picture, on which the diagnosis should be based.The prevalence of dementia in older people in an urban population of Korea: the Seoul study.To estimate prevalence of dementia and its subtypes in older people in Seoul, a metropolitan area of Korea, and compare these findings with estimates reported for other populations.The study employed a two-stage design for case identification. Initially, the Mini-Mental State Examination in the Korean version (MMSE-KC) of the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease (CERAD) assessment packet was administered to all participants. Two hundred seventeen persons sampled from three levels of performance on MMSE-KC underwent the second-stage clinical evaluation based on the Korean Version of the CERAD assessment packet.The study was conducted in an urban community setting.Six hundred forty-three persons aged 65 and over participated in the study.Dementia was defined using the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition diagnostic features of dementia.Dementia prevalence ranged from 2.6% in persons aged 65 to 69 to 32.6% in persons aged 85 and older. Age-standardized prevalence was 8.2% for dementia, 5.4% for Alzheimer's disease, and 2.0% for vascular dementia. The prevalence estimates, which excluded very mild cases (clinical dementia rating index 0.5), were approximately 5.3% for dementia and 4.3% for Alzheimer's disease.The prevalence of dementia in older people in Seoul appears to be somewhat lower than in rural areas of Korea. Considering the difficulties involved in establishing a diagnostic threshold for dementia, actual differences in dementia prevalence between Asian populations are probably minimal.Identification of factorial structure of MMSE based on elderly cognitive destiny: the Italian Longitudinal Study on Aging.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is one of the most commonly used instruments in the evaluation of global cognitive status, but only few studies have investigated the relationship among its components in terms of factorial structure. We have considered data from the Italian Longitudinal Study on Aging (ILSA), carried out in Italy in 1992 on a sample of 5,632 subjects aged 65-84 years, and followed up in 1996. The aim of our study was to investigate static factorial structure in three groups of elderly (subjects with a diagnosis of dementia at baseline; subjects free of dementia at baseline, but incident cases at follow-up; subjects who never developed dementia during the 4-year follow-up). Considering our results, we could hypothesize that MMSE static structure reflects the cognitive profile of elderly, and is thus influenced by subjects' potential to develop dementia.The mini-cog: a cognitive 'vital signs' measure for dementia screening in multi-lingual elderly.The Mini-Cog, a composite of three-item recall and clock drawing, was developed as a brief test for discriminating demented from non-demented persons in a community sample of culturally, linguistically, and educationally heterogeneous older adults.All 129 who met criteria for probable dementia based on informant interviews and 120 with no history of cognitive decline were included; 124 were non-English speakers.Sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic value of the Mini-Cog were compared with those of the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) and Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI).The Mini-Cog had the highest sensitivity (99%) and correctly classified the greatest percentage (96%) of subjects. Moreover, its diagnostic value was not influenced by education or language, while that of the CASI was adversely influenced by low education, and both education and language compromised the diagnostic value of the MMSE. Administration time for the Mini-Cog was 3 minutes vs 7 minutes for the MMSE.The Mini-Cog required minimal language interpretation and training to administer, and no test forms of scoring modifications were needed to compensate for the extensive linguistic and educational heterogeneity of the sample. Validation in clinical and population-based samples is warranted, as its brevity and ease of administration suggest that the Mini-Cog might be readily incorporated into general practice and senior care settings as a routine 'cognitive vital signs' measure.Validity of the Mini-Mental State examination as a screening instrument for cognitive impairment and dementia in French elderly community residents.A survey was made of 2,792 subjects aged 65 and older living in the community of Gironde (South-Western France). The predictive value of the Mini-Mental state examination (MMS) as a screening instrument for the detection of cognitive impairment was tested against DSM-III criteria for dementing syndromes. Of the 2,792 subjects who consented to participate in the study, 101 met the DSM-III criteria for dementia, giving a 3.62% prevalence rate. With an MMS threshold of 24, the sensitivity was 100%, the specificity was 78%, and the positive predictive value was equal to 15%. Using the same MMS threshold, 572 subjects (85%) were false-positive for the diagnosis of dementia. A multiple logistic regression analysis revealed that age, sex, depressive symptomatology and educational level were independently correlated with false-positive cases of the MMS. Several issues are raised for using the MMS as the only screening instrument for cognitive impairment in elderly community residents.Factors associated with inconsistent diagnosis of dementia between physicians and neuropsychologists.To explore reasons for discrepancy in the diagnosis of cognitive impairment between physicians and neuropsychologists.Retrospective analysis of national survey data.Canadian Study of Health and Aging Phase 1, a national survey of community-dwelling and institutionalized older Canadians.1879 subjects who completed all components of a clinical examination.Data available to both disciplines (demographic data, functional status, Modified Mini-Mental State (3MS), schedule H of the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination (CAMDEX)), results of the physician's history and physical examination, and results of a psychometric test battery. Subjects were classified as No Cognitive Impairment, Cognitive Impairment Not Dementia (CIND), and Dementia, the latter according to the criteria of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual, 3rd Ed., Revised. Preliminary diagnoses by physicians and neuropsychologists were compared.In univariate modeling, higher education increased consistency. Lower scores on the 3MS, depression reported in the CAMDEX, focal neurological signs, and all neuropsychological variables decreased agreement. In multivariate modeling, higher education and identification of long-term memory impairment by the neuropsychologist increased agreement; lower scores on the 3MS, depression reported on the CAMDEX, and identification of short-term memory impairment or constructional impairment led to disagreement. When the category of CIND was removed, kappa for agreement increased from 0.51 to 0.92.Physicians and neuropsychologists have different, complementary approaches to the diagnosis of dementia, and a consensus approach should be used. The category of CIND requires elucidation. Identification of dementia in subjects with depression or low education is difficult, and new strategies are required.[Mini mental state examination and the diagnosis of dementia in Brazil].The diagnosis of dementia is based on the presence of memory deficits and decline of other cognitive functions. Many scales have been designed to aid the clinician in the assessment of at risk subjects, such as the elderly. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is the most widely used of such scales, although its use as an aid to the diagnosis of dementia has not as yet been studied in a Brazilian sample of patients. The current study was designed with 2 main aims: (1) to determine the best cut-off point of the MMSE for the diagnosis of dementia in a sample of elderly subjects assessed in a mental health outpatient unit and; (2) evaluate the impact of age and schooling on MMSE scores. Two hundred and eleven subjects aged 60 or over assessed at the Mental Health Outpatient Unit for the elderly at "Santa Casa de São Paulo" between February 1997 and February 1998 were included in the study. They were assessed with the SRQ-20, MMSE, and a clinical interview for the diagnosis of dementia according to the ICD-10. Seventy patients received the diagnosis of dementia. The MMSE cut-off point of 23/24 (cases/non-cases) was associated with a sensitivity of 84.3% and specificity of 60.3%. MMSE scores were associated with age (r = -0.41, p < 0.001) and schooling (F = 12.69, p < 0.001). Analysis of covariance taking age into account showed that MMSE scores were significantly lower among those with no formal education (F = 10.51, p < 0.001). A cut-off point of 19/20 on the MMSE was associated with sensitivity of 80.0% and specificity of 70.9% for the diagnosis of dementia in this particular group. Subjects with previous school history were better classified to the diagnosis of dementia with the cut-off point of 23/24: sensitivity of 77.8% and specificity of 75.4%. The evaluation of elderly subjects with the MMSE should take education into account, and different cut-off points should be used accordingly as a guideline to the diagnosis of dementia.Incidence of mild cognitive impairment and Alzheimer disease in Southern Brazil.The objective of the study was to evaluate incident cases of Alzheimer disease (AD) and mild cognitive impairment (MCI) in an elderly community cohort in a major city of southern Brazil and to determine the variables associated with the development of cognitive dysfunction. Data were drawn from a cohort to investigate healthy aging among community elderly (N = 345) and were derived from the follow-up for a maximum of 8 years. Sociodemographic, psychiatric and medical information, the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), and the Clinical Dementia Rating scale were obtained in each assessment. The Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (Fourth Edition; DSM-IV), NINCDS-ADRDA (National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and the Alzheimer's Disease and related Disorders Association), and the Mayo Clinic criteria were applied to ascertain diagnoses of AD and MCI. The incidence rate per 1000 persons-year for MCI was 13.2 (95% confidence interval [CI] 7.79-20.91) and for AD was 14.8 (95% CI 9.04-22.94). Cognitive dysfunction was associated with education (odds ratio [OR] = 0.86; confidence limit [CL] 0.76-0.97 95%) and baseline MMSE (OR = 0.81; CL 0.70-0.94 95%). The AD incidence in this sample was higher than those reported in a previous Brazilian study. The study filled the epidemiological gap in the evaluation of MCI in Brazil.[Mini-Cog: a simple method for very brief screening of mental decline].Physicians do not detect majority of the demented people, and many patients appear only in an advanced stage of their mental decline at the first medical visit. Role of general practitioner is crucial; a brief and effective screening method can basically change the present situation. Borson et al (2000) has investigated a new, very brief method named Mini-Cog that consists of the combination of the 3-word recall and the clock-drawing test.of the present study was to evaluate this method in Hungarian patient population.Authors have analysed the charts of patients examined by the first author in the outpatient part of the Memory clinic of the National Institute of Psychiatry and Neurology in a 2-year interval (between 11.01. 1999 and 31.10.2001). Data of 186 patients were analysed. From the Mini-Mental State the total score, score of three-word recall (possible scores between 0-3), serial counting backward with 7 from 100 were taken into consideration; the clock-drawing test was analysed quantitatively (1 = failure, 2 = borderland, 3 = acceptable solution).The algorithm which considers the patient demented if she or he does not remember of any word, or remembers only of 1-2 and the clock-drawing is pathologic, has a high sensitivity (100%) and specificity (80.9%) in cases using the < or = 24 Mini-Mental State value, while the sensitivity and specificity is 98.8% and 88.0% respectively if drawing the limit at < or = 26 points. Combination of the two tests (word-recall, clock drawing) gives a better value than either of them alone. Based on their experiences they propose to apply in a short test the serial backwards with seven from 100 too, while patients with very high Mini-Mental State scores (29-30) not infrequently can not perfectly solve this subtest (7/11 = 64 p.c.).In agreement with the Hungarian Protocol for diagnosing and treating dementias (1999) authors stress the importance of the consultation with a specialist (neurologist or psychiatrist) in cases of suspected dementia to reveal the underlying disease.Validation of a 6 item cognitive impairment test with a view to primary care usage.To validate the 6 Item Cognitive Impairment Test (6CIT) against the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE) with a view to usage as a screening tool.Three groups with varying levels of dementia were tested using the MMSE, 6CIT and Global Deterioration Scale (GDS).Testing was carried out within Wiltshire, both in the community and outpatients.Patients were selected from a hospital database of dementia patients and were stratified into two groups according to GDS; a control group was also tested.Two hundred and eighty-seven patients were tested: 135 controls (GDS 1-2), 70 with mild dementia (GDS 3-5) and 82 with more severe dementia (GDS 6-7). The 6CIT and MMSE were found to correlate well, r(2)=-0.911 (p<0.01), when all groups were analysed. Correlation falls to r(2)=-0.754 (p<0.01) in the mild dementia group. In the GDS 3-5 group, the MMSE has a sensitivity and specificity of 51.43% and 100% respectively (cutoff 23/24). The 6CIT gives a sensitivity and specificity of 78.57% and 100% (cutoff 7/8).The 6CIT is a brief and simple test of cognition, which correlates well with the MMSE but outperforms it in milder dementia. The MMSE is of little value as a screening test for dementia.The cognitive assessment screening test (CAST) for dementia.The purpose of this study was to assess the usefulness, the sensitivity, and the specificity of the Cognitive Assessment. Screening Test (CAST), a paper-and-pencil self-administered cognitive test designed to screen elderly people for possible dementia, for use in general physicians' offices, requiring little expertise or staff time. CAST consists of three parts: part A (relatively easy), part B (more demanding), and part C (self-report of concerns). CAST was administered in two studies to: (1) 19 patients known to be mildly to moderately demented versus 24 age-matched normal controls (to establish cutoff standards); and (2) a "real world" sample of 26 elderly patients not known to be demented, attending a general medicine clinic. The sensitivity and specificity of CAST were compared with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Blessed Dementia Scale cognitive portion (BDS-cog). In study 1, controls were given a detailed neuropsychological battery; in study 2, all patients were given the neuropsychological battery, which served as the "gold standard" to identify individuals with cognitive impairment. In study 1, the cutoff scores for dementia using CAST (Parts A and B) were established. CAST discriminated demented patients from controls with a sensitivity of 95% and a specificity of 88%; the MMSE had a sensitivity of 74% and a specificity of 100%; and the BDS-cog had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 96%. In study 2, CAST discriminated cognitive impairment with a sensitivity of 88% and a specificity of 100%, the MMSE had a sensitivity of 38% and a specificity of 100%; and the BDS-cog had a sensitivity of 50% and a specificity of 94%. Part C was not used to discriminate demented from normal elderly individuals, but to screen for those concerned about their cognitive functioning. CAST is highly useful as a dementia screening test, with sensitivity and specificity equal to or better than the MMSE and BDS-cog, yet requiring minimal examiner time and little training or experience to administer.Predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients using longitudinal and multimodal biomarkers.Accurate prediction of clinical changes of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) patients, including both qualitative change (i.e., conversion to Alzheimer's disease (AD)) and quantitative change (i.e., cognitive scores) at future time points, is important for early diagnosis of AD and for monitoring the disease progression. In this paper, we propose to predict future clinical changes of MCI patients by using both baseline and longitudinal multimodality data. To do this, we first develop a longitudinal feature selection method to jointly select brain regions across multiple time points for each modality. Specifically, for each time point, we train a sparse linear regression model by using the imaging data and the corresponding clinical scores, with an extra 'group regularization' to group the weights corresponding to the same brain region across multiple time points together and to allow for selection of brain regions based on the strength of multiple time points jointly. Then, to further reflect the longitudinal changes on the selected brain regions, we extract a set of longitudinal features from the original baseline and longitudinal data. Finally, we combine all features on the selected brain regions, from different modalities, for prediction by using our previously proposed multi-kernel SVM. We validate our method on 88 ADNI MCI subjects, with both MRI and FDG-PET data and the corresponding clinical scores (i.e., MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 5 different time points. We first predict the clinical scores (MMSE and ADAS-Cog) at 24-month by using the multimodality data at previous time points, and then predict the conversion of MCI to AD by using the multimodality data at time points which are at least 6-month ahead of the conversion. The results on both sets of experiments show that our proposed method can achieve better performance in predicting future clinical changes of MCI patients than the conventional methods.[The Mini Mental Status test inadequate as screening test for cognitive deterioration in a neurological department].To study the validity of the Mini-mental state (MMS) in a neurological population.Comparing the results of a neuropsychological examination and the MMS score.Departments of Neurology/Neuropsychology of the University Hospital Leiden.One hundred and forty-seven patients participated in the study. One hundred and eight patients were classified into two diagnostic groups according to the deterioration index (obtained from test results of the neuropsychological examination) and DSM-III-R criteria: 63 patients had dementia, 45 did not; the other 39 patients were found to have specific cognitive impairments and were excluded from the group comparisons. The discriminative powers of the deterioration index and the MMS were compared; sensitivity and specificity were determined with several cut-off scores of the MMS.The MMS had limited power to discriminate between demented and non-demented patients. The MMS score was strongly related to premorbid intelligence, occupational level and age. Increasing the original cut-off score to 25 points improved sensitivity and specificity to 79% and 84% respectively (with the original cut-off level these were 68% and 93%).The diagnostic value of the MMS is limited, especially in patients for whom a correct diagnosis is most relevant.Correcting the 3MS for bias does not improve accuracy when screening for cognitive impairment or dementia.We investigated the effects of correcting for demographic biases on the sensitivity and specificity of the Modified Mini Mental Status Exam (3MS) using a sample of English-speaking older adults (N=8901) from the Canadian Studies of Health and Aging. The sensitivity and specificity of the original 3MS were compared to the 3MS regression-adjusted for the influence of demographic variables and then to 3MS percentiles based on published normative data with age and education corrected cutoff scores. According to receiver operating characteristic curve analyses, the regression-adjusted 3MS was no more accurate than the original 3MS when screening for dementia, and it was less accurate when screening for cognitive impairment. The use of 3MS percentiles based on normative data with age and education corrected cut-off points were less accurate than the original 3MS when screening for both cognitive impairment and when screening for dementia.The prevalence of dementia in Belgium: a population-based door-to-door survey in a rural community.The project Epidemiology Research on Dementia in Antwerp (ERDA) estimated the prevalence of dementia in a random, population-based sample, stratified for age and sex. The sample of 1,736 elderly was screened at home with the Mini-Mental State Examination. All elderly under the cutoff of 23-24/30 got a diagnostic examination with the Cambridge Mental Disorders of the Elderly Examination and the DSM-IIIR criteria. The prevalence of dementia in the population above 65 years was estimated at 9%. The following age-specific prevalences of dementia (included mild dementia) were found in the age-groups 65-69, 70-74, 75-79, 80-84, 85+: 0.6, 5.1, 7.6, 16.2 and 33.6%. The prevalence of at least moderate dementia was 0.3, 3.9, 4.0, 11.2 and 25.0%, respectively. The prevalence of dementia, vascular dementia and dementia of the Alzheimer type was markedly higher in women than in men.Which two questions of Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) should we start from?The MMSE is a simple and commonly used instrument to evaluate cognitive impairment. With the aim of enabling the examiner to skip a large portion of the MMSE when screening subjects with lower possibility of cognitive impairment, we examined the internal distribution of the MMSE scores among 792 older adults visiting a teaching hospital, a long-term care hospital, nursing homes, and a geriatric clinic. The correlation coefficients between the summed scores of any two items of MMSE and the total score were compared. A receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was drawn to show the sensitivity and the specificity of predicting cognitive impairment, which was defined by the total MMSE score being less than 24. The mean MMSE score was 20.5 +/- 6.9 (+/-S.D.). A good predictor for cognitive impairment was the summed scores of the time orientation and serial sevens with a sensitivity of 98.2% and a specificity of 69.2% if cut-off was set at 7/7+. This finding appears to help streamline the screening process for cognitive impairment in general elderly population.[Mini-Mental State Examination: psychometric characteristics in elderly outpatients].To assess the psychometric characteristics of the Mini-Mental State Examination in elderly outpatients who seek primary health care.A total of 303 subjects (>65 years) underwent comprehensive geriatric assessment with functional tools, including Mini-Mental State Examination. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and ROC curve were calculated.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and area under ROC curve were 80.8%, 65.3%, 44.7%, 90.7% and 0.807 respectively (cutoff point =23/24). The best cutoff point for illiterate was 18/19 (sensitivity =73.5%; specificity =73.9%); and for literate was 24/25 (sensitivity =75%; specificity =69.7%).While screening elderly outpatients for dementia, schooling must be considered in the choice of the best cutoff point in the Mini-Mental State Examination.Sensitivity and specificity for dementia of population-based criteria for cognitive impairment: the MoVIES project.Few norms exist for the elderly on the cognitive tests commonly used to screen for dementia; conventional cutpoints used in clinical settings may be of limited value in population screening. A particular problem is posed by elderly populations with low educational levels, as performance on most cognitive tests is affected by education. Thus, a healthy but poorly educated population may obtain test scores in the range considered impaired in the clinical setting.A random sample of 1,367 subjects aged 65+ years was screened for dementia in a rural community in Southwestern Pennsylvania. Two sets of cognitive measures were used: a global cognitive scale (the MMSE) and a brief battery of tests tapping a variety of cognitive domains. Rather than using a priori cutoff scores, we examined the specificity and sensitivity for dementia of two operationally defined levels of cognitive impairment, at the 5th and 10th percentiles of the study sample on each set of measures.Results suggest that the screening of multiple cognitive domains at the 10th percentile had significantly greater sensitivity but not lower specificity for definite dementia than did the use of the single global scale.Our data support the use of population-based cutpoints over standard cutoff scores, in that the global scale at the conventional cutoff was less sensitive than the battery at the same percentile, and because adequate norms do not exist for tests such as those in the battery.The psychogeriatric assessment scales (PAS): further data on psychometric properties and validity from a longitudinal study of the elderly.The PAS is a standardized interview which assesses the changes seen in dementia and depression using a set of scales. There are three scales derived from an interview with the subject (cognitive impairment, depression, stroke) and three from an interview with an informant (cognitive decline, behaviour change, stroke). The aim was to provide data on the psychometric properties and validity of the PAS. The scales were originally developed using data from the first wave of a longitudinal study of the elderly. Reported here are further data on the PAS from the second wave of the same study, carried out 3 1/2 years later. The setting was a community survey carried out in the Australian city of Canberra. Seven hundred and nine elderly persons, with a mean age of 80 years, and 641 informants participated. Besides the PAS, participants were administered several other scales: the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly, the National Adult Reading Test and the Goldberg anxiety and depression scales. Diagnoses of dementia and depression were made with the Canberra Interview for the Elderly, from which the PAS is derived. Confirmatory factor analysis replicated the five-factor model which underpins the PAS. The PAS was found to correlate with the other scales having similar content and showed correspondence with diagnoses of dementia and depression derived from the Canberra Interview for the Elderly. Longitudinal data supported the validity of the cognitive decline scale as a measure of change. Overall, the results support the original psychometric and validity research on the PAS.Detecting dementia with the mini-mental state examination in highly educated individuals.To evaluate the utility of Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) scores in detecting cognitive dysfunction in a sample of highly educated individuals.Archival data were reviewed on 4248 participants enrolled in the Mayo Clinic Alzheimer Disease Research Center and Alzheimer Disease Patient Registry.A total of 1141 primarily white (93%) individuals with 16 or more years of self-reported education were identified. These included 307 (164 men and 143 women) patients with dementia (any type), 176 (106 men and 70 women) patients with mild cognitive impairment, and 658 (242 men and 416 women) control participants without dementia.Mayo Clinic Alzheimer Disease Research Center and Alzheimer Disease Patient Registry cohort.Diagnostic accuracy estimates (sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive power) of MMSE cut scores in detecting cognitive dysfunction.In this sample of highly educated, largely white older adults, the standard MMSE cut score of 24 (23 or below) yielded a sensitivity of 0.66, a specificity of 0.99, and an overall correct classification rate of 89% in detecting dementia. A cut score of up to 27 (26 or below) resulted in an optimal balance of sensitivity and specificity (0.89 and 0.91, respectively) with an overall correct classification rate of 90%. In a cognitively impaired group (dementia and mild cognitive impairment), a cut score of 27 (sensitivity, 0.69; specificity, 0.91) or 28 (sensitivity and specificity, 0.78) might be more appropriate.Older patients with a college education who present with complaints of cognitive decline (reported by themselves or others) and score less than 27 on the MMSE are at a greater risk of being diagnosed with dementia and should be referred for a comprehensive dementia evaluation, including formal neuropsychological testing.Relation between education and dementia: the role of test bias revisited.Several authors have suggested that dementia screening tests may be biased against low levels of education, whereas others find that a low level of education is a genuine risk factor for dementia. The present paper attempts to reconcile these conflicting views by examining item bias and test bias indices of the mini mental state examination (MMSE). Psychometric calculations and receiver operating characteristics (ROC) analyses of sensitivity and specificity as performed by earlier studies were replicated and extended from the database of the Amsterdam Study of the Elderly. This is a population survey on cognitive decline and dementia (age range 65-84). Subjects with a low level of education (primary school) were compared with better educated subjects (at least some secondary education). Cases were matched by age and sex. The results indicate that the MMSE is not educationally biased as far as item characteristics, reliability, and construct validity are concerned. Yet its predictive validity as a screening test for dementia is educationally biased. This bias will effectively be eliminated with a two point higher cut off score for the subjects whose education extends beyond primary school. Even after such score correction, a low level of education probably remains a genuine risk factor for dementia.Effects of sequential neuropsychological testing of an elderly community-based sample.The magnitude and importance of changes in scores of neuropsychological tests on retest in the elderly, especially over long time periods, is not well established. Three neuropsychological tests and one mental status test were initially administered to screen for potential dementia and were readministered to 380 of the surviving individuals 2.4 years later who either failed the screening examination or were an age matched control. Of the 380 women and men aged 65 and older, 56 were diagnosed as having Alzheimer disease (AD), 82 as at risk for developing AD, and 242 as having normal cognition. The present report focuses on changes in test scores between the two visits. In the normal and at risk groups, significant improvements were seen on retest of the Visual Reproduction Test (VRT), the Trails B test, and the Mini-Mental Status examination; verbal fluency decreased, and savings score of the VRT showed small variations. On most tests, scores of the AD group decreased. Practice effects, biases, and other variables may have played a role in the improvements seen in those labeled normal and at risk. If these results are confirmed, savings score of the VRT (which remained stable over time in normals and individuals at risk and decreased in patients with dementia) and verbal fluency (which decreased in all groups) may be better measures of true cognitive performance than the other tests that we evaluated.The validity of informant report for grading the severity of Alzheimer's dementia.The validity of informant-based techniques has been established for the detection of dementia cases by non-pathological individuals, but is still controversial for the assessment of the severity of dementia. This study aimed at ascertaining whether informant-based evaluation (the so-called informant report) of the cognitive and behavioral impairment of a patient is valid for grading the severity of dementia, and consistent with objective assessment of the patient's cognitive and behavioral functioning. We enrolled 96 community-dwelling outpatients and 56 controls assessed at the Geriatric Evaluation Unit of the University of Modena, Italy. All patients scored lower than 27 on the MMSE, and met DSM-IV inclusion criteria for Alzheimer's dementia. Patients and controls were administered the CAMDEX interview, containing a section which collects participant (patient or control) and informant evaluations on dementia-related cognitive and behavioral deficits. The informant report resulted effective at MANOVA for grading the severity of dementia in 4 of its 5 measures (namely, memory, everyday activities, general mental functioning and depressed mood), and was correlated with the scores of several scales of the CAMDEX cognitive section (i.e., CAMCOG). Instead, the participant's (patient or control) report showed a lower capacity for grading dementia, and was poorly correlated with the psychometric outcomes of cognitive functioning. On the whole, the results corroborated the validity of the informant report in the diagnostic work-up for grading dementia, given its sensitivity to the severity of dementia, and its consistency with cognitive psychometric outcomes.Comparison of the Saint Louis University Mental Status Examination, the Mini-Mental State Examination, and the Montreal Cognitive Assessment in detection of cognitive impairment in Chinese elderly from the geriatric department.The Saint Louis University Mental Status (SLUMS) examination is a popular screening scale for cognitive impairment in North America but has not been studied in Chinese populations. The aim of this study is to compare consistency of the SLUMS with the Chinese version of Mini-Mental Status Examination (CMMSE) and the Beijing version of Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA-B) in Chinese elderly.Two hundred seventy-eight Chinese elderly with chronic diseases and geriatric syndromes from the geriatrics department were screened for cognitive impairment, including dementia and mild cognitive impairment, using SLUMS, CMMSE, and MoCA-B. The modified education level cutoff in the diagnostic criteria of SLUMS (mSLUMS) was explored. Scores of the scales and classifications for cognitive status by them were compared using Spearman and κ statistics, respectively.Spearman correlation coefficient between scores of the scales were 0.747 (SLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .001), 0.839 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .001), and 0.773 (CMMSE vs MoCA-B, P < .001). For detection of dementia, κ values were 0.462 (SLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .000) and 0.484 (mSLUMS vs CMMSE, P < .000). For mild cognitive impairment, κ values were 0.123 (SLUMS vs CMMSE plus MoCA-B in parallel, P = .089) and 0.148 (mSLUMS vs CMMSE plus MoCA-B in parallel, P = .031). For all cognitive impairment, κ values were 0.562 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .000) and 0.650 (SLUMS vs MoCA-B, P < .000).Findings from our study indicate that the scores of SLUMS are fairly consistent with MoCA-B and CMMSE in Chinese elderly. Discrepancies of classifications for cognitive status by SLUMS and the other 2 scales implies that further work is needed to explore optimal cutoffs of SLUMS for screening mild cognitive impairment and dementia in elderly Chinese.A longitudinal population study of the mini-mental state examination in the very old: relation to dementia and education.We examined the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in relation to the prevalence and incidence of dementia in a representative population sample (n = 494), followed from age 85 to 88. The study included a neuropsychiatric examination (including the MMSE) and a key informant interview conducted by a psychiatrist. Dementia was defined according to the DSM-III-R. Among non-demented 85-year-olds, 75% of those who scored below the cut-off score of 23/24 and 37% of those scoring 24-25 became demented during the follow-up. Non-demented 85-year-olds who did not develop dementia during the following 3 years had a mean decline in MMSE score of 0.6 per year, while those who became demented decreased by 2.3 points per year. A decrease of 4 or more points during the 3 years had a sensitivity of 83% and a specificity of 80% for a diagnosis of dementia. High and low MMSE score at base-line was related to a smaller decrease in MMSE score between age 85 and 88. Higher education was related to higher scores on MMSE at age 85 and to a smaller decline in scores between age 85 and 88. Change in MMSE score in non-demented individuals is small especially among individuals with high education. Non-demented individuals scoring below 26 should receive close attention, as a high proportion are at risk of developing dementia.The Montreal Cognitive Assessment and the mini-mental state examination as screening instruments for cognitive impairment: item analyses and threshold scores.To perform an item analysis of the Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) versus the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) in the prediction of cognitive impairment, and to examine the characteristics of different MoCA threshold scores.135 subjects enrolled in a longitudinal clinicopathologic study were administered the MoCA by a single physician and the MMSE by a trained research assistant. Subjects were classified as cognitively impaired or cognitively normal based on independent neuropsychological testing.89 subjects were found to be cognitively normal, and 46 cognitively impaired (20 with dementia, 26 with mild cognitive impairment). The MoCA was superior in both sensitivity and specificity to the MMSE, although not all MoCA tasks were of equal predictive value. A MoCA threshold score of 26 had a sensitivity of 98% and a specificity of 52% in this population. In a population with a 20% prevalence of cognitive impairment, a threshold of 24 was optimal (negative predictive value 96%, positive predictive value 47%).This analysis suggests the potential for creating an abbreviated MoCA. For screening in primary care, the MoCA threshold of 26 appears optimal. For testing in a memory disorders clinic, a lower threshold has better predictive value.Reliability and validity of revised Turkish version of Mini Mental State Examination (rMMSE-T) in community-dwelling educated and uneducated elderly.To evaluate the reliability and validity of the revised Turkish version of Mini Mental State Examination (rMMSE-T) in educated and uneducated community-dwelling elderly, to re-organize the present Turkish version of MMSE and to determine cut-off point of the revised test.This cross-sectional and analytical study involved totally 490 elderly subjects selected by cluster sampling method. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, kappa analysis and Cronbach's alpha coefficients were used for statistical analysis.Areas under ROC curve in educated and uneducated elderly were found as 0.953 and 0.907. Cut-off point of 22/23 of rMMSE-T in educated elderly had the highest sensitivity (90.9), specificity (97.0) and positive likelihood ratio (30.3), whereas cut-off point of 18/19 of the test in uneducated elderly had the highest sensitivity (82.7), specificity (92.3) and positive likelihood ratio (10.7). The Cronbach's alpha values of the rMMSE-T for educated and uneducated elderly were higher than 0.7 (sign of good internal consistency of the test). A significant correlations between intrarater and interrater test-retest in educated elderly subjects were observed (0.966 (p = 0.000); 0.855 (p = 0.000), respectively), and also in uneducated elderly (0.988 (p = 0.000); 0.934 (p = 0.000), respectively). Kappa value of the test in educated and uneducated elderly showed a perfect agreement interraters (1.000) and a substantial agreement in intraraters (1.000, 0.784; 0.826, 0.656, respectively).rMMSE-T had a high reliability and validity. It will be more appropriate to use the revised test and the new cut-off point for the diagnosis and screening of dementia among community-dwelling Turkish elderly population.Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination: agreement in a cross-sectional study with an elderly sample.We aimed to compare the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) with the Mini-Cog, measuring agreement in participants' classification, using a general population sample.Cross-sectional evaluation of 609 community dwellers aged ≥60 years was performed by trained interviewers. Cohen's kappa and 95% confidence intervals (CI) were calculated to assess overall agreement, and Cronbach alphas computed to assess reliability. Two-parameter Item Response Theory models (difficulty and discrimination parameters) were used to assess discrimination.Considering MMSE cut-point for scores <24, 3.1% of the participants would be 'cognitive impaired' and 6.2% considering cut-point scores <25. Following Mini-Cog's cut-point score <3, 11.3% would be impaired. For MMSE cut-point <24 and Mini-Cog <3, we observed a Cohen's kappa of 0.116 (95% CI: -0.073 to 0.305), and of 0.258 (95% CI: 0.101-0.415) for cut-point <25. The highest kappa was obtained for cut-point <26 on the MMSE and Mini-Cog <3 (kappa = 0.413). MMSE Cronbach alpha was 0.6108 and Mini-Cog's alpha was 0.2776. Co-calibration according to inherent ability is graphically presented.Agreement between scales seems fragile in our sample. The discriminative and reliability analysis suggests a better performance for subsets of the MMSE compared with the Mini-Cog. Usefulness of calibrated scores is discussed.The validity of the MMSE and SMQ as screening tests for dementia in the elderly general population-- a study of one rural community in Japan.To compare the validity of the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Short-Memory Questionnaire (SMQ) as screening tests to detect dementia in the elderly general population.Six hundred and sixty-two subjects and their informants from the elderly general population sample who had completed these tests.One rural community survey in Japan.We used receiver-operating characteristic analysis to compare the performance of the MMSE and the SMQ with the clinical diagnosis of dementia according to DSM-III-R.The areas under the receiver-operating characteristic curve of the MMSE and the SMQ were 0.980 (SE = 0.006) and 0.982 (SE = 0.008), respectively. This differed from chance to a highly significant degree for both the MMSE and the SMQ, but the difference between the two scales was not statistically significant.As screening tests to detect dementia in the elderly general population, the SMQ which is assessed by informants demonstrates a statistically significant discriminating ability as well as the MMSE.A low, 'normal' score on the Mini-Mental State Examination predicts development of dementia after three years.To study whether a low, "normal" sumscore (i.e., 24 or higher) on the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE) near the cutpoint usually employed for identifying persons with cognitive impairment predicts later development of dementia.A prospective study of a random sample of nondemented persons aged 75 years and older, according to DSM-III criteria, with follow-ups after 3 and 6 years.The subjects were 215 persons living at home, mean age 81 years, 81% women. Their mean MMSE sumscore at the start of the study (T0) was 27.9 (range 24-30).A low MMSE sumscore at T0 was identified as a statistically strongly significant predictor of dementia after 3 years (P < .001), when more than 40% of those with a sumscore of 24 or 25 at T0 had become demented. A similar, although weaker and statistically nonsignificant, trend was observed for the risk after 6 years in relation to MMSE scoring at baseline.Persons with a sumscore of 24 or 25 and classified as not suffering from dementia according to the DSM-III criteria are at high risk of developing dementia within 3 years.Validation study of a French version of the modified telephone interview for cognitive status (F-TICS-m) in elderly women.To evaluate the performance of a French version of the modified Telephone Interview for Cognitive Status (F-TICS-m) in identifying cognitive decline among elderly women.All women aged 72-86 participating in the 'Etude Epidémiologique auprès de Femmes de l'Education Nationale' (E3N) cohort and living in or near Paris constituted the target population of the validation study. Volunteer women (n = 120) underwent both a 20-min telephone interview and a face-to-face neuropsychological examination at an interval of few days (median interval: 10 days). The telephone interview included F-TICS-m, as well as a recall of key elements of a short story, arithmetic/verbal problems and two verbal fluency tests. Neuropsychological examination consisted of a standardized battery of cognitive tests (including the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the Free and Cued Selective Reminding Test-FCSRT, Trailmaking tests A and B, the similarities subtest of the Wechsler Adult Intelligence Scale-III, etc.) the Instrumental Activities of Daily Living questionnaire, and the Geriatric Depression Scale. Neuropsychological examination led to classification of each subject as cognitively normal (n = 92) or impaired/demented (n = 28).F-TICS-m showed satisfactory internal consistency (Cronbach's alpha = 0.69). It correlated linearly with MMSE (Pearson's r = 0.72). Concurrent validity against the gold-standard classification was satisfactory, with an area under the ROC curve (AUC) of 0.83. The combination of F-TICS-m and the other telephone tests had no additional effect on discrimination power in our sample (AUC = 0.81).F-TICS-m is a valid instrument for assessing the overall cognitive status of French elderly women. Its validity in men and its reproducibility warrant further studies.Subjective memory complaints in Chinese subjects with mild cognitive impairment and early Alzheimer's disease.Mild cognitive impairment (MCI) represents a transitional state between normal aging and dementia. However, there is inconsistent opinion as to the validity of subjective memory complaints as a criterion for diagnosis.This study aimed to examine the potential significance of applying a short memory questionnaire in the assessment of Chinese subjects with MCI and early dementia.Three hundred and six ambulatory Chinese subjects were recruited. Each participant completed a short memory questionnaire. They were also assessed with the Chinese versions of the mini-mental state examination (CMMSE), Alzheimer's disease assessment scale-cognitive subscale (ADAS-Cog), category verbal fluency test (CVFT) and span tests. Severity of cognitive impairment was evaluated using the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR); subjects with CDR 0.5 were further classified into MCI not demented (MCIND) and MCI possible incipient dementia (MCIID) depending on the subscale scores of CDR.An increasing frequency of memory complaints with increasing CDR was observed (Kruskal Wallis test, chi square = 21.29, df 3, p < 0.001). With a cutoff of 3 or more memory complaints, the memory questionnaire demonstrated a sensitivity of 65.3% and 70.4% in identifying subjects with incipient and early dementia respectively. Significant associations between memory complaints and most cognitive test performance were found (Spearman's correlations, p < 0.01). Logistic regression analysis revealed that educational level, the memory questionnaire, ADAS-Cog total and delayed recall scores were significant predictors of MCIID status.The findings suggested that a short memory questionnaire is useful in the screening of MCI, particularly in subjects who already present with subtle functioning disturbances. Subjective memory complaints were significant correlated with objective performance of memory functions, reflecting the usefulness of memory complaints in the assessment of MCI.Performance on the Mini-Mental State Examination and Mattis Dementia Rating Scale among older American Indians.Optimal methods for assessing cognitive impairment among older American Indians have not been established. This study sought to examine the cultural relevance and performance of two common cognitive screening measures, the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Mattis Dementia Rating Scale (MDRS), in one American Indian population. One hundred forty American Indians ages 60 to 89 were assessed; nearly 11% scored more than 2 standard deviation points below performance expectations on the MMSE, as did 27% to 81% on the MDRS. Complex relationships were found between gender, health conditions (with possible effects on cognitive functioning), and MMSE and MDRS scores. The authors discuss implications and future directions.Assessment of instrumental activities of daily living in dementia: diagnostic value of the Amsterdam Instrumental Activities of Daily Living Questionnaire.Measuring impairments in "instrumental activities of daily living" (IADL) is important in dementia, but challenging due to the lack of reliable and valid instruments. We recently developed the Amsterdam Instrumental Activities of Daily Living Questionnaire (A-IADL-Q; note 1). We aim to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of the A-IADL-Q for dementia in a memory clinic setting.Patients visiting the Alzheimer Center of the VU University Medical Center with their informants between 2009 and 2011 were included (N = 278). Diagnoses were established in a multidisciplinary consensus meeting, independent of the A-IADL-Q scores. An optimal A-IADL-Q cutoff point was determined, and sensitivity and specificity were calculated. Area under the curves (AUCs) were compared between A-IADL-Q and "disability assessment of dementia" (DAD). The additional diagnostic value of the A-IADL-Q to Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) was examined using logistic regression analyses.Dementia prevalence was 50.5%. Overall diagnostic accuracy based on the AUC was 0.75 (95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.70-0.81) for the A-IADL-Q and 0.70 (95% CI: 0.63-0.77) for the DAD, which did not differ significantly. The optimal cutoff score for the A-IADL-Q was 51.4, resulting in sensitivity of 0.74 and specificity of 0.64. Combining the A-IADL-Q with the MMSE improved specificity (0.94), with a decline in sensitivity (0.55). Logistic regression models showed that adding A-IADL-Q improved the diagnostic accuracy (Z = 2.55, P = .011), whereas the DAD did not.In this study, we showed a fair diagnostic accuracy for A-IADL-Q and an additional value in the diagnosis of dementia. These results support the role of A-IADL-Q as a valuable diagnostic tool.Brief cognitive assessment in a UK population sample -- distributional properties and the relationship between the MMSE and an extended mental state examination.Despite the MMSE's known flaws, it is still used extensively as both a screening instrument for dementia and a population measure of cognitive ability. The aim of this paper is to provide data on the distribution of MMSE scores in a representative sample from the UK population and to compare it with an extended cognitive assessment (EMSE) which covers a wider range of cognitive domains and provides a wider range of difficulty levels.The MMSE and the EMSE were administered to over 12,000 participants at the screening stage of the MRC Cognitive Function and Ageing Study (MRC CFAS). MRC CFAS is a multi-centre population-based study in England and Wales with respondents aged 65 years and older.Normative values on the MMSE and EMSE are presented by age group, sex and level of education. There are very large differences between age groups, with smaller differences seen between the sexes and by level of education. The EMSE extends the scores at the high end of the ability range, but is no better than the MMSE at differentiating between dementia and non-dementia.Population-derived norms are valuable for comparing an individual's score to the score that would be expected among the general population, given the individual's specific demographic characteristics.Limitations of the Mini-Mental State Examination for screening dementia in a community with low socioeconomic status: results from the Sao Paulo Ageing & Health Study.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) is the most widely used instrument for the screening of cognitive impairment worldwide, but its ability to produce valid estimates of dementia in populations of low socioeconomic status and minimal literacy skills has not been adequately established. The authors investigated the psychometric properties of the MMSE in a community-based sample of older Brazilians.Cross-sectional one-phase population-based study of all residents of pre-defined areas of the city of Sao Paulo, aged 65 years or over. The Brazilian version of the MMSE was compared with DSM-IV diagnosis of dementia assessed with a harmonized one-phase procedure developed by the 10/66 Dementia Research Group.Analyses were performed with 1,933 participants of the SPAH study. Receiver operating characteristic analysis showed that the MMSE cut-point of 14/15 was associated with 78.7% sensitivity and 77.8% specificity for the diagnosis of dementia amongst participants with no formal education, and the cut-point 17/18 with 91.9% sensitivity and 89.5% specificity for those with at least 1 year of formal education (areas under the curves 0.87 and 0.94, respectively; P = 0.03). Even with these best fitting cut-points, the MMSE estimate of the prevalence of dementia was four times higher than determined by the DSM-IV criteria. Education, age, sex and income influenced MMSE scores, independently of dementia caseness.The MMSE is an adequate tool for screening dementia in older adults with minimum literacy skills, but misclassification is unacceptably high for older adults who are illiterate, which has serious consequences for research and clinical practice in low and middle income countries, where the proportion of illiteracy among older adults is high.Comparison of two scoring systems of the Mini-Mental State Examination as a screening test for dementia.The difference in validity in detecting dementia of two different scoring systems (age- and education-adjusted versus raw scores) of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), was assessed in an epidemiological study on the prevalence of dementia. A second, independent, psychometric screening tool, the Milan Overall Dementia Assessment (MODA), was also used. A group of 829 subjects over age 59 took part in the study. Subjects scoring below the cut-off point of the MMSE and/or MODA were clinically evaluated. Clinical diagnoses were adopted as the gold standard. Sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of the two tests were calculated. Our findings show that the correction for age and education of the raw score of the MMSE causes the loss of the mildest demented patients and heavily reduces the sensitivity of the screening test (from 85.7% to 71.4%), while it accounts for a moderate improvement in the specificity (from 90.0% to 96.3%). A possible explanation for this seeming paradox is proposed.Clinical utility of the mini-mental status examination when assessing decision-making capacity.The main objectives of this study were to examine the relationship between cognitive deficits, as measured by the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE), and decision-making capacity and to determine whether the sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE varied based upon the patient population assessed. Using a sample size of 152 patients and varying cutoff scores, the MMSE demonstrated extremely poor sensitivity. In contrast, the MMSE had excellent specificity when scores of 19 or less were obtained. In our sample, not one patient, regardless of diagnosis, was deemed to have capacity if their MMSE score was below 20. However, reliance on the MMSE for scores above 19 would too frequently lead to misclassification and incorrect assumptions about a patient's decision-making abilities. Although a score below 20 consistently yielded findings of incapability in our sample, it remains our opinion that the MMSE should not be used as a stand-alone tool to make determinations related to capacity, especially when considering the complexities associated with capacity evaluations and the vital areas, such as executive functioning and individual values and beliefs, which are omitted by the MMSE.Screening for cognitive impairment: comparing the performance of four instruments in primary care.To determine whether brief cognitive screening tests perform as well as a longer screening test in diagnosis of cognitive impairment, no dementia (CIND) or dementia.A cross-sectional comparison of cognitive screening tests to an independent criterion standard evaluation using Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) criteria. Performance of the cognitive screening tests for identifying dementia, and separately for identifying dementia or CIND, was characterized using sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios, and diagnostic odds ratios.Three Department of Veterans Affairs primary care clinics.Of 826 independently living veterans aged 65 and older without a prior diagnosis of dementia, 639 participated and 630 were assigned a research diagnosis.Screening tests included the modified Mini-Mental State Examination (3MS; average time to administer, 17 minutes) and three brief instruments: the Memory Impairment Screen (MIS; 4 minutes), the Mini-Cog (3 minutes), and a novel two-item functional memory screen (MF-2; 1.5 minutes).Participants were aged 74.8 on average and were mostly white or black. They were mostly male (92.9%) and had been prescribed a mean of 7.7 medications for chronic conditions. The prevalence of dementia and CIND was 3.3% and 39.2%, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity for dementia were 86% and 79% for the 3MS, 76% and 73% for the Mini-Cog, 43% and 93% for the MIS, and 38% and 87% for the MF-2, respectively.In individuals without a prior diagnosis of cognitive impairment, the prevalence of dementia was low, but the prevalence of CIND was high. The 3MS and Mini-Cog had reasonable performance characteristics for detecting dementia, but a definitive diagnosis requires additional evaluation.Epidemiological dementia index: a screening instrument for Alzheimer's disease and other types of dementia suitable for use in populations with low education level.MMSE and CAMCOG are neuropsychological scales developed for use in everyday clinical practice and epidemiological surveys.These two instruments were used as part of the assessment during an epidemiological survey in the municipality of Pylaia, Greece. The project was based on the World Health Organization Program for Research on Aging and Age-Associated Dementias (1992). It had two phases. During phase I, nursing students collected demographic data, risk factors, personal and family history data and they applied MMSE, CAMCOG and scales of everyday life functioning. During phase II, 4 physicians examined all subjects that manifested possible cognitive deterioration (MMSE<27), in order to reach a final diagnosis. The final diagnosis was made according to DSM-IV and NINCDS-ADRDA criteria. MMSE and CAMCOG were not taken into consideration in the diagnostic process. Three hundred and eighty subjects were initially screened. All were aged over 70 years. After the exclusion of subjects who were illiterate, blind, etc., the results of 277 subjects were finally analyzed. Subjects with 6 years of education or less accounted for 92.42% of the total study sample. Twelve of them (5.33%) suffered from Alzheimer's disease, 7 from vascular dementia (2.52%) and 1 suffered from secondary dementia (0.36%).MMSE exceeded 90% sensitivity at the level 22/23 and specificity at 14/15. The levels for CAMCOG were 56/57 and 43/44, respectively. This low performance of both tests is to a large extent due to the functional illiteracy of elderly individuals in Greece, to possible coexistence of mood disorders or simply to lack of cooperation. The analysis of data led to the development of an Epidemiological Dementia Index (EDI), with a scale ranging from 0 to 7. Nondemented subjects had a mean EDI of 5.12 (SD = 1.67) and demented patients had a mean EDI of 1.6 (SD = 1. 92). At the level 4/5 sensitivity was 93.33. Specificity was 93.56 at the level 2/3.Improving screening for dementia in the elderly using, Mini-Mental State Examination subscores, Benton's Visual Retention Test, and Isaacs' Set Test.The Mini-Mental State Examination score is often used as a screening test for dementia. We studied its properties for a population of French community residents, using a sample of 2,792 randomly selected subjects in Gironde, France. When the traditional cutoff point 23-24 was used, we observed a sensitivity of 1.0 and a specificity of 0.77. We sought to increase the specificity of the test, while keeping sensitivity at 1.0, with the use of logistic regression analysis. We found (1) a specificity of 0.81 when "recall three objects" and "orientation to time" were added to the Mini-Mental State Examination score; (2) a specificity of 0.90 when Benton's Visual Retention Tests and Isaacs' Set Test of Verbal Fluency were added to the Mini-Mental State Examination score and subscores; and (3) no improvement in specificity when age and educational level were included in the analyses.Predicting dementia from the Mini-Mental State Examination in an elderly population: the role of education.Our study aimed to assess whether education affects the positive predictive value of the MMSE when it is used as a screening test for dementia. The MMSE has been consistently found to correlate with education and, at the same time, education is regarded by some researchers as being of potential etiological significance for dementia. In the present study, results on the MMSE from a community-based study in Sweden were compared with two standards: the clinical diagnosis of dementia and the Katz index of daily living activities. For both these comparisons, education did not substantially change the predictive ability of the MMSE. Our data, when compared with previous studies, show that the influence of education on the predictive ability of the MMSE varies in different populations. We conclude that differential MMSE cut-off points for different educational levels or adjustment techniques for education are not universally applicable.Is the montreal cognitive assessment superior to the mini-mental state examination in detecting subtle cognitive impairment among middle-aged outpatient U.S. Military veterans?The Montreal Cognitive Assessment (MoCA) is a relatively newly designed test that was developed as a tool to screen patients with mild cognitive problems that are not typically detected by the Mini-Mental State Exam (MMSE). While early research suggests that the MoCA is more sensitive to subtle cognitive impairment than the MMSE, there is concern about potential decreased specificity when using the MoCA. The aim of the present study was to examine the comparative utility of using the MoCA and the MMSE to detect subtle cognitive impairment among a group of 82 middle-aged U.S. military veterans referred for outpatient neuropsychological testing. Using receiver operating characteristic analyses, the MoCA was shown to be a better predictor of subtle cognitive impairment on neuropsychological testing than the MMSE. When using an adjusted cutoff, the MoCA was shown to be more sensitive (i.e., 0.72 vs. 0.52) and nearly as specific as the MMSE (0.75 vs. 0.77).Memory testing in dementia: how much is enough?Analyses of eight widely used memory measures (Word List Acquisition and Recall used in the Alzheimer's Disease Assessment Scale and the Consortium to Establish a Registry for Alzheimer's Disease neuropsychology battery, Wechsler Memory Scale-Revised [WMS-R] Logical Memory I and II, WMS-R Visual Reproduction I and II, the memory scores from the Neurobehavioral Cognitive Status Examination [NCSE], memory scores from the Mini-Mental State Examination [MMSE]), and the MMSE total score showed each to have moderate predictive power in differentiating between patients with mild dementia and healthy normal controls. When these instruments were combined in a logistic regression analysis, three of them had substantial predictive power. Together, the Word List Acquisition, WMS-R Logical Memory II, and WMS-R Visual Reproduction II were 97.26% accurate (100% sensitive and 94.59% specific) in distinguishing these two groups. The Word List Acquisition is a brief test that alone had high accuracy (92%). These memory tests are highly useful in the diagnosis of mild dementia.General practitioner diagnosis of depression and dementia in the elderly: can academic detailing make a difference?The objective was to improve the ability of general practitioners (GPs) to diagnose depression and dementia compared with standard screening measures. The setting was a retirement village on the outskirts of Sydney, Australia. The study used a prepost design with a 6 month follow-up. The intervention involved a visit to the GP by an academic detailer who spent 15 minutes discussing the diagnosis of depression and dementia. Ratings of depression and dementia on two occasions by GPs, and by independent interviews were made using the Geriatric Depression Scale, Mini-mental State Examination and Canberra Interview for the Elderly. In the case of depression, the level of agreement (Kappa) between the GPs and all instruments increased significantly by a factor of between 2.3 and 3.3. The doctors did not significantly improve in their agreement with the instruments on the diagnosis of dementia. An academic detailing approach to improving GPs' abilities in the diagnosis of depression can be effective. A controlled trial would be justified to confirm this finding.Social and leisure activities and risk of dementia: a prospective longitudinal study.To study the relationship between social and leisure activities and risk of subsequent dementia in older community residents.A cohort study of people aged 65 and older were followed-up 1 and 3 years after a baseline screening (the Paquid study).2040 older subjects living at home in Gironde (France) were randomly selected and followed for at least 3 years.Information about social and leisure activities was collected during the baseline screening with an interview by a psychologist. Incident cases of dementia were detected during the first and third year follow-up screenings according to the DSM-III-R criteria.All but one of the social and leisure activities noted were significantly associated with a lower risk of dementia. Only golden club participation was not significantly associated with this risk. After adjustment for age and cognitive performance measured by the Mini-Mental State Exam, visual memory test, and verbal fluency test, only traveling (Relative risk (RR) = .48,95% Confidence Interval (95% CI) = .24-.94), odd jobs or knitting (RR = .46,95% CI = .26-.85), and gardening (RR = .53, 95% CI = .28-.99) remained significant.Regular participation in social or leisure activities such as traveling, odd jobs, knitting, or gardening were associated with a lower risk of subsequent dementia.AD8-Brazil: cross-cultural validation of the ascertaining dementia interview in Portuguese.Dementia is a global public health problem and detection in the primary care setting, particularly in developing countries, is challenging. The aim of this research was to produce the cross-cultural validation of the AD8 interview to the Brazilian Portuguese Language. The original version of the AD8 was submitted to translation, back-translation, and application of the questionnaire to 20 elderly informants for face validation. The AD8-Brazil was then evaluated in 109 community-dwelling elderly with a sociodemographic questionnaire, clinical examination, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), Katz Inventory of Activities of Daily Living (ADL), and Clinical Dementia Rating scale (CDR). The AD8-Brazil was compared with the other instruments and with the clinical diagnosis (DSM-IV) for criterion validation. There was significant agreement of AD8-Brazil with diagnosis of dementia (p < 0.001), MMSE (p = 0.047), and ADL (PFisher = 0.004). Also, the AD8-Brazil was able to differentiate the stages of dementia by CDR scale. The reliability was high (alpha = 0.818) and reproducibility analysis showed excellent inter-rater (kappa = 0.889) and test-retest consistency (kappa = 0.814). The AD8-Brazil showed excellent discrimination between CDR 0 and CDR > 0 (area under the curve 86.1%) and between CDR 0 and CDR 0.5 (area under the curve 76.9%). The administration of the questionnaire took 2.3 ± 0.1 minutes. The Brazilian version of the AD8 is a valid, reliable, quick, and easy screening instrument for dementia.Cut-off values of blessed dementia rating scale and its clinical application in elderly Taiwanese.Although the Blessed Dementia Rating Scale (BDRS), a clinical screening instrument, has been applied extensively, no suitable cut-off values and clinical application have been proposed, particularly in mild cognitive impairment (MCI), the precursor of dementia. The BDRS, Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE), and Clinical Dementia Rating Scale (CDR) were administrated in people aged 65 years and above, who were enrolled from southern Taiwan with multistep stratified random sampling and followed-up for 2 years. All subjects (total number = 3,027), with new onset of MCI (defined as CDR = 0.5) in the first year and dementia (defined as CDR > or = 1) in the second and third years were subjected to statistical analysis. In distinguishing normal from MCI, except in the literate group aged 65-74 years, MMSE was superior to BDRS, with cut-off values of 1 in both literate groups aged 65-74 years and > or = 75 years, and 1.5 and 2 in less educated groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, respectively. In distinguishing MCI from dementia, BDRS had cut-off values of 2.5 in both literate groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, and 2.5 and 3 in less educated groups aged 65-74 and > or = 75 years, respectively. These values were better than those for MMSE in all groups. BDRS might be considered as a better tool than MMSE to screen for MCI and dementia in the increasing proportion of literate elderly aged 65-74 years in the aging population.Prevalence of mild cognitive impairment by multiple classifications: The Monongahela-Youghiogheny Healthy Aging Team (MYHAT) project.To estimate and compare the frequency and prevalence of mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and related entities using different classification approaches at the population level.Cross-sectional epidemiologic study of population-based cohort recruited by age-stratified random sampling from electoral rolls.Small-town communities in western Pennsylvania.Of 2,036 individuals aged 65 years and older, 1,982 participants with normal or mildly impaired cognition (age-education-corrected Mini-Mental State scores ≥ 21).Demographics, neuropsychological assessment expressed as cognitive domains, functional ability, and subjective reports of cognitive difficulties; based on these measurements, operational criteria for the Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) scale, the 1999 criteria for amnestic MCI, the 2004 Expanded criteria for MCI, and new, purely cognitive criteria for MCI.A CDR rating of 0.5 (uncertain/very mild dementia) was obtained by 27.6% of participants, whereas 1.2% had CDR ≥ 1 (mild or moderate dementia). Among those with CDR <1, 2.27% had amnestic MCI and 17.66% had expanded MCI, whereas 35.17% had MCI by purely cognitive classification. Isolated executive function impairment was the least common, whereas impairment in multiple domains including executive function was the most common. Prevalence estimates weighted against the U.S. Census are also provided.The manner in which criteria for MCI are operationalized determines the proportion of individuals who are thus classified and the degree of overlap with other criteria. Prospective follow-up is needed to determine progression from MCI to dementia and thus empirically develop improved MCI criteria with good predictive value.Improving detection of dementia in Asian patients with low education: combining the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly.Previous work combining the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) has been conducted in western populations. We ascertained, in an Asian population, (1) the best method of combining the tests, (2) the effects of educational level, and (3) the effect of different dementia etiologies.Data from 576 patients were analyzed (407 nondemented controls, 87 Alzheimer's disease and 82 vascular dementia patients). Sensitivity, specificity and AUC values were obtained using three methods, the 'And' rule, the 'Or' rule, and the 'weighted sum' method.The 'weighted sum' rule had statistically superior AUC and specificity results, while the 'Or' rule had the best sensitivity results. The IQCODE outperformed the MMSE in all analyses. Patients with no education benefited more from combined tests. There was no difference between Alzheimer's disease and vascular dementia populations in the predictive value of any of the combined methods.We recommend that the IQCODE be used to supplement the MMSE whenever available and that the 'weighted sum' method be used to combine the MMSE and the IQCODE, particularly in populations with low education. As the study population selected may not be representative of the general population, further studies are required before generalization to nonclinical samples.Prevalence of very mild and mild dementia in community-dwelling older Chinese people in Hong Kong.In this report, the results of a household survey were used to examine the prevalence of very mild and mild dementia in Chinese older persons in Hong Kong.The study adopted a two-phase design. At Phase 1, 6100 subjects were screened using the Cantonese version of the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) and a short memory inventory. At Phase 2, 2073 subjects were screened positive and 737 were evaluated by psychiatrists. Clinical Dementia Rating (CDR) and cognitive assessment were used for diagnosis of dementia. Very mild dementia (VMD) was defined as a global CDR of 0.5, with memory and non-memory subscale scores of 0.5 or more. Mild dementia was classified for subjects with a CDR of 1.The overall prevalence of VMD and mild dementia for persons aged 70 years or above was 8.5% (95%CI: 7.4-9.6) and 8.9% (95%CI: 7.8-10.0) respectively. Among subjects with clinical dementia, 84.6% had mild (CDR1) dementia. Logistic regression analyses revealed that older age, lower educational level and significant cerebrovascular risk factors were risk factors for dementia, while regular physical exercise was a protective factor for dementia.A sizable proportion of community-living subjects suffered from milder forms of dementia. They represent a high risk for early intervention to reduce potential physical and psychiatric morbidity.Development and validation of a brief cognitive assessment tool: the sweet 16.Cognitive impairment is often unrecognized among older adults. Meanwhile, current assessment instruments are underused, lack sensitivity, or may be restricted by copyright laws. To address these limitations, we created a new brief cognitive assessment tool: the Sweet 16.The Sweet 16 was developed in a cohort from a large post-acute hospitalization study (n=774) and compared with the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Equipercentile equating identified Sweet 16 cut points that correlated with widely used MMSE cut points. Sweet 16 performance characteristics were independently validated in a cohort from the Aging, Demographics, and Memory Study (n=709) using clinical consensus diagnosis, the modified Blessed Dementia Rating Scale, and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE).The Sweet 16 correlated highly with the MMSE (Spearman r, 0.94; P<.001). Validated against the IQCODE, the area under the curve was 0.84 for the Sweet 16 and 0.81 for the MMSE (P=.06). A Sweet 16 score of less than 14 (approximating an MMSE score <24) demonstrated a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 70%, whereas an MMSE score of less than 24 showed a sensitivity of 64% and a specificity of 86% against the IQCODE. When compared with clinical diagnosis, a Sweet 16 score of less than 14 showed a sensitivity of 99% and a specificity of 72% in contrast to an MMSE score with a sensitivity of 87% and a specificity of 89%. For education of 12 years or more, the area under the curve was 0.90 for the Sweet 16 and 0.84 for the MMSE (P=.03).The Sweet 16 is simple, quick to administer, and will be available open access. The performance of the Sweet 16 is equivalent or superior to that of the MMSE.[Five by five test. A brief instrument for the detection of cognitive impediment in clinical settings].Many psychological tests for the detection of cognitive impediment and dementia are inadequate by being too prolonged, inconsistent or with poor specificity or sensibility. It is presented a brief test of evocation of proper names by classes (TIG) and their properties psicometrics and utility are compared with the Mini-mental State Examination (MEM).We selected 196 patients from a neurological clinic, with suggestive symptoms of cognitive impediment. We excluded individuals with focal or chronic cerebral disorders, sensorial disturbances, severe psychiatric diseases and toxicity by drugs. Patients were by grouped the Clinical Dementia Rating scale and they were evaluated neuropsychologically. The internal consistency of TIG was examined and a cross-validation procedure was performed to test for the predictive validity. Likewise, the convergent validity was tested against the scale of dementia of Blessed and the MEM. Finally the diagnostic efficiency of both tests, the effects of the demographics variables and the clinical utility were analyzed. We used non-parametrics statistics, analysis of sensibility upon curves ROC and analysis of the post-test probabilities.The TIG has adequate internal consistency and validity. The diagnostic efficiency was high (area under the curve ROC 0,939 [IC 95%: 0,908-0,971], p < 0,0001). The introduction of the demographics covariates in a logistic model wisely improved the diagnostic efficiency. The TIG has some better fulfillment than the MEM. Neither the MEM nor the TIG are tests suitable for communitary screening of cognitive defect.The TIG is briefer, easier to apply and more efficient than the MEM. Possibly it is useful to detect cognitive impediment in clinical contexts. This study is preliminary.The Mini-Mental-37 test for dementia screening in the Spanish population: an analysis using the Rasch Model.Our aim was to analyze the psychometric properties of the Mini-Mental State Examination-37 using the Rasch Model (RM) in order to identify the cognitive domains that optimize detection of dementia in the Spanish population. All participants (n = 3955) were part of the NEDICES (Neurological Disorders in Central Spain) cohort study designed to detect dementia in persons aged 65 years and older. Clinical diagnosis of dementia (n = 178) was established by consensus of expert neurologists according to the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM-IV) criteria. Results indicate that the items on the MMSE-37 have a good fit with the assumptions of the RM. None of the items on the MMSE-37 exhibits differential item functioning in relation to the groups. The items that assess orientation, attention, and language (repetition and comprehension) are those that best enable us to discriminate between the group with dementia and the group without dementia. The implications of the education and other sociodemographic characteristics of the population are discussed.Premorbid cognitive testing predicts the onset of dementia and Alzheimer's disease better than and independently of APOE genotype.To determine whether a cognitive test package can predict the onset of dementia up to 11 years later, and the extent to which this prediction is independent of that provided by APOE genotype.Prospective cohort study based on 54 general practices in the UK; 657 survivors of the 1088 participants in the MRC treatment trial of hypertension in older adults were followed for up to 11 years; 370 participants (57% of survivors) were traced, screened for dementia, and genotyped for APOE in 1994. Baseline assessments included trail making test A, paired associated learning test, Raven's progressive matrices, and national adult reading test. At follow up, both mini-mental state examination and CAMCOG were used. Outcome measures were DSM-IIIR dementia and NINCDS-ADRDA possible and probable Alzheimer's disease.All the cognitive tests completed in 1983 predicted onset of dementia and Alzheimer's disease up to 11 years later, as did APOE genotype. Cognitive test performance was not associated with APOE genotype. Addition of cognitive tests increased the area under the ROC curve for the prediction of Alzheimer's disease provided by age, family history, and APOE genotype (0.81 v 0.69, p = 0.048); addition of APOE genotype did not increase the area under the ROC curve for the prediction provided by age, family history, and cognitive tests (0.81 v 0.77, p = 0.28).Simple tests of cognitive ability provide useful predictive information up to a decade before the onset of dementia. The predictive information provided is independent of, but not enhanced by, the addition of APOE genotype.The accuracy of the MMSE in detecting cognitive impairment when administered by general practitioners: a prospective observational study.The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) has contributed to detecting cognitive impairment, yet few studies have evaluated its accuracy when used by general practitioners (GP) in an actual public-health setting.We evaluated the accuracy of MMSE scores obtained by GPs by comparing them to scores obtained by Alzheimer's Evaluation Units (UVA).The study was observational in design and involved 59 voluntary GPs who, after having undergone training, administered the MMSE to patients with symptoms of cognitive disturbances. Individuals who scored < or = 24 (adjusted by age and educational level) were referred to Alzheimer's Evaluation Units (UVA) for diagnosis (including the MMSE). UVAs were unblinded to the MMSE score of the GP. To measure interrater agreement, the weighted Kappa statistic was calculated. To evaluate factors associated with the magnitude of the difference between paired scores, a linear regression model was applied. To quantify the accuracy in discriminating no cognitive impairment from any cognitive impairment and from Alzheimer's disease (AD), the ROC curves (AUC) were calculated.For the 317 patients, the mean score obtained by GPs was significantly lower (15.8 vs. 17.4 for the UVAs; p < 0.01). However, overall concordance was good (Kappa = 0.86). Only the diagnosis made by the UVA was associated with the difference between paired scores: the adjusted mean difference was 3.1 for no cognitive impairment and 3.8 for mild cognitive impairment. The AUC of the scores for GPs was 0.80 (95%CI: 0.75-0.86) for discriminating between no impairment and any impairment and 0.89 (95%CI: 0.84-0.94) for distinguishing patients with AD, though the UVA scores discriminated better.In a public-health setting involving patients with symptoms of cognitive disturbances, the MMSE used by the GPs was sufficiently accurate to detect patients with cognitive impairment, particularly those with dementia.Simplifying detection of cognitive impairment: comparison of the Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination in a multiethnic sample.To compare detection of cognitive impairment using the Mini-Cog and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and to identify sociodemographic variables that influence detection in an ethnoculturally diverse sample.Cross-sectional.A registry of the University of Washington Alzheimer's Disease Research Center Satellite.A heterogeneous community sample (n=371) of predominantly ethnic minority elderly assessed using a standardized research protocol, 231 of whom met criteria for dementia or mild cognitive impairment (MCI).Demographic data, a standardized research protocol for cognitive assessment and dementia diagnosis, MMSE, and Mini-Cog.Both screens effectively detected cognitive impairment, the Mini-Cog slightly better than the MMSE (P<.01). Overall accuracy of classification was 83% for the Mini-Cog and 81% for the MMSE. The Mini-Cog was superior in recognizing patients with Alzheimer-type dementias (P=.05). Low education negatively affected detection using the MMSE (P<.001), whereas education did not affect the Mini-Cog, and low literacy minimally affected it.The Mini-Cog detects clinically significant cognitive impairment as well as or better than the MMSE in multiethnic elderly individuals, is easier to administer to non-English speakers, and is less biased by low education and literacy.[A comparison between 2 abbreviated Spanish versions of mental status assessment in the diagnosis of dementia. Study data on elderly community residents].There are several Spanish versions and adaptations of the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE), the most used abbreviated test for screening of the cognitive decline in clinical and epidemiological setting. Among them, the Mini-Examen Cognoscitivo (MEC) is highlighted. The aim of this study was to compare the diagnostic usefulness between the Spanish translation of the MMSE (the MMSE1 which incorporates the proof of serial "sevens" and the MMSE2 which includes spelling "world" backward) and the MEC for the diagnosis of dementia.A sample of elderly persons (65 years or over), included in a population-based study of dementia prevalence. The diagnosis of dementia was assessed through exhaustive neuropsychological evaluation. The diagnosis of dementia (according to the standardized DSM-III-R criteria) was carried out by expert neurologists, who were independent and blind to the scores obtained in the MMSE and MEC.79 subjects underwent both tools and neuropsychological assessment. The MMSE1 obtained the highest accuracy (92%), followed by the MEC (90%) and the MMSE2 (83%). The analysis of the areas under receiver operating characteristic curves did not show significant statistical differences between the MMSE1 and MEC (p = 0.38), but significant differences were observed between those and the MMSE2 (p = 0.01).The diagnostic usefulness of Spanish translation of the MMSE is similar to the MEC. The proof of spelling "world" backward obtained poorer results than serial "sevens". The Spanish versions of the MMSE should be improved to be adapted to our cultural characteristics.